KTLAby:John A. Moreno(Credit: KTLA)A shooting in the Vermont Vista neighborhood of South Los Angeles on Saturday left one man dead and three other people wounded, police said.The incident happened about 4:20 p.m. in the 8800 block of South Figueroa Street (map), where one female and three male victims were struck by gunfire, said Sgt. John Gregozek of the Los Angeles Police Department’s Southeast Division.One of the victims, a 26-year-old man, died at the scene, according to Gregozek. Two of the injured — one male and one female — were transported to hospitals in unknown condition.The fourth victim, a male who likely suffered a graze wound, was treated at the scene and released, the LAPD said.Police described the shooter or shooters as one or two black men.It was unknown whether the incident was gang related, Gregozek said.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.ST. LOUIS•   Police on Thursday released more details about the Christmas Eve shooting downtown that left one man dead and three wounded.The man found shot to death in the street near the 7-Eleven in the 200 block of North 17th Street was Christopher Johnson, 20, of St. Louis. He was shot in the chest and pronounced dead at the scene.He was shot when two men got out of a car in the 1600 block of Olive Street about 5:30 p.m. and opened fire on the four victims, who were all near each other.Two men were critically wounded – a man, 54, was shot in the face and another man, 32, was shot in the chest.Another man, 35, was shot in the buttocks. He was expected to survive.The 7-Eleven was closed on Thursday. A sign on the door said it would re-open at 11 p.m.No arrests had been made.Johnson lived inthe 4400 block of Bircher Boulevard in St. Louis, police said.Editor's note: This story has been revised to reflect that while one shooting victim died in the 200 block of North 17th Street, police say the shooting occurred in the 1600 block of Olive Street.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.MenuTwo families ripped devastated by the murders of their loved ones came together for a memorial service.Family and police are still pleading for tips, while praying for one another.Inside a Grosse Pointe Park home, a prayer service was held to celebrate the life of Paige Stalker.The 16-year-old honor student at University Liggett was gunned down in Detroit last December 22nd.To this day, no one has been arrested for her murder, despite a reward of more than $162,000.Paige's family has also become close with the family of Christina Samuel, a 22-year-old college graduate and aspiring law student killed just days after Paige.There's also been no arrest for Christina’s murder - despite numerous tips.What has happened is an outpouring of support from the community, including two separate scholarships in Paige’s name through Beaumont Hospital and her old school.A park will also be dedicated in memory of both girls, along the border of Detroit and Grosse Pointe Park.Tonight night at 11, the family of Christina Samuel opens up in an emotional interview you'll see only on 7.NewsByHelen PowPublished:18:48 EDT, 28 December 2012|Updated:22:06 EDT, 28 December 201211ViewcommentsA 24-year-old woman has been arrested for buying the assault rifle used to murder two innocent firefighters on Christmas Eve, on behalf of the killer.Dawn Nguyen of Rochester, New York, was a former neighbor of William Spengler, 62, who shot dead firefighters Michael Chiapperini and Tomasz Kaczowka in a shocking ambush as they responded to a house fire he started early Monday morning.Three other people were wounded before Spengler killed himself.According to police, Nguyen purchased the AR-15 semiautomatic rifle and a 12-gauge shotgun on behalf of Spengler,a convicted felon who was barred from possessing weapons,on June 6, 2010.Accessory: Nguyen is pictured after her arrest on charges connected to the guns used in the Christmas Eve ambush slaying of two volunteer firefightersSpengler is believed to have picked out the weapons himself at a firearm store in Henrietta, New York.The young woman faces a federal charge of knowingly making a false statement, U.S. Attorney William Hochul said, and is also charged with a state count of filing a falsified business record.The gunman also had a .38-caliber revolver in his possession on the day of the shootings, but Nguyen is not connected to that gun. Police used the serial numbers on the weapons to trace them to Nguyen.Killer: William Spengler had previously served 17 years in prison for killing his elderly grandmother'She told the seller of these guns, Gander Mountain in Henrietta, N.Y., that she was to be the true owner and buyer of the guns instead of William Spengler,' Hochul said.'It is absolutely against federal law to provide any materially false information related to the acquisition of firearms.'During an interview late on Christmas Eve, Nguyen told police she had bought the guns for personal protection and that they were stolen from her vehicle, though she never reported the guns stolen.The day after the shootings, however, Nguyen texted an off-duty Monroe County Sheriff's deputy with references to the killings and later admitted to him that she bought the guns for Spengler.Police said that information was consistent with a suicide note found near Spengler's body after he killed himself.The .223-caliber Bushmaster rifle, which had a combat-style flash suppressor, is similar to the one Adam Lanza used to shoot dead 20 children and six female staff at Sandy Hook Elementary school in Newtown, Connecticut, earlier this month.Nguyen and her mother, Dawn Welsher, lived next door to Spengler in 2008 - when Nguyen was just 20 years old.On Wednesday and again on Friday, shortly before her arrest, she answered her cellphone and told The Associated Press that she didn't want to talk about Spengler.Her brother, Steven Nguyen, told the Democrat and Chronicle newspaper of Rochester that Spengler stole the guns from Dawn Nguyen.Bushmaster: Nguyen allegedly bought the Bushmaster rifle, pictured, for William Spengler and he used it to shoot two firefightersHome: Dawn Nguyen was arrested at her home, pictured, at 249 Alpine Road in Rochester, New YorkSpengler set a car on fire and touched off an inferno in his Webster home on a strip of land along the Lake Ontario shore, took up a sniper's position and opened fire on the first firefighters to arrive at about 5:30am on Christmas Eve, authorities said. He wounded two other firefighters and an off-duty police officer who was on his way to work.A Webster police officer who had accompanied the firefighters shot back at Spengler with a rifle in a brief exchange of gunfire before the gunman killed himself.Spengler spent 17 years in prison for killing his grandmother in 1980. His neighbors said he confessed his criminal past within 15 minutes of them meeting, and even pointed to the staircase where he committed the crime.'He said, "I was on drugs and I wanted money for drugs and my grandmother wouldn't give it to me,"' Amy Warner, who bought the cottage next to Spengler's home with her boyfriend this summer, toldNew York Magazine.She said they tore out the staircase 'because it was creepy,' but didn't think twice about buying the house because Spengler had served his time.Her home was one of seven destroyed by the fire Spengler started.Trap: This billowing inferno in Webster, New York, was lit by William Spengler, before he opened fire on the firefighters who responded to the blazeBrave: Webster police Lieutenant Mike Chiapperini (left) and Tomasz Kaczowka, (right) a 911 dispatcher, both volunteered for the West Webster Fire Department. They were gunned down on Monday morningBurning: A bystander watches while seven homes in a street in Webster, New York, burnedInvestigators still haven't released the identity of remains found in William Spengler's burned house.They have said they believe the remains are those of his 67-year-old sister, Cheryl Spengler, who also lived in the house near Rochester and has been unaccounted for since the killings.The Spengler siblings had lived in the home with their mother, Arline Spengler, who died in October. Police found a rambling, typed letter laying out Spengler's intention to destroy his neighborhood and 'do what I like doing best, killing people.'He had been released from parole in 2006 on the manslaughter conviction, and authorities said they had had no encounters with him since.Nguyen faces a maximum penalty of 10 years imprisonment, a fine of $250,000 or both.Published by Associated Newspapers LtdPart of the Daily Mail, The Mail on Sunday & Metro Media GroupThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — Five teens were hospitalized after a shooting Monday night in Englewood.Around 9:40 p.m., the group was standing on the sidewalk in the 5700 block of South Green Street when someone opened fire from a green minivan, said Officer Janel Sedevic, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.A 17-year-old girl was shot in gthe chest, another 17-year-old girl was grazed in the abdomen and a 16-year-old girl was shot in the left foot. They were all taken to Stroger Hospital, Sedevic said.A 16-year-old boy was shot in the right leg and another 16-year-old boy was shot in the right leg and right hand. They were both taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, Sedevic said.All the teens were listed in stable condition, Sedevic said.No one is in custody for the shooting, which appears to be gang related, Sedevic said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Two people are dead and three others wounded following a shooting at Kay's Lounge in Sarasota early Sunday morning.According to the Sarasota County Sheriff's Office, the incident occurred around 1:20 a.m. at the 4034 N. Washington Blvd. bar.Deputies say Todd Thompson, 24, of Bradenton and Vincent Dipina, 26, of Sarasota were both killed. Terrell Harris, 23, and Takila Hayes, 26, both sustained non-life-threatening injuries. A fifth victim suffered injuries from broken glass while trying to assist those who had been shot. Deputies have no released that person's identity.The three male victims were found initially and were airlifted to a trauma center, the sheriff's office said in an email to media. The fourth victim, a woman, drove herself to Sarasota Memorial Hospital.Deputies have not released suspect information at this time, but ask that anyone who has information about the crime call 941-861-4900. Anonymous tips may also be submitted by contacting Crime Stoppers at 941-366-TIPS or online atwww.sarasotacrimestoppers.com.Image via ShutterstockTo request removal of your name from an arrest report, submitthese required itemstoarrestreports@patch.com.WAYNESBORO, MS (WDAM) -Copyright 2014 WDAM. All rights reserved2362 U.S. Hwy 11 MoselleMoselle, MS 39459(800) 844-9326A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.ROCKFORD — Six years after a Rockford woman tragically lost her daughter and two grandsons in a quadruple homicide, she says she's chosen to forgive the killer.“By the grace of God, he has given me peace,” said Rolanda Collins, who spent the anniversary of their death last weekend surrounded by family. There was no special memorial or tribute, just a place of love, she said.Collins' daughter, Martia Flint, was at home with her two sons, Tyrone Smith III, 6, and Tobias K. Smith, 4, and her boyfriend, Demontae Rhodes, on Dec. 20, 2014, when all four were shot to death.Calvin L. Carter, 28, who has ties to Rockford and the St. Louis area, was convicted of the killings and sentenced to four life terms plus 280 years in prison.More:‘They deserve to be celebrated’: Hundreds mourn loss of slain Rockford familyMore:Calvin Carter sentenced to four life terms plus 280 years for killing 4Since the trialended in 2017, Collins has relocated to Milwaukee, Wisconsin, where she has joined World Outreach and Bible Training Center. Her new church home has provided support and comfort over the years, and that's where she found the strength to forgive Carter.“There’s a group at the church called the Healing Clinic. I ended up going there one day because I needed healing. It was imparted to me that I needed to forgive my daughter’s murderer in order to become free.“I decreed and declared, ‘I forgive you Calvin Carter, for what you took from me, for what you did to my daughter and my grandchildren.’ I said it and I said it from my heart. My life has not been the same since. I have found so much peace and I’ve developed a deeper level with Christ.”She’s gotten involved with church organizations that work in the community.“Being a victim of domestic violence myself and suffering the loss of my family members and loved ones, I’ve made it a priority [to help] other families who are deemed high risk due to domestic violence. It’s as prevalent here as in Rockford.”Within the last year, Collins has also started journaling.A Mother’s Prayerwas formed in 2015 with a mission of neutralizing violence, restoring hope in the community and transforming youths’ minds. It was founded based on Collins' tragedy and loss, but since her move, it’s been dormant.That’s about to change.She's relaunching A Mother's Prayer in Wisconsin to help women in abusive relationships. Collins said she was once in one and then after learning about her daughter’s relationship, she felt called to be a resource for other victims.“We’re looking for a building to house people or assist people who are in need of transitional housing or a safe house,” she said.The organization will also help them obtain an order of protection.She wants other women to know their value and self-worth.“I want to encourage them and build them up,” she said.If a woman finds herself in a domestic violence situation, Collins said the first step is for them to ask themselves ‘Who am I?’ so they can acknowledge their self-worth. From there, they must seek help from loved ones.“One thing my daughter didn’t do is she didn’t tell me, she told everybody else but me,” she said. “What hurts me more than anything is my daughter didn’t give me the opportunity to help her.”Collins encourages women to get to a safe place.“Once there, you can take action,” she said. “There is nothing anyone can (do to) justify why they put their hands on you or demean your character.”A Mother’s Prayer is Collins' way of keeping her daughter’s legacy alive.“Because he got sentenced to life, that equals justice for some, but it doesn’t for me,” she said. “I’m sure the Rhodes family would agree. That doesn’t equal justice for us. That doesn’t bring our children back. That doesn’t make us feel better.“I still get angry at times, but when I look at A Mother’s Prayer and what’s about to be birthed and transpire I know there’s a platform God is escalating me to so I can help others who are victims of a violent crime such as this.”A Mother’s Prayer is seeking sponsors and is collecting donations such as winter clothes for women, coats, boots and more. People can call her at 414-544-3791 or email atCollinsrolanda@icloud.comto schedule a drop-off. All messages will be returnedwithin 24 hours, she said.Cash donations can be sent via Cash App $UniqueStyles713.Andrea V. Watson:awatson@rrstar.com;@andreavwatson12WATCHVIDEOSBy providing my email address, I agree to theTerms of Useand acknowledge that I have read thePrivacy Policy.Eyewitness News Weekend UpdateNY to receive 85% decrease of J&J vaccine next weekNY warning residents about sites charging for COVID-19 vaccineTake a journey into the past and reminisce about great moments in Philadelphia history© 2021 The Philadelphia Inquirer, LLCTerms of Use/Privacy Policy/California NoticeCalifornia residents do not sell my data request© 2021 The Philadelphia Inquirer, LLCTerms of Use/Privacy Policy/California NoticeCalifornia residents do not sell my data requestOne of the five people hospitalized aftera drive-by shooting in Overtown this past weekendhas died, police said Thursday.Julian Bryant, 22, died Wednesday night, Miami Police said.Bryant was among a group of people who were standing in front of 1311 Northwest 2nd Avenue when a black SUV drove by and someone opened fire Sunday night.Witnesses said 20-30 shots were fired. Victims ranged in age from 17 to 54.The motive for the shooting remains unknown. Police are still looking for the SUV.Anyone with information is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.MISHAWAKA — One man is charged with illegally carrying a handgun in connection with a shooting that injured four people after a party swelled to hundreds of people at an event center in southeastern St. Joseph County.Rodney Taylor, 34, was arrested on a single count of being a serious violent felon in possession of a handgun after police responded to gunfire at the Oaks at Southpaw Farm, 16323 Roosevelt Road, early Sunday morning.County police were still working to identify possible suspects in the shooting, Lt. Matt Blank, a spokesman, said Wednesday. He said Taylor was part of the investigation, but it was unclear if he was suspected of taking part in the gunfire.Three of the victims were hospitalized with non-life-threatening injuries Sunday morning, and a fourth ran away from the scene of the shooting. None of the victims had provided police with information about possible shooters."We're getting very little cooperation," Blank said. "This thing's kind of moving real slow at this point."Terrance Shorter, 22; Armond Davis, 21; and Brandon Burton, 21, were among those injured.Police who responded to the shooting found a chaotic scene, as party-goers tried to run away before officers could secure the area. Police estimated about 500 people attended the event.Blank said management at the Oaks likely had no idea the party, which was originally billed as a much smaller event, would end in violence."I think they're more the victim here than anything," he said. "I'm quite sure they had no idea" the event would spiral out of control.The Oaks is operated by a Christian organization called Point of Light Ministries, according to its website. The 77-acre property once belonged to former Major League Baseball pitcher Jamie Moyer, who converted the large barn into an 11,000-square-foot home. A reporter's call to the facility went unanswered Wednesday.According to court documents, the shooting Sunday broke out on the back deck of the house. Security guards may have also been involved in an altercation around the time the shooting broke out, according to the documents.Police found Taylor in an upstairs bedroom. A black-and-silver handgun was allegedly found in his pocket. He previously served time in federal prison for his role in a bank robbery, the court documents said.574-235-6480csheckler@sbtinfo.com@jcshecklerSuccess!An email has been sent with a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.The news you need to start your day, sent weekday mornings.The day's top 5 news headlines, sent weekday evenings.MenuNewport News, Va. - Five people were shot during a reported fight outside Deju Vu restaurant in Newport News on Tuesday night.Newport News Police responded to the restaurant in the 6100 block of Jefferson Avenue around 8:30 p.m. after receiving calls reporting the shooting.An investigation revealed that several people were shot when a fight broke out between two groups of people.Police found out that three of the victims had arrived at a local hospital emergency room. A fourth victim was found at nearby Crittenden Middle School and transported to a local hospital.Police were later notified that a gunshot victim had also arrived at the Hampton VA Hospital before being transferred to another hospital. That person was determined to be the fifth victim in the shooting incident.All five victims are men, ages 28, 32, 42, 45, and 59. They are all being treated for non-life threatening injuries.Newport News Police Detectives say the investigation is a top priority right now. They were back out at the scene in the 6100 block of Jefferson Avenue on Tuesday morning.Investigators paid extra special attention to a black SUV. It's marked with at least two bullet holes and is parked in the same area where the victims were shot."It was like, boom boom boom boom boom boom boom and then it was like silence, then it was like bam bam bam bam bam and then it went boom boom boom like a shotgun would make," said a man who heard the shooting.He was too afraid to be identified, but lives nearby. He says he was standing on his back porch when it all went down."I seen one gentleman, he had a handgun because I could see the muzzle fire off of it, because he was shooting back at the truck," he says.That neighbor says there have been problems here before, but nothing like last night.If you have any information that, take action and call the Crime Line at 1-888-LOCK-U-UP.Report a typoThe gunman who shot and wounded four people in front of a Brooklyn baby shower was in a gang beef with the baby daddy of the mother-to-be, police said.The father of the unborn child is affiliated with the Crips gang, police said.The gunman, who was still at large Monday, was believed to be acting on behalf of an opposing gang when he opened fire in front of Remsen Hall on Remsen Ave. in Brownsville on Sunday night, police said.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Memphis police officers are investigating a shooting at a bikini bar that sent four people to local hospitals on Friday morning.Police were called to Pure Passion at 1849 East Brooks Road just before 4 a.m. where multiple shots were fired in the parking lot.Two victims, ages 19 and 24, were taken to Regional Medical Center. The 19-year-old victim is in critical condition. The 24-year-old victim was shot in the leg; she is in non-critical condition.An 18-year-old victim was driven to the hospital by someone who was on the scene. A fourth victim was driven to Methodist University Hospital. He was shot in the arm and listed in non-critical condition.According to investigators, the shots were fired into a crowd from someone in a white car.Keto Brown was in his hotel room, not too far from the crime scene."I did hear the gunshots in the hotel, but I didn't think nothing of it because in this area, it's like that sometimes," he said.Randy Williams, who is the club's Promoter, said the shooting happened next door rather than on their property."There was no problem inside the club. No shooting on this parking lot," he said. "Everything went good for the night."The Thanksgiving Day shooting is not the first time Pure Passion has been in the news. In 2008, Shelby County District Attorney's Officeshut the club down for illegal drug useand drug sales following a 4-month-long investigation.The club eventually reopened.Most recently, in April 2014,a 25-year-old man was killed and another was rushed to the hospitalafter witnesses told police someone opened fire into their car."There has been a few problems before, but recently we haven't had any problems at all," Williams added.If you have any information about the shooting that sent four people to hospitals, call Crime Stoppers at 901-528-CASH.Copyright 2014 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WATCHVIDEOSSan Francisco shooting sceneMenuAccomack County, Va. – A 23-year-old man is behind bars after officials in Accomack County say he fired at a home and shot four people inside.This happened on Parksley Road on November 23rd. Authorities were notified about the incident at 1:55 a.m.The four victims were all taken to Riverside Shore Memorial Hospital for treatment. They are considered stable at the moment.Deputies say this happened during an argument at a party. They arrested and charged 23-year-old Jaquan Cortez Portier of Hopeton who was taken into custody in Pungoteague.He has been charged with discharging  a firearm in an occupied building, aggravated malicious wounding, use of a firearm in the commission of a felony and possession of a firearm by a convicted felon.He is now in the Accomack County Jail with no bond.If you have any information about this crime, please call the Accomack County Sheriff’s Office at 757-787-1131 or 757-824-5666.Report a typoDENVER (CBS4)– The identity of a man shot to death at a bar on Federal Boulevard early Sunday morning has been released.The coroner says Kevie Durham, 24, was killed in the shooting at a bar called The Beach located near Federal Boulevard and 16th Avenue.Kevie Durham performed as KL Tha General (credit: Facebook)Durham was one of five people shot during some sort of fight at the bar. The others suffered injuries that weren’t considered life-threatening.Durham was an up-and-coming rap singer from Denver known as KL Tha General. He was scheduled to perform this Saturday.Durham’s music producer Russ P. called him one of the most talented rappers in Denver.“Literally I think he might actually have been my first client,” Russ P. said.Kevie Durham performed as KL Tha General (credit: Facebook)Durham’s music videos and songs show tens of thousands of views and downloads online. Russ P. says his career was about to take off as he was planning to move to Atlanta.Friends say Durham was a man devoted to his family and his career.“He was really was the last person that I expected this to happen to,” Russ P. said. “This guy really had a chance, with his talent, to go places with it.”The Beach on Federal Boulevard (credit: CBS)Officers are still interviewing hundreds of possible witnesses. They don’t know exactly what happened or if Durham was targeted.“At this point we don’t know what the motive was behind this shooting,” Ron Hackett with Denver police said.Friends and family are planning a benefit for Durham’s family Tuesday night atOver There Off Hampden Bar and Grille. Agofundme.compage has also been set up to help pay for funeral costs.Domestic violence was the driving force behind the shooting deaths of four people last month in Sisseton, according to Attorney General Marty Jackley.Colter Arbach, 22, used two guns to kill Vernon Renville Jr., Angela Adams, Candice Labelle and himself on Nov. 22 at a home in Sisseton, Jackley said at a press conference Friday in Sisseton.Arbach also injured Karissa Dog Eagle in the attack, shooting her several times.Jackley said Dog Eagle and Arbach were involved in a relationship, and that Dog Eagle had ended the relationship on the morning of Nov. 22.Arbach had punched her three times that night inside a house on Fourth Avenue.Dog Eagle and Adams planned to contact family members after the altercation, Jackley said."They were going to call a mother. When Karissa told that to Colter, he grabbed the .223 and began shooting in a very rapid fashion," Jackley said.Arbach used a .223 rifle and a 12-gauge shotgun to fire on Renville Jr., whose body was found next to the driver's side door of a Kia vehicle. The bodies of Labelle and Adams were found on the other side of the vehicle. Both passenger side doors of the Kia were open."Karissa was shot several times in the back," Jackley said.Arbach's body was found outside the home, as well. A total of 18 spent shell casings from the .223 and three shotgun shells were found outside the home. Arbach's blood alcohol content was .123, over the legal limit to drive, but no other drugs were found in his system.Autopsies confirmed that all the victims had died of gunshot wounds.State investigators worked alongside law enforcement from the Sisseton-Wahpeton Sioux Tribe to piece together the events surrounding the shooting, Jackley said.Tribal Secretary Robin Quinn thanked police for their help and thanked state and national supporters for their help during what she called a trying time for the community."I'm asking that our community stay in your prayers and we work to heal," Quinn said.A fund has been established for the victims' families atgofundme.com/hrg674."I would encourage South Dakotans to contribute to that," Jackley said.PITTSBURGH (KDKA) – Clairton and Allegheny County Police continue to investigate after a half-dozen people were shot overnight inside what investigators describe as a “speakeasy.”It was about 3:30 a.m. when Clairton Police got a number of 911 calls about gunfire that began inside the establishment on the 600-block of Miller Avenue.On Friday afternoon, workers from the City of Clairton made sure no one would go back into the building, which is now condemned.A group of young men, not believed to be local to Clairton, confronted a group already inside and then the gunfire rang out.“From what we’re piecing together, it sounds like there was a group of young men who arrived, who are not local to Clairton. We’re not sure where they’re from, and shortly after they arrived, there was some type of fight and then the shooting following thereafter,” said Allegheny County Police Lt. Andrew Schurman.In all, six people were shot, and victims as well as patrons scattered. Two were in serious condition at mid-day. Three people were transported to hospitals from the scene. Three other victims showed up later at area hospitals by their own means.All of the victims are men in their early 20s.The gunfire started in the building, but may have spilled out into the street.“There is a car that showed up at one of the hospitals with bullet holes in it, so it may have,” said Lt. Schurman.The sign on the door said members only 21 or older, but investigators called what went on inside as a speakeasy where liquor was sold without a license.“In speaking with the Clairton police, the understanding that I have is that this establishment is not a licensed business, and in some capacity, they are selling alcohol illegally,” said Lt. Schurman. “They used the term ‘speakeasy’ to describe it. Obviously, they were looking into what was going on in this  building prior to the shooting.”Allegheny County Police are continuing to investigate and look for witnesses.Anybody with information about the shooting is asked to call Allegheny County Police.You May Also Be Interested In These Latest News Stories[display-posts category=”news” wrapper=”ul” posts_per_page=”4″]Join The Conversation On The KDKA Facebook PageStay Up To Date, Follow KDKA On TwitterWATCHVIDEOSFatal shooting near Humboldt ParkAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorMIAMI– A man who was killed in a Liberty City shooting over the weekend has been identified as Vincent Miller, 49.Three others were injured in the Saturday night shooting near Northwest 54th Street and 14th Avenue.Miami police said Miller was rushed to Jackson Memorial Hospital's Ryder Trauma Center where he died from his injuries.The three other victims were also taken to the hospital, where they were still recovering on Sunday.Police said a motive for the shooting wasn't immediately known.Follow Local 10 News on Twitter@WPLGLocal10Copyright 2014 by Local10.com. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Five people were shot and wounded when a gunman opened fire in a Pomona park Saturday night, police said.Officers were called to Palomares Park at 499 E. Arrow Highway at about 7:55 p.m. after reports of shots fired from a nearby vehicle, police said.Three men and two women who “frequent the park” suffered gunshot wounds and went to Pomona Valley Medical Center, said Lt. Ron McDonald. They were reported in stable condition.The gunman remains at large.Investigators are trying to determine if the attack was gang-related. The victims range in age from 31 to 56, McDonald said.Twitter:@CarlaRiveraLatThe perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsCarla Rivera is an assistant editor in Metro who previously covered higher education for the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsTwo men were in critical condition after being shot in Compton on Friday night.Four males suffered injuries in the incident, which occurred on 136th Street at around 11:45 p.m.Two were transported to local hospital in critical condition, while the others were treated at the scene and released, according to the Los Angeles Sheriff’s Department.Local news from across Southern CaliforniaIt is unknown what led up to the shooting or if it was gang related at this time, and the incident is under active investigation.Trending:LOS ANGELES (CNS) – Four men were hospitalized today with gunshot wounds received late Friday, authorities said.Two of the shooting victims suffered critical injuries, one requiring surgery and two others escaped the shooting attack with less serious injuries, a Los Angeles County Fire Department dispatcher said.It happened about 11:45 p.m. near the intersection of East 126th Street and North Compton Avenue, Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department Lt. Jason Wolak said.Two of the victims were in their early 20s, and the other two in their late 30s, Wolak said.All were gathered outside an apartment when a suspect, or suspects, began firing, Wolak said.The shooting was being investigated by a gang unit, he said.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.WATCHVIDEOSSan Francisco police said four people were shot in San Francisco's Mission District Wednesday night.WREG.comby:Jessica Gertler,George BrownMEMPHIS, Tenn — Police are searching for a group of men who shot five people in Raleigh.One of the victims, a woman trying to break up the fight, was shot in the head.Witnesses said the shooters didn’t care who they hit when they opened fire at the Lexington Apartments near the intersection of Yale and Ramill Roads.Witnesses said the trouble started in a white car and green car, both of which police had towed from the scene.Witnesses said a group of guys in each of the cars were yelling back and forth at each other in the middle of the complex Wednesday afternoon.One witness told WREG a woman tried breaking up the fight when she was shot in the head, and the next thing you know, bullets were flying everywhere.Four other men were hit.Kids were coming home from school as officers were collecting evidence. The children were escorted through the crime scene.“It is really sad. These apartments are really nice. It’s just the people who live in the apartments that are making it rough over here,” Betty Morris said.Morris was shaking when she pulled up to the complex. Thankfully, her husband who works there wasn’t hurt.“I was hoping he was OK. He was fine,” she said.Family members said some of the victims live at the complex, and the woman shot was on vacation visiting her boyfriend.What’s even worse, they said one of the victims just got out of the hospital after being shot last month.“It is sad. The violence needs to stop. It really does. It needs to stop,” Andrea Jennings, who lives next to the complex, said. “Everybody wants to be the bad man. Everybody wants to run around with the guns. It’s everywhere. It’s everywhere! It’s sad.”While a man was put in the back of the cruiser, police said no arrests have been made as of Wednesday night.Police did not release a description of the suspects, but said they are looking for three to four men.As of Wednesday night, three victims were in critical condition at Regional Medical Center, and two others were expected to be OK.WREG will keep you updated on this story.Submit(NEXSTAR) – Pfizer and BioNTech requested Friday that the U.S. Food and Drug Administration grant emergency use approval to start administering the COVID-19 vaccine to children ages 12 to 15.The companies said in a news release that they plan to request the same authorization – which could help children return to classrooms sooner – from other regulatory authorities around the world this week.SHELBY COUNTY, Tenn. — Shelby County Sheriff’s Office detectives announced they arrested a man for a homicide on Hacks Cross Friday morning.SCSO said Theodore Cohen, 29, is charged with Second Degree Murder.KNOXVILLE, Tenn. (WATE) — How bad do you want some of Dolly Parton's limited edition ice cream?The limited-run of Dolly Parton's Strawberry Pretzel Pie Ice Cream by Jeni’s Splendid Ice Cream was so popular that it caused the company's site to crash on Thursday.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.QUEENS — An ex-con was arrested Thursday night, nearly six months afterhe opened fire on another man outside a busy Sunnyside nightclub, wounding four bystanders,policesaid.Traevon Robinson, 23, who had violated the parole he was on for a 2011 Queens burglary, was picked up at his South Jamaica home for the Oct. 19 shooting outsideAllure Club and Lounge, 33-02 Queens Blvd., an NYPD spokeswoman said.Robinson, who can be seen in a gray sweater in video released by police, faced charges of felony assault and reckless endangerment, police said.Robinson and another man, who had not been arrested as of Friday morning, were arguing outside the watering hole about 10:45 p.m. when they drew their guns and started shooting, NYPD officials said.Four clubgoers were hit by the crossfire, police said. A 37-year-old man was hit in the chest while the other three, a 19-year-old girl, 23 and 28-year-old men were each hit once in the leg, police said.They brought themselves to area hospitals, officials said.An NYPD spokeswoman said she did not know why Robinson was arguing with the other shooter.Robinson was convicted in 2011 for a burglary and served about 2 years and 8 months behind bars until he was released on parole in April 2014, records show.NYPD officials did not have a description of the second suspect.Next inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityNext inAstoria & Long Island CityCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Four teenagers opened fire on a Brooklyn street, spraying bullets that hit four different men, police said Sunday.The four attackers, all believed to be between the ages of 14 and 16, were wearing black hoodies when they began shooting Saturday at around 10:30 p.m., police said.Police said their bullets injured four men on Lenox Road in Prospect Lefferts Gardens: a 50-year-old who was shot in the chest; a 46-year-old who was shot in the leg; a 19-year-old who was shot in the foot; and a 19-year-old who was shot in the leg.All four were hospitalized in stable condition and were expected to survive, police said.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.With 58 outbreaks tied to indoor dining in the past week, Gov. Whitmer is urging people to get carry out rather than eat inside.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.People spend all day staring at their phones, so when they get into the float therapy tank in Clarkston, they're introduced to a new kind of immersion. One separated from stress and anxiety that comes with the current events we keep up with.New details from the deadly US Capitol riot show Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand: “Clear the Capitol.”Franmil Reyes homered twice and Zach Plesac pitched seven dominant innings after getting an early lead to give the Cleveland Indians a 4-1 win Friday night over the Detroit Tigers, who scratched starter Julio Teheran just before the first pitch.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.A Georgia couple wanted to continue taking trips and long walks with their 16-year-old dog who had become immobile, so they created a specialized mobile dog bed just for their beloved Cocoa.The number of Americans applying for unemployment benefits rose last week to 744,000, signaling that many employers are still cutting jobs.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Stockton police have called in the state Department of Justice after a series of weekend shootings left five people dead.Watch report: Rash of Stockton homicides has police chief asking for helpOfficer Joe Silva said Stockton police resources were stretched thin by the three separate crime scenes, so the department requested help from DOJ forensic evidence technicians.Related:5 people shot to death within 4 hours in StocktonThe technicians processed the last crime scene, where three people were shot and killed and a fourth was wounded early Sunday morning in the parking lot of a March Lane shopping center.Police have not identified the victims or released a motive for the attack.However, the family members of one of the March Lane victims told KCRA 3 that one of the people shot to death was their relative, Carlita.No last name was provided. The family gave us a photo of Carlita, who is pictured with her 18-month-old daughter.Sunday night, Dallas Bidwell's family identified him as another victim in the March Lane shooting. Bidwell was 19 years old.His relatives said they had no idea why anyone would want to kill the teen.The shooting on March Lane came just hours after a 28-year-old man was shot and killed in a family dispute at a home in the 1500 block of Bordeaux Avenue.Andy Hem, 21, has been arrested in that case.About 10 minutes after that shooting, police received a report of another shooting that claimed the life of a 26-year-old gang member. No names or further details have been released in the incident.KCRA 3's Melinda Meza contributed to this report.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.The New York City man accused of shooting four people outside the downtown Level Bar & Lounge in October is now facing charges in connection to the incident.The New York City man accused of shooting four people outside the downtown Level Bar & Lounge in October is now facing charges in connection to the incident.Calvin Dennis, 27, is due to appear in Oneida County Court on Friday for 13 charges, including three counts of attempted second-degree murder, two counts each of first-degree and second-degree assault, and two counts of attempted first-degree assault. He also is charged with criminal possession of a firearm, second-degree and third-degree criminal possession of a weapon and menacing a police officer.Dennis is accused of opening fire on a crowd outside the Bleecker Street bar at about 2:15 a.m. Oct. 11. Exactly what prompted the shootings, however, has not yet been revealed.The following individuals – all from Utica – were struck by gunfire, but they survived their injuries: Adrian Liggins, 31; Memphis Delacruz, 22; Ezra McLean, 33; and Rodney Pearson, 23.Dennis was shot by Utica police Officer John Scaramuzzino as he fled the scene and was immediately taken into custody. Scaramuzzino and a New York state trooper had been nearby when the shooting occurred as part of a patrol funded by a state grant to combat gun violence.Dennis has not faced any charges related to the shooting until now.Follow @OD_LaDuca on Twitter or call him at 792-5037.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Uticaod  ~ 221 Oriskany Plaza, Utica, NY 13501~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.ByAssociated PressandZoe Szathmary for MailOnlinePublished:14:29 EDT, 9 October 2014|Updated:02:55 EDT, 10 October 20146ViewcommentsTwo boys, ages 7 and 10, and two adults were found slain inside their suburban upstate New York home, authorities said Thursday as they sought the public's help in their investigation.The adults were a 37-year-old man and a 39-year-old woman, but officials weren't saying how the four were related.The victims' names were being withheld while relatives were notified, Albany County District Attorney David Soares said during a news conference in Guilderland.Officials refused to comment about whether the deaths, which were discovered Wednesday afternoon, were a murder-suicide or whether the victims were targeted.'At this point, we don't believe the neighbors have much to fear,' Soares said.Local media, however, have reported the victims were a family.Guilderland Police Chief Carol Lawlor speaks during a press conference Thursday as Albany County District Attorney David Soares, left, and New York State Police Capt. Scott Coburn look onSlain: Officials say the two adults were a 37-year-old man and a 39-year-old woman. Police aren't saying how the four people found were relatedPolice were still at the scene where the homicides were discovered ThursdayPolice, seen Wednesday, have said they had to enlist help from interpreters to question people for their ongoing investigationAuthorities didn't say how the four were killed. Autopsies being conducted Thursday will determine the cause of death, Soares said.Officials said the four were of Chinese descent, but disclosed no other information. Police said they had to enlist help from interpreters to question people for their ongoing investigation.Soares said the boy attended classes in the Guilderland school district.The home where the bodies were found is in a busy residential and commercial stretch of a road just west of Albany.Several police vehicle remained at the scene Thursday.Soares and police are asking anyone who may have seen anything suspicious around the home Wednesday afternoon to contact investigators on a telephone tip line: 1-800-448-3847.The victims had ties to a Chinese restaurant, called King's Wok Restaurant, according to local media reports.'Right now, I'm still not believe what happened,' a female employee toldNews10on Wednesday.'Do you know why this may have happened to them?' the unnamed woman also said. 'She's not hurt somebody. People really kind. Everybody's friends. In the Albany area, we're all friends. We know each other.'Fellow employee C.C. Chen toldThe Times-UnionThursday that the victims are relatives of Kam Lo, who owns King's Wok.Lo owns the home where the victims were found, the newspaper reported.'We just saw them yesterday,' Chen told The Times-Union. 'They always come to the restaurant.'Local media reported the victims had ties to a Chinese restaurantPolice secure the scene of the quadruple homicide WednesdayThe slain adults sometimes worked at King's Wok, two women claiming to be family members toldWNYT.Chen Lin, a friend of the family, toldNews 10'They are nice. I know there's two boys and the wife and the husband. The husband was a funny guy.'Guilderland Elementary School Principal Allan Lockwood wrote a letter about the two boys on Thursday, the affiliate stationreported.'It is with profound sadness that I write this letter to our Guilderland Elementary community,' Lockwood wrote. 'Earlier this morning, police confirmed that two of our young students, a fifth grader and a second grader, were among the victims of yesterday's tragic crime on Western Avenue in the Town of Guilderland. Police have not released the names of the victims, pending notification of all next of kin, and so we cannot share further details about the students at this time.'Lockwood wrote that 'a team of counselors, school psychologists, and social workers will be providing support to any students, faculty or staff members in need throughout the coming days.'Published by Associated Newspapers LtdPart of the Daily Mail, The Mail on Sunday & Metro Media GroupWREG.comby:Ashley ForestMEMPHIS, Tenn. — A Memphis man is behind bars Saturday after police say he shot and killed two people in the 1400 block of Gherald Street in October of 2014 during a robbery.Police say 20-year-old Antwon Young and another male approached a group of males demanding their money.Young and the other male began shooting at the men, killing Juan Pedro Garcia and Alvaro Casillas Becerra and severely injuring two others.Antwon Young will is scheduled to be in court on Monday.Submit(NEXSTAR) – Pfizer and BioNTech requested Friday that the U.S. Food and Drug Administration grant emergency use approval to start administering the COVID-19 vaccine to children ages 12 to 15.The companies said in a news release that they plan to request the same authorization – which could help children return to classrooms sooner – from other regulatory authorities around the world this week.SHELBY COUNTY, Tenn. — Shelby County Sheriff’s Office detectives announced they arrested a man for a homicide on Hacks Cross Friday morning.SCSO said Theodore Cohen, 29, is charged with Second Degree Murder.KNOXVILLE, Tenn. (WATE) — How bad do you want some of Dolly Parton's limited edition ice cream?The limited-run of Dolly Parton's Strawberry Pretzel Pie Ice Cream by Jeni’s Splendid Ice Cream was so popular that it caused the company's site to crash on Thursday.POMONA >> Four men were hospitalized in stable condition after gunfire erupted in the drive-through of a Mexican restaurant Saturday, police said.The shooting took place just after 6:40 p.m. at Alberto’s Mexican Food, 1925 West Holt Ave., east of Fairplex Drive, Pomona police Sgt. Steve Congalton said in a written statement.The victims were inside a car that was in the drive-through of the restaurant just before the shooting“An altercation took place between the occupants of the vehicle and suspect that were on foot,” Congalton said. “Moments later, shots were fired and four individuals were hit.”A motive in the shooting remained under investigation, though detectives suspected it was gang-related, Congalton said.All four wounded men were flown by helicopter to area hospitals, where they were listed in stable condition, police said. Their ages or cities of residence were not released.No description of the suspects was available.Police were investigating the shooting as attempted murder.Anyone with information was asked to contact Pomona Police Department detectives at 909-620-2085. Tips may also be submitted anonymously via L.A. Regional Crime Stoppers at 800-222-8477.We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailingmoderator@langnews.com.2126 Charlie Hall BoulevardCharleston SC 29414(843) 402-5555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.PHILADELPHIA (CBS) — Police are investigating a quadruple shooting in North Philadelphia.It happened around 5 a.m. Sunday along the 2800 block of Hope Street in the city’s Fairhill neighborhood.Investigators tell CBS 3 that a group of people got into an argument and then gunfire erupted.Police say four people were shot and wounded, including a 17-year-old boy who was pistol whipped in the head, and then shot in the ankle. A 30-year-old was shot three times in the legs. A 41-year-old man suffered a graze wound to the back and a 37-year-old man was struck in the thigh.The victims were all taken to Temple University Hospital in stable condition.Witnesses tell police the shooter was a Hispanic man. He and an accomplice drove off in a dark-colored vehicle.No arrests have been made.You may also be interested in these news stories:[display-posts category=”sports” wrapper=”ul” posts_per_page=”5″]A second teen was arrested Tuesday in the shooting of 15 people at a Miami nightclub.The 16-year-old juvenile was charged with one count of accessory after the fact (attempted first degree murder) and 14 counts of accessory after the fact (aggravated battery) for his alleged role in the Sept. 28 shooting at The Spot.The teen told police he was at the club during the shooting but denied knowing the other person charged, 17-year-old Will Campbell, who was arrested Monday, according to the arrest affidavit.But Campbell told detectives Monday that he knew the 16-year-old and that they were both in the club on the night of shooting, the affadavit says. Detectives also said that Campbell’s and the 16-year-old’s Facebook accounts showed pictures of the two together.Police believe Campbell was the triggerman in the mass shooting at The Spot. Campbell is being charged with attempted first-degree murder and 14 counts of aggravated battery with a firearm.Police Chief Manuel Orosa said detectives had been looking for Campbell throughout the weekend before taking him into custody Monday afternoon. Police said Campbell has been talking with detectives with his mother present.Chief Orosa said the shooting stemmed from a fight at Norland Senior High School.“One of his friends got involved in a fight, and when [he] and his friends arrived at The Spot, they found the other person involved in the fight there," Orosa said. "He was told that [another patron] was the other juvenile involved in the fight. So he took out a gun and shot that juvenile, who’s in critical condition at Jackson Memorial Hospital. He also shot at the crowd as he was running away, hitting 14 other people."Police said since Campbell is still under 18, he will go through the juvenile justice system for now.Orosa said Campbell didn’t have much of an arrest history. The chief said Campbell had arrests for obstructing a police officer and possession of marijuana.Campbell was arrested just days after The Spot's manager Tiffany Johnson was arrested and given a notice to appear in court for allegedly selling liquor without a license.Johnson, 31, was arrested after agents found bottles of liquor behind the bar during an inspection of the facility. The bar only had a license to sell beer and wine.FOX 2by:George SellsST. LOUIS, MO (KTVI)-More violence overnight as shots ring out in different parts of the city of St. Louis.  At least one of those shootings was fatal.Police found two men shot inside a car outside of a bar on 7th Street in the Soulard neighborhood. Investigators are still trying to figure out exactly what happened, but witnesses said both men had been inside the bar, Cuz’ Bar & Grill, earlier in the night.The shooting occurred in the parking lot around 3:00am Saturday. The car the two men were in then idled across the parking lot and struck the building.One of the men later died as a result of the shooting. The other man remains in critical and unstable condition. There is no motive for the shooting.Two shot outside Soulard bar. Among three shootings with nine victims overnight.@FOX2nowpic.twitter.com/Jfz1w9kE4e— George Sells (@GeorgeSells)September 27, 2014There were two other shootings in north St. Louis overnight.  A woman and her 4-year-old child were wounded in a drive by shooting around 11:00pm Friday in the 5900 block of Kennerly. The woman and her child were both shot in the leg.  They are all in stable condition. Later, a man showed up at the hospital also suffering from a gunshot wound related to this incident.Five people were shot in another drive by shooting around 2:30am Saturday in the 2000 block East John Avenue. All  the victims are adults and are listed in stable condition. Police are looking for four or five suspects.Police so far do not have any suspects or a motive for these shootings.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.DARLINGTON COUNTY, SC (WMBF) - Two suspects surrendered to Darlington County officials and have been charged following a September 26, 2014 fatal shooting.Bianca A. Moore, 31, died Tuesday, October 7, 2014 in a local hospital from injuries stemming from being shot, according to Darlington County Coroner Todd Hardee.Alonzo T. Russell Jr., 30, of Florence, turned himself into Darlington County Sheriff's Office. He was wanted for the possession with the intent to distribute marijuana and possession of crack cocaine, according to Sheriff Wayne Byrd.Brice S. Russell, 28, of Florence, has been charged with the same crimes as those of Russell, Jr.A total of five suspects have been arrested and charged in the Darlington shooting.  According to the Darlington County Sheriff's Office:Alonzo Russell Sr., 64, was charged with possession with intent to distribute marijuana and possession of crack cocaine.Sylvester Lamont Jordan, 26, was charged with three counts of attempted murder and possession of a weapon during the commission of a violent crime.Damaino Nicholas Thomas, 30, was charged with the same crimes as Jordan.Five people were shot early Friday, September 26 after a drug deal apparently went bad, according to the DCSO.Officials were notified of the shooting at about 1:39 a.m.; it took place in the 600 block of Turner Drive in the Palmetto area of Darlington County.The injured victims were taken by a private vehicle to a local hospital before law enforcement arrived on scene. According to a news release from DCSO, one female victim was in critical condition with a gunshot wound to the head."The incident appears to be the result of a drug deal gone badly," Sheriff Wayne Byrd stated.DCSO is working with the State Law Enforcement Division to determine what happened. More information will be released as the investigation continues.Anyone with information on this case is asked to call DCSO at 843-398-4501.Copyright 2014WMBF News. All rights reserved.918 Frontage Rd. EastMyrtle Beach, SC 29577(843) 839-9623A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.CHARLESTON — Gov. Jim Justice vowed to keep fighting for a compromise personal income tax plan between himself ...WHEELING — U.S. Sen. Shelley Moore Capito returned from a recent visit to the United States-Mexico border, and ...CHARLESTON — Another variant of the COVID-19 coronavirus has been found in West Virginia, state officials said on Friday.

The South African ...WHEELING — When it comes to basketball, even the fair weather fans know that the sport is a game of runs. That certainly showed during Wheeling ...WHEELING — It isn’t surprising that crosses are a part of the Rev. Richard Skaggs’ everyday life. The man’s a priest, after all.

What ...In the midst of a global pandemic that has crippled private-sector companies (but not local, county or state governments, of course), that has created massive levels ...I awoke to what sounded like the repetitive ringing of a telephone from half a century ago. When fully awake, I realized the sound I heard was that of an ambitious ...John L. Bland Jr., 78, of West Alexander, PA died at home on April 8, 2021, surrounded by his wife, two daughters, grandson, and his 2 dogs, Mikey and Dukie. 

John ...By MATTHEW DALY Associated Press
WASHINGTON (AP) — President Joe Biden's  $2.3 trillion plan to transform America's infrastructure includes $16 billion to plug ...Read a digital version of the newspaper on your computer, tablet or smart phone using either an app or a web browser.Employment News ›Today's breaking news and more in your inboxAdvertising affords you the opportunity to give people reasons to do business with you rather than your competition.Copyright © The Intelligencer | https://www.theintelligencer.net | 1500 Main Street, Wheeling, WV 26003 | 304-233-0100 |Ogden Newspapers|The Nutting CompanyAPTOPIX Tennessee Daily LifeXzavier Miles, 2, rests on his mother Juanita Miles' lap during opening day of the Annual Mid-South Fair at The Landers Center in Southaven, Miss., Friday, Sept. 19, 2014. The fair has found a home in Mississippi where thousands of people from all over the mid-south enjoy the fun filled action the fair offers during its 10-day run. (AP Photo/The Commercial Appeal, Mark Weber)(Mark Weber)Here are some news and notes around Mississippi today:In Batesville,two men are dead after an early Saturday shooting at a rural grocery store near Batesville.Panola County Coroner Gracie Grant-Gulledge says the dead men are 20-year-old Quendez Robinson and 24-year-old Rodrick Scurlock. Gulledge says Robinson died of a gunshot wound after being taken to Tri-Lakes Medical Center, while Scurlock died at the store in the Curtis Station community, about 7 miles northwest of BatesvilleBoth were shot about 1 a.m. at the Hilltop Grocery, where a party was apparently in progress. At least two other people were shot and are recovering.Panola County Sheriff Dennis Darby tellsWATN-TVthat two gang rivals may have argued. Deputies say a fifth person may have also been grazed by a bullet. Officials are currently questioning several people.In Jackson,Hinds Community College will expand its nursing and allied health programs in Jackson after agreeing to move Mississippi State extension service employees to college property in Raymond.The Hinds County Board of Supervisors voted Sept. 2 to accept the swap.The college will gain use of 11.5 acres and two buildings. President Clyde Muse says one building will be renovated to house classrooms. The property adjoins the college's current nursing and allied health programs near Central Mississippi Medical Center.The college could use the property for a surgical simulation center to help train students. Plans also call for a lodge for families of burn victims being treated at the hospital.The 11 extension service employees will relocate to Eagle Ridge Conference Center in Raymond, possibly as early as Christmas.In Vicksburg,members of the Mayor's Health Council hope to work out a plan under which the Vicksburg farmers market can accept electronic benefits transactions as part of a plan to improve the health of Vicksburg residents."If we don't get people healthier, they're always going to be sick and depending on the government's pockets," said council member Vanessa Prentiss, who teaches health classes at Kings Empowerment Center. "This is our city, and we want our city to last and our people to last."Council member Gail Kavanaugh, nutrition director for the Vicksburg Warren School District, told The Vicksburg Post (http://bit.ly/YZ48V8) the system could involve the farmers market manager accepting EBTs -- electronic food stamps -- and issuing tokens that can be traded to market vendors, or allowing farmers to accept EBT payments at their booths.The ability to accept EBT transactions would allow more access to fresh fruits and vegetables for low-income residents, Kavanaugh said. EBT is accepted at several farmers' markets around the state, she said."It's very important for the community to know this is in the best interest of farmers and the community," she said.So far, the move has been a tough sell to farmers, she said."Many of them are skeptical and don't want the government involved in their business," she said.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad Choices© 2021 New York Public Radio. All rights reserved.Four young men were shot at a home in East Elmhurst, Queens last night, and the NYPD says the suspected gunman is still at large.According to cops, officers found the four injured men at 32-14 106th St., near Northern Boulevard around 9:50 p.m. last night.CBS 2 reportsthat a house party was going on at the time, and there were two 25-year-old victims, one 24-year-old victim and one 34-year-old victim. One man was shot in his arm, two were shot in their torso and head, and one was shot in the face; all four were transported to Elmhurst General Hospital in stable condition.An investigation revealed that shortly before cops arrived, an unidentified gunman approached the group of men who were hanging out at the residence. Authorities say that after the victims greeted him, the gunman pulled out a rifle and fired off about five shots before fleeing; no arrests have been made at this time.Last night's shooting was one of three in the borough.The Post reportsthat woman sustained a graze wound to her head in Far Rockaway at about 10:30 p.m., and another man was hit with a BB gun bullet in Rosedale at 9:50 p.m. Both victims are expected to survive.By submitting your information, you're agreeing to receive communications from New York Public Radio in accordance with ourTerms.Do you know the scoop?Commentbelow orSend us a TipGothamist is a website about New York City news, arts and events, and food, brought to you by New York Public Radio.arrowSign up for our newsletter! Share your email address to get our top stories each day.By submitting your information, you're agreeing to receive communications from New York Public Radio in accordance with ourTerms.© 2021 New York Public Radio. All rights reserved.SubscribeAccountActivationManage accountLOG OUTSix people were wounded, one critically, in an early morning shooting Sunday outside a downtown after-hours club, Anchorage police said.Officers were called to the Kodiak Bar, 225 E. Fifth Avenue, at 4:25 a.m. for a reported shooting, the police department said in a news release.Victims told police that a group of family and friends were standing outside the Kodiak when an argument between one person and two suspects led to gunfire.Six people were hit. According to police, Jonah Silva, 20, received a life-threatening gunshot wound to the abdomen. As of Sunday evening, police spokeswoman Anita Shell said, he was still believed to be in critical condition.Randi Popalii, 33, was shot in the foot. Willie Popoalli, 34, was shot in the back. Dorothy Tialino, 20, was shot in the shoulder.Tasi Silva, 21, was shot in the waist and knee. Derrick Parson, 21, was shot in the forearm. None of their wounds were considered life-threatening by police.Police are looking for two male suspects.The Kodiak stays open after normal bar closing hours as an "after hours" club offering food and music -- but no alcohol -- until 5 or 6 a.m., the establishment says on its Facebook page. A planned name change to Club Nocturnal is in the works.The victims did not know the suspects before the morning of the shooting, police spokeswoman Shell said.On Sunday, police closed Fifth Avenue between Cordova and Barrow streets for hours while APD crime scene investigators worked.The Kodiak was closed. An apparent bloodstain remained on the sidewalk near the corner of East Fifth Avenue and Barrow Street.Alaska NewsAnchorageMichelle Theriault Boots is a reporter who covers news and features about life in Alaska, and has been focusing on corrections and psychiatric care issues in the state. Contact her at mtheriault@adn.com.A drive-by shooting at a gas station on South Orange Blossom Trail early Saturday sent four people in their twenties to the hospital, officials said.The shooting happened just after 3 a.m. near the Kwik Stop's Kaley Avenue entrance, according to Orange County Sheriff's Office Sgt. Neil Mitchell.Officials say shots were fired at the group "loitering" near the gas station from a passing vehicle with multiple men inside.The victims were taken to Orlando Regional Medical Center with non-life-threatening injuries, Sheriff's Office spokesman Jeff Williamson said.The shooting victims have been identified as Thomas May, 26, , Joseph Edwards, 28, , Demetria Childers, 27, and Roger Montgomery, 29.Deputies continue searching for the suspected gunmen, Williamson said.A description of the suspect's vehicle hasn't been released."There was a description but we rather not put that out considering it may not be accurate," Mitchell said.Tiffany WaldenRecommendedWATCHVIDEOSGunfire erupts again in South LA; 8 injuredTrending:CORRECTION: In an earlier version of this story, the location of the shooting was incorrect.Five people were injured in an early morning shooting in Highland, an official said.The shooting was reported at 12:03 a.m. Tuesday at an apartment complex in the 25100 block of Fifth Street, according to a San Bernardino County sheriff’s news release.The four female victims and one male victim, all between the ages of 18 and 24, were hanging out in a garage when an unknown man walked up and opened fire, the release stated.The five victims were taken to Loma Linda University Medical Center. An 18-year-old woman was in critical condition, and a 21-year-old man was in moderate to critical condition, the release said.The gunman is at large and the motive is unknown.Contact the writer:psurowski@pe.com, 951-368-9567, follow him on Twitter at@PeterSurowskiandlike him on Facebook.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A 30-year-old man was fatally shot and three others were injured during a drive-by shooting at an Auburn Gresham lounge early Sunday.The men were in a lounge in the 8300 block of South Halsted Street around 2:35 a.m. when someone drove past in a light colored car and opened fire. A 30-year-old was shot in his chest and transported to Advocate Christ Medical Center in critical condition. He was later pronounced dead, said Officer Ana Pacheco, a Chicago police spokeswoman.The man was identified as James McCoy, of Peoria, according to the Cook County Medical Examiner's Office.A 39-year-old man was also taken to Christ Hospital in stable condition after being shot in his buttocks. A 32-year-old man was shot in his chest and taken to Stroger in serious condition. A 41-year-old was shot in the ankle and in good condition at Little Company of Mary Hospital, Pacheco said.Police had been called to the club before the shooting — at 1 a.m. and 2:10 a.m. — for noise, theTribunereported. There were 200 to 300 people reportedly inside and outside the club when police responded the first two times, theTribunesaid.No one is in custody for the shooting.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.(WMC) - Volunteers turned out to take back their neighborhood Thursday.They hit the streets in Frayser after a shooting that left five people hurt. Like a swarm of bees, volunteers invaded the area clearing out blight and eliminating hiding places near Corning Avenue and Steele Street."It looks different. So if it looks different, it feels different. And if it feels different, it must be different," said one person who lives in the area.The shootings offive men Wednesday nightat the nearby Corning Village Apartments actually brought people together for this positive event quickly organized by the nonprofit LifeLine 2 Success.The group's executive director, DeAndre Brown, told WMC Action News Five, "It made me angry. Then it made me sad. Our children need to know our neighborhood is safe. They need to know adults will be adults and do the right thing and life is valuable"The Blight Patrol, which contracts with the city, provided services for free. The event ended with block party and cookout.Meanwhile, police have released no new information on what sparked the shooting that left five people injured.Four of the five victims have been released from the hospital, but one remains in critical condition.Copyright 2014 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Police say four people were injured in a shooting early Sunday in Queens when two men got out of a car and fired more than 20 rounds at the victims.Two of the victims--a 27-year-old man who was shot in the back and a 26-year-old man who was shot in the chest--are in critical condition. The other two sustained less serious injuries: A 19-year-old man was wounded in the hand and a 23-year-old woman was wound in her stomach and hip.The shooting happened at 153-38 118th Ave. in South Jamaica shortly before 6 a.m., according to the NYPD. Police say the unknown shooters fled the scene in a black-and-silver Audi.All four of the victims were taken to Jamaica Hospital.WATCHVIDEOSBy providing my email address, I agree to theTerms of Useand acknowledge that I have read thePrivacy Policy.Eyewitness News Weekend UpdateNY to receive 85% decrease of J&J vaccine next weekNY warning residents about sites charging for COVID-19 vaccineCLARKSVILLE, Tenn. – Two men were shot dead and six people were injured in four separate shootings in only five days, leading Clarksville police to ramp up patrols this weekend and ask some businesses to close early.As of Friday evening, no arrests had been made in any of the cases.The latest shooting came Thursday night. Shortly after 9 p.m. Clarksville police were called to the 100 block of Chapel Street, where they found 24-year-old Fran Daniel Caratini of Clarksville on the ground behind one of the apartments.Caratini, called "Frankie" by his friends, died at the scene. He did not live in the apartment complex and it was unclear why he was there.On Wednesday, six people were injured in two separate shootings just four hours apart. Clarksville Police Department spokeswoman Natalie Hall said police had no definitive evidence Friday that any of the shootings were related.Victim linked to slain manLast Sunday, another Clarksville man — the uncle of Caratini's young son — was also found shot to death.Andre Mitchell, 27, of Clarksville was found dead in the backseat of a vehicle behind a Waffle House on Fort Campbell Boulevard in Clarksville on Aug. 10, according to a CPD press release. At about the same time, Oak Grove Police responded to a call of shots fired at Club Gravity and found shell casings in the area. That case remains unsolved.Clarksville bail bondsman Jamie Kojac Thomas said Caratini came to see him just two hours before his death Thursday because he had failed to appear in court on a DUI charge on Tuesday. Thomas could have locked him up because a bench warrant had been issued, but Caratini told him that he had arranged through his attorney to appear in court Friday.Caratini had his young son with him and told Thomas that the boy's uncle had been murdered last week."He said his baby's mama's brother was the one found dead (Sunday)," Thomas said. "That kind of floored me."Caratini asked Thomas not to lock him up Thursday night and promised he would appear in court Friday. Thomas said Caratini was a repeat client, and he had posted bond for him over the years on charges ranging from aggravated assault to speeding. Most of the charges were alcohol related, he said. Caratini was scheduled for a violation of probation hearing Sept. 8.He said he had become friendly with Caratini over the years and was upset when he got the call about his death. Caratini had two children, he said.Clarksville Police have not said there is a gang connection.Extra patrolsPolice Chief Al Ansley said there will be extra patrols this weekend "in specific areas of interest" to prevent further violence."We are on top of it," he said Friday afternoon. "We have extra people on the street. We know what's going on ... We are being proactive to all the violence."He said a number of businesses agreed to help police by closing early this weekend. He did not name the businesses, but said he appreciates their cooperation.All of the shootings remain under investigation.Detectives went door to door at the apartments on Chapel Street on Friday, talking to people who live in the apartment complex.'Too much drama'A number of small groups gathered on porches outside to talk to one another Friday, but while several said they knew Caritini, or "Frankie" as they called him, no one saw what happened.A man who asked not to be identified said his girlfriend heard a gunshot Thursday night and he went outside to find Caritini laying on the ground at the corner of an apartment building. His young step-daughter saw the man too, but by then a number of other people had come outside to see what was happening, he said."I heard the commotion going on and when I came out, he was just laying there," the man said.He said he did not know who shot Caritini, a man he knew only in passing.Karen Judge said she arrived home after police arrived Thursday night and was worried only about the safety of her two granddaughters who are spending the summer with her."I stay to myself because there's too much drama," she said. "I don't bother nobody and nobody bothers me."Six shot on WednesdayPolice were busy Wednesday with two separate shootings that injured six people.Two men were injured after gunfire was apparently exchanged between two vehicles on Caldwell Lane and Edmondson Ferry Road. A light-colored sedan and black sedan were seen driving on Edmondson Ferry Road as a woman heard continuous gunfire at about 4:44 p.m., according to a police report.A few minutes later, three men were found in a light-colored Toyota Camry sedan stopped at the intersection of Emory and Stafford streets shortly before 5 p.m., and two of them had been shot.Front seat passenger Christopher Fletcher, 28, was shot in his left shoulder. Backseat passenger Christopher Harris' head was grazed by a bullet. Both were taken to Gateway Medical Center for treatment.The driver, Shawnquavi Kelly, 22, was not injured.Police found a handgun inside the car, along with a small amount of marijuana, according to police reports.About four hours later, four people were shot on Treeland Drive after the driver of a white Ford pickup opened fire on a Cadillac parked in front of a home at about 8:55 p.m.. The Ford F-150 and a white car that was driving behind it both took off at a high rate of speed toward Trenton Road.Taylor Barger, 20, of Clarksville was shot in her leg and hip. She was found laying on the ground about 10 feet from the home. Donavon Smith, 27, was shot in his upper left leg. A 16-year-old was shot in one finger while looking out his bedroom window. Lacy McIntire, 21, was shot in her left calf, according to police reports. All were taken to Gateway Medical Center for treatment.According to a police report, the Cadillac Fleetwood sustained the majority of damage from the gunfire. Bullet holes were also found throughout the home.Police found 24 shell casings on Trenton Road. The police report lists the type of weapon used as a rifle.Police seek helpThe Clarksville Police is asking anyone with any information on Caratini's case or Mitchell's case to contact Detective Chris Nolder at 648-0656, ext. 5341.Anyone with information about the Caldwell Lane shooting is asked to call Detective Nick Newman 648-0656, ext. 5340, or Detective David Bramel at ext. 5161.Anyone with information about the shooting on Treeland Drive can call Detective Dennis Honholt at ext. 5260 or Detective Kagan Dindar at ext. 5434.To remain anonymous, call the Crime Stoppers TIPS Hotline at 931-645-TIPS (8477).Stephanie Ingersoll, 245-0267City government and crimesingersoll@theleafchronicle.comTwitter: @StephLeafA family affected by a drive-by shooting describes how the experience affects their lives long after the initial bullet wounds heal.NEW ORLEANS — It was a shooting that grabbed the headlines on TV newscasts and in newspapers. In August 2014, there was a breaking news flash that two were dead and five wounded in a drive-by shooting in the Lower 9th Ward.Later, more breaking news came as the NOPD caught five suspects. Then over the years, the suspects wound their way through the criminal justice system and courts. Afterwards, the headlines stopped.Behind the breaking news banners of the past are lives forever changed. There's a first grader who now has to feel the furniture and walls to get to his room."I was wondering why I couldn't see anything when I first woke up," said Kyle Romain, remembering his time in the hospital after the gunfire hit him.When it happened, Kyle had just started kindergarten and was just playing on the front porch with his siblings after school. His mom stepped out to ask what they wanted for dinner. That's the last image he would ever see."I birthed five healthy kids and for you to take that from me, take my son's eyesight, take my other son and had a piece of skull missing, I don't feel like it's fair, you know.  It's not God's creation. It's man, so it hurts me to my heart every day," said Alanna Romain.READ MORE:Voices: Another view on gun violence|Community members unite, pray to end gun violence in LafayetteKyle is just one face behind the 'five wounded' headline. The barrage of bullets, intended for someone else, took his sight. Because they were destroyed, doctors had to remove his eyeballs."I asked them what blind was. I was afraid, like what if I couldn't walk around and I couldn't even know which I do, or where should I go," Kyle said.Also playing on the front porch was Kyle's little half brother, Jamal. He was shot in the head."They shot my brain when I was two," Jamal Riley, 4, said.Jamal has had multiple surgeries. A piece of his skull was removed. A metal plate now replaces the hole that was left. He has moved to Texas to be with his father. That arrangement helps give the boys the extra attention they need, by dividing up the care. He misses his brothers and sisters. His dad quietly sheds tears about Jamal's memory being terribly off, how he cries a lot and doesn't use his right arm and leg well."It's senseless. It's just kind of like, it makes no sense. You've altered an entire family just period. For what? Like these kids will never, ever, ever be the same," said a sorrowful John Riley Jr., who is Jamal's dad.Their teen sister has permanent knee damage from a bullet and can't do the extracurricular activities and athletics she used to. She now has to use crutches when her knee swells up.Alanna is struggling, physically with pain from multiple gun shots to the abdomen and leg, emotionally from the stress and financially. Without the stamina to work her certified nurse assistant job and restaurant jobs, she fears not having money for rent.RELATED:Vigil held for artist caught in the crossfire of Bourbon Street shooting"I've been working since I left my parent's house at 17, always taking care of my kids. Single mother. No child support. No Section 8. No welfare. It's always been me working, taking care of mine," said Alanna.The family had to leave their 9th Ward home. Alanna said she's never received any victim's assistance money and only Kyle gets disability. Her dad and stepmother now are helping as caretakers. Her mother, Barbara, was helping, but during all this stress suffered a stroke and stopped talking."I'm taking care of her too on top of everything that's on my plate. It's really a lot," said Alanna, trembling."Emotionally, it's been just really, really devastating and it continues to be a strain because it's like, this doesn't go away. This continues, as they grow they ask questions," said Pamela Hill-Romain, Alanna's stepmother.Kyle loves to read and is already on his way to being proficient in Braille.Through all this hardship, it's the strength and resilience seen through his heart, that keeps Alanna going."In the beginning, all I did was cry every time I saw him because I'm not used to seeing him with no eyes, you know," Alanna said. "He got me to the point where he started asking me, 'Mama, what are you crying for? He's like, 'If I ain't crying, you don't need to be crying.'"When Jamal comes to visit Kyle they love to play. Even though the shooting caused the boys to live apart, they have an unbreakable bond. In the hospital, they reached over and held hands, and at first, only talked to each other. Kyle taught himself to do many things on his own and doesn't understand why he can't play football with the big boys. He craves just to be normal."I just don't like when people ask me about my eyes and ask me, 'Can you, can't see?'  Because, it kind of makes me, like, mad because sometimes I don't like people asking me that," Kyle stressed.When Kyle and Jamal went to one of the accused's trials, there wasn't a dry eye on the jury. Their mother had a message when it comes to settling disputes with violence."People need to learn to take responsibility for their actions," she said. "Think before you do. And I don't feel like taking someone's life is the answer to nothing."But Kyle's message is to people who see him as disabled."Because even though I can't see, doesn't mean I can't read or write or walk around or go to the bathroom or go to my room," Kyle said.Now, adding to the stress, the family's home is damaged by last month's tornado.You can help by donating to the 'Kyle and Alanna Romain' account at any Whitney Bank or by donating atgofundme.com/eye-surgery-for-Kyle-romain.D.C. police are investigating a shooting in Southwest that left three men and three women injured early Sunday morning, police said.The shooting occurred around 1:47 a.m. in the unit block of N Street Southwest, said Officer Paul Metcalf. All the victims suffered non-fatal gunshot wounds, and four were taken to a local hospital. The other two walked in later Sunday morning for medical treatment.No further information on the victims or possible suspects was disclosed. No arrests have been made.Get updates on your area delivered via e-mailGet updates on your area delivered via e-mailMINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)– A 27-year-old Bloomington man died on Sunday, about six weeks after being shot in an incident at a downtown Minneapolis nightclub.Minneapolis Police say the shooting happened at about 1:40 a.m. on Aug. 8 at 400 Soundbar, located on the 400 block of 3rd Avenue North. That’s the same incident that sent nine people to the hospital, including Minnesota Vikings defensive lineman Linval Joseph. He suffered a minor gunshot wound to the calf.The Hennepin County Medical Examiner identified the victim Thursday as Dion Darnell Nathaniel Toney. Authorities said he died of complications from multiple gunshot wounds and his manner of death was a homicide. He was pronounced dead late Sunday night.The bar has been closed since the shooting. Minneapolis police said the gunman had an intended target and that they believe the incident was gang-related.At least 13 people were shot in the District in five incidents spread over all quadrants of the city between Friday night and Sunday morning, police said. One shooting was fatal, and another came during a carjacking.Six people, three men and three women, were wounded in one incident, which occurred early Sunday on N Street SW, just west of South Capitol Street.Four people were shot just before midnight Friday night in Northeast at Second Street and Todd Place.In the carjacking, a man was shot and wounded about 2:45 a.m. Sunday in the 2300 block of Hartford Street SE. Another shooting occurred in Southeast about 1 a.m. Saturday in the 2000 block of Savannah Terrace.The homicide occurred about 11 p.m. Friday near Quebec Place and Warder Street NW.No connections were apparent among the incidents.Get updates on your area delivered via e-mailGet updates on your area delivered via e-mailMILWAUKEE (WITI) -- Milwaukee police are investigating three separate shooting incidents that occurred late Friday night, August 8th and early Saturday morning, August 9th. Police say six people sustained injuries as a result of the shootings.The first shooting incident occurred in the 2700 block of N. 23rd Street (23rd and Center) around 10:52 p.m.23rd and Center shooting sceneAccording to police, a 27-year-old Milwaukee man suffered a non life-threatening gunshot wound during an ongoing neighborhood dispute.He was taken to the hospital for treatment.Police say there are currently no suspects in custody -- and the incident remains under investigation.The second shooting incident occurred in the 3000 block of N. 28th Street (28th and Chambers) around 11:43 p.m.28th Street shooting scenePolice say officers on patrol in a marked squad car heard the sound of gunshots and located two shooting victims running from the scene. Police say two other victims were located in a parking lot of a nearby business.The victims, a 19-year-old male and three 17-year-old females, were taken to the hospital for treatment of non life-threatening wounds.While on scene, officers were able to identify a possible suspect who was arrested at a residence nearby.The circumstances surrounding this shooting are still under investigation.The third shooting incident occurred in the 4000 block of N. Fond du Lac Avenue (40th and Fond du Lac) around 1:10 a.m.According to police, a 39-year-old West Allis woman suffered a single, non life-threatening gunshot wound during an armed robbery.She was taken to the hospital by a friend for treatment.Police say there are no suspects in custody -- and the investigation into this matter is ongoing.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsPlease try the search option in the top menu or select a category below.Contact|Public Files & EEO|Careers|AdvertisingFCC Public Inspection Files:|KOB|KOBF|KOBRAny person with disabilities who needs help accessing the content of the FCC Public File may contact KOB via our online form or call 505-243-4411.FCC Applications|Privacy Policy|Terms of Use|DMCA Notice|Do Not Sell My Info|Contest Rules|Site MapThis website is not intended for users located within the European Economic Area.©KOB-TV, LLCA Hubbard Broadcasting CompanySeven people are recovering after an argument escalated into a shooting early Sunday in the parking lot of a club in Spring.Investigators estimate 30 to 40 shots were fired in an overflow parking lot across the street from a "Teen Night" event Saturday at the Boss NightClub and Sports Bar on FM 1960.Based on early witness statements, two groups left the club arguing, continuing the verbal dispute in the neighboring parking lot. One person facing away from the club pulled a pistol and started firing, officials said. A person from the other group, who was facing the club, pulled out his own pistol and fired back, bullets crossing the street to shatter the windows of a shopping center and to strike parked cars."We don't know if they were bystanders or participating in the fight," saidThomas Gilliland, a spokesman for the Harris County Sheriff's Office.Some people fled the shooting, running back across the street toward the club. The shooters left the scene in unidentified vehicles.Two men ages 20 and 27 were transported toMemorial Hermann Hospitalin critical but stable condition, two men ages 19 and 23 were treated atBen Tauband three men drove themselves toNorthwest Hospital, Gilliland said. An eighth man was treated for other wounds, but had not been shot. All are expected to survive.Gilliland said details of the shooting, such as its cause and a description of the get-away vehicles, remain under investigation."We had 60 witnesses we had to get statements from," he said. "Hopefully we find someone who saw something happen and hopefully we'll find out who these guys are."Jayme Fraser covers government and growth in Katy and Fort Bend. She has worked at the Houston Chronicle since 2012, writing about city government, religion, housing and homelessness. Before coming to Texas, she reported on state and tribal governments, social services, higher education and other topics at dailies throughout the Northwest.GET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XTrending:An argument outside a New Bedford bar early this morning escalated and ended with seven people shot, according to police.The shootings happened outside Jalice Cafe on Acushnet Avenue around 1:30 a.m., New Bedford police said in a statement.Two people were found shot on the street — one with a gunshot wound to the elbow and one to the leg, police said. Five more people who were shot in the lower leg went to St. Luke’s Hospital on their own. All seven people — four men and three women — suffered non-life-threatening injuries, police said.Police said there was a large crowd at the bar attending a DJ-promoted event. Police said initial reports suggest a customer came out of the bar and found a drink on his car, and slapped it away. The drink hit another person, which led to a shoving match and eventually shots were fired. At least 10 shots were fired, some of which hit a nearby business, police said.All of the victims were in their 20s with the exception of a man who was 19, police said.It is unclear if the assailants suffered injuries, or if more than one gun was used. There have been no arrests.Police said the chief and mayor “will be pushing for swift action from the liquor licensing board.”Sign up for email newslettersWATCHVIDEOSVIDEO: Suspect arrested in child murderChild killed ID'd, 3 wounded in Grays Ferry shootingWATCHVIDEOS911 Calls detail horror of shooting rampagePHILADELPHIA (CBS)– Police say one person is dead after a gunman opened fire early Monday morning, shooting five people in the Feltonville neighborhood of Philadelphia.This happened just after midnight on the front porch of a home located on the 4900 block of North Front Street.Police say one of the victims, a 20-year-old, died at the hospital. Another victim is in extremely critical condition while the other three are suffering from non-life threatening injuries.There’s no word yet on a suspect or motive.Bangor Daily NewsMaine news, sports, politics, election results, and obituariesSACO, Maine — In the 13 months before police say he murdered his family and then killed himself, Joel Smith repeatedly visited doctors seeking help for stress and anxiety, but stopped taking prescribed medication because he lost his insurance, according to documents released this week by the state medical examiner’s office.The night of July 26, police say Smith, 33, shot his wife, 35-year-old Heather Smith, 12-year-old stepson Jason Montez, and biological children Noah Montez, 7, and Lily Smith, 4, with a shotgun before turning the weapon on himself in the family’s Saco apartment.On Monday, the medical examiner’s office released its reports on all five individuals in response to a Freedom of Access Act request filed by the Bangor Daily News in August.According to an account by Saco police officer Megan Tibbetts that accompanied the reports, Joel Smith was angry at his wife for staying out until 10:30 p.m. on the night in question, drinking with neighbors in the Water Street apartment complex where they lived.Within the next hour, neighbors said they heard what sounded like fireworks going off.Heather Smith had recently returned to the apartment after treatment for heroin and oxycodone abuse, Tibbetts’ account read, in part. Three days before the incident, on a Wednesday, Joel and Heather Smith went to pick up the three children from their paternal grandfather, with whom they’d been staying during Heather’s rehabilitation stint.The night before the crime, Heather Smith passed a drug test, but abruptly left a group therapy session halfway through the meeting with no explanation. Police would later report that on the same night, Joel Smith threatened suicide, although it is unclear whether, or in what way, the two circumstances are related.According to the medical examiner’s report, Joel Smith had visited doctors at least four times between June 2013 and February 2014 seeking help for stress and anxiety, among other things. Those visits came on the heels of what the report suggested were numerous previous attempts to seek medical help since 2008, when Smith told doctors he lost his job and his anxiety became “intolerable.”“He had done well on [the antidepressant] sertraline, but lost his insurance and had not been taking sertraline for several months. His anxiety had returned with panic symptoms, obsessive worrying and difficulty sleeping,” read the medical examiner’s recounting of Joel Smith’s Feb. 28 appointment with his primary care physician. “He rarely drank and denied recreational drugs. He denied depression and suicidal and homicidal ideation. The impression was generalized anxiety and panic disorder. Sertraline, 50 mg daily, was prescribed. He was to return in one month. There were no further visits.”The report did not indicate why he lost his insurance or whether he regained coverage, but by July 26, Joel Smith was apparently not using any antidepressants. The medical examiner’s office found only cotinine, a byproduct of tobacco use, in his system.The medical examiner’s office found what it called “a therapeutic level” of hydrocodone in Heather Smith’s system, as well as a peripheral blood alcohol content of 0.23.Much of the rest of the reports released Monday support state and local police accounts in the immediate aftermath of the incident.The three children who were home at the time died of two shotgun shots apiece. The youngest, 4-year-old Lily, was found in bed next to her mother in what appeared to be the master bedroom.Heather Smith and Joel Smith each died of a single shotgun wound to the head.Police have surmised that Joel Smith, who was found beside the master bed next to the murder weapon, killed Jason Montez and Noah Montez in their bedrooms before continuing to the master bedroom, where he shot Lily Smith twice, Heather Smith once and then himself.Joel and Heather Smith had been together 12 years, and moved from Arizona to Maine approximately four years ago.Seth has nearly a decade of professional journalism experience and writes about the greater Portland region.More by Seth KoenigCHICAGO (STMW) —Three men were charged in a July 2014 shooting in the East Garfield Park neighborhood that left a 13-year-old boy dead and six other people wounded.Anthony Harris, Anthony Lyons and Joshua Almore, all 23, each face one count of first-degree murder and six counts of attempted first-degree murder in connection with a shooting on July 25 2014 in the 700 block of South California, police said.About 6 p.m., 13-year-old Samuel Walker was standing outside with six other people — three of whom were also teen boys — when they were shot, police said at the time. Walker, who lived nearby in the 3000 block of West Flournoy, was shot in the head and pronounced dead 20 minutes later, according to the Cook County medical examiner’s office.A 15-year-old boy was shot in the right foot and three 14-year-old boys were each shot in the left leg, police said. A 21-year-old man was shot in the right leg and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in serious condition, police said.A 25-year-old man suffered a graze wound to the abdomen and was treated at the scene, police said.Harris, of the 1600 block of South Komensky, Lyons, of the 1200 block of South Harding, and Almore, of the 6800 block of South Ridgeland, are scheduled to appear in bond court Thursday.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2015. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)NORTH BRADDOCK (KDKA) — Police are investigating a shooting that left multiple people wounded Wednesday afternoon in North Braddock.The gunfire broke out just before 3:30 p.m. in the 700-block of Hickory Street.Police say it appears the victims, four young men who have not yet been identified, were on the front porch of a white home when a car drove up, possibly two people got out and began firing before they jumped back in the car and drove away.Investigators are hoping someone saw the vehicle and can give them a description.According to police, this shooting may be related to one earlier in the day in Rankin.“We believe this is directly related to an earlier shooting in Rankin this morning. This is probably going to be the retaliation shooting,” said Lt. Andrew Schurman, of Allegheny County Police. “Mid-morning on Patterson Avenue in Rankin, there was a young man shot. Again, he was taken to a local area hospital listed in stable condition.”(Photo Credit: NewsChopper 2/KDKA)Allegheny County emergency crews were called to the scene. Multiple police departments were also on scene into the evening collecting evidence, including North Braddock, East Pittsburgh and Allegheny County Police.One neighbor reportedly heard screaming and as many as six gunshots.“I heard gunshots,” said Katherine Gee, a neighbor. “I heard about six of them. Not too long after I heard it, I heard people screaming and hollering. But I didn’t know exactly where it was coming from, but as soon as they came around the bend, everyone came out. After that, it’s been chaos ever since.”Another neighbor reported hearing between 13 to 15 shots.There’s no word of any arrests in the incident.All four victims are listed in stable condition at various local hospitals.Meanwhile, Allegheny County Police believe a report of shots fired Wednesday evening in Rankin is connected to the North Braddock shooting as well.Witnesses saw a man leaning out of one car firing shots at another.(Photo Credit: KDKA)It happened near Hawkins Village.Police inspected two vehicles, one of which had the windows shot out; however, there are no reports that anyone was injured.Housing Authority Police detained five people. It remains to be seen what charges they may face.Allegheny County Police are trying to sort it all out, but they believe it’s the latest in a day long back and forth of shots fired that are probably connected.The investigation continues.Stay with KDKA for the latest on this developing story.RELATED LINKS:More North Braddock NewsMore Local NewsJoin The Conversation On The KDKA Facebook PageStay Up To Date, Follow KDKA On TwitterScreen Shot 2014-07-21 at 3.56.19 PM.pngSix people were shot during a large fight in Irvington Sunday afternoon, according to police.(Google Maps)IRVINGTON— Six people were injured after a large fight escalated into a shootout Sunday afternoon, according to police.Sgt. Patrick Brennan of the Irvington police said officers arrived at 36 Welland Avenue at around 3:08 p.m. to investigate a report of a large fight when they found a woman suffering from a gunshot wound to her leg.As officers canvassed the area, they located five additional male victims, all of whom had also been shot in the arms or legs, Brennan said.All were taken to area hospitals to be treated for the injuries, which were not deemed to be life-threatening.Brennan said police have not been able to discern how the fight began or whether one or more people may have been responsible for the shootings. No arrests have been made, though he said detectives are pursuing “strong leads” in the case.Anyone with information on the incident is asked to contact Irvington police at (973) 399-6603.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesTwo Maryland men who wereshot and killed in a carin the District’s Bloomingdale neighborhood early Sunday were attacked by a passenger who opened fire without provocation, according to a witness account described in court papers.The witness, who was one of five people in the blue Honda Accord, told police that the suspect used a silver handgun and that he “pulled the trigger and stated ‘bang’ every time he fired the gun,” according to a police affidavit filed in D.C. Superior Court.The vehicle crashed into a barrier wall about 1:15 a.m. at North Capitol and T streets in Northwest. A third person who was wounded was being treated at an area hospital Monday.Authorities said they weren’t sure whether the shootings are related to an incident Sunday night in which four people were wounded by gunfire two blocks away, in the 1700 block of Lincoln Road NE, in neighboring Eckington.Another fatal shooting Sunday night, in Southeast, brought the day’s death toll to three in the District.The North Capitol Street shooting claimed the lives of Donchell Thomas, 21, of Montgomery Village, and Derek Price, 20, of District Heights. Police said they died at two District hospitals — one Sunday morning, the other Sunday night.D.C. police said they arrested Jimmie Fleming, 36, of Northwest, and charged him with two counts of first-degree murder. He lives in Bloomingdale, about three blocks from where the car crashed. Police said he was arrested at his home, where they found a Redskins jersey and a leg brace a witness said he was wearing in the car. Police said they also found a bag of ammunition.The police affidavit supporting the arrest says the witness told detectives that “no one was talking prior to the gun being fired.” The witness said one person who was not shot passed out, and another passenger was crying over his mortally wounded friend, the driver.D.C. police said they have not learned a possible motive.Teri Janine Quinn, president of the Bloomingdale Civic Association, said she is pleased with the police presence in the area and that police made a quick arrest.She said she doesn’t believe the shootings are related to the neighborhood, which is several blocks north of Truxton Circle, where there have been several shootings this year.“The two victims who died both had addresses in Maryland,” Quinn said. “That gives you a sense that they might know each other and just happened to be here when they got caught up with something. Still, it’s really concerning, but I don’t think people are just coming here shooting at Bloomingdale residents.”The other fatal shooting Sunday occurred about 10:30 p.m. in the 3500 block of Sixth Street SE in Congress Heights. Police identified the victim as Delonte Hemphill, 22, of Southeast. No other information was immediately released.A man accused of opening fire outside a Stamford, Connecticut, nightclub Sunday, injuring five people, after an altercation over a woman appeared in court on Monday, where a state's attorney called him a "serious risk to the community."Stamford police arrested Dayron Wills, 22, who they said admitted being involved in the shooting in the parking lot of Tino's Nightclub at 84 West Park Place in Stamford.The shooting victims have been identified as Stephanie Riccoio, Clay Williams, Domingo Ramos, Michael Palomba and Darren Bornet. Latoya Williams and Jean Prosper sustained other injuries during the conflict, authorities said.According to Stamford Mayor David Martin, Tino's owner agreed to voluntarily shutter the club and forfeit its liquor license. Signs will come down tomorrow, and the clubs will no longer hold promoted private parties.Tino's will likely reopen under a new name, but Martin said the kind of behavior that took place over the weekend "will not be tolerated" and the city will increase its police presence at upcoming events.Martin said the agreement comes as the result of a meeting among area restaurant owners, public safety officials and officials from the Stamford Downtown Special Services District, a local non-profit responsible for managing and promoting the city's downtown area.Wills appeared in court Monday. His attorney claims Wills acted in self defense, but the states attorney called him a "serious risk to the community."Police released video footage that a witness took of the shooting and are asking for other witnesses to come forward with information.The video shows a man in a red shirt, who police say is Wills, pulling a gun out in a crowded parking lot and several people ducking for cover as the man fired successive shots. Witnesses posted the video on social media and police have the footage in evidence, police said.Wills pulled his gun on another person he got into an altercation with and fired shots at the individual, he told police.Police received reports of a shooting at about 1:38 a.m. July 13. Responding officers heard gunshots being fired as they arrived at what they described as a "chaotic scene" and discovered five people who were shot.Four men and one woman were taken to an area hospital to be treated for gunshot wounds "to their upper and lower extremities," police said. The injuries appear to be non-life threatening, police said.It's not clear whether the person Wills got into a dispute with was one of the wounded or one of the people in the video, police said. The shooting remains under investigation.Wills told police he discarded his .40-caliber handgun near the Atlantic Street and Bank Street intersection, which was where people found it. Police said that Wills has a valid pistol permit and that he is legally registered to carry the gun that was used in the shooting.When police found Wills, they also seized "a small amount of marijuana" that he had on him.Stamford police charged Wills with five counts of first-degree assault, first-degree reckless endangerment, unlawful discharge of a firearm and possession of marijuana.Police held him on a $1 million bond. When Wills appeared in Stamford Superior Court on Monday, his attorney asked the judge to delay setting bond, but the judge denied the request and kept bond at $1 million.Stamford police notified the State's Attorney's Office about the incident.The Stamford Police Department said that there were several witnesses to the shooting and are asking for the public's help in the investigation. Anyone with information should call the Stamford Police Detective Bureau at 203-977-4417.Neighbors and community members in Pasadena Sunday mourned the death of a man they called a pillar of the Hispanic community there, gunned down along with his daughter and a good Samaritan in his home on Summit Avenue.Friends said Luis Aguiar was 91-years-old, and a leader in the community at St. Elizabeth of Hungary Catholic Church, where he was instrumental to bringing the first Spanish language mass in the 1980s.Churchgoer Laura Prieto fought back tears while pointing out Aguilar’s regular pew.Top news of the day“We’re not going to see him there no more and it just hurts,” she said. “It hurts real bad.”A native of Mexico, Aguiar lived with his daughter, Maria Theresa, who took care of him.“He was very loved by every one of us and he’s going to be in our hearts forever,” another friend told NBC4.John Izael Smith, 44, reportedly rented from Aguiar, and after a rent dispute allegedly shot both Maria Teresa and Luis with an assault rifle Saturday.He also shot and killed a man in his 20s who ran to help the father and daughter. He has not been identified.“I just can’t believe it,” neighbor Juan Uribe said.Luis Aguiar was remembered at the church as a man of strong faith, who said special prayers on the twelfth of each month for Our Virgin of Guadalupe.Freddy Duran pointed out that Aguiar died July 12.“”Even in these tragedies, God plans how,” he said.(STMW)–Three people were killed and at least 22 others have been wounded in shootings across the city since Friday evening.The most recent fatal shooting happened Saturday afternoon on the North Side.William Lewis, 28, was standing on the street in the 1300 block of West Devon Avenue about 3:20 p.m. when someone approached on foot, produced a weapon and shot him in the back, police said.Lewis, of the 4700 block of North Hermitage Avenue, was taken to Presence Saint Francis Hospital in Evanston, where he was pronounced dead at 3:58 p.m., authorities said.Police said the shooting may have been gang-related.Early Saturday, a 50-year-old woman was seriously injured and her son was killed in a domestic-related shooting in a Chicago Lawn neighborhood apartment on the Southwest Side.About 1:15 a.m., a 47-year-old man got into an argument with a mother and son in the 6200 block of South Rockwell Street, left the apartment, then returned with a gun and shot both people in the chest, police said.Adarrius Thompson, 27, was dead at the scene, according to the Cook County Medical Examiner’s office. He lived in the block where the shooting happened, authorities said.His mother was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in serious condition, police said.The exact relationship between the 47-year-old — who is not in police custody — and the two others was not immediately known, police said.Friday night, a man was killed and three other people were injured in a possible drive-by shooting shortly after 8 p.m. in the Austin neighborhood.The shooting happened in the 5200 block of West Quincy Street, police said.Damien Bryant, 32, was shot in the head and pronounced dead at the scene at 8:13 p.m., according to police and the medical examiner’s office. Bryant lived in the block where the shooting happened, authorities said.A 30-year-old woman who suffered multiple gunshot wounds in the shooting showed up at Loretto Hospital and was later transferred to Stroger Hospital in “stable” condition, police said.Another male, whose age was not known, was shot in the right arm and refused medical treatment, police said. He did not cooperate with authorities, police said.A 41-year-old man took himself to West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Park with a gunshot wound to his hand, police said. He was listed in “stable” condition.Additionally, a 37-year-old man was taken from the scene of the shooting to West Suburban with a broken foot, police said. He was listed in good condition.Police believe the shooting may have been a drive-by attack.The most recent nonfatal shooting happened about 1:15 a.m. Sunday in the North Lawndale neighborhood on the West Side.A 16-year-old boy was standing on a sidewalk in the 3600 block of West 15th Street when a male walked up, pulled out a handgun and shot him in the leg, police said. He was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in “stable” condition, police said.Saturday evening, a 19-year-old man was shot in both legs near Midway Airport in the West Elsdon neighborhood.A friend drove him to Mount Sinai about 7 p.m. The man told police he had been shot in the 4500 block of West 58th Street. He was listed in good condition early Sunday.At least 16 other people have been wounded in other citywide shootings since 6 p.m. Friday.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2014. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)A deputy is carted away from the scene of a police standoff after suffering heat exhaustion. Police were involved in a standoff after multiple people were killed in a shooting in Spring. (Brett Coomer / Houston Chronicle)Accused mass shooter Ron Lee Haskell is escorted by deputies for a hearing on Friday, July 11, 2014, in Houston. Haskell is accused of a mass shooting that resulted in the death of six people.Ronald Lee Haskell, 33, has been charged with one count of Capital Murder (Multi). On Wednesday, July 9, 2014, Haskell traveled to a residence located on the 700 block of Leaflet Lane in North Harris County, demanding the whereabouts of his estranged wife. Posing as a parcel delivery driver, Haskell forced entry into the home, holding multiple juvenile victims at gunpoint. Haskell held the juveniles at gunpoint until additional family members returned to the home. During the incident, Haskell opened fire on the family, killing six and wounding one. Stephen and Katie Stay, along with four juvenile victims were killed during the confrontation.Stephen and Katie Stay, along with four juvenile victims were killed during the confrontation with Ronald Lee Haskell, 33, who has been charged with one count of Capital Murder.Cassidy Stay, center, the only survivor of the family massacre, leaves with other mourners after services for her parents and four siblings.Seven people have been shot, five fatally, Wednesday afternoon, July 9, 2014 on the 700 block of Leaflet Lane in Spring. (Brett Coomer / Houston Chronicle)A man charged with capital murder in the execution-style shootings of six members of a Spring family in 2014 will face the death penalty, according to attorneys connected to the case.Ronald Haskell, 36, of Utah, is set to stand trial in the fall of 2017, according to Harris County Assistant District Attorney Kaylnn Williford.THE CRIME:6 members of Spring family shot to death in likely domestic disputeProsecutors and defense attorneys updated state District Judge Kent Ellis during a court hearing Friday, but Haskell did not appear in court.Outside the courtroom, defense attorney Doug Durham confirmed reports of Haskell's mental health issues and said those problems would likely be part of the defense. He said little else about the defense or mitigation.DETAILS:Prosecutor say suspect in Spring family slaying shot victims 'execution-style'Haskell is accused of slaying Katie and Stephen Stay and their children Bryan, 13; Emily, 9; Rebecca, 7; and Zach, 4. Another daughter, Cassidy, 15, also was shot, but survived.The case made national headlines after Haskell, disguised in a FedEx uniform, allegedly pushed his way into the Stay residence where Cassidy Stay was home alone. He then bound the teen, and other members of the family as they arrived home. Haskell demanded to know the whereabouts of his ex-wife, Katie Stay's sister, then shot them all in the head.IN COURT:Suspect in Spring killings collapses in courtInvestigators said Haskell was trying to find out the location of his estranged ex-wife, a woman who apparently left him after several episodes of domestic violence.On his initial appearance in court two days after the shooting on July 9, 2014, Haskell collapsed as an assistant district attorney described the crime he is accused of committing.RESPONSE:Grieving Spring community gathers for Stay family funeralAfter that, Durham outlined a possible insanity defense, saying Haskell suffered from mental illness, and was not on his medication when the crime occurred.Haskell remains in the Harris County Jail without bail.Brian Rogers covers Houston crime and courts. A licensed attorney who loves telling stories, Brian covers breaking news, civil and criminal trials, and the political underpinnings of criminal justice.Trending:Bullet holes mark the wall of a doughnut shop near a Monday shooting in San Bernardino that left one man dead and four seriously wounded. The shooting took place shortly after 11 p.m. in front of the ND Vape shop at 312 E. Base Line.Monday night’s shooting was the 28th homicide in San Bernardino this year.SAN BERNARDINO >> Juan Gomez has seen a lot of violence in his young 28 years — including what he saw during his tours in Iraq.But with the 28th homicide this year in the city on Monday night, the violence he’s seeing in San Bernardino is beginning to draw troubling parallels.“This place is bad,” he said Tuesday, a day after right across the street 24-year-old Orlando Wayne Hunt Jr. of Beaumont died from multiple gunshot wounds in front of the ND Vape shop at 312 E. Base Line.“It’s so violent you don’t even feel safe in your own home,” Gomez said. “I was safer in Iraq than I am here. It’s time to rethink my options and get out of Dodge.”The shooting, which also seriously injured four others, took place shortly after 11 p.m., police Lt. Rich Lawhead said.The smoke shop is in a small strip mall on the corner of Base Line and Waterman Avenue, police said. Hunt was found on the sidewalk in front of the business.Three of the victims were found inside the smoke shop and the other was found behind the smoke shop near Stater Bros. Market, police said.Authorities believe he collapsed running away from the shooting.Three employees of the smoke shop were inside the business as the barrage of gunfire found its way inside the shop, but they took cover when bullets began to fly and were unharmed, police at the scene said.Police believe the motive behind the shooting was gang and/or drug-related. Authorities are searching for two men they believe are suspected of shooting the five people.Like Gomez, residents of the neighboring Waterman Gardens housing project say they heard the shots ring out.“I was sitting in front of my home when it sounded like I was back in Iraq,” Gomez said. “It just sounded like the gunfire wouldn’t stop. I ran into my home.”After the shooting, more than 20 yellow markers were placed throughout the parking lot of the strip mall showing where bullet casings landed after being ejected by a handgun.Police responded to a shooting in the same area just the night before.Shortly after 11 p.m., 9-1-1 received multiple-shots-fired calls from a Jack in the Box restaurant at 303 East Base Line, saying men were shooting at each other. One group was firing their guns from Masters Donuts at 306 East Base Line toward the Jack in the Box and the other from the Jack in the Box toward the doughnut shop, police said.Nobody was hurt in that shooting.“I watched these knuckleheads shooting at each other from across the street Sunday,” 87-year-old San Bernardino resident Michael Johnson said. “This has to be a retaliation from that.”However, even though residents of Waterman Gardens believe the two shootings are related, police say no.“There is no evidence that the two shooting are related,” police Sgt. Gary Robertson said.Anyone with information on the incident is asked to contact Detective Bill Flesher at 909-384-5655 or Sgt. Gary Robertson at 909-841-5361.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.2 hours ago3 hours ago9 hours ago2 hours ago3 hours ago17 hours ago8 hours ago8 hours ago21 hours ago22 hours ago16 hours ago22 hours ago16 hours ago20 hours ago20 hours agoWISH-TV InstagramWISH-TV TwitterWISH-TV YouTubeWISH-TV FacebookIndy Style FacebookAll Indiana FacebookLocalStaff Reports2021-04-10T11:59:03-04:002 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T10:18:18-04:004 hours ago|Aleah Hordges2021-04-10T09:36:22-04:005 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T08:14:08-04:007 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T06:23:57-04:008 hours ago|NationalLISA MASCARO, BEN FOX and LOLITA C. BALDOR, Associated Press2021-04-10T14:04:33-04:003 hours ago|Clare Foran, CNN2021-04-10T08:23:17-04:006 hours ago|JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T08:03:23-04:006 hours ago|JONATHAN LEMIRE and JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T06:46:02-04:007 hours ago|Chris Boyette, Hollie Silverman and Jennifer Henderson, CNN2021-04-10T06:20:11-04:008 hours ago|TRENDING PODCASTSSPORTSChris Boyette, Hollie Silverman and Jennifer Henderson, CNN2021-04-10T06:20:11-04:008 hours ago|Gregg Montgomery2021-04-09T22:07:21-04:0016 hours ago|Dan Klein2021-04-09T23:02:09-04:0017 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-09T14:04:08-04:001 day ago|Charlie Clifford2021-04-09T10:19:21-04:001 day ago|INDY STYLEAmber Hankins2021-04-09T15:50:08-04:0022 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:52:12-04:0022 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:52-04:0022 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T16:39:40-04:0022 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:38-04:0022 hours ago|FEATURED POLLTake Our PollCOMMUNITY CALENDARA music and cultural festival on Houston's south side turned violent early Saturday after shots were fired into the crowd of thousands, injuring four men and two women.Friday's event was part of the monthlong Houston Caribbean Festival, which hosts parties across the city.Police say that pproximately 5,000 to 10,000 people were attending the Jouvert Festival party, held at the San Miguel Arena at 1700 Almeda-Genoa. The party was set to end at 6 a.m., according to the event's website.Youtube videos posted of the shooting, which occurred just before 2 a.m., show throngs of guests dancing in a crowded arena.Several shots can be heard followed with screams of "get out!" and "move."John DeWalt, with thePrairie View Volunteer Fire Department, was at the party enjoying himself when he was enlisted to help first responders tend to the injured. He kept one of the men who was shot in the head alert whileEMSofficials arrived. The man's injuries were critical, according to DeWalt, a recent graduate of theCy-Fair Volunteer Fire Departmentcadet school.Four men were injured by bullets - two were transported toBen Taub Hospitaland the other two were taken toMemorial Hermann Hospital.The most seriously injured was a male, age 16, according to Houston police, who say that he was taken to Ben Taub for treatment.Two women were also transported to an area hospital after being trampled in the flood of people attempting to flee after the gunfire. Updates on their injuries were not immediately available Monday.According to DeWalt, venue personnel were having a hard time getting everyone out safely.TheHouston Police Departmentis still investigating what lead to the shooting. So far, there are no suspects in custody, and the only description they have of the suspect is that he was a shirtless, muscular black male.SpokespersonJodi Silvasays that there were at least 30 off-duty Harris County Precinct 7 deputy constables working security for the party, though they were stationed on the perimeter and not inside the arena where the shooting happened."We're asking anyone who might have seen something to share their information with our homicide unit as they also handle major assault cases like this," Silva said.DeWalt said he can't stop thinking about the man he helped early Saturday."The mood was joyous and people were having a good time and then this all happened," DeWalt said Saturday. "We were all in good spirits."Craig Hlavaty is a freelance writer for chron.com and the Houston Chronicle.MenuNorfolk, Va,-Norfolk police were on the scene of four different shootings throughout the night and morning, resulting in 14 confirmed victims.  All of the injuries appear to be non-life threatening.The first call came in just before midnight Friday.  It happened at 1722 Thurgood Street.  Police say several people were reportedly standing outside and were shot by an unknown assailant.  3 adults and 2 juveniles ages 14 and 15 were taken to the hospital.The second call came in just after midnight Saturday.   This one happened at 945 E. Virginia Beach Blvd.  An adult female was standing outside her home and was shot by what police say appears to be random gunfire.  She was taken to Sentara Norfolk General hospital.The third call came in at 12:17 Saturday morning of a report of a gunshot victim  in the 900 block of Bagnell Road.  An adult female was shot and taken to Sentara Norfolk General hospital with non-life threatening injuries.The last call came in right at 3:00am Saturday in reference to 6 adults that walked into Sentara Norfolk General hospital with non-life threatening gunshot wounds.  This shooting took place at 861 W. 36th Street.  Police say an unknown vehicle drove by and shot towards the adults.  Shortly after that dispatch received a call of a 7th adult victim who stayed near the initial shooting location.  Police located the victim and took the victim to Sentara Norfolk General hospital.Norfolk Police Chief, Michael Goldsmith, made a statement on the gun violence in the community, stating, "I have more than 740 police officers working hard every day to keep 245,000 people safe. We need the assistance of our citizens to combat the gun violence that is affecting our streets and harming our youth."He encouraged people to not resort to violence in settling disputes and said that it is the community's responsibility to instill these moral values in our youth.Lastly, Goldsmith addressed his plan to tighten down on security in affected areas, "I am putting more resources in the neighborhoods affected by these senseless acts of violence.  These resources will include uniformed patrol, vice and narcotics and gang investigators, as well as members of our Homeland Security Division."Norfolk Detective Division responded to all the scenes and is currently handling the investigations.  There is no further information on suspects or motives and any of the shootings.Anyone with information regarding these incidents should contact the Norfolk CrimeLine at      1-888-LOCK-U-UP.Report a typoMenuThe first of the five shootings that wounded 15 different people in Norfolk over July 4th weekend was in the Diggs Town neighborhood.Witnesses say a car drove up in the middle of a neighborhood 4th of July party and just starting shooting.Five people at the party were shot and one of them says he feels he and his friends were the target for being gay.With a cast on his foot and crutches on his lap, 19-year-old Walter Barnes says takes us through the moments before he was shot."My friend was like he seen the boys pull up in the car and was like there goes some f******, and he said by the time they said that, he just heard gunshots," Barnes says, "My back was facing towards the car when it hit so I didn't see nothing. I didn't know where it came from, it just came from out of the blue."We reached out to police to see if they believe the shooting on Thurgood street was a targeted hate crime. They have not answered our question.As for the investigation into the shootings, policehave arrested four adults and one 17-year-old. They continue to investigate further.Related:Another shooting in Norfolk just 24 hours after 14 people were shotNorfolk Police Chief releases statement about four over-night shootingsReport a typoChester police said five people were hospitalized, including two teens, following shootings in the 1400 block of West Congress Street early Wednesday morning. (Times Photo / Frank Wesnoski)Chester police said five people were hospitalized, including two teens, following shootings in the 1400 block of West Congress Street early Wednesday morning. (Times Photo / Frank Wesnoski)Chester police said five people were hospitalized, including two teens, following shootings in the 1400 block of West Congress Street early Wednesday morning. (Times Photo / Frank Wesnoski)Chester police said five people were hospitalized, including two teens, following shootings in the 1400 block of West Congress Street early Wednesday morning. (Times Photo / Frank Wesnoski)CHESTER - Investigators are looking into a possible link between a shooting early Wednesday that sent five people, including two teens to the hospital, and a shooting Friday that left one man dead and wounded two women.'We are looking to see if the shooting incidents are connected,' Delaware County District Attorney Jack Whelan said Wednesday night.Investigations are ongoing by the Chester Police Department and the county's Criminal Investigation Division.Previously, Whelan said 'turf issues' involving the Ruth L. Bennett Homes was a possible motive in the June 27 shooting, where as many as 37 rounds were sprayed outside the Platinum Harambee Cafe at Seventh and Lloyd streets at about midnight. Verlondon Gary, 32, of Chester, was dead at the scene; two city women were wounded, one critically.According to city authorities, the recent incident unfolded shortly after midnight as a group of people, including a boy and girl both 14 years old, were outside in the 1400 block of West Congress Street. Some residents were standing around talking, while others were in the middle of a pickup game of basketball.Then, at 12:09 a.m., gunfire erupted, sending people on Congress Street scurrying. The five victims, including the teens, were caught in apparent crossfire.When police arrived on the scene, they found five people had been injured; a 14-year-old girl shot in the foot and a 14-year-old boy shot in the right leg were among them. Two adult males, ages, 20 and 31, suffered leg wounds while a third man, 35, was struck in his back and right thigh.All five victims were taken to Crozer-Chester Medical Center, where they were listed in stable condition on Wednesday. None of the injuries appeared to be life-threatening, according to authorities.According to police, whoever pulled the trigger did from a distance away in the 800 block of Tilghman Street, about a block from where the victims were found. Shell casings found at the scene indicate that at least two weapons were fired. Investigators are trying to determine if the shooters were firing at each other or at someone else.Of the 25 homicides in Delaware County this year, 16 have occurred in Chester. All but one of the cases involved a firearm.Four people have been fatally shot since the anti-crime initiative 'Operation City Surge' was launched in May. The effort includes unannounced patrols by state police, as well as added assistance by other agencies including SEPTA Transit Police.Repeated attempts to reach Chester Police Commissioner Joe Bail concerning the latest shooting were unsuccessful.Wednesday night, Mayor John Linder said any shooting is tragic.'What I can do to protect my young citizens is bring them indoor after hours,' he said.But he warned that a solution is not solely a police matter.'Others can help us as much as they can (by reporting those) who are continually committing crimes in this city,' Linder said. 'We've had great cooperation from our community, and it's getting better.'The mayor added that since the launch of the anti-crime push police response time has been quicker thanks to the state police and other agencies who are working with city police.Anyone with information is asked to contact city detectives at 610-447-8433 or county detectives at 610-891-4700.MenuLEXINGTON, Ky. (LEX 18) — A man convicted of his role in a 2014 deadly shooting has been sentenced to three years in prison.Allen Burgess was convicted of facilitation of robbery and assault in the shooting death of Kieara Green.Police said that back in June 2014, Green and three others were inside a home in the Scottsdale Circle area when a group barged in and opened fire.Green died from her injuries and the other three victims survived.In 2018, Green's relatives told LEX 18 that prosecutors were planning an Alford Plea for facilitation to murder.It is unclear what changed since then.Report a typoSeven men who were shot at a house in Antioch in Northern California this past weekend are expected to survive their injuries, authorities said.Five of the men were discovered by police officers responding to a call around 11:50 p.m. Saturday in the 5500 block of Cedar Point Way. The men were transported to local hospitals for injuries that did not appear to be life-threatening, according to the Antioch Police Department.While officers were at the scene of the shooting, two more men arrived at area hospitals seeking treatment for non-life-threatening gunshot wounds. It was later determined that they were victims of the same incident but had left the location before police arrived.Officials said not all the men lived at the house and were having a “get together” when the shooting occurred.An investigation into the identity of the shooter remained ongoing Monday.For breaking news in Los Angeles and the Southland, follow@Caitlin__Owens, or email her atcaitlin.owens@latimes.com.The perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsNEW YORK (CBSNewYork) —It was a violent night in New York City after at least 21 people were shot in incidents spanning each of the five boroughs.As CBS 2’s Janelle Burrell reported, one of the shootings happened on Staten Island, where a man is fighting for his life after being shot in the face.The incident happened at around 3:30 a.m. on Amboy Road in the New Dorp section of Staten Island.Police were still on the scene Sunday morning collecting and processing evidence, including a backpack that belonged to the 42-year-old victim.Scene of shooting in New Dorp section of Staten Island on June 29, 2014 (Credit: CBS 2)Investigators told Burrell the shooting was not random.The victim had apparently gotten into an argument with another man. Police said a gun was fired and the victim was hit in the face with a bullet just outside of his home.The shooting suspect was caught on surveillance video running from the scene of the crime, police said. He got away in a dark-colored pick up truck, WCBS 880’s Monica Miller reported.The victim was rushed to Staten Island University Hospital.Neighbors were shaken up over the news. They said it’s rare for the community to see this kind of violence.“This is a busy street, Amboy Road is busy, but it’s not an area where you would have a shooting of any kind. I mean, we’re here five years and this has never happened before,” said one neighbor.“We have a baby. You know, we have a 5-year-old. It’s very scary. This is unusual, very unusual for this area,” said another neighbor.Dawn said she got an early wake up call from police who rang her door bell after the victim was shot just steps from her door.“We just saw them yesterday. You know I’m like this is very very strange and very scary, especially when you tell us a gun was shot. I said what!!” Dawn said.Neighbors also said the victim only moved to the area a few months ago with his wife and son.“It’s a man and his wife and their son. They’re very quiet people. They just moved in not long ago. They’re very nice people,” neighbor Mike told WCBS 880’s Miller.Mike was just returning home from the night shift, only to find his house was on the part of the street that was sectioned off by police.The shooting incident is just one of 13 that happened across the city in the last 24 hours, WCBS 880 reported.In Cambria Heights, Queens, 33-year-old Bronx resident Jason Bragg was found shot to death around 10 p.m. Saturday.A10-year-old boy and a male adult were shotin Coney Island at around 7 p.m. Saturday. Elhadi Abdel Rahman suffered minor injuries with a gunshot wound to his knee. The man was last listed in serious condition with a gunshot wound to his stomach. Police released a photo of the suspect.“I didn’t think they were gunshots. I thought they were firecrackers, but then everybody started running,” Abdel Rahman said.Suspect wanted in connection with a Coney Island shooting that injured 10-year-old boy (Credit: CBS 2)He was a block away from his home when he was caught in the middle of a spray of bullets, CBS 2’s Don Champion reported.One person was killed and two others were injured in a shooting at 92 Tapscott St. in Brooklyn.Also in Brooklyn, a female was shot in the leg at 1780 Bergen St. She was taken to Kings County Hospital.Four people were shot at Fifth Avenue and West 139th street. CBS 2 reported the victims were teenagers. All of the victims were listed in stable condition at St. Luke’s-Roosevelt Hospital Center, WCBS 880 reported.In the Bronx, a male suffered a gunshot wound to his torso at University Avenue & West 195th Street. A suspect was arrested in the case, WCBS 880 reported.Earlier this week NYPD Commissioner Bill Bratton addressed the spike in gun violence, saying more than 1,000 academy graduates will hit the streets this coming week. They are expected to be sent to areas where the most shootings have happened.“Actually it turns out we’re still significantly less shootings than we had at this time last year. We’re still well behind what we had last year for this week,” the commissioner said.Investigations into the violent weekend continue, and the NYPD is pouring over statistics to determine if the end of the stop and frisk policy has led to an increase in the number of guns on city streets.In the last week there have been 23 shooting incidents, compared to 37 in the same period last year.Check Out These Other Stories From CBSNewYork.com:[display-posts category=”news” wrapper=”ul” posts_per_page=”4″]The case of this missing page is still unsolved … but don't worry, we have our best investigative reporters tracking down leads.Stay tuned…Teen altercation leads to shoot out, three of five people injured released from hospitalMILWAUKEE (WITI) -- Three of the five people shot on Milwaukee's northside are out of the hospital. A feud between two families ended in a spray of bullets.The mother of those teens tells FOX6 they were attacked not only with fists, but later everyone with weapons as well. After the fight she says adult men got involved in the situation and shot up her home. Family members were struck and hospitalized.Nancy Mays is frightened for her family to say in their home near 24th and Locust."I`m scared I don`t even want go to the store I`m just scared they are going to shoot me," said Mays. "I heard the bullets ricocheting, came out of nowhere and just got to shooting."As shots echoed throughout the neighborhood, Mays' home was riddled with bullets."They came in front of my house out here and I got plenty bullet holes in my house, all in my kitchen," said Mays.She claims gunfire rang out after a dispute that should have been left among teens."My daughters ain`t nothing but 13 and 16 years old some grown girls jumped my daughter," said Mays.She says after the altercation, a few men joined the fray and the argument escalated."So my cousin and my brother got to beating the dudes up and the dudes came from nowhere and got to shooting," said Mays."Someone from one of the houses approached residents of the other house armed with firearms and commenced firing," said Milwaukee Police Chief Ed Flynn.When the gunfire stopped, police counted almost three dozen shell casings. Five people were struck."Shot my cousin, shot my brother 5 times, shot my cousin 4 times and my other cousin got shot it he leg. The police saved her life I`m glad," said Mays.Since the violent incident Thursday afternoon, June 26th, folks nearby are understandably on edge and thankful to see extra police patrolling Friday, June 27th.Authorities continue to watch a block torn apart by senseless actions, while neighbors feel it all could have been prevented.Three of the five people shot have been released from the hospital. Two victims, one male and the other female, remain in the hospital. As of now, no arrests have been made.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsDETROIT (WWJ)– Detroit police investigating an early morning shooting that left two people dead and two others injured.It happened on Grand Street, near the Lodge Freeway and the Davison Freeway on the city’s west side.According to police, the two killed were a 28 year-old man and a 37-year-old man. Those injured were 28 and 31 years old. One of those injured was shot in the leg, but there were no further details available about the victims.There have been no arrests and there was no immediate word about a suspect or motive in the shooting as an investigation continues.Stay with WWJ Newsradio 950 and CBSDetroit.com for more on this developing story.Trending:By Robert Millsrmills@lowellsun.comLOWELL – At least four people were shot, including a woman who was shot in the chest, when gunfire erupted outside a birthday party on Midland Street in Lowell on Wednesday night shortly before midnight.Police said a female who was shot in the chest suffered what appeared to be the most serious wounds. It was not immediately clear if her injuries were life threatening.At least three other people were shot, including a male who was shot in the leg. The gender and injuries suffered by two other gunshots victims were not immediately clear since they were taken to city hospitals in personal vehicles.The female who was shot in the chest and the male who was shot in the leg were taken to the hospital by ambulance.The shootings occurred at 58 Midland St., a well-kept white house about two blocks up from Chelmsford Street in the city’s Highlands neighborhood.Neighbors said there had been a party there much of the night, but that aside from loud noise there had not been previous problems. Neighbors said there have been frequent parties at the home since a new family moved in about a year ago.Several neighbors said they heard noises that they believed were fireworks since there have been numerous instances of fireworks going off in the area recently. It was not until emergency vehicles flooded the street that many neighbors began to realize what happened.One man said he heard at least seven gunshots fired in rapid succession.Police said they recovered more than seven shell casings in the street in front of the home, but could not immediately provide an exact number.Last July 13, just before midnight, police responded a few blocks away to a shooting at Forest and Blodgett streets. In that incident, a man was shot several times and hospitalized.Police said the incident does not appear to be random.Anyone with information is asked to call Lowell police at 978-937-3200 or Crimestoppers at 978-459-TIPS (8477).Tipsters can remain anonymous, but can receive up to $1,000 for information leading to an arrest.Follow Robert Mills on Twitter and Tout @Robert_Mills.Police in the District reported a series of violent incidents early Saturday that included a homicide in Adams Morgan, a pursuit that ended with gunfire and a car accident in which authorities said a man shot at firefighters and officers.In addition, D.C. police said four people were shot in the 1800 block of Florida Avenue NW near the southern end of Adams Morgan.The slaying occurred about 2:20 a.m. in the 1600 block of Columbia Road NW, near Mozart Place in the northeastern corner of Adams Morgan, several blocks from the neighborhood’s late-night entertainment strip.Officer Araz Alali, a police spokesman, identified the victim as Luis Avila Melende, 27, of Northeast. Alali said Melendez was pronounced dead at an area hospital. No other details were released.About an hour later and one mile away, police said, three men and one woman were struck by gunfire at Florida Avenue and U Street in Northwest. None of the injuries were life-threatening, police said, and the incident is not believed to be related to the earlier homicide.About 3:45 a.m., Montgomery County police said, they chased a maroon Ford SUV traveling about 100 mph into the District along Georgia Avenue. The chase ended with a crash with a police car on Van Buren Street NW in the Takoma neighborhood, police said, and a Montgomery County officer fired his weapon, striking the SUV’s tire. The driver was arrested. Police said the chase began when the driver tried to run down two officers in Silver Spring.About 4:30 a.m., police investigating a car accident in the 2100 block of H Street NE said one of the drivers pulled out a gun and opened fire on officers, firefighters treating the injured and a crowd that had gathered. No one was injured, said Alali. The fire union president said firefighters from Truck 13 dived behind their firetruck for cover.Alali said the suspected gunman took off in a car that was stopped after a pursuit into Southeast, where he was arrested. Alali said a gun was recovered.Get updates on your area delivered via e-mailGet updates on your area delivered via e-mailFox 59by:Eric LevyKOKOMO, Ind. (June 15, 2014) — Kokomo police want to know more about what led up to a shooting outside a nightclub, that put four people in the hospital.Police reponded to the “Ultimate Place 2-B” on Clinton Drive near IN 931 around 3:15 a.m. Sunday morning. Alert police officers heard the gunshots, quickly showed up and saw numerous people running, some who’d been hit by bullets. Police have identified them as Emmanuel Arrington, 33, of Kokomo, Sieyumbe Arrington, 37, of Kokomo, Cristobal Guerroro, 31, of Marion and Anthony Heard, 39, of Kokomo.Police say all four were initally taken to Community HOward Regional Hospital in Kokomo. It’s where Heard was treated, then released, Sieyumbe Arrington is having surgery to fix his injuries. Emmanuel Arrington and Guerroro were flown to Parkview Hospital in Fort Wayne. Arrington is listed in stable condition, Guerroro is in critical condition. Police haven’t said what led up to the shooting, but sources say a local motorcycle club was at the club at the time.Anyone with additional information is asked to contact the Kokomo Police Department Hotline at (765) 456-7107. You may qualify for a cash reward by calling Central Indiana Crime Stoppers at 1-800-222-TIPS.SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.The 21-month-old toddler who sustained a gunshot wound to his head following an apparent road rage incident on April 6 is out of the medically induced coma he was in, but remains on a ventilator.Police are searching for people wanted in connection with two phone store robberies reported in March and April in Homan Square and Heart of Chicago.Jennifer Emmi, founder of The Animal Law Center, allegedly plotted against her husband and his girlfriend.Illinois broke its record for daily coronavirus vaccinations for the third day in a row Friday."These statues are very important to our community and represent generations of traditions, including the one day of the year that we celebrate our culture on the federal Columbus Day holiday. We know the original intention of removing the statues was one of safety, but that was months ago, and it is time to return them."The Chicago White Sox game against the Kansas City Royals has been postponed due to inclement weather, the team announced on Saturday.With new tax changes possible, Anthony Pellegrino discusses ways you can prepare for those changes ahead.The Chicago Riverwalk will once again be opened to residents and visitors starting Friday.Latronico, a quaint town in southern Italy with thermal spas, hiking and mountaintop views, is hoping to give new life to some of its old homes.To make the story even stranger, the woman claims she had a dream that there was something scary hidden behind the mirror before she even moved it. See the video, here:This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsOct. 24, 2014, 5 a.m.June 21, 2014, 7:45 p.m.June 13, 2014, midnightJune 13, 2014Trevor Andre Williams, a 33-year-old black man, was shot and killed Friday, June 13, near South Figueroa Street and West Manchester Avenue in Vermont Knolls, according to Los Angeles County coroner’s records.Williams is believed to have shot about 10 times at the occupants of a silver Toyota Camry about 10 p.m., killing Jacinta Walker, 18, and Aveion Bolden, 20, said Los Angeles police Det. Dave Garrido.A person inside the Camry returned fire at Williams, who was in the passenger seat of a red Nissan Altima.The driver of the Nissan took Williams to a nearby fire station, at South Main Street and East 108th Street. Williams was found dead inside the car. The driver fled.Anthony Alonzo Cudger, 25, was arrested June 14 on suspicion of killing Williams, but he released June 17.Prosecutors declined to file charges because the investigation found that Cudger acted in self-defense, said Greg Risling, a spokesman for the Los Angeles County district attorney.The shooting was the latest in an ongoing feud between two street gangs – the Main Street Crips and the Hoover Crips, authorities said.Anyone with information is asked to call the Criminal Gang Homicide Division at (213) 485-1383. Those who wish to remain anonymous can call Crime Stoppers at (800) 222-8477.--Nicole Santa CruzDo you have information to share about the life of 
                    Trevor Andre Williams
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Oct. 24, 2014, 5 a.m.June 21, 2014, 7:45 p.m.June 13, 2014, midnightBefore you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:Ms Rigsby...I think your comments fully explain the whole situation... people in your community have a problem taking responsibility for their actions...your comment is kind of akin to climbing into a cage full of tigers and blaming getting eating on the zoo keeper who didn't stop you...maybe your community should stop climbing into cages with tigers and go home and be parents... but that's a lot harder than playing the blame game whilst allowing your children to act like animals...maybe I'm completely wrong but I am going to hazard a guess that your sadly deceased son never had a father figure at home... I'm also going to hazard a guess that you take absolutely no responsibility for that... someone else's fault, right... you can't be held accountable for who you have children with, same as you can't be held responsible for the way you raised them...the only way to stop this is to post a policeman in your bedrooms to stop you from making bad decisions when it comes to contraception...or, your community could grow up, have some pride in itself and stop blaming everybody else when something goes wrong..."The police are responsible for these killing since they are aware of the areas that these shootings occur and they dont setup up post there."— Margaret Rigsby ; do you really believe that? Or are you living in a neighborhood so violent, you have trouble distinguishing right from wrong?Ms. Rigsby,You cannot have it both ways...if the police set up to "watch" over these areas that make everyone that lives and walks and visits these area's susceptible to being randomly stopped, searched, and/or pulled over. That is exacly the same situation that we find ourselves in that you all protest. So why not think about the situation as it is now and what the law allows? The dots are not all connected in your statement.The police are responsible for these killing since they are aware of the areas that these shootings occur and they dont setup up post there. Race is given to probably signify that these minorities have no care for their lives by doing these senseless killings so why should the police dept care either. However, I am not surprised because my son was shot and killed and it was not investigated thoroughly just a shut and closed case and not a care for his human life; he was also an innocent victim.Who is worse, the gang members who kill for a sport, well thats what they do, or the police who is supposed to protect and serve and is yet to visit this duty. This is why I have lost faith with those in authority who misuse their power and would suggest that they consider giving the gangs a paycheck to do the job they are  failing at, and the gangs are fearless.Rip Trevor you are and will always be a good person No matter what these people say they don't know you and don't know what happen that night only God can judge he knows your heart  love you we love you this shit hurts everyday and this gang banging is stupid its taking all and everybody love ones away its about time we show are loyalty to God cuz the devil making a fool out of everybody hood if the killings don't stop then bodies ain't gone stop dropping and anybody can get it a bullet ain't got no name eeeeuuuu long live the chosen one !!!!!Know one deserves to dies by the hand of a another human hand. Gang violence is what caused all them to die the girl was from trouble and her boyfriend was from Hoover. There not innocent there the devil in disguise.Shooting into a cars of teenagers for absolutely nothing. Big loser, too damn old to be gang banging. Now he's looking real stupid with not one family supporter mourning over his death on this form.Karma got him quick.. He definitely got what he deserve. His was too old out there still gang banging. At 30 plus you suppose to have yourself together by then. Plus he was shooting at some young folks. The world was saved from his ignorance.Looks like the predator finally became the prey.Trevor Williams is right where he need to be "Pushing Up Daisies!" Like the saying goes "Live by the Gun, Die by the Gun"  Innocent kids lost their lives because of this coward!I guess it did'nt go according to plan Mr.Williams! SMH sadHe got what he deserved, he had no business shooting into a vehicle, I bet he was surprised to have someone shoot back.Delshawn LoweryPATERSON— An arrest has been made in connection with a drive-by shooting last month in the city, police said.Delshawn Lowery, 21, is charged with six counts of attempted murder following the June 9 shooting at the corner of Rosa Parks Boulevard and Godwin Avenue, according to authorities. Lowery was arrested this morning about a mile away.Shots were fired from a dark-colored car that passes through the intersection just after 10:30 p.m that night, Detective Lt. Patrick Murray said.The vehicle then continued west on Godwin Avenue in the direction of Carroll Street and out of the area, Murray added.Injured were:• A boy, 17, with a graze wound on his head.• A woman, 45, with a gunshot wound to her foot.• A woman, 18, with gunshot wounds to her upper torso and legs.• A man, 61, with gunshot wounds to his feet.• A man, 18, with a gunshot wound to his shoulder.• A man 24, with gunshot wounds to his legs.All have since been treated and released from an area hospital, police said. Lowery is being held in lieu of $3 million bail.Last month, a15-year-old was shot in the backon the same corner.The drive-by shooting took place about 10 blocks from wherea 12-year-old girl was shot and killed on Saturday.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesAn Elba man faces murder and attempted murder charges in connection to a shooting at an Opp nightclub over the weekend that left four people wounded, and another dead.According to a statement from Opp Police Chief Mike McDonald, police arrested Kanavis Malik Cole, 23, of Elba, and charged him with murder and felony attempted murder.Cole was taken to the Covington County Jail and held on bail totaling $1.5 million.The police statement said the arrest was made as part of a joint investigation by the Opp Police Department, the Covington County District Attorney’s Office, along with assistance from agents with the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the Elba Police Department.The nightclub shooting left four people wounded, including a Dothan woman, 27-year-old Tornesha Evette Fate, who suffered a gunshot wound to her forearm.The police statement said police initially responded to a report of shots fired with people down at a local business on Hardin Street known as “The Little Harlem Club” around 1:30 a.m. Sunday.McDonald also said in a statement that when police officers first responded to the business they discovered five people had been taken by private vehicles to the emergency room at Mizell Memorial Hospital in Opp.A 20-year-old Opp resident, Demetrice Lawon Hines, later died from his injuries at the hospital.Police officials said Cole was also charged with attempted murder in connection to gunfire that left 26-year-old James Danshay Edwards, of Opp, wounded. A police statement said Edwards suffered a gunshot wound to the shoulder from the shooting.The following two other people were also wounded in the shooting:-Quanisha Tearow Stoudemire, 19, of Opp, who was treated for a gunshot wound to her foot at Mizell Memorial Hospital.-Kenyen Devone Netles, 21, of Evergreen, who was treated for a superficial gunshot wound to his leg at Andalusia Hospital.Follow Matt on Twitter@ElofsonMatt.Get local news delivered to your inbox!Enterprise Police charged a 67-year-old local man with murder Wednesday in connection to an early morning stabbing on Middlebrook Street.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.With 58 outbreaks tied to indoor dining in the past week, Gov. Whitmer is urging people to get carry out rather than eat inside.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.People spend all day staring at their phones, so when they get into the float therapy tank in Clarkston, they're introduced to a new kind of immersion. One separated from stress and anxiety that comes with the current events we keep up with.New details from the deadly US Capitol riot show Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand: “Clear the Capitol.”Franmil Reyes homered twice and Zach Plesac pitched seven dominant innings after getting an early lead to give the Cleveland Indians a 4-1 win Friday night over the Detroit Tigers, who scratched starter Julio Teheran just before the first pitch.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.A Georgia couple wanted to continue taking trips and long walks with their 16-year-old dog who had become immobile, so they created a specialized mobile dog bed just for their beloved Cocoa.The number of Americans applying for unemployment benefits rose last week to 744,000, signaling that many employers are still cutting jobs.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.COOK COUNTY CRIMINAL COURTHOUSE — A South Austin man was denied bail Thursday on chargeshe killed one man and wounded three othersduring a 2014 shooting.According to prosecutors, the victims were near a front stoop in the 4900 block of West West End Street about 5 p.m. June 4, 2014, when three gunman approached from an alley and opened fire.Ronald Holliman, 18, was shot in his knee, buttocks and thigh, prosecutors said, and died at Mt. Sinai Hospital.Three other men were shot and survived: a 21-year-old who was shot in his abdomen, arm, leg, back and flank; a 26-year-old who was shot in his chest, back, abdomen and flank; and a 17-year-old who suffered a graze wound to his hip but did not seek medical treatment.Two of the victims were able to identify Dennis Weathers, now 25, as one of the shooters, Assistant State's Attorney Sheila York said during a bond hearing Thursday.Police arrested Weathers and codefendant Reginald Jackson on June 8, 2014, prosecutors said. Officers found two 9-mm handguns that matched shell casings found on the scene of the South Austin shooting, York said.Jackson wascharged in the case last weekand ordered held on $600,000 bail.Weathers, of the 400 block of North Lavergne Avenue, appeared in bond court Thursday on charges of first-degree murder and attempted first-degree murder. Cook County Judge Donald Panarese Jr. denied Weathers bail.It is not clear why prosecutors waited nearly three years to file charges.Weathers is currently an inmate at Cook County Jail, where is awaiting trial for a 2015 unlawful-use-of-a-weapon case. In that matter, York said, Weathers is accused of shooting someone multiple times on July 6, 2015.Police arrested Weathers three blocks away from the shooting, prosecutors said. A .40 caliber handgun found on a nearby rooftop matched shell casings found on the scene; a fingerprint on the gun allegedly matched Weathers.Weathers admitted to feuding with the victim in that case and to owning the gun, according to prosecutors. Bail was set at $1 million.Weathers was previously convicted of trying to blackmail a police officer by offering $5,000 to let him go free, York said. He was sentenced to boot camp. Weathers also has prior convictions for soliciting unlawful business, manufacturing and delivering a controlled substance, and driving on a suspended license.According to his public defender, Weathers has four children and previously worked in construction, specializing in rehab and demolition work.Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.SOUTH SHORE — Chicago Police have video surveillance footage of a mass shooting at a South Shore laundromat, and it shows a lone gunman opening fire "without any sort of provocation," Police Supt. Garry McCarthy said Tuesday.That lack of provocation leads police to believe the shooting that left six people wounded — including two teens — could be gang-related."It kind of fits that pattern that we're accustomed to seeing, but we haven't really made that determination," McCarthy said. "For all we know, this could be a fight over a girl."All six of the victims are expected to survive, and three already have been released from the hospital, he said.McCarthy told reporters Tuesday morning police recovered video of the shooting and said the gunman appeared to open fire "without any sort of provocation."Thegunman walked up to group of people in the 2600 block of East 79th Street and began firing a handgun at them, police said.Six people, ages 14 to 52, were shot.McCarthy said some of those wounded are known gang members, but he did not elaborate.McCarthy said there are at least five ongoing gang conflicts in the South Chicago police district where the shooting took place.Tuesday morning, blood, shattered glass and a small slipper were in the parking lot of a strip mall in the 2600 block of East 79th Street, marking the spot where the gunman opened fire Monday evening.The doors of the strip mall's laundromat were boarded up, and discarded police tape and medical supplies littered the ground. But inside, the place again bustled with neighborhood residents washing their clothes.The strip mall sits on the north side of East 79th Street, the border between the city's South Shore and South Chicago neighborhoods.Four people—including a 14-year-old boy, a 16-year-old boy, a 27-year-old woman and a 52-year-old man— were all shot in their legs, police said. A 41-year-old man was shot in his elbow, and a 42-year-old man was shot in his hand.The 14-year-old boy was taken to University of Chicago Comer Children's Hospital, and the 16-year-old was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, police said. The rest were taken to area hospitals.McCarthy said all those wounded in the shooting were cooperating with police."But they don't really have a whole heck of a lot to give us," McCarthy said. "Most of these folks didn't even see what happened."While waiting on a load of laundry, Jesse Hayes said he was shocked at news of the shooting."You always hear the sirens, but I didn't know it was like that until I saw the news this morning," he said.Customers like Hayes, who lives just a block away, said the shooting left them rattled."It's jacked up. You can't even do your laundry," Hayes said. "They need to up the police patrols."Zeke Herrera, who said he comes to the laundromat at least once a week, said he was shocked at the timing of the shooting."On a Monday of all things," he said. "Friday, by now, the mindset is you stay inside. But you shouldn't have to live like that."Herrera, who said he lives just a couple blocks away, also said he's no stranger to the sound of gunshots, but Herrera said Monday's shooting felt too close."This is my home. This is where I live," he said. "I'm feeling very afraid that it's going to be me next time."But many customers in the laundromat Tuesday morning said the shooting would not stop them from returning to the business. It's the closest option for many in the neighborhood.One man, who declined to be named, said he still feels safe in the neighborhood."It's not gonna change nothing about what I do," he said. "Nobody died up here last night, and they'll all be back this evening."When asked by a reporter what he planned to do about gang violence in South Shore and South Chicago — an area known as "Terror Town" — McCarthy said the department would continue with its gang reduction strategy."There's no magic formula here," he said. "It's hard work, and it's intelligence-based, getting in between these conflicts and preventing the next shooting."As of Tuesday afternoon, no one was in custody in connection with the shooting.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodNext inHyde Park & KenwoodCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A shooting in the Austin neighborhood fatally wounded a 17-year-old boy and injured five others, including a 14-year-old girl.The teenage boy and group of females were standing on a corner in the 500 block of North Lavergne Avenue when several people emerged from an alley firing shots, police said. The shooting occurred around 12:30 a.m., saidOfficer Amina Greer, a police spokeswoman.The boy was shot in the back and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital where he later died, Greer said. He was pronounced dead at 1:19 a.m., according to the Cook County Medical Examiner's Office. He was identified as Donald Williams, of the 3000 block of West Dickens Avenue.A 14-year-old girl, 17-year-old girl and 19-year-old woman were all taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in stable condition. The 14-year-old was shot in her back, the 17-year-old in her buttocks and 19-year-old in her arm during the shooting, Greer said.A 22-year-old woman was also taken to West Suburban Hospital in stable condition after she was struck with bullet fragments. A 19-year-old woman took herself to West Suburban Hospital after being shot in the arm, Greer said.At least one of the females is possibly gang-affiliated and no one is in custody, authorities said. Area North detectives are investigating, Greer said.Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Trending:SAN BERNARDINO >> One man was killed and three family members wounded in a late Saturday night drive-by shooting, police said Sunday.Mitchell Wayne Davis Jr., 23, of Rialto was pronounced dead shortly after midnight Sunday morning at Arrowhead Regional Medical Center in Colton, according to San Bernardino County Coroners reports.Police said the three other shooting victims suffered several gunshot wounds to the legs and are expected to survive.Davis and three family members were working on cars parked in the 2800 block of West Victoria Street shortly before 11p.m. Saturday night, according to police reports.That’s when police say someone in a black four-door Honda drove past the family and gunned them down.Authorities said the car was last seen going east on Victoria Avenue.Police have not determined the motive for the shooting or if it was gang-related.Anyone with information is asked to call Detective John Munoz at 909-384-5630 or Sgt. Gary Robertson at 909-841-5361.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.With 58 outbreaks tied to indoor dining in the past week, Gov. Whitmer is urging people to get carry out rather than eat inside.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.People spend all day staring at their phones, so when they get into the float therapy tank in Clarkston, they're introduced to a new kind of immersion. One separated from stress and anxiety that comes with the current events we keep up with.New details from the deadly US Capitol riot show Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand: “Clear the Capitol.”Franmil Reyes homered twice and Zach Plesac pitched seven dominant innings after getting an early lead to give the Cleveland Indians a 4-1 win Friday night over the Detroit Tigers, who scratched starter Julio Teheran just before the first pitch.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.A Georgia couple wanted to continue taking trips and long walks with their 16-year-old dog who had become immobile, so they created a specialized mobile dog bed just for their beloved Cocoa.The number of Americans applying for unemployment benefits rose last week to 744,000, signaling that many employers are still cutting jobs.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsHigh school graduate dismayed by violence at his partyGeorge Washington Carver Senior High 2014 graduate JeShan Vail was hoping to celebrate his accomplishment by having a party shared with friends and family. Instead the party turned violent when several people were shot including one fatality.Empty cups litter the yard. Deflated orange and green balloons dangle from a gate. A banner celebrating the graduation of a young man named JeShan hangs nearby.A graduation party here in Gentilly turned violentat 11:20 p.m. Friday, when police say a 15-year-old was fatally shot and five others were injured. Gunfire exploded after an argument, police said, with one person believed to be the gunman.JeShan Vail, 17, who graduated Thursday from George Washington Carver Senior High School, said the party was for him. He said he was standing beside his younger brother, Tremaine Robinson, 15, when Tremaine was fatally shot."He was an innocent bystander," Vail said. "He don't even sell drugs or in a gang. None of that. He's just a normal little kid."John Gagliano, chief investigator for the Orleans Parish Coroner's Office, confirmed that Tremaine Robinson, 15, of Spring, Texas, died at Interim LSU Hospital after being shot in the head.Vail said his brother was born in New Orleans, but left after Hurricane Katrina in 2005. He said part of the reason he hasn't moved back from the Houston area is that Tremaine's mother is wary of the crime here. Tremaine, he said, enjoyed basketball and fashion and was about to enter his junior year of high school.A few feet away from where Vail spoke, a "Thou Shalt Not Kill" sign was stuck in the grass.The scene at the home in the 6200 block of Eads Street was somber Saturday. By noon, people had emerged from the home to begin cleaning up what was left from the party: trays and bottles, cans and cups and food.Those injured in the gunfire included three women ages 19 to 30 and two men ages 22 to 25, police said. The 19-year-old is undergoing surgery, according to police. The others sustained non-life-threatening injuries.Around 8 a.m. Saturday morning, a car containing five young college students from Lafayette slowed down in front of the house, located off of Robert E. Lee Boulevard. The driver, a 19-year-old who declined to give her name, said she was looking for their purses, which they'd left behind in all the chaos the night before.She said she'd heard about the party on social media. The organizers charged $5 for admission and issued armbands to guests, she said.Though she said she was cautious at first, she and her friends described feeling relieved when they saw young children and what she believed were adult family members at the event."We were just having fun and the next thing you know everyone was running under the tables," said the driver, who said she's a student at the University of Louisiana at Lafayette. "We want to go back to Lafayette because there are not these problems."A tweet advertising the party on Twitterindicated free alcohol would be provided all night and that the price of admission would rise to $10 after 11 p.m.Vail said the money was collected to offset the costs of the food and drinks. He estimated 250 to 300 people attended. He said family members including Tremaine had gathered in town not only to celebrate his graduation, but also to honor an aunt who recently died."It was mostly friends," he said of the Friday party. "So whoever did what they did, we didn't know them."Neighbors said this was the second year the residents of the house had held such a party.One neighbor said she heard the shots and peeked out of her door and saw who she thought was the gunman. She said she quickly closed the door. Later, she found a bullet had pierced the trunk of her car.The woman described the teenagers who live at the house where the party was held as friendly and well-mannered, frequently engaging her in conversation. "They are really nice people," she said.The 15-year-old is the second-youngest homicide victim of the year so far in New Orleans.Detectives are investigating the incident to determine a motive and the identity of the suspect in the case. Detective Charles Hoffacker is the lead detective.Anyone with information is asked to call CrimeStoppers at 1.877.903.7863 or 504.822.1111. A cash reward of up to $2,500 is available for information leading to an arrest.Correction:An earlier version of this story, using information provided by police and coroner's office officials, incorrectly reported that there were seven additional shooting victims instead of five, and that the teen slain was named Tremaine Robertson instead of Tremaine Robinson.Photojournalist Chris Granger contributed to this report. Rebecca Catalanello can be reached atrcatalanello@nola.comor 504.717.7701.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionThe shooting that left 10 people wounded on Canal Street early Sunday follows several other high-profile multiple shootings in New Orleans in …News Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?May 23, 2014Kenneth Mills, a 22-year-old black man, was shot and killed May 23 in the 9500 block of Flower Street in Bellflower, according to Los Angeles County coroner’s records.About 7:45 p.m., three black men entered a barber shop with hoodies over their heads and opened fire without saying anything, said Det. David Gunner of the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department.Four people were injured in the shooting. Mills, a customer of the shop, was taken to a hospital where he was pronounced dead at 8:32 p.m., according to coroner’s records.German Booker, a 25-year-old manager of the shop, was also killed.------------For the RecordMarch 15, 3 p.m.: A previous version of this report said that Mills was a manager of the barbershop and Booker was a customer. Booker was a manager and Mills was a customer.------------An 18-year-old man and a 30-year-old man who were wounded were expected to survive.The barber shop was open for business at the time, but witnesses fled the scene. Gunner declined to state the motive for the shooting, but said that it was not a robbery.Anyone with information can call the Sheriff’s Department Homicide Bureau at (323) 890-5500. Those who wish to remain anonymous can call Crime Stoppers at (800) 222-8477.--Nicole Santa CruzDo you have information to share about the life of 
                    Kenneth Mills
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:German Booker Jr is the Barber Shop owner/the barber, Kenneth Mills was the Customer. German-Gman cut Kenneth hair, the customer. I know this because I am German Booker Sr. Auntie and German Booker Jr. Great Auntie and German Jr called and told me that he had his own shop and I could bring my son, his cousin up there so he can learn how to cut hair.Your information isn't accurate! German booker was the sole owner, manager and CEO of Billionaire Barber Group. He was not a customer. Kenneth Mills was a long time companion and customer at the shop as well as the other victims.German worked very hard to open his own shop for his family! And I don't want that discredited in any way! Please report facts and be knowledgeable of the facts before putting up false assumptions.I will always. Miss you baby boy it's hard. Knowing your gone its the hardest thing ever you were a good person man I wish it wasn't youFox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Darcie LorenoSANDUSKY, Ohio — A man was found beaten with serious injuries, and seven people reported being shot during an incident near DJ’s Sports Bar in Sandusky early Sunday.According to Sandusky police, police were called to the bar just after 4 a.m. to reports of a large commotion and shots fired.When they arrived, officers found one man on the ground. He had been seriously beaten, said police, and was taken to a local hospital before being taken by medical helicopter to another hospital due to life threatening injuries.While police were investigating the beating, two other people told officers they had been shot. Five others showed up at an area hospital with gunshot wounds.There is no word on any of the seven gunshot victims’ conditions or on what may have started the incident.Stick with Fox 8 and Fox8.com for more on this story.SubmitLONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.CLEVELAND (WJW) — Companies are hiring in Northeast Ohio this spring for seasonal positions and beyond.As COVID-19 vaccine distributions continue, the job economy is thawing, with the Labor Department announcing that U.S. employers added more than 900,000 jobs in March and unemployment rates moving from 6.2% to 6%.Correction:Because of incorrect information provided by D.C. police, an earlier version of this article described the site of a shooting in Northeast Washington as just outside the popular Stadium Club. The incident occurred near Queens Chapel Road and Adams Place NE, about a block from the club, in an area that is home to several other clubs. This version has been corrected.Three men and two women were shot and wounded early Saturday near a strip club in Northeast Washington.Police said the shooting occurred about 2:55 a.m. in the 2200 block of Adams Place NE, a block away from the Stadium Club,a steakhouse and gentleman’s clubpopular with professional athletes and hip-hop artists. The club is also home for a reality show called “Strip Club Queens.”Officer Hugh Carew, a D.C. police spokesman, said the shooting occurred outside, and the victims were seriously wounded.— Luz LazoAn employee at the District’s Cardozo Education Campus was arrested Friday after allegedly engaging in inappropriate communication with a student, according to D.C. police.Joseph Morales, 26, was charged with enticing a minor and has been placed on administrative leave, police said.Cardozo’s Web site lists Morales, who lives in Northwest Washington, as an educational aide at the Columbia Heights school.— Emma BrownArlington National Cemetery announced Friday that it will rename its 19th century“Old Amphitheater”for Civil War double amputee and veterans advocate James R. Tanner.Tanner was a Union corporal in the 87th New York regiment when he was wounded at theSecond Battle of Bull Runin August 1862, which cost him both legs, the cemetery said.But he survived, became a stenographer and was called to Abraham Lincoln’s deathbed to record events after the president was shot in 1865. He later headed the Grand Army of the Republic, a veterans group, and advocated for veterans.The renaming will take place at 5 p.m. May 30 during a ceremony at the amphitheater hosted by Lincoln-Cushing Camp No. 2 of the Sons of Union Veterans.— Michael E. RuaneVandals caused extensive damage at Purcellville’s Franklin Park late Friday or early Saturday, according to Loudoun County law enforcement officials, who have temporarily closed the park to investigate.The vandals “accessed work trucks” at the park and caused $25,000 in damage.— Emma BrownThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — Four men were hospitalized after a shooting in the Little Village neighborhood.About 11:15 p.m. Monday, the four men, ages 18 to 38, were standing on the sidewalk in the 3400 block of West 24th Street when a gunman began shooting from the mouth of a nearby alley, said Officer Amina Greer, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.All four men were taken to area hospitals where their conditions stabilized, Greer said. An 18-year-old was shot in the buttocks and taken to John H. Stroger Hospital. A 38-year-old was shot in the right thigh and was taken to Stroger Hospital.A 26-year-old was also taken to Stroger Hospital where he was treated for a graze wound in the  head. Another 26-year-old was shot in the buttocks and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, police said.Police said the shooting appeared gang-related, but no one was in custody as of Tuesday morning. After the shooting, the gunman got into a dark-colored sedan and drove eastbound on West 24th Street.The four men were among nine people who were wounded in shootingsacross the city's South and West sides since Monday evening.Next inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenNext inWest Loop, Near West Side, PilsenCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Get the latest from WMC Action News 5 anytime:iPhone|iPad|Android|SMS Alerts|Email Alerts|Facebook|Twitter|Instagram1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SACRAMENTO (CBS13) – The bounce house sits deflated a Natomas park, the fun replaced with fear at a 1-year-old’s birthday party.A 7-year-old girl was one of the victims hit with a bullet; an adult is dead.“I just dove to the ground. There was about 25-30 shots that rang out, everyone was screaming and yelling and just running all hysterical,” said a witness who did not want to be identified.In all, seven people were shot at Peregrine Park – on day that was supposed to celebrate a child’s life.“There was one kid shot in the leg, the other guy was shot who died … and there was a couple people around the corner [with] wounds to the leg and to the back,” the witness said.Family and friends at the party, reeling after the violence, held each other in prayer.“Somebody called and said, ‘Don’t come to this party, they just shot this party up.’ I was like I don’t believe this. What is going on?” said Brenda Jones.Jones’ 2-year-old grandson was at the birthday party.“Some lady over there pulled a bunch of kids that were at the party, she grabbed them and pulled them into her house,” Jones said.Police aren’t saying how many suspects there are, or why the gunmen chose to put little kids in the line of fire. But, investigators think it may be gang related.“Some folks approached the party, shots were fired,” said Doug Morse with the Sacramento Police Department. “Our gang detectives were called out so we are going to try to get to the bottom of that.”The six others shot during the incident are expected to survive.“It’s devastating that it happened in my backyard and the park that we go to everyday,” a neighbor in the area said.Sunday, investigators told CBS13 that they believe someone at the party fired back at some point during the shooting.Authorities ask anyone with information about the shooting to call the Sacramento Police Department.Two people were killed and three others were injured in a drive-by shooting in DeKalb County on Saturday night.The incident happened on Shamrock Drive, and authorities are continuing to look for suspects.Police told Channel 2 Action News that the victims knew the shooters and may have been involved in a dispute that started at another location.At least two suspects in one vehicle began shooting at the other vehicle, police said.“The driver of the first vehicle lost control and ran up into (a) yard and second vehicle fled,” DeKalb police Lt. A.W. Ford told Channel 2.One man and two women were wounded and transported to hospitals.No names have been released.DeKalb County police spokeswoman Mekka Parish said the drive-by shooting is not related to acrime spree that left a 9-month-old boy deadin a home invasion on Saturday night.CHICAGO (CBS)— Four people were wounded Wednesday night in a shooting in the South Shore neighborhood.The victims were walking in front of 7320 S. Phillips Av. at approximately 9:05 p.m., police said, when someone opened fire on them from a sport utility vehicle.People scattered quickly, but Chicago Fire Department paramedics transported three people from the scene. A 22-year-old man was shot in the upper right leg, and was transported to Northwestern Memorial Hospital in serious condition.  A 27-year-old man also was taken to Northwestern, in serious condition, with a wound to the left thigh.  A 21-year-old man was shot in the right arm, and taken to South Shore Hospital in fair condition.A fourth person was found a short distance away, on the 7300 block of South Oglesby Avenue, with a wound to the left calf. That person was transported in good condition to Jackson Park Hospital.No one is in custody.  Area South detectives are investigating.Discover Thomson ReutersByTami Chappell3 Min ReadKENNESAW, Georgia (Reuters) - A FedEx Corp package handler armed with a shotgun opened fire at a shipping facility in suburban Atlanta early on Tuesday, injuring six people before killing himself, apparently with his own weapon, police and hospital officials said.Three people were in critical condition, two of them with life-threatening injuries, after being shot by the 19-year-old gunman just before 6 a.m. EDT at a FedEx warehouse near the airport in Kennesaw, Georgia, about 30 miles northwest of Atlanta, police and hospital officials said.The shooter, identified as Geddy L. Kramer of Acworth, Georgia, drove up to the security guard shack at the warehouse and shot the guard before entering the warehouse where he shot the other five people, according to police.FedEx employee Liza Aiken told the Atlanta Journal-Constitution she was correcting addresses on packages when she saw a colleague dressed in black and armed with a knife, gun and a cartridge belt strapped across this chest.“He had bullets strapped to his chest like Rambo,” she told the newspaper. “He looked like he was heading into war.”Authorities searching the building after the incident found a Molotov cocktail that appeared to have been left behind by the gunman, said Cobb County Police spokesman Michael Bowman. No motive was given for the attack.Aiken said she previously had reported the man to her superiors after he pointed a work laser at her eye.Michael Hogland, a driver at the facility, told the paper his boss called him early on Tuesday and said a security guard was among the shooting victims.The six patients taken to WellStar Kennestone Hospital in Marietta all had multiple gunshot wounds that appeared to be from a shotgun, Dr. Michael Nitzken said at a news conference.Two men, 28 and 22 years old, as well as a 52-year-old woman were listed in critical condition. Another 28-year-old man was stable, while a 42-year-old woman and 19-year-old man had been treated and were being released, Nitzken said.Hundreds of police from multiple agencies converged on the scene after the shooting, and employees escorted from the facility in a bus tearfully reunited with family members at a nearby skating rink.A FedEx spokeswoman extended condolences to those affected by the shooting.“The situation is now stabilized, and we are focused on the needs of our team members and cooperating with the law enforcement investigation of this tragedy,” said company spokeswoman Shea Leordeanu.Additional reporting by David Beasley in Atlanta, Kevin Gray and David Adams in Miami.; Writing by Colleen Jenkins; Editing by Gunna Dickson and Ken WillsOur Standards:The Thomson Reuters Trust Principles.All quotes delayed a minimum of 15 minutes. Seehere for a complete listof exchanges and delays.View more photos »Feb. 16, 2021Zachary Boone, a 35-year-oldBlackmale, died Friday, Feb. 5, after beingshotnear 4611 S. Crenshaw Blvd. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Zachary Boone? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 16, 2021Juan Manuel Jacinto Cortes, a 52-year-oldLatinomale, died Wednesday, Feb. 3, after beingshotnear 2413 W. 54th St. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Juan Manuel Jacinto Cortes? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 16, 2021Devin Jerome Denmark, a 40-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Feb. 2, after beingshotnear 8th Avenue N/O 68th Street inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Devin Jerome Denmark? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 1, 2021Olend Quincy Mickell, a 48-year-oldBlackmale, died Sunday, Jan. 10, after beingshotnear 5720 2nd Ave. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Olend Quincy Mickell? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 25, 2021Demetri Lamar Alexander, a 35-year-oldBlackmale, died Wednesday, Dec. 30, after beingshotnear 3502 W. Slauson Ave. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Demetri Lamar Alexander? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Tyrell Darshay Williams, a 26-year-oldBlackmale, died Monday, Dec. 14, after beingshotnear the Rear of 3240 Slauson Ave. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Tyrell Darshay Williams? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Dawaine Raynell Henderson, a 31-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Dec. 8, after beingshotnear 5339 10th Ave. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Dawaine Raynell Henderson? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Oct. 2, 2020Michael Jamel Jackson, a 30-year-oldBlackmale, died Saturday, Sept. 12, after beingshotnear 6714 11th Ave. inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Michael Jamel Jackson? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.July 30, 2020Donte Ali Phillips, a 24-year-oldBlackmale, died Thursday, July 2, after beingshotnear West 59th Street & 5th Avenue inHyde Park, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Donte Ali Phillips? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.WGN-TVPolice in suburban Montgomery are looking for the person who shot six people at an Easter party early Sunday.It happened just after 12:30 a.m. Sunday, in Montgomery, near Aurora.Four men and two women in their 20’s were sitting inside a garage at a home in the 1300 block of Jefferson Street, when a shooter walked up and fired several shots.They were taken to the hospital, and are all expected to recover.Police said the gunman got away in a gold SUV with black rims.Anyone with information about the shooting should contact the Montgomery Police Department at (630) 897-8707 ext. 3300.SubmitCHICAGO — The Illinois Department of Public Health reported 3,630 new cases of COVID-19 and 13 deaths.The deaths were reported in the following counties:LONDON — Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Philip, also known as the Duke of Edinburgh, took part in planning his funeral and its focus on family was in accordance with his wishes. The 99-year-old duke, who died Friday, also took part in designing the modified Land Rover that will carry his coffin.CHICAGO — The man who was with 13-year-old Adam Toledo when he was fatally shot by Chicago police has been charged with felony gun charges.Ruben Roman, 21, was charged with felony reckless discharge of a firearm, unlawful use of a weapon by a felon and endangerment of a child. Roman was arrested Friday.CHICAGO (CBS) —Five children – ages 11 to 15 – were shot Sunday night in a drive-by on the South Side.The kids were walking from a nearby park to a convenience store, when they were shot in the 6600 block of South Michigan Avenue around 7:30 p.m., police said.An 11-year-old girl and a 15-year-old girl were taken to John H. Stroger Jr. Hospital of Cook County. The younger girl was the most seriously injured, initially listed in serious to critical condition, but was awake and talking Monday morning.Her cousin, 14-year-old Jamanta White, and a 14-year-old girl, were taken to Comer Children’s Hospital. The girl was in serious condition, with a gunshot wound to the abdomen.Jamanta was released from the hospital at around 10 a.m. Monday, after doctors treated him for a gunshot wound to the leg and a graze wound to his side.A fifth child, a 14-year-old girl, walked into St. Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center after the shooting. She had been grazed by a bullet.Jamanta said he and his cousin were with about seven other kids who were leaving a nearby park, and were on their way to a local convenience store when a car with four young men inside pulled up and asked what gang the kids were with.“They never gave us a chance to speak,” he said. “They just started shooting.”He said three people in the vehicle all had guns and opened fire. He said he and his friends tried to run for cover.“I had no reason to get shot, because I’m not in a gang or nothing,” he said.His grandmother, Rebecca Washington, said Jamanta and his cousin attended Easter church service earlier in the day.“Easter Sunday was a typical Sunday,” she said. “We’re in church every Sunday.”Washington said it will be a while before she lets her two grandchildren go outside to play again.Police said no suspects were in custody as of Monday morning.Fox 59by:Kylee ScalesRICHMOND, Ind. (April 11, 2014) – Four men were wounded in a Richmond shooting Thursday night.At approximately 9:05 p.m. the Richmond Police Department was dispatched to the area of North 15th and H Streets on the report of shots fired.When officers arrived, they found three men suffering from gunshot wounds. All three were taken to Reid Hospital.A fourth male was also shot, but he was able to drive himself to the hospital. The injuries are not considered life-threatening, police said.Investigators located at least 15 empty shell casings that had been fired by the suspects. Witnesses told police the suspects were three black males in a dark colored car that left the scene and headed northbound on North 15th Street.The four men who were shot have been identified as Tristen Odell Bennett, 34, Ohio; Frank Deloney, 33, Richmond; Maurice Boatman, 26, Anderson; and Terry Johnson, 23, Anderson.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call the Richmond Police Department Detective Division at 765-983-7356.SubmitLAWRENCE, Ind. -- The Lawrence Police Department (LPD) is investigating a shooting that left one person in critical condition.LPD said at 11:30 a.m. Friday, officers responded to a gas station on the 11000 block of Pendleton Pike on a report of a person shot.BRYAN, Texas (NewsNation Now) — A man opened fire Thursday at a Texas cabinet-making company where he worked, killing one person and wounding five others before shooting and seriously wounding a state trooper prior to his arrest, authorities said.Larry Winston Bollin, 27, of Iola, Texas, was booked into the Brazos County Detention Center in Bryan late Thursday, according to a Bryan Police Department statement. Jail records showed Bollin was charged with murder and being held on a $1 million bond. No attorney was listed for Bollin in the jail record.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department is investigating after a man was critically wounded in a shooting Thursday afternoon.The IMPD said the shooting happened in the 2400 block of North Sherman Drive just before 5 p.m. Thursday. When officers arrived, they found a man with injuries consistent with a gunshot wound. The man was transported to a local hospital in critical condition. His condition has since stabilized.ROCKFORD — Police said at least four people were shot with birdshot Wednesday night.None were seriously injured.About 9:40 p.m. Rockford Police officer responded to West Jefferson Street and North Sunset Avenue on a report of gunfire.Police found one spent shotgun shell casing in the street in the 300 block of North Sunset.While officers were on scene, a 16 year old male called police and reported being shot in the back and legs on North Sunset with birdshot, small pellets designed for shooting birds. Rockford Fire Department paramedics transported the teen to an area hospital for treatment.During the course of the investigation police determined that at least four other victims between 16 and 17 years old had been shot at and three of them were struck by birdshot. All had very minor wounds, police said.Police are looking for two suspects.Anyone with information regarding the incident is asked to call Rockford Police at 815-987-5824 or Crime Stoppers at 815-963-7867.— Chris GreenROCKFORD — Police said at least four people were shot with birdshot Wednesday night.None were seriously injured.About 9:40 p.m. Rockford Police officer responded to West Jefferson Street and North Sunset Avenue on a report of gunfire.Police found one spent shotgun shell casing in the street in the 300 block of North Sunset.While officers were on scene, a 16 year old male called police and reported being shot in the back and legs on North Sunset with birdshot, small pellets designed for shooting birds. Rockford Fire Department paramedics transported the teen to an area hospital for treatment.During the course of the investigation police determined that at least four other victims between 16 and 17 years old had been shot at and three of them were struck by birdshot. All had very minor wounds, police said.Police are looking for two suspects.Anyone with information regarding the incident is asked to call Rockford Police at 815-987-5824 or Crime Stoppers at 815-963-7867.— Chris Green© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Rockford Register Star  ~ 99 E. State St., Rockford, IL 61104~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Lux shooting 04-06-2014.jpgPolice cars and yellow crime scene tape surround the area in front of the Lux nightclub on Worthington Street, where four people were wounded in a shooting Sunday morning.SPRINGFIELD— A total of five gunshot victims were being treated at Baystate Medical Center in connection with two early Sunday shootings in Springfield.Four people were wounded after they apparently got caught in the crossfire between two rival groups firing at each other outsideLux Nightclubat 90 Worthington St. just before 2 a.m. Sunday.Springfield policeCapt. Harry Kastrinakis said preliminary information indicates the groups were involved in a shootout as people were leaving the nightclub around closing time. An estimated 20 rounds were fired.Police responded to the scene at 1:58 a.m. Some officers who were within earshot of the gunfire responded within moments. Multiple ambulances were dispatched to the scene.One shooting victim showed up at Mercy Medical Center for treatment, while four victims were brought to Baystate's trauma unit. None of their injuries were believed to be life-threatening. Some were shot in the torso, but most were hit in the arms or legs, Kastrinakis said.One victim was shot in the leg in Baystate's parking lot, but Kastrinakis said police were unsure if that incident was related to the shooting outside the nightclub.Several police police units were stationed near the emergency room entrance as a precaution to prevent any retribution attacks, but gunfire erupted in the parking lot despite the police presence.Police do not know how many shooters were involved in the downtown gunfight outside Lux. The incident remains under investigation.Anyone with information is asked to call the Springfield Police Detective Bureau at (413) 787-6355.This is a breaking story; more information will be posted as it becomes available.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Oklahoma City police are investigating a shooting at a club early Sunday morning.Authorities said shots were fired at Club Pulse about 1:30 a.m. That club is near Northwest 29th Street and Portland Avenue.Investigators said a fight led up the the shooting, and the gun battle continued into the parking lot.Officials said security guards opened fire when they said they came under gunfire.At least four people were taken to area hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries.Police said other shooting victims may have left the scene before officers arrived.None of the security guards were hurt.Police have questioned at least three people in the case, but no suspects were named.Share breaking news photos on u local.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Sunny. High 78F. Winds NNE at 10 to 15 mph..Clear skies. Low 51F. Winds ESE at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:10 pmEmergency personnel race through the Bernie Beck Main Gate following reports of a shooting, Wednesday, April 2, 2014 at Fort Hood.Emergency personnel race through the Bernie Beck Main Gate following reports of a shooting, Wednesday, April 2, 2014 at Fort Hood.FORT HOOD — Soldiers could face new requirements for owning personal firearms in the wake of a report on the 2014 post shooting that left four dead.The report, released Friday, makes a number of recommendations about so-called privately owned weapons based on the findings of an investigation into the shooting by 34-year-old Spc. Ivan A. Lopez.On April 2, Lopez opened fire on his fellow soldiers, killing three and wounding 16 before taking his own life.In the aftermath of Lopez’s rampage, investigators discovered the .45-caliber handgun he used was purchased at Guns Galore, an off-post retailer. Before purchasing that weapon, Lopez bought a similar model firearm at an AAFES on-post store. He later reported that gun stolen to the Killeen Police Department.The April shooting is far from the only deadly incident at Fort Hood to involve a weapon purchased privately off-post. Nidal M. Hasan also used a weapon purchased from Gun Galore in the Nov. 5, 2009, Fort Hood shooting that killed 13 people and injured more than 30 others.Four months before Lopez’s rampage, Army spouse Rouhad Ahamd Ezzeddine used a weapon and ammo purchased at Action Pawn #1 on Fort Hood Street to kill his two young daughters, and then himself, in their on-post home in January 2014.In all three cases, the weapons purchased off post were not registered when they were brought onto Fort Hood.Meet majority of requirementsAccording to Friday’s report, Fort Hood meets the majority of Army requirements for privately owned weapons. Currently, all service members and their dependents living, residing or staying temporarily on-post must register any personal firearms kept on the installation with the Directorate of Emergency Services. Registration requirements do not apply to soldiers or their families if they live off-post.“Commanders are limited in collecting a soldier’s (privately owned weapons) information if the soldier resides or stores (the weapon) off the installation,” the report states. “This impacts a commander’s ability to maintain situational awareness over a service member and their actions involving a firearm that could be concealed and brought onto the installation for unauthorized purposes.”The report stated there were about 9,800 weapons on post, though it noted the registration system is not always updated when a soldier or family member with a personal firearm leaves post.The report recommends broad changes to the National Defense Authorization Act that would require commanders to collect information about soldiers’ privately owned firearms, and require them to register the weapons regardless of residence.Changes at Fort HoodThat change, however, would require legislative action.Friday’s report also recommended changes to the personal weapons policy at Fort Hood specifically. The installation was not completely in compliance with an Army policy that mandates all soldiers and family members obtain the approval of a unit commander to register a private weapon. Instead, soldiers with the rank of sergeant first class and above are exempt from getting approval before registering a personal weapon.The report recommended the local regulation be changed to get rid of the exemption, though it also notes this policy did not have an effect on the April 2 shooting. In fact, the report concluded there were no “clear warning signs” Lopez was going to commit a mass shooting.Other recommendations included developing a de-registration policy for private weapons, and creating policy and guidance for purchasing firearms on post.On Friday, Fort Hood spokesman Col. Christopher Garver said the installation was working with Army in assessing recommendations in all the areas covered by the report.“The Army’s investigation report release Jan. 23 included several recommendations,” Garver said. “The Army, including Fort Hood, are currently in the process of evaluating and implementing those recommendations.”Contact Chris McGuinness atchrism@kdhnews.comor (254) 501-7568. Follow him on Twitter at ChrismKDH.FORT HOOD — It was just after 4:15 p.m. April 2 when gunshots rang out on post.Ft Hood (or any other military installation) will never solve the problem of these "random" shooters until the military leadership decides to recognize the right of individuals to protect themselves.  Soldiers and citizens should be permitted to carry firearms for their own protection on military installations.  Or the military needs to begin a 100% inspection regime at every gate and begin armed patrols of all public and work locations on Ft Hood.Classic example in how far left the military has moved in the last 6 years.Bubba is SPOT ON! It’s not about registering guns!The people that suggests these recommendations are smoking pot! CHL holders should be allowed to carry on Post; it’s more dangerous on Post that it is in Killeen. I use the Dental Clinic on Post and I’m in fear because some whack job going to come in and shoot the place up; while I’m sitting there like a sheep!Do they honestly believe someone bent on shooting people is going to give a rats butt about registering a firearm?This isn't about firearms registration. Once again, leadership gets focused on the incorrect aspect of this issue.Soldiers are citizens. They have rights. This includes the right to bear arms. Firearms registries are illegal. Rights are being abused and laws are being violated by some of these policies.Whether a firearm is registered, or not, is not an accurate indicator as to whom may be a threat to themselves or others with a firearm.The recurring theme with these incidents is that someone knew, prior to the incident, that the perpetrator was under stress or was a threat to others, and this information was not passed to proper authority to enter this information into the National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) as required by the United States Code. Only then can retailers prevent ineligible persons from acquiring firearms, as they have been declared mentally defective as required by law.Procedures must be implemented to identify potential threats and restrict that person's access to firearms, by linking mental health treatment and law enforcement. Mental health professionals must be more forthcoming in reporting potential threats and law enforcement must take such reports seriously, and respond accordingly.Someone in this Soldier's unit knew he was under stress. The incidents in the Soldier's life prior to the violent outburst indicate significant stress was being placed on this individual. He was under evaluation for PTSD, had sought help for depression, anxiety, and was on some form of unknown medication. This person should not have had access to firearms.The report issued indicates that the chain of command is not to blame and no signals were missed. Really?Stop focusing your after action reports on the inanimate object you seek to regulate to no useful purpose, giving the appearance that you're "doing something". Stop issuing reports exonerating those who should have known.Get focused on the problem, and fix  your broken mental health treatment system. Fix the communication systems between the medical community and commanders, who, generally, are not doctors. Give commanders the authority to intervene in the lives of Soldiers in crisis, and separate them from the ability to harm themselves and others. Restore the role of the noncommissioned officer, whose role it is to know their Soldiers and lead them while preserving their well being.^agree 100%!! If an individual is not mentally stable and even if they are ineligible to legally buy a firearm they will, in fact, use something else, knife, sword, pitch fork, etc. if they truly wish to do harm to others or themselves. Changing the regulation to try an fix this issue is like trying to put a band-aid on wound that requires a tourniquet. Firearms and weapons are not the problem, mental instability is.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.SAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) — San Francisco police said seven people were injured in a drive-by shooting, following a fight in the city’s Tenderloin neighborhood Sunday night.Witnesses reported hearing arguing during what appeared to be a game of dice. A male suspect then shot the group near Turk and Taylor streets at about 8:55 p.m., San Francisco police Sgt. Danielle Newman said.The suspect got into an argument with the victims and then walked to a double-parked silver sedan and pulled out a handgun from the car and began firing into the crowd lingering on Turk Street, Newman said.Seven victims, all males, were transported to San Francisco General Hospital, treated and released for gunshot wounds and injuries to their extremities, Newman said.The suspect then got into the passenger seat of the car and the driver headed westbound on Turk Street, Newman said.Investigators have not been able to establish a motive or make any arrests. Police are checking to see if there’s surveillance video that captured the shooting.No suspect information was immediately available.© Copyright 2014 by CBS San Francisco and Bay City News Service. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.View more photos »March 31, 2021Davon Ramon Lawrence, a 32-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, March 16, after beingshotnear 1726 Alamitos Ave. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Davon Ramon Lawrence? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.March 31, 2021Joel Campos Vargas, a 54-year-oldLatinomale, died Thursday, March 11, after beingshotnear 1600 Stanton Place inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Joel Campos Vargas? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.March 16, 2021Lavelle Lamonte Brandon, a 45-year-oldBlackmale, died Monday, Feb. 22, after beingshotnear 327 E. 25th St. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Lavelle Lamonte Brandon? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.March 2, 2021Dwight Deshaw Neals, a 31-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Feb. 16, after beingshotnear 639 Olive Ave. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Dwight Deshaw Neals? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 16, 2021Anthony Steven Loia, a 26-year-oldLatinomale, died Saturday, Feb. 6, after beingshotbylaw enforcementnear 1401 Magnolia Ave. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Anthony Steven Loia? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 16, 2021Kosta Dimitrios Kritikos, a 30-year-oldwhitemale, died Thursday, Jan. 28, after beingstabbednear 2677 56th St. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Kosta Dimitrios Kritikos? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 1, 2021Egary Baide, a 25-year-oldLatinomale, died Friday, Jan. 22, after beingshotnear 429 E. 14th St. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Egary Baide? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Feb. 1, 2021Samuel A Villalba, a 64-year-oldLatinomale, died Sunday, Jan. 10, after beingshotnear W/B 91 Freeway E/O Cherry Avenue inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Samuel A Villalba? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Arthur Touch, a 14-year-oldAsianmale, died Wednesday, Dec. 16, after beingshotnear 1440 Saint Louise Ave. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Arthur Touch? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Miguel Reyes, a 21-year-oldLatinomale, died Saturday, Dec. 12, after beingshotnear 980 N. Loma Vista Drive inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Miguel Reyes? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Alejandra Martinez, a 36-year-oldLatinofemale, died Saturday, Dec. 5, after beingshotnear Magnolia Avenue & West Anaheim Street inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Alejandra Martinez? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 16, 2020Jaime Alonzo Perez Anaya, a 55-year-oldLatinomale, died Tuesday, Dec. 1, after beingshotnear West Wardlow Road & Magnolia Avenue inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Jaime Alonzo Perez Anaya? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 16, 2020Vanessa Chacon, a 35-year-oldLatinofemale, died Sunday, Nov. 22, after beingstabbednear 1464 Chestnut Ave. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Vanessa Chacon? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 16, 2020Shemar Jajuan Alexander, a 19-year-oldBlackmale, died Friday, Nov. 20, after beingshotnear 1312 E. Artesia Blvd. inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Shemar Jajuan Alexander? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 1, 2020Joshua Maurice Mabry, a 32-year-oldBlackmale, died Friday, Nov. 6, after beingstabbednear 340 W. Pacific Coast Hwy inLong Beach, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Joshua Maurice Mabry? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.A Beaumont man pleaded guilty Monday to killing his three siblings and wounding his girlfriend last year.Joe Frederick Hawkins, 27, was sentenced to life in prison for the March 16, 2014 shooting.Jefferson County prosecutors chose not to seek the death penalty in this case because Hawkins was deemed to be intellectually disabled with an IQ below 70."This was a horrible tragedy for the Hawkins' family," Assistant District AttorneyRachel Grovesaid in a news release. "Nothing will bring back Mrs. Hawkins' children, but justice requires that Mr. Hawkins be held responsible for what he did no matter who the victims were.  We cannot stand by and allow this type of tragedy to occur in our community with no consequences."Beaumont police responded to gun shots fired at an address on Fourth Street, where they found four victims wounded, two of them already dead.Reshawna Hawkins was shot in the face and pronounced dead at the scene.Anthony HawkinsJr. was also pronounced dead at the scene with multiple wounds in his upper torso, court records show.Darrel Hawkins, the oldest brother, was shot in the head area and died later atChristus Hospital-St. Elizabeth.According to statements from witnesses, Hawkins had an altercation with all four victims.  Hawkins then produced a handgun and began firing at all victims.After shooting his three family members, he chased down and shot his girlfriend several times.  His girlfriend was the only survivor of the attack.BScott@BeaumontEnterprise.comTwitter.com/BrandonKScottBrandon Scott is a reporter at the Beaumont Enterprise.A 12-year-old boy was among four people hit in a wild shooting in Brooklyn on Friday.The targeted quartet, which also included two 14-year-olds and a 17-year-old, were all shot in the legs at S. Second and Roebling Sts. in Williamsburg at about 7:30 p.m., according to witnesses and police sources.They immediately scattered but then fell from their wounds, creating a crime scene that stretched for two blocks.The victims, who are all expected to survive, have been uncooperative with detectives, police sources said.The parents of one 14-year-old victim said a man called out and started blasting away ."In New York nothing surprises me," the teen's 60-year-old mom said outside Bellevue Hospital. "I just try to stay prayed up."The shooting could be gang related, according to a police source.Fox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Dave NethersIgmidio Mista (Courtesy: Fremont Police Department)FREMONT, Ohio – Authorities have named the alleged suspect in a fatal bar shooting in Fremont, Ohio.Police are searching for Igmidio Mista, 33, and say he should be considered armed and dangerous.Three people including an off-duty police officer are dead and another is in the hospital after ashooting in Fremont, Sunday morning.Police said they were called to the Last Call Bar around 1:30 a.m. for reports of shots fired.Friends of the victims told FOX 8 News the shooting may have been the result of an argument that escalated.Among the deceased is Officer Jose ‘Andy’ Chavez of the Elmore, Ohio Police Department.Elmore Sgt. Jeffrey Harrison described Chavez as “a great guy.”Chavez was a full time officer, one of only six officers in the department including the police chief.He was a father of two young children, ages 16 months and 6 years.Harrison said Chavez was out celebrating a belated 26th birthday with friends when the shooting started.Also among the victims is Ramiro Sanchez, 28, an employee of the bar and a local musician whose friends said enjoyed working with other musicians in the area.“He’s real big into helping people get bigger. He helps publicize. He helps do all their fliers, helps get all their shows going, you know. He tries to help out a lot. He would give you the shirt off of his back if you asked for it,” said Robert Saudeda.Police identified the third victim as Daniel Ramirez, a patron of the bar who may have been there helping celebrate with Chavez.A fourth victim, Ramiro Arrola, 25, was flown to a Toledo hospital. His condition was not known on Sunday.Little is known about what led to the shooting.Neighbor, Chris Page, was shocked. “It was a very quiet bar. It was families and couples involved with it. It was family-owned and that’s all you would see going in there was couples,” said Page.Agents with the Bureau of Criminal Identification were assisting Sandusky County Sheriff’s deputies, The Ohio Highway Patrol, and local police with the investigation.According to the Fremont Police, Mista is wanted on three murder charges for the shooting. Each charge is a first degree felony with a maximum penalty of 15 years to life in prison and a $15,000 fine.They’re asking anyone with information to contact them at 419-332-6464.CLICK HEREfor more.SubmitLONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.CLEVELAND (WJW) — Companies are hiring in Northeast Ohio this spring for seasonal positions and beyond.As COVID-19 vaccine distributions continue, the job economy is thawing, with the Labor Department announcing that U.S. employers added more than 900,000 jobs in March and unemployment rates moving from 6.2% to 6%.A gunman opened fire on a home in the Austin neighborhood Sunday morning after an argument at a party, wounding six people, including a high school basketball star, police and hospital officials said.The shooting happened around 3:30 a.m. in the 4900 block of West Race Avenue on the West Side, said Officer Hector Alfaro, a Chicago Police Department spokesman.The shooter left the home after a dispute with another person, returned with a gun and shot into the home, Alfaro said.Bullets struck six people.Tyquone Greer, a Division I college basketball prospect at Orr Academy High School, was one of three victims taken to Stroger Hospital, a hospital official said.Greer and his family could not be reached for comment Sunday. But his coach, Louis Adams, said Greer was home from the hospital and is expected to make a full recovery."He's doing pretty well," Adams said. "Fortunately the bullet went in and out." Two others were taken to Stroger and were stabilized, a 17-year-old boy shot in the face and an 18-year-old man shot in the arm, police said.A 20-year-old man shot in the chest, back and leg was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was listed in serious condition. A 22-year-old man was also taken to Mount Sinai with a gunshot wound to the calf. His condition was stabilized, police said.About the same time, a 20-year-old woman arrived at Loretto Hospital shot in the abdomen and lower leg. She was transferred to Mount Sinai Medical Center and listed in serious condition.Police did not immediately take anyone into custody or release a suspect description.Greer's team is considered a favorite in the Class 3A basketball tournament. Asked whether he had heard from a lot of college coaches Sunday, Adams said he had taken "a million calls.""With the grace of God, everything is going to be OK with his career. … Right now we just want the kid to get well."Freelance reporter Mike Helfgot contributed.asege@tribune.com|Twitter:@AdamSegeCONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneRICHMOND (CBS SF) — One person was killed and three others injured in a shooting in unincorporated North Richmond on Saturday night, a spokesman said Sunday.At around 10 p.m., deputies responded to reports of several people who had been shot in front of a home in the 1600 block of First Street, Contra Costa County Sheriff’s spokesman Jimmy Lee said.Two victims were taken by private vehicle to Doctors Medical Center in San Pablo before deputies arrived at the scene, Lee said.Two other victims remained at the scene and were taken by ambulance to John Muir Medical Center, he said.One of the victims who had been taken to Doctors Medical Center — a 23-year-old man — was flown by helicopter to John Muir, where he later died, Lee said.The victim’s name was not released.The three other victims were expected to survive, Lee said.No suspects have been identified.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact the Contra Costa County Sheriff’s Office at (925) 313-2600 or the anonymous tip line at (866) 846-3592.© Copyright 2014 by CBS San Francisco and Bay City News Service. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributedSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A woman who hid under a bed to escape a man who killed three other people has described what happened.The information in the police report from the Anderson County Sheriff's Office came from the sole survivor of the shooting, 36-year-old Tara Hendricks.Hendricks called police from a house a short distance from where the shooting took place on Law Street on Wednesday.  Hendricks told deputies that she had been the home on Law Street in Pelzer where she and Victor Vandergrift live.  She said her friend, Hank Eaton, was also there.She said Eaton got into an argument with 34-year-old Jared Williams, who was at the home. She said the argument became heated, and Williams pulled out a handgun and shot and Eaton.Hendricks said Williams then shot and killed Vandergrift, and then shot her. She said she hid under the bed, and Williams stayed in the house until another woman came in, and he shot and killed her.Thursday morning, Deputy Coroner Don McCown identified those killed as Wanda Renee Anderson, 43, Victor Vandergrift, 48, and Hank Eaton, 33.Hendricks said that Williams then stole a green truck and drove away.  He was later captured after a chase and crash in Piedmont. (Full story, video, pictures)Gladys Waters, the 91-year-old neighbor whose home Hendricks ran to after the shooting, said, "She was scared to death.  She was foaming at the mouth.  She was hollering, 'Call 911, call 911.'"Waters said Hendricks told her she was shot in the leg and the arm."She was bleeding and I got her a roll of paper towels," said Waters.Investigators said Hendricks injuries are not life-threatening.  She remains hospitalized.Williams was under guard at Greenville Memorial Hospital until Thursday afternoon, when he was moved to the Anderson County Detention Center.His girlfriend, Hope Phillips, 19, was arrested Wednesday night and charged with murder, four counts of accessory after the fact of murder and larceny.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.PITTSBURGH (KDKA) — A man has pleaded guilty in a 2014shooting that left four men injured and one dead.Cornell Poindexter, 30, appeared in court Monday and pleaded guilty to one count of 3rd degree murder, four counts of aggravated assault and one count of person not to possess a firearm.The charges stemmed from a shooting that occurred on Mar. 4, 2014 at the Rendezvous Phase III bar on Hamilton Avenue.Vincent Holt Jr., 27, was was shot eight times and pronounced dead at the scene, while four other men were taken to the hospital with non-life-threatening wounds.According to our partners at The Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, 23-year-old Corey Clark was originally accused of being the gunman, but those charges were dropped.In exchange for his guilty plea, Poindexter was sentenced to 15 to 30 years in prison.Join The Conversation On The KDKA Facebook PageStay Up To Date, Follow KDKA On TwitterThis material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten,
      or redistributed. ©2021 FOX News Network, LLC. All rights reserved.
      Quotes displayed in real-time or delayed by at least 15 minutes. Market data provided byFactset. Powered and implemented byFactSet Digital Solutions.Legal Statement. Mutual Fund and ETF data provided byRefinitiv Lipper.Detroit Police Officers check out the scene after a shooting injuring four people at a tax preparation business in Detroit, Friday, Feb. 28, 2014. Deputy Police Chief Rodney Johnson said a woman became upset when her tax refund wasn't ready Friday and started scuffling with the guard. Johnson said the man with her pulled a gun and started shooting. (AP Photo/Detroit Free Press, Jarrad Henderson)  DETROIT NEWS OUT; NO SALES; MANDATORY CREDIT(The Associated Press)DETROIT –A man who authorities say shot three people at a Detroit tax-preparation business has been charged with attempted murder, weapons violations and other crimes.The Wayne County prosecutor's office says 19-year-old Xzavier Mazyck was arraigned Monday. He is being held on a $250,000 bond, and his Mazyck's probable cause hearing is scheduled for March 14.Prosecutors say Mazyck got into an argument Friday with a tax preparer because a woman accompanying him wasn't able to get a cash tax refund at Tax City Tax Service.Prosecutors say Mazyck shot a security guard and two women inside the building and beat a tax preparer. Police said earlier that four people were shot.Get all the stories you need-to-know from the most powerful name in news delivered first thing every morning to your inboxSubscribedYou've successfully subscribed to this newsletter!This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX News Network, LLC. All rights reserved. Quotes displayed in real-time or delayed by at least 15 minutes. Market data provided byFactset. Powered and implemented byFactSet Digital Solutions.Legal Statement. Mutual Fund and ETF data provided byRefinitiv Lipper.Mugshot of Kevin Dale Palmer, provided by the Washington County, Va., Sheriff's OfficeGLADE SPRING — Four people are dead and one is hospitalized in fair condition as the result of a domestic shooting in Southwest Virginia Tuesday.Officers with the Washington County Sheriff's Office received a call around 5:30 a.m. Tuesday about a shooting in progress at 33325 Graceland Lane, Glade Spring. The person who called was believed to be Griffin Palmer, 17.He told officers that two people had been shot at the residence, and then the phone was disconnected.When Palmer was contacted by telephone, he told police he had been shot. When asked where the shooter was, he stated in the house, according to a news release.When officers arrived at the scene, they found five people who had been shot inside the home. Two were dead while the other three were in critical condition.The injured were Kristin Palmer, 46, 21131 Deerfield Lane, Glade Spring; Griffin Lane Palmer, 17; and Terry Griffin, 75. All three were transported to Bristol Regional Medical Center.Griffin Palmer died on the way to the hospital, and Kristin Palmer died at BRMC. Terry Griffin is listed in fair condition, the release stated.Nancy Griffin, 74, and Kevin Dale Palmer, 44, 21131 Deerfield Lane, were dead at the scene. Police believe Kevin was the shooter and died from what officers said appears to be a self-inflicted gunshot wound.Investigators think the shooting was the result of an ongoing domestic dispute between Kristin and Kevin. Authorities said there was evidence of forced entry into the home and a struggle inside.Both Nancy Griffin and her husband, Terry, were retired from Emory and Henry College.Emory and Henry President Jake Schrum released the following statement about the incident.“On behalf of Emory & Henry College, I wish to express my profound condolences to the family and friends of Nancy Griffin, a former employee of Emory & Henry College, and other members of her family who died Tuesday morning," he said. "We ask for prayers for Nancy’s family, including her husband, Dr. Terry Griffin, a retired E&H professor, who is recovering from injuries sustained in the incident. Both Nancy and Terry, who served this institution with distinction and dedication for many years, occupy an important place in the heart of the Emory & Henry community, and this tragedy leaves us with an extreme sense of sadness and loss.”Kristin Palmer was an English and drama teacher at Virginia High School. She had been employed by the school for the last 20 years. She coached a competitive drama team, and her students consistently won regional championships, according to school principal Ronnie Collins.She taught English at all levels as well as summer school and home school."She was very energetic and vibrant," Collins said. "She will be sorely missed by all the faculty she worked alongside for the last 20 years."Griffin Palmer was a student at Patrick Henry High School in Glade Spring. He was active in athletics.Trending:HARBOR CITY (CNS) – An argument degenerated to a shooting at a family party at a Harbor City home today, leaving one person hospitalized in critical condition and three others winged.The three other shooting victims wounds were considered non-life threatening, said Sgt. Ed Piago of the Los Angeles Police Department’s Harbor station.The shooting was in the 1200 block of West Papeete Street and was reported to police at 2:45 a.m., Piago said.According to police at the scene, the suspect drove away in a dark- colored BMW.Harbor station police detectives asked anyone with any information regarding the shooting attack to call them at (310) 726-7900.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.ALTURAS, Modoc County (KPIX 5) — A woman involved in an eviction hearing at an American Indian tribal headquarters near the Oregon border went on a deadly rampage Thursday, killing four people and critically wounding two others in a gun and knife attack, police said.Cherie Lash Rhoades, a former tribal leader and chairwoman of Cedarville Rancheria in Modoc County, was arrested after the attack, said Alturas Police Chief Ken Barnes.The dead include a 19-year-old woman, a 30-year-old man, a 45-year-old woman and a 50-year-old man, with one of the victim’s being the tribe’s leader,Barnes said.Rhoades is charged with four counts of murder and two counts of attempted murder.Barnes said tribal members were meeting about evicting Rhoades and her son from property at the Rancheria which, according to its website, is a federally recognized tribe with 35 members.During the hearing, Rhoades drew a semi-automatic handgun and started shooting, Barnes said. When she ran out of ammunition, Rhoades ran into the kitchen, grabbed a butcher knife and charged after a woman who had already been shot several times, Barnes said.Four people were shot in the tribal office and a fifth was shot trying to flee, police said.One of the people who escaped the attack, and was covered in blood, ran to the Alturas police station to report the attack, Barnes said.When officers arrived the suspect was outside the building, running and clutching the knife in her hands, but a Rancheria employee helped tackle her and she was quickly subdued and brought into custody, Barnes said.Map of a fatal shooting at the Cedarville Rancheria Tribal Office in Alturas on February 20, 2014. (CBS)The stabbing victim and one of the shooting victims—both women—were taken to a Redding hospital where they were in critical condition, the Redding Record-Searchlight reported.Investigators said they found two guns but Barnes said he didn’t know whether both had been used in the shooting, the Record-Searchlight said.A person who answered the phone at a residence listed for Rhoades declined to comment Thursday evening.Alturas, the seat of Modoc County, is a town with a population of about 2,800 and is known for its remote wilderness and natural beauty. It is about 55 miles south of the Oregon border and 35 miles west of the Nevada line.Officials said the Rancheria owns 26 acres in Cedarville, Calif., and many of its families reside there, according to the tribe’s website.The tribal office in Alturas hosts tribal events and activities like council meetings, youth tutoring and holiday celebrations.TM and © Copyright 2014 CBS Radio Inc. and its relevant subsidiaries. CBS RADIO and EYE Logo TM and Copyright 2014 CBS Broadcasting Inc. Used under license. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten. The Associated Press contributed to this report.A shootout between rival gangs left one man dead and six others injured at a teen function at a Dallas nightclub early Sunday morning.Dallas police said it happened at about 1 a.m. Sunday at the B-N-H club on the 2600 block of South Harwood Street.Dallas police told NBC DFW that rival gangs caused a disturbance inside the club during a function for teens. Armed security used mace to break up the fight and forced the offenders outside, where the shooting took place.The latest news from around North Texas.Officers arrived to find 21-year-old Terrance Carroll dead from gun shot wounds. Six other people were treated for non life-threatening gunshot wounds.Several witnesses identified 22-year-old Eugene Rudd as the shooter. He was taken into custody for unlawful possession of a weapon by a felon. Police said additional charges may also be added.MGM Resorts president and CEO Bill Hornbuckle said Saturday the company is working with Nevada Gov. Steve Sisolak to open Allegiant Stadium at full capacity by July.Capstone Christian Academy plans to start construction next year on a new 25-acre main campus with brick buildings and lush greenery.Las Vegas homicide detectives are helping investigate after a body was found Saturday morning in Summerlin.A jury in Las Vegas awarded $29.5 million on Friday to the family of a woman who was left brain damaged after being treated for a severe allergic reaction in 2013.Nevada’s attorney general and lieutenant governor want to end the death penalty, but Clark County’s district attorney is pushing for the state’s first execution since 2006.The jackpot was one of several across Nevada recently.Bills that would abolish the death penalty, ban “ghost guns,” and allow for cannabis consumption lounges were among dozens of bills approved by lawmakers on Friday.At least one of the three confirmed cases of the Brazilian variant — thought to spread more easily — occurred in Clark County, the state’s lab director said.Congress returns from a break this week to confront issues including improved security at the Capitol, President Joe Biden’s infrastructure bill and taxes.A man was found dead inside a burning home Friday afternoon in western Las Vegas.Temperatures will climb to the upper 80s Saturday with a sunny sky and light afternoon breezes in the Las Vegas Valley, according to the National Weather Service.The case has been closed, and no charges will be filed, a Metropolitan Police Department spokesman said Friday.The Southern Nevada Health District has announced it is expanding the hours for vaccine appointments at the Las Vegas Convention Center.Golden Entertainment, Inc. employees and their families will be able to sign up for a vaccine at one of the company’s six hotel-casinos.Becca’s Restaurant & Lounge, Casa Calavera, Al Solito Posto, Ada’s Wine Bar and Project BBQ expand options for those who want to dine in the great outdoors.When Gray and Sue Gatlin moved into their south Las Vegas Valley community in 2013, they were surprised by how much non-functional grass was in their neighborhood. As most of the lots are about a half-acre in size, it meant large swaths of grass were being watered even though they weren’t used for play or […]Drilling began in November 2019 and on Thursday, media members got their first look at the Tesla-centered $52.5 million Convention Center transit system.Lace up those dancing shoes: the Electric Daisy Carnival is officially on as scheduled.Bryce Hamilton on Thursday became the eighth Rebels’ player to enter the portal since the season concluded last month. The 6-foot-4-inch junior led UNLV in scoring the last two seasons.Check out the Las Vegas Raiders' new $2 billion home with this view looking south.Copyright ©2019Las Vegas Review-Journal, Inc.|Privacy Policy|Terms of ServicePowered byWordPress.com VIPsublogCROWN POINT | An Illinois man was sentenced Thursday to 14 years in prison after he pleaded guilty to being involved in a shootout last year at the Safe and Sound Senior Citizens Social Club in Gary.Kendall M. Reed, 25, of Calumet Park, pleaded guilty to aggravated battery, a Class B felony. As part of the plea agreement, he could have been sentenced to prison for 10 to 14 years.The shooting happened Feb. 12, 2014, after Reed intended to rob the club at 2220 Broadway, which led to a shootout between Reed and club patrons, according to court records. Five people, including Reed, were wounded in the shooting.According to the plea agreement, one of the victims, Stevie Coleman, is no longer able to use his left arm because of the gunshot wound. Coleman also was shot in the upper left leg.Deputy Prosecuting Attorney Robert Persin presented Lake County Criminal Judge Clarence Murray with a letter from Coleman and photos of the injuries.Persin said the injuries have drastically impacted Coleman's employment and personal relationships. He argued for the 14-year term, citing Reed's extensive criminal history.Persin said Reed has had 27 contacts with law enforcement, and he was on parole in Illinois when the shooting happened.Defense attorney Marc Laterzo told Murray though his client does have past felony convictions, Reed has been cooperative and remorseful for his actions.Reed apologized to a mostly empty courtroom for his actions. He said he wants to take advantage of programs while incarcerated, and hopes to become a better role model for his younger relatives."I'm (going to) do my time constructively," Reed said.Murray said it was clear from Coleman's letter and photos that the gunshot injuries have nearly destroyed his life. He told Reed he hopes he will use his time wisely in prison."You don't have to stay on this course that you've been on," Murray said.Return to Regional Crime ReportReturn to Regional Crime ReportReturn to Regional Crime ReportReturn to Regional Crime ReportGet local news delivered to your inbox!CROWN POINT | Gary police identified a 23-year-old Chicago man as the suspect who shot four victims Wednesday night in an unlicensed bar and g…GARY | The senior club where five people were shot late Wednesday was not registered to do business in the state after failing to file documen…See all the latest crime map updates for Gary here.See all the latest crime map updates for Whiting here.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.FOX40by:Ian McDonaldSTOCKTON-Stockton Police say four people were shot, one fatally, at Constitution Park late Wednesday afternoon.Three victims were rushed to the hospital. Their condition was not immediately known.Investigators have not released any information about a motive or possible shooters.SubmitAs governors loosen long-lasting coronavirus restrictions, state lawmakers across the U.S. are taking actions to significantly limit the power they could wield in future emergencies.The legislative measures are aimed not simply at undoing mask mandates and capacity limits that have been common during the pandemic. Many proposals seek to fundamentally shift power away from governors and toward lawmakers the next time there is a virus outbreak, terrorist attack or natural disaster.WASHINGTON (AP) — The Supreme Court is telling California that it can’t enforce coronavirus-related restrictions that have limited home-based religious worship including Bible studies and prayer meetings.The order from the court late Friday is the latest in a recent string of cases in which the high court has barred officials from enforcing some coronavirus-related restrictions applying to religious gatherings.SACRAMENTO, Calif. (AP) — Intensive care nurse Meynard Villa was on the verge of losing his family’s $150,000 investment in his new senior care home because he couldn't hire workers while grappling with a glitchy state system designed to automate criminal background checks.The California Department of Social Services' new portal is supposed to help home and community care providers, foster care families and even nannies and baby-sitters who apply for clearance under the state's background check system.Barbara A. BesteniBarbara A. BesteniMIAMI– Five people were shot in a drive-by shooting along Northwest 41st Street and 9th Avenue in Miami-Dade County.Three of the victims were airlifted to Jackcon Memorial Hospital in critical condition.  Two others were taken to the hospital by ambulance.  One of those victims has already been released.  The other is in stable condition.Sources say the victims were standing in front of a house when a man walked up, pulled a gun and fired at close range, striking all five people.There was no sign a of a getaway car and police say they believe the shooter ran, perhaps to a car waiting around the block.According to investigators, the shooting appears to be gang-related.Large quantities of marijuana were found inside the house, and one of the victims was arrested and charged with possession of a stolen gun which he had when police arrived.Copyright 2014 by Local10.com. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.ROGERS PARK — Rapper Young Pappy survived a shooting attempt that left a 17-year-old dead outside a Rogers Park McDonald's, and later was unscathed when a bullet intended for him killed a photographer waiting for a bus instead, police have said.But earlier this month, the rapper — whose real name is Shaquon Thomas — allegedly went back to that same McDonald's at 6740 N. Clark St., where he got in a fight with a man who later was shot across the street from the restaurant, police said.Now, Thomas —whom authorities have told residents about at community meetings— is in jail.He is locked up on $50,000 bail while awaiting a Thursday court hearing.Ben Woodard spoke to Thomas' mother about her son's arrest:Thomas was charged with marijuana possession and reckless conduct on Jan. 14 after he was arrested at his mother's home, according to a police report.The 18-year-old man he got into a fight with wasshot in the legabout 11:50 a.m. Police said the victim was cooperating in the investigation, but no charges have been filed in the shooting.Thomas is no stranger to gunplay.Last February, surveillance videocaptured a masked gunman opening fireon the rapper and the group he was walking with outside the McDonald's, striking him in the arm and killing 17-year-old Markeyo Carr, whose family lives in the same building as Thomas' mother. While Markeyo was with the group,his relatives have said he was not in a gang.Then, on July 12,photographer Wil Lewiswas killed by a stray bullet when another shooteropened fireat the rapper, who was walking in the 1300 block of Devon Avenue, police said. Lewis had been waiting for a bus and was shot in the back.The rapper celebrated his 19th birthday in jail during the time between the shootings. He served about two months of a one-year sentence for unlawful use of a weapon/vehicle, according to the Illinois Department of Corrections.Now, Thomas is back in jail.On Jan. 14, the rapper could be seen on surveillance camera footage "verbally assaulting" the man who later was shot, according to a police report. The commotion caused customers to rush out of the restaurant.After the altercation, officers responded to shots fired in the 1600 block of West Columbia Avenue, where they found the victim, the report said.Officers then went to Thomas' mother's home, where the rapper's mother allowed officers to search the apartment, the report said.Thomas was found inside the unit, the report said. Before leaving, Thomas asked for his jacket. When officers searched the jacket, they found four knotted plastic bags containing pot, according to the report. The red-and-black jacket with an "Indian" on the back matched the description of someone who was seen fleeing the scene of the shooting, the report said.A $50,000 bail was set for Thomas in court the next day, according to court records.Thomas' mother, Ingrid Thomas, said Thursday there was no evidence to prove her son was the target of any shootings."I could believe that if my son was the only person out there, but he wasn't," she said, standing at the front door of the home where her son was arrested two weeks earlier. "I don't believe the police. They don't have proof."She said her son had straight As in grade school, but began hanging around a bad crowd at Sullivan High School. (The police report of the most recent shooting incident described him as a known member of the Insane Cutthroat Gangstas, a Gangster Disciples street gang in Rogers Park.)Now, she fears for her son's life, she said."It's very scary, and it's very frustrating," she said.She said when her son was arrested, police entered her home with guns drawn. They later searched the home for hours "looking for a gun," she said, but didn't find any.She said the police are "painting my son as someone that he's not.""I'm not arguing with the police, but you can't believe everything they say," she said.Thomas recently had been introduced to a Chicago Police Department program that refers people at risk of gun violence to social services, such as job training.In addition to the recent incident, Thomas has other convictions in his background: In June 2013, he was convicted of felony unlawful use of a weapon and sentenced to two years probation, court records show, but he violated that probation and was sentenced to a year in prison.The following year, Thomas racked up four misdemeanor convictions for retail theft, criminal trespass and two counts of reckless conduct, and was sentenced to a total of 65 days in jail.Between stints in jail, the well-known rapper racked up more than 50,000 views on one of his most recent YouTube music videos, titled "Savages."The song includes an apparent reference to the shootings."...Tried to set me up, but you missed n----," he raps.Thomas has also publisheda videowith fellow rapper and Insane Cutthroat Gangsta Keith Hayer, akaBang Da Hitta.The duo seems to have a close bond. Since Thomas was locked up, Hayer has been posting messages to his Facebook page calling for Thomas' release.Contributing:Erica Demarest, Erin MeyerFor more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterNext inRogers Park & EdgewaterCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Fox 59by:Matt Adams - Web Producer,Zach MyersAbove (left to right) Ernest Jasper, Andrew Parish and Sara DavidsonFRANKLIN (Feb. 4, 2014) – Johnson County authorities believe 21-year-old Andy Parish knew he was going to die.They say Parish left a vague suicide note in the bedroom of the home he shared with his parents. But, they say the note gave no indication that he intended to hurt or kill anyone else.Around 10:30 Monday night, Franklin Police say Parish took a handgun to a house on Bridlewood Drive, where he argued with his ex-girlfriend, 19-year-old Maria Davis. Davis lived in the house with her mother, Leanne Smith, her 12-year old brother and her friend, 19-year old Sarah Davidson. Davidson had just moved into the house three days earlier, according to her mother.Investigators say the argument between Parish and Davis prompted her younger brother to run across the street for help. He found 46-year old Ernest Jasper and his two sons, Dustin Gray, 21 and Danny Scott Jr, 18. Jasper and his two sons went across the street to calm things down, according to police. And that’s when the situation turned deadly.Franklin Police Chief Tim O’Sullivan said Parish fired multiple shots, killing Sarah Davidson at the scene and injuring Leanne Smith and Dustin Gray. Ernest Jasper survived his injuries for a short time before he was later pronounced dead.“This is a very violent scene and unexpected,” O’Sullivan said. “I don’t know that I have words for it. It’s just something you hope never to see again.”Smith sustained a minor injury and was treated and released. Gray was last reported in stable condition at Eskanazi Hospital.Maria Davis and her 12-year old brother were not injured.After the shootings at the house, investigators say Parish drove his Ford Mustang a short distance to a grain silo along County Road 400 North. A neighbor who saw his car called it in as suspicious activity. As police responded and announced their presence, Parish was standing a few feet from his car. Without a word, they say he turned an AK-47 on himself and took his own life.“It’s just a sad day in Johnson County,” said Sheriff Doug Cox. “Unfortunately, we may have these type of incidents once a year, but once is once too many.”During a Tuesday news conference, police said there were no outward signs that Parish would resort to deadly violence. They said the suicide note left at his parents house was found after the shootings occurred. They did not share details on what the note said, but did mention that it was vague.Reached by telephone, Sarah Davidson’s mother told Fox59 that her daughter had just move into the house on Friday. She said Sarah and Maria Davis had been friends from middle school. She said Sarah never mentioned any problems with Maria’s ex-boyfriend, Andy Parish.A friend of Ernest Jasper told Fox59 that Jasper was a kind man who would do anything to help somebody. According to police, that’s what he was trying to do when he was killed Monday night.Investigators were still working to determine what caused Parish to turn toward violence. Pictures on his Facebook page showed him and Maria Davis during happier times. There were also several pictures of guns and ammunition, similar to what police say they found in his car.Franklin Mayor Joe McGuiness praised the work of law enforcement in responding to the violence. He also stressed the importance of spotting any warning signs of violent behavior.“You know, a lot of times we hear domestic violence, whether it’s emotional, physical, whatever that may be,” McGuiness said. “This is a perfect situation where it can be taken and escalated to the next level. And it needs to be taken very seriously. “SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.CHICAGO (STMW) —Three people were killed and at least 14 others were wounded since early Saturday in shootings across the city.Miguel Naverrette, 15, was shot and killed in the Little Village neighborhood Sunday afternoon.Naverrette was sitting inside a parked vehicle in the 4100 block of West 30th Street about 4:50 p.m. when someone inside a dark-colored SUV pulled up and fired shots at him while yelling gang slogans, authorities said.Naverrette, of the 2800 block of South Karlov Avenue, was shot in the abdomen and side and pronounced dead on the scene at 5:24 p.m., authorities said. Police said the teen had gang affiliations.A man was shot and killed early Saturday in the South Lawndale neighborhood.Police responding to a call of a person shot about 2:55 a.m. found the 23-year-old man unresponsive on the sidewalk in the 3800 block of West 26th Street, police said. The man suffered a gunshot wound underneath his chin.Jose Nunez, of the 1800 block of North Leavitt Street, was pronounced dead at the scene at 3:10 a.m., according to the Cook County Medical Examiner’s office.About two hours earlier, four people were wounded and one man was killed in a shooting in a bar on the South Side.The five people were shot about 12:52 a.m. while they were attending a party inside Rudy’s Lounge in the 5100 block of South Union Avenue, police said. An argument broke out between party-goers and two uninvited males, and after the males were escorted from the bar by security, shots were fired from the bar’s doorway.Elsaleem Mannte’el, 35, of the 8100 block of South Drexel Avenue, suffered a gunshot wound to the head and was taken to John H. Stroger Jr. Hospital of Cook County, where he was pronounced dead at 1:38 a.m., according to police and the Cook County Medical Examiner’s office.Also, a 37-year-old man was shot in the neck and a 40-year-old man suffered a graze wound to the head, police said. Both men were taken to Stroger Hospital, where they were both listed in “stable” condition.A woman, 34, suffered a graze wound to the neck in the shooting and took herself to Provident Hospital of Cook County, police said. She was later transferred to Stroger Hospital and listed in “stable” condition.A 37-year-old man also drove himself to Provident Hospital with a graze wound to the arm, police said. As of 5 a.m., he had been treated and released.Ten other people were shot across the city over the weekend, including a man in the River North neighborhood Sunday evening.The 42-year-old was shot in the chest and arm just before 7:30 p.m. in the 300 block of West Chicago Avenue, police said. The man was taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital where he was listed in “stable” condition, police said.No one is in custody for any of the shootings as area detectives investigate.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2014. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)A Saturday night shooting in Belle Glade left four people hospitalized, according to a Palm Beach County Sheriff's Office news release.It happened about 8:20 p.m. as a group of people were standing outside in the 600 block of Covenant Drive. That's when a vehicle drove by and opened fire, leaving four people hit.Palm Beach County Fire Rescue took the victims to a local hospital.Investigators set up a perimeter after more than one person ran toward a nearby cane field, according to the release.Deputies also found a vehicle riddled with bullets, but it is not known if the vehicle is related to the shooting. The investigation remains underway.NewarkShootings.jpgProsecutors have identified the victims of a shooting that left 2 people dead and three others injured in Newark on Tuesday. Akbar Muhammad, the 36-year-old son of a city Imam, and 28-year-old East Orange woman Shante Spivey were gunned down while sitting in a parked car on Springfield Avenue on Tuesday morning.(Seth Augenstein/The Star-Ledger)NEWARK— Investigators have identified the victims of a shooting that left two people dead and three hurt after a gunman opened fire on a parked car in Newark's Central Ward Tuesday.Akbar Muhammad, the 36-year-old son of a well-respected Newark imam, and 28-year-old Shante Spivey of East Orange were shot and killed at 11:43 a.m. Tuesday on Springfield Avenue, according to Acting Essex County Prosecutor Carolyn Murray.Three other victims, a 35-year-old woman, a 34-year-old man and an 18-year-old man, were injured in the attack, Murray said. They were listed in stable condition at University Hospital in Newark Tuesday night, according to Newark Police Director Samuel DeMaio, who said one of the victims was a local store owner.All five victims were sitting in a parked car near the intersection of Springfield and Fairmount avenues when a lone gunman walked up and started shooting, DeMaio said on Tuesday. Muhammad, who was in the driver's seat, died at the scene. Spivey was pronounced dead at University Hospital a short time later.DeMaio said the attack was "targeted," but claimed it was too early to tell who the shooter was aiming for. The gunman remains at large, and prosecutors have not commented on a motive in the twin slayings.Muhammad is the eldest son of Imam Abdul Akbar Muhammad of Ali K. Muslim Mosque in Newark. Many consider him one of the most well-respected imams in the city and a leader in the local Muslim community.Muhammad is survived by his parents and six siblings, according to Amin Nathari, a longtime activist in the Muslim community."He was a very popular and well-liked young man, always respectful anytime that I saw him, and my heart grieves for his mother, father and his brothers and sisters," Nathari said Tuesday.•Killing of Newark imam's son draws fiery reaction from city leaders•Son of Newark Imam identified as one of two killed in Newark shooting•Multiple shooting in Newark leaves 2 dead, three others hurtNote to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesBREAKING NEWSMaking You Smarter About Your Community. Faster.Update 1:30 p.m.Prince William police announced an arrest today in connection with this case:Arrested on January 20th:Jeremiah Eugene PULLEN, 24, of 285 Manassas Dr in ManassasCharged with 4 counts of aggravated malicious wounding, 4 counts of use of a firearm in commission of a felony, 1 count of shooting into an occupied dwelling, and 1 count of shooting from a moving vehicleCourt date: unavailable | Bond: held WITHOUT bondPhoto credit: Prince William police8 a.m.MANASSAS, Va. —A woman remains in a hospital this morning after she and three others were shot outside a Manassas nightclub.More in a unedited press release:*UPDATE: Shooting Investigation – On January 20th at 2:21AM, officers responded to 90 Degrees located at 8509 Rixlew Ln in Manassas (20109) to investigate a reported shooting. Officers arrived and located four victims suffering from gunshot wounds. All of the victims, two men and two women, were transported to area hospitals.Three of the victims have since been treated and released. The remaining victim, a woman, is still being hospitalized with non-life threatening injuries. The investigation into the shooting revealed that the suspect had been removed from the bar by security shortly after 2:00AM. Once outside, the suspect got into his vehicle and drove by the front of the establishment where he opened fire, striking the victims.Officers arrived at the scene quickly and were able to broadcast a description of the suspect vehicle to adjoining agencies.A Manassas City Police officer located the vehicle and detained the suspect following a traffic stop. Detectives are currently interviewing the suspect and charges are forthcoming.The nightclub “90 Degrees” is in Prince William County just outside Manassas, and is  a restaurant by day and nightclub by night. It is located across from Manassas Mall and sits behind a Hooters restaurant.Share this storyYour email address will not be published.Required fields are marked*Catholic Diocese of ArlingtonMaking You Smarter About Your Community. Faster.© Copyright 2020 | All rights reserved by Potomac Local Media, LLC. Website byWeb Publisher PRODon't miss a headline! Sign up for our free email newsletterLeave this field empty if you’re human:Ardmore Police Chief Ken Grace said the citizens of Ardmore should be "extremely proud" of the skill and professional manner in which the city's police officers responded to and ended the ongoing threat of a rampaging shooter Thursday night."I have to commend the Ardmore officers for an outstanding job. And we would not have been able to accomplish our mission without the cooperation from the agencies who assisted," the chief said.Talking about the manhunt, Grace described Henry Jackson, also known as Lil Henry, as exhibiting signs of spiraling violence. He said it was those signals that led him to order the city sealed off and a street- by-street manhunt for the 18-year-old who had already wounded four people, including two ATF agents in Ardmore, and was the prime suspect in the murder of a Tishomingo man."People were terrified and we were very concerned his next action might be in a public place, like a convenience store or a restaurant, where numerous lives would be at stake," Grace said. "We needed to stop him before he shot anyone else."Grace called in off-duty officers and requested assistance from other law enforcement agencies, including the Carter County Sheriff's Department, Oklahoma Highway Patrol and Lighthorse Police Department. Two hours after the manhunt was launched, Jackson was cornered near the intersection of H Street NE and Martin Luther King Boulevard."We had received information about the stolen car he was driving and then what sector of the city he was in, and we began tracking him," Grace said.Corralled, Jackson refused to surrender. Instead, he opened fire on Ardmore police, shooting multiple rounds through the windshield and into the body of a police car. Officers returned fire. Jackson died in the gun battle."Two officers put an end to the situation," Grace said, adding both officers were on paid leave pending the outcome of the officer-involved shooting.The chief deferred identifying the officers pending the outcome of the investigation. "I don't think it would be proper to name them, and in order to eliminate any hint of bias, the APD has stepped away from the investigation and I have requested the Carter County Sheriff's Department to handle the inquiry."Carter County Sheriff Milton Anthony said Saturday the investigation was under way, adding four guns had been recovered from Jackson's car during the initial stages of the investigation.Rumors began circulating Friday that Jackson was also responsible for a number of other unrelated crimes, including burglary and robbery in Ardmore earlier in the week.However, APD Capt. Kevin Norris said Jackson has not been identified as the primary suspect in any of those crimes."We've heard the rumors, too, but so far we have not confirmed he was involved in those crimes. The investigation is ongoing," Norris said.The Johnston County Sheriff's Department is also conducting an investigation into the murder of Marcus Cole Holt and the subsequent kidnapping of Holt's girlfriend and her children.Johnston County Sheriff Jon Smith confirmed Friday the stolen car Jackson was driving at the time he died in the shootout with Ardmore police belonged to the 21-year-old Holt. But Smith said the investigation into what happened at the rural Tishomngo residence where Holt's body was recovered was not completed.Smith said deputies discovered Holt's body shortly before 7 p.m. Thursday. Smith said the former Lone Grove resident was "the of victim of a violent act" and listed his death as "an apparent homicide," but would only say it was "probable" Jackson was the killer.In a press release, the sheriff said deputies acted on a 911 call from a women who reported "a kidnapping and possible shooting ... The caller reported that her daughter and the daughter's two small children had been kidnapped from their residence, and that her daughter's boyfriend (Holt) had been shot ... the kidnap victim had just been freed from her abductor .. The dispatcher was able to determine the kidnap victims were at a residence in Gene Autry where the suspect had left them and then fled."Smith said he requested assistance from OSBI as deputies began the probe into Holt's death and responded to Gene Autry to make contact with the kidnapping victim.About the same time, the sheriff said he learned of the shooting of ATF agents in Ardmore "by a person identified as fugitive Henry Jackson, and that Jackson was driving a vehicle belonging to the shooting victim."Smith said Friday several law enforcement agencies were continuing to work together to investigate all of the incidents involving Jackson.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Daily Ardmoreite  ~ PO Box 1328, Ardmore, OK 73401~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.KTLAby:Melissa PamerFour people were wounded in a shooting in South Los Angeles on Tuesday evening, according to police.Police were called to scene in the 400 block of West 89th Street (map) for a report of people shots just before 6 p.m., according to Officer Christopher No of the Los Angeles Police Department’s Media Relations Section.The shooter was last seen heading southbound on Flower Street, possibly in a burgundy Jeep, No said.One person was shot in the leg, but the injuries of the other three victims were not known, No said.All the victims were 45 to 50 years old, No said.It was not known if the shooting was gang related, he said.KTLA’s Nidia Becerra Tijerino contributed to this article.SubmitAs governors loosen long-lasting coronavirus restrictions, state lawmakers across the U.S. are taking actions to significantly limit the power they could wield in future emergencies.The legislative measures are aimed not simply at undoing mask mandates and capacity limits that have been common during the pandemic. Many proposals seek to fundamentally shift power away from governors and toward lawmakers the next time there is a virus outbreak, terrorist attack or natural disaster.Internal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.Intensive care nurse Meynard Villa was on the verge of losing his family’s $150,000 investment in his new senior care home because he couldn't hire workers while grappling with a glitchy state system designed to automate criminal background checks.The California Department of Social Services' new portal is supposed to help home and community care providers, foster care families and even nannies and baby-sitters who apply for clearance under the state's background check system.A 16-year-old boy has been charged with killing a 17-year-old in Ford Heights following a dispute Wednesday, authorities said.Paris Walker, of the south suburb, was ordered held without bail in a hearing today before Cook County Judge Darron Bowdown in Markham Branch Court after being charged as an adult with murder in the slaying of Malik McMillian, of Chicago Heights, according to the Cook County state's attorney's office.McMillian and Walker had a dispute on the street and in the back yard of a home in the 1400 block of Ambassador Lane in Ford Heights about 7:35 p.m. Wednesday, and McMillian tried to leave, trying to climb over a chain-link fence, when he was shot, prosecutors said.When McMillian fell to the ground after the first shots were fired, Walker stood over him and shot McMillian several more times, then fled the scene, prosecutors said.McMillian, who also had an address in the 16000 block of Shea Avenue in Hazel Crest, was pronounced dead on the scene at 8:07 p.m. Wednesday, according to the Cook Count medical examiner's office.An autopsy performed Thursday determined that he died as a result of multiple gunshot wounds.Twitter: @ChicagoBreakingCONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribunebenchwarmerHuntsville police have arrested a 15-year-old in the shooting of five people at the Benchwarmer sports club early Sunday morning. (File photo)HUNTSVILLE, Alabama- Huntsville police have arrested a 15-year-old suspect in the shooting of five people early Sunday morning at the Benchwarmer sports club on University Drive. Police arrested the juvenile and found the weapon used in the shooting, according to a press release. The shooting suspect is being held at the Robert Neaves Detention Center on five counts of assault in the first degree.HPD also released the names of three of those shot as the result of a fight at the club: Jordan Darell Baker, 21, John Wesley Brewer, 20, Craig Allen Shelnut, 31, as well as a 16- and a 17- year-old. All five shooting victims remain at Huntsville Hospital where they are being treated for non-life threatening injuries.According to HPD, the shooting suspect has a prior history of arrests.HPD Chief Lewis Morris has suspended the city liquor license based on the fact that several juveniles were in the club when the shooting took place. The Benchwarmer is classified as a lounge with an entertainment license, which means patrons must be 19 years of age or older to enter. The club owner was contacted and agreed to voluntarily surrender his license, according to the press release. Agents from the Alabama Beverage Control Board are taking part in the ongoing investigation along with HPD.A patron who was at the Bench Warmer at the time of the shooting postedof a fight at the club and gunshots can be heard in the short clip.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesJACKSON, MS (Mississippi News Now) - Jackson police are investing six shootings from early Saturday morning. The first two shootings occurred near the M-Bar Sports Grill on Ridgewood Court in Jackson. Police said two men are in stable condition at UMC after getting shot leaving the M-Bar around 1:40 A.M.According to police, the victims were walking across the street from the bar when they were approached by two males in an SUV. The suspects pulled out guns and demanded money and other items. One man was shot in the stomach and the other man was shot in the arm.Shortly after the shootings near M-Bar, four others were shot at West Lounge located at 3430 W. Capitol Street.Police said some patrons were escorted out of the lounge after an altercation inside. Gunshots rang out among four individuals. One person was grazed and three people were shot. All are in stable condition.If you can help Jackson Police with any of these Saturday morning shootings call Crime Stoppers at 601-355-TIPS.Copyright 2014MSNewsNow. All rights reserved.715 South Jefferson StreetJackson, MS 39201(601)948-3333A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SectionsFeaturesWBBJ-TVEAST JACKSON, Tenn. — Four people were injured outside in the parking lot of a bar after a shooting in East Jackson overnight.According to the Jackson Police Department, the shooting occurred at “B and B Bar Dive” on North Parkway Sunday morning around 2 a.m.The four victims were taken to the hospital for their injuries. The incident is currently under investigation. Police did not say if they are looking for suspects or if anyone is in custody.© 2021 WBBJ TV.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Two men were arrested on suspicion of attempted murder with a hate-crime enhancement Tuesday after they allegedly shot four people outside a San Leandro nightclub Monday morning because some of the people in the group were gay, police said.The suspects were identified Wednesday as Carlos Cervantes and Salvador Lopez Aguilera, both 28, said Lt. Robert McManus, a police spokesman.The victims, three men and a woman, were all between 28 and 34 years old, and are from Oakland and Livermore.Officers responded toreports of the shootingin the parking lot of Club Caliente on the 14500 block of East 14th Street just before 2 a.m. on Monday, McManus said.The incident started inside the club, where the victims met to go dancing. They were confronted by Aguilera and Cervantes at the bar, and an exchange of words ensued.McManus said Cervantes and Aguilera followed the group to the parking lot where they began making disparaging remarks about them due to their sexual orientation.“At one point, Aguilera told Cervantes to shoot them, and he pulled out a high-powered handgun and opened fire,” McManus said.Four people were injured, all hit by gunfire, McManus said, but none of their injuries was life-threatening. All were taken to nearby hospitals for treatment and were released, but none of the victims was identified.After the shooting, the suspects fled in Aguilera’s van, which had been parked across from the club at East 14th Street, but was later found in front of an East Oakland home, police said.About noon Tuesday, undercover San Leandro detectives caught Aguilera leaving a residence in the 1100 block of 82nd Avenue in Oakland, where he was arrested.McManus said when Cervantes was arrested, he appeared to be making plans to leave the Bay Area or possibly the state.Detectives started trailing him in a car that left a home in the 3100 block of Berlin Way in Oakland, then continued to follow the car along Interstate 580 to San Leandro.The car stopped at MacArthur Boulevard and Dutton Avenue around 6 p.m. Tuesday, where Cervantes was identified and arrested. Investigators were continuing to look for the gun used in the shooting, described as a high-caliber semi-automatic pistol.Both suspects were being held at Santa Rita Jail in Dublin. Their arraignment in Alameda County Superior Court is set for 2 p.m. Thursday.Kale Williams is a San Francisco Chronicle staff writer. E-mail:kwilliams@sfchronicle.comTwitter: @sfkaleKale Williams is an Oakland native who writes about crime, catastrophes and cat videos, among other things. He joined The Chronicle as a general assignment reporter in 2013 after serving as the editor-in-chief of the Golden Gate Xpress, the student newspaper at San Francisco State University, where he got his journalism degree. His coverage of the feline community once prompted the Marin Humane Society to name a cat after him.Yelena Orrelly, Associate ProducerAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorYelena Orrelly, Associate ProducerAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorMIAMI– A violent weekend in Miami-Dade County ended with 14 people shot in four different shooting incidents, authorities said.The first shooting was reported Saturday in the city of Miami. Police said Jamal Pieze, 16, was walking on Northwest 39th Street and Northwest 16th Avenue when hewas shot by two other teens.One of the bullets hit a passing car driven by Ronald Galindo, 30, and shattered his window. Galindo was taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital to be treated.Pieze survived the shooting and was also taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital, where he remains in stable condition.Another shooting was reported Saturday at Northwest 95th Terrace and 20th Avenue. Three people were injured.Five people standing outside a corner storeat Southwest 216th Street and 120th Avenue were shot Saturday night. Two of the victims were airlifted to Jackson Memorial Hospital in critical condition. The other three were taken to a hospital in Kendall, where Shannon Raheem, 23, died.Police are looking for a four-door, newer model silver car with tinted windows in connection with the southwest Miami-Dade County shooting. Police said the car is missing a passenger side rear-view mirror.The most recent shooting was reported Sunday night in northeast Miami-Dade County. Four people were shot just before 6 p.m. outside an apartment building at Northeast 167th Street and Sixth Avenue. Two people were taken to Aventura Hospital in stable condition, and two others were treated at the scene and released.The victims in that shooting were identified as Sabrina Edden, 19, James Lacroix, 43, Stanley Maignant, 25, and Valerie Pierre, 25.Detectives believe it was a drive-by shooting, but they do not know a motive. They said a dark-colored vehicle was driven by the culprits, but no other description was given.Anyone with information about any of the shootings is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.Copyright 2015 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.KTLAby:Ashley Soley-CerroSurveillance video wasreleased Mondaythat police said captured the man who shot four people, killing one, outside The Standard hotel in downtown Los Angeles.Police have asked anyone who recognizes the man to come forward.The fatal incident began with an argument outside the hotel, located in the 500 block of South Flower Street, around 2:30 a.m. on Sunday, said Mike Lopez, with the Los Angeles Police Department’s Media Relations.The argument escalated to a physical altercation before one of the men pulled out a handgun.Three people were shot in front of the hotel, and the gunman chased a fourth person to the back of the hotel, Lopez said.All four victims were transported to the hospital, where the man who was chased was pronounced dead.He was identified by the L.A. County coroner’s office Monday as 21-year-old Thomas Johnson.The condition of the three surviving victims was not known.Police initially said one victim was located about 10 blocks from the hotel, at the intersection of West Olympic Boulevard and South Hill Street. It was unclear how he or she got to the location.The gunman was described by police as a black man in his 20s, with a mustache and black hair styled in cornrows. He was wearing a black trench coat the night of the shooting.The surveillance footage released came from the hotel elevator, which he took to get to a rooftop nightclub, Lopez said.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.Trending:HUNTINGTON BEACH – The Huntington Beach Police Department is seeking information on a Sunday morning shooting that injured four people and appears to be gang-related, according to a news release. No arrests have been made.Two shooting victims were treated for minor injuries and released. Another two are in stable condition at a local hospital.Officers responded to the report of shots fired at about 10:46 a.m. in the 17000 block of Keelson Lane and found the four victims.Anyone with information is asked to call the Huntington Beach Police Department Special Investigation Bureau at (714) 536-5669 or the Information Hotline at (714) 375-5066. Anonymous tips can be submitted through Orange County Crime Stoppers at (855) 847-6227.Contact the writer:smountjoy@ocregister.comGet the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Tony Hampton, 25, is accused of leading police on a chase with a stolen vehicle.Bottoms Up Strip ClubTony Hampton, 25, is accused of leading police on a chase with a stolen vehicle.Bottoms Up Strip ClubBROOKLYN, Ill (KMOV.com) - A 25-year-old man has been sentenced to 75 years in prison for the murder a 29-year-old man outside a Metro East strip club.Tony Hampton, 27, was convicted of first-degree murder in the fatal shooting of Salahudin Malik Robbins outside the Bottoms Up Strip Club in Brooklyn, Illinois in early December.According to authorities, at least three others were wounded in the shooting.It is still unclear what led up to the incident, officials say.Copyright 2015 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Four people were shot, one fatally, overnight in Central Park Heights, police said.At about 12:40 a.m., officers responding to the 5100 block of Park Heights Avenue for a report of a shooting said they found a 21-year-old female suffering from a gunshot wound to the side and a 17-year-old male suffering from a gunshot wound to the back.Police said a 24-year-old male transported himself to an area hospital for treatment for gunshot wounds to the chest and biceps.Evan Davis, 27, of the 3300 block of Garrison Avenue, was fatally shot.Police ask that anyone with information on this incident call Homicide Detectives at 410-396-2100 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP.Clarification: In an earlier version of this article, Baltimore Police incorrectly stated the age of the 17-year-old man shot in the back. It has since been corrected.RecommendedSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Cincinnati police say they've arrested a man in a gun battle earlier this month that left one dead and three others injured.Police say they charged 31-year-old Anthony Rosemond Jr. with murder on Saturday.Court records do not indicate whether he has a defense attorney. The Associated Press attempted to reach several possible relatives, and a telephone listing for Rosemond was disconnected.Investigators say more than 20 rounds were fired Dec. 8 in front of a market on Cincinnati's west side.Police say 24-year-old Jonathan Austin died at the scene. Three others were injured in the shooting.Bond for Rosemond was set Monday at $500,000.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.An autopsy conducted on the woman killed in Sunday night's shooting determined she wasn't pregnant, according to a release from the Omaha Police Department.[Video: Team coverage: Dontevous Loyd turns himself in Tuesday morning]Autopsies were performance on Destacia Straughn, 22 and her daughter, Kenacia Amerson-Straughn, 2, according to the release. The finding means the man accused in the crime, Dontevous Loyd, will not face additional charges.Loyd turned himself into police Tuesday around 5:30 a.m. and will appear in court later this week."He took a little bit of relief, a little bit of pressure, a little bit of stress off people knowing he turned himself in," said Michael Roby, the father of Kachelle Roby, who was injured in the shooting. "But at the end of the day, there are still people out there that might want to do something else."Loyd posted a photo (below) of himself at the Douglas County Jail on his personal Facebook page with the caption "im here."Authorities handcuffed Loyd and took him to police headquarters for questioning shortly after.Police believe Loyd shot and killed Destacia Straughn and her daughter, Kenacia Amerson-Straughn.Stacey Straughn, the mother of Destacia, said on a phone interview that she is glad he's (Loyd) in custody. She said that there's a lot of sadness in her home.The shootings happened in an apartment near 108th and Ida streets just after 11 p.m. Sunday.Three others were also shot and left in critical condition. Police identified them as Kachelle Roby, 22, Jamie Latner, 18, and Larrion Williams, 21."It's not right, senseless," Bill Hanes, the step-grandfather of Latner, said."What's wrong with you?" asked Michael Roby. "Why would you do something like that? You weren't in harm's way. They weren't jumping on you."Michael Roby said he knows Loyd."His nickname is Sleepy in the streets," Michael Roby said. "I met Sleepy about three years ago. He showed no signs he could do something this horrific."Kachelle Roby, a mother of two, was shot three times.Williams is at Nebraska Medicine, and her condition will not be released.Latner could be going home soon."The bullet did go through all the way, and she is in pain," Hanes said.Hanes said his step-granddaughter and the other women went to the apartment near 108th and Ida because their friend felt something bad was about to happen."Just went because the girl called, 'Please come over. I'm scared,' so they went," Hanes said. "When a friend calls you, try to help. I hope he never sees the light of day again."KETV NewsWatch 7's attempts to reach Williams' family were unsuccessful. The families of the other survivors said they're praying for Destacia Straughn's loved ones, and hope anyone who knows anything about the case will speak up.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.A father of six. A free-spirit who befriended strangers in the grocery store checkout line. A mother of three who fled religious persecution in Iran. A woman who was 8 when she and her mother left Vietnam for a better life. The youngest was 26. The oldest was 60.These are the names and stories of the 14 people killed in the San Bernardino shooting on Dec. 2, 2015. They lived across Southern California, from Los Angeles and Orange counties, in the Inland Empire and the San Bernardino Mountains that tower over the valley where the shooting occurred.The list will be updated as more information becomes available. It also includes information about some of the 21 people wounded.Full coverage:San Bernardino shooting|Live updates|Share a memoryKTLAInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: YucaipaOccupation: Environmental health specialistMarital status: MarriedChildren: 1PermalinkAs an environmental health specialist with San Bernardino County, Robert Adams often inspected pools and food facilities during the construction phase.Adams, 40, and his wife grew up in the Inland Empire and were high school sweethearts, said family friend Jenni Kosse. They had tried to have kids for some time, she said, and he adored their 20-month-old daughter, Savannah. He loved taking her to the park and uploaded new pictures of her to Facebook almost every night.“When you saw the three of them together,” said a distressed Kosse, “you just wanted to jump in the middle and think, ‘I want to have fun too.’”He always looked out for others. He could sense when someone was angry or frustrated, she said. He’d smile at them and ask, “How can I help you?” Almost always, Kosse said, the person’s anger would melt away.Adams — who wore bright ties and his beard in a goatee — also spent time helping his parents, who donate doves to Inland Empire families who have lost a loved one, Kosse said. They give them away for free, she said, so families can release them at ceremonies.“To be supportive,” she said, her voice quivering. By Thursday night,a fundraising pageset up by friends, who said they were struggling to “make sense of what makes NO sense,” had raised more than $20,000 for the widow and young daughter.—Marisa GerberCourtesy of familyInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: FontanaOccupation: Health department employeeMarital status: MarriedChildren: 3PermalinkIsaac Amanios immigrated from Eritrea to California in 2000 to escape violence and repression in his home country, his brother said.“Nowhere is safe,” Abraham Amanios said, standing in front of his brother’s home in Fontana. “It makes you think that wherever I go in public... there is the chance of being threatened or attacked.”Nephew Zeke Gebrekidane heard the news of Isaac Amanios’ death late Thursday and drove through the night from Tucson to be with family in Fontana, he said.“I was beyond shocked,” Gebrekidane said. “It’s a very sad scenario. Whether it’s Paris, whether it’s Colorado, whether it’s San Bernardino, when does it end?”Amanios shared a cubicle with shooter Syed Rizwan Farook, said Chris Nwadike, a coworker.Nwadike said the two of them spoke what he assumed was Arabic — with Amanios clearly the native speaker, often poking fun at Farook’s poor delivery.Amanios was a family man who tutored his three children with their school work. All are currently in college, Gebrekidane said.“He was looking forward to his kids graduating from college,” he said. “He came here so his kids could have a better life. It’s not just his family affected, but the entire community is affected by this tragedy.”Isaac Amanios’ wife, Hiwet, works as registered nurse at Arrowhead Regional Medical Center. He is survived by his wife, sons, Bruk and Joseph and daughter, Milka.On Twitter, Nat Berhe, safety for the New York Giants, said Amanios was his cousin and “a great human being.”“Just got word that one of my cousins was among the 14 killed yesterday, I’m so sick right now,” Berhe said in one Twitter post. Berhe was born in Fontana and played football at Colton High School.“The true terror is that this keeps happening. I still can’t believe it. Take a moment to think of the families hurting right now,” Berhe also tweeted.Read more:Families lay shooting victims Tin Nguyen and Isaac Amanios to restRead more »—Ben PostonCourtesy of the familyInjury: FatalGender: FemaleHometown: RialtoOccupation: Environmental health specialistMarital status: MarriedChildren: 3PermalinkBennetta Betbadal fled to America with her family to “escape Islamic extremism and the persecution of Christians that followed Iranian Revolution.”She was 18 at the time, according to statement released by her family. Her first stop was New York but she eventually moved to California, where she met and married Arlen Vedehyou, a police officer.Betbadal left her Rialto home Wednesday, eager to deliver a presentation to her colleagues in the San Bernardino County Department of Public Health at their meeting at the Inland Regional Center.She would not return to her husband and their three children, 10, 12 and 15 years old.Betbadal, who earned a chemistry degree from Cal Poly Pomona, worked as a health inspector and also led a team of restaurant inspectors, said Mark Russell, a friend who was acting as a spokesman for the family.“It is the ultimate irony that her life would be stolen from her,” the family said in their statement, “by what appears to be the same type of extremism that she fled so many years ago.”Read more »—Matt HamiltonCourtesy of familyInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: UplandChildren: 2PermalinkNobody was home at Harry Bowman’s apartment in Upland on Thursday evening.A package was tucked neatly under the welcome mat on the concrete landing. It had been sent “priority express” by his mother from York, Pa. The postage was $44.95.It was addressed to “Hal.”Bowman’s name had been released by authorities earlier in the day, along with the 13 other victims of the mass shooting Wednesday in San Bernardino. He was 46.Bowman was one of the earliest contributors to CREATE, a USC center that studies national security and terrorism, the director said in an email. Bowman, who left the center for a job with the San Bernardino Unified School District, was an expert in spacial data and mapping.Neighbors said they didn’t really know much about him, or anybody else at the Stoneridge Apartment Homes for that matter.“There’s not a lot of socializing,” said Gina Lugo, 54, who lives in the one-bedroom next door with her mother. “People just go to work and come home.”She said they had talked only once, when he advised her to call the management about a problem with the hot water.Across the hall, Dr. Guillermo Saenz, a 29-year-old medical resident, said he knew Bowman had at least one daughter.“He would come out to the pool and teach her how to swim,” he said.Reached by phone in York, Bowman’s mother, Marion, said that her son had grown up there and moved to California for work more than 15 years ago.He had two daughters, she said, adding that the family wanted to protect their privacy.The package, she said, contained Christmas presents.—Alan ZaremboKTLAInjury: FatalGender: FemaleHometown: Moreno ValleyOccupation: Environmental health specialistPermalinkSierra Clayborn, a 2010 graduate of UC Riverside, worked as an environmental health specialist for San Bernardino County.“I love hanging out with my friends and I love my blooming career in public and environmental health,” she wrote on her Facebook page, where her profile photo still has the red, white and blue filter honoring victims of last month’s terrorist attack in Paris. “I am dedicated to enjoying my new life, that God so graciously gave me, so I thank Him… and live life to the fullest. I love my life.”“I love you more than you ever knew,” her sister Tamishia wrote Thursday morning ina Facebook post. “You were taken too soon. My heart is broken. I am completely devastated.”She was energetic, thoughtful and always smiling, said Mary Hale, manager of the Fontana apartment complex where Clayborn had lived for a year and a half.“When I think of Sierra, only one word comes to mind: She was a lady,” Hale said. “That’s not a word I use lightly. She was a super, super lady.”Hale told The Times that Clayborn had frequently said how much she loved her job. “She was dedicated to her profession, and she loved the opportunities to meet different people,” Hale said.Clayborn shared an apartment with a boyfriend, Hale said.—Laura J. NelsonandLouis SahagunCourtesy of familyInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: HighlandOccupation: Environmental health inspectorMarital status: MarriedChildren: 2PermalinkJuan Espinoza, the youngest of 13 siblings, was raised in Sonora, Mexico, his nephew Daniel Castaneda said.He immigrated to Indio when he was in his early 20s and worked at the Department of Corrections to put himself through Cal State San Bernardino. He was hired as an environmental health inspector for the county, a job he loved “almost as much as working on his back yard,” Castaneda said.“He always mentioned that having an education is first priority and that an education is a treasure that nobody can take away from you,” said Espinoza’s niece, Zhenia Ponce De Leon.For those who first met him, Espinoza seemed a serious person. But his laugh was contagious, and he lived to make his family happy.He was “everyone’s favorite... and he reciprocated by making every one of us feel like we were his favorite, too,” Castaneda said.“Tio Juan was a hard-working, loyal, honest, and strict person but at the same time was a loving leader and advisor. He was someone who we could rely on and tell all our secrets with,” his niece said.The shooters, she said, “took away a piece of heart of everyone who surrounded him with love and respect.”He is survived by his wife, a daughter and a son.—Laura J. NelsonCourtesy of James GodoyInjury: FatalGender: FemaleHometown: San JacintoOccupation: Office assistantMarital status: MarriedChildren: 1PermalinkAurora Godoy had a wide smile and an open heart, and at the age of 26, the life she had planned for herself was falling into place.She and her husband, James Godoy, had met in 2003 during a Junior ROTC class at Carson High School, her husband said.They dated for about eight years before eloping in 2012. They bought a home in San Jacinto. She gave birth to their son, Alexander, who will turn 2 in January.Speaking by telephone as his son fussed in the background, James Godoy praised his late wife as a devoted mother.“It was all about him,” James Godoy said of his son.They did not plan on having more children, he added: “Oh no, one was enough.”Over the years, Aurora Godoy had attended various colleges and a culinary school, and she was a few credits shy of completing her associate degree.For about three years, she worked for the San Bernardino County elections office.Since January, she worked as an office assistant in the county’s Department of Public Health. She had joined her co-workers on Wednesday for a meeting at the Inland Regional Center.On Thursday afternoon, following a difficult, daylong wait, authorities informed James Godoy of his wife’s death.Calls have since flooded in and co-workers have set upa fundraising page. But he said he had not yet processed what happened or how to move forward. No funeral arrangements have been made.“Disbelief is the word,” he said. “Disbelief.”Read more:Shooting victim Aurora Godoy remembered for her humor, warmth—Matt HamiltonLinkedInInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: Los AngelesOccupation: Environmental health specialistPermalinkShannon Johnson’s studio apartment in Koreatown is a museum to his life.More than two dozen framed concert posters fill the walls of the main room. “We had tickets to see Gary Clark Jr. tomorrow,” his girlfriend, Mandy Pifer, said Friday morning.In the kitchen, portraits of relatives hang over a small, round table.Johnson had several of the images tattooed on his body: His first wife, his grand-daddies, his father, who died in a grain silo accident in Georgia when Johnson was a small boy.He wanted Pifer to be his next tattoo. They had recently decided to get married and planned to tell their families this month.In the bathroom, a framed collage of business cards hangs over the toilet, mostly from truck stops across the country.Johnson drove 18-wheelers for about a decade — with the CB handle Shannondoah — before he gave up life on the road to finish college and settle down. Around 2005, he started working for the Public Health Department in San Bernardino County.At the office, Pifer said, Johnson enjoyed talking about religion with Syed Rizwan Farook, a fellow restaurant inspector. Farook was a Muslim. Johnson was a Christian who dabbled in Hinduism.“He loved the department because he said it was like working in the United Nations,” Pifer said.Pifer, a psychotherapist and longtime member of Mayor Eric Garcetti’s crisis response team, met Johnson online about three years ago. Six months later, she moved into the apartment across the hall.He awoke each morning to read the news online and get his caffeine fix. He took his coffee with sugar and creamer. He had to be out the door by 4:45 a.m. to make it to work. He would text Pifer from the train.“Have a great day. I love you,” he wrote Wednesday morning in their last communication.Sitting in Johnson’s kitchen, she struggled to recall details. “My memory is damaged right now,” she said.It’s a common phenomenon among trauma survivors.“I’ve studied it,” she said. “I’ve read about it. I’ve heard about it from clients. Intellectually I understood it. Experiencing it is something different.”Update: When the gunfire began, Johnson shielded his co-worker Denise Peraza telling the young woman: ‘I got you.’ She was wounded but survived.Read her account>>—Alan ZaremboCourtesy of Ryan ReyesInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: RialtoOccupation: Ran coffee shop at Inland Regional CenterPermalinkLarry Daniel Kaufman, 42, considered himself a free spirit. He loved horror movies. He often held up the grocery store checkout line because he talked to everyone he met.He refused to get a driver’s license, saying he didn’t want to give up the daily rides to and from work from his boyfriend of nearly three years, Ryan Reyes. Reyes was the one who dropped him off Wednesday at his job running the coffee shop in Building 3 at the Inland Regional Center, training the developmentally disabled clients who worked there.Throughout the morning the couple traded texts and photos. At 10:37 a.m., Kaufman sent what was to be his final photo — a picture of a friend he had met at a comic book conference.About an hour later, Reyes, 32, received a text from his sister: “Hey Ry does Daniel work at the Regional Center in Sb? Check the news.”“Call me ASAP!” he texted Kaufman. He left messages and texted repeatedly. There was no reply. After false information that he had been wounded, Reyes and Kaufman’s loved ones waited 22 hours for word. Authorities needed a description to compare to the dead bodies still at the facility.Just under 6 feet tall and around 195 pounds, Reyes said. Black dress shoes with square toes. Khakis. A black polo shirt — the uniform for Coffee N More. No tattoos. Lots of rings and necklaces and one earring on each side — rainbow bars for gay pride.One minute past 24 hours from the last time Reyes heard from Kaufman, his phone rang. The aunt who adopted Kaufman had news: he was gone.Read more »—Alan ZaremboKTLAInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: RiversideOccupation: Health department employeePermalinkIn an email sent to employees, Juan C. Perez, director of Riverside County Transportation & Land Management Agency, called Damian Meins a “bright light” that had been “extinguished from our world in a most tragic way.”Perez said Meins had spent 28 years working for Riverside County and had recently returned to a position with the Environmental Health Dept. after retiring in 2010.“I will always remember Damian as a caring, jovial man with a warm smile and a hearty laugh,” Perez wrote.Meins was previously a physical education teacher and helped run after-school programs at St. Catherine’s School in Riverside, where he played Santa for the children. He was a graduate of UC Riverside, school spokesman James Grant said.“I just want everyone to know that he was a good man,” said a woman who answered the phone at his home. She identified herself as his daughter but did not provide her name. “He was an amazing man.”Parents and students gathered with school staff on Thursday to remember Meins. One of those parents, Laurie Lee Nusbaum, posted photos on Facebook of a religious mural he painted at the school.“This is such a tragedy and my 7-year-old daughter has learned a part of life that I wish I could protect her from,” Nusbaum wrote on Facebook.Read more:Victim of San Bernardino terror attack is recalled as ‘one of the good guys’—Megan GarveyandZahira TorresCourtesy of the Nguyen familyInjury: FatalGender: FemaleHometown: Santa AnaOccupation: Health inspectorPermalinkTin Nguyen was just 8 when her mother fled Vietnam with her child and maternal grandparents. The family toiled and saved their paychecks to rebuild after the war in a country they believed was safe. A place where “younger people would find their rewards through education.”Nguyen graduated from Cal State Fullerton with a degree in health sciences. For more than four years, she had worked as a county health inspector. On the job, she screened plenty of mom-and-pop restaurants, and away from work, she made sure to stay in constant touch with aunts, uncles and nearly 30 cousins ranging from age 3 to 41.“You cannot imagine how caring she is. She had such a big heart,” Emily Nguyen, 16, said of her cousin. “She never said no to us and would give you anything you asked.”The extended family united every Sunday for dinner, according to uncle Phu Nguyen. “Tin was a huge part of our gatherings. Everyone loves her spirit, she is so cheerful and so wonderful to be with,” he remembered. “Just days ago, she was trying on wedding dresses and had so much hope for the future.”Nguyen and her longtime boyfriend San Trinh had planned to get engaged next year and to marry in 2017. The day before she was killed the couple toasted his 32nd birthday at a shabu-shabu restaurant.“I work day in, day out, saving money. I intended to buy her a new house. We would move her Mom in to live with us. We talked about everything — our marriage, how many kids we wanted to have,” the mechanical engineer from Westminster said. “If I could tell people anything from this experience, I’d say: ‘Whatever you’re planning, don’t push it off. Get it done.’ ”Her mother Vanessa called her daughter “such a good soul.”“Only she can understand me — she understood everything I went through,” said Vanessa Nguyen, sobbing.Mother and daughter had planned for a wedding at their beloved St. Barbara’s Catholic Church, a few miles from their house.“She promised that no matter what, she would return to have her wedding there and now we’re having a funeral,” her mother said. “What will become of our lives?”Read more:Families lay shooting victims Tin Nguyen and Isaac Amanios to restRead more »—Anh DoCourtesy of Jennifer ThalasinosInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: ColtonOccupation: Health inspectorMarital status: MarriedPermalinkJennifer Thalasinos said her husband, Nicholas, was a “very devout believer.”The couple, who met online and had been together for 14 years, were Messianic Jews. Nicholas Thalasinos wore tzitzit, traditional fringe tassels, as well as a tie clip with the Star of David.“He became born again a couple of years ago, and because of that I had a very strong faith,” she said, “so I know that he’s in a much better place.”He evangelized many, she said. “He wanted to serve the Lord and bring more people to the Lord.”Friends recalled him as man who was always willing to lend a hand.Thalasinos said her husband, a health inspector, worked with shooting suspect Syed Rizwan Farook. She said that he was aware Farook was Muslim but had never mentioned that his co-worker had any extreme views. “If he would have ... my husband would have had something to say.”“They got along,” she said. “As far as I know, [Syed] got along with everybody. That’s what’s so shocking.”Thalasinos said she had heard that before the shooting there may have been an argument at the party. She described her husband as very outspoken about Islamic terrorism, with strong conservative politics.“I’m sure that he went down fighting and protecting people,” she said.Thalasinos’ last public Facebook post, written just hours before the shooting, mentioned receiving a threatening message related to Israel.—Hailey Branson-PottsCourtesy of George VelascoInjury: FatalGender: FemaleHometown: FontanaOccupation: Health inspectorPermalinkTo her family, Yvette Velasco embodied intelligence and ambition.One of Robert and Marie Velasco’s four daughters, the 27-year-old was “full of life and loved by all who knew her,” according to a statement issued by her family.To John Velasco, Yvette’s younger cousin, she was an important influence. When he was looking to choose a career after high school, he asked her for guidance.“She said to go for what I would love to do,” he said. “Go for what you what will make you happy and not for money.”He took took her advice seriously and today he is a pastry chef.“She was a giving person,” he said. “By helping out people who needed it.”Since 2014, the Fontana native had worked as an environmental health specialist for the San Bernardino County Department of Public Health, according to public records.Yvette’s sudden death has stunned her loved ones.“We are devastated about what happened,” the family statement said, “and are still processing this nightmare.”Read more:San Bernardino shooting victim Yvette Velasco remembered as a ‘guiding light’—Ben Welsh,Louis SahagunandMatt HamiltonCourtesy of the familyInjury: FatalGender: MaleHometown: Lake ArrowheadOccupation: Supervising environmental health specialistMarital status: MarriedChildren: 6PermalinkAround Lake Arrowhead, Mike Wetzel was a frequent sight, running errands with his six children in tow, three from his first marriage and three from his second.He loved babies, said family friend Arlene Arenas, 40, and could soothe a colicky infant when no one else could.His first year coaching local AYSO soccer, he led a team of five-year-old girls just learning the sport. Their team had a princess theme.“He was super tall, and the littlest of girls thought he was a giant,” said Arenas, whose daughter played on the team. “He had no qualms about letting them follow him around, or walking around like a monster, with the little ones shrieking and hanging off his legs.”Wetzel graduated from Rim of the World High School in Twin Peaks, Calif., in 1996.Last summer, Arenas said she watched Wetzel and his wife, Renee, hold their baby and dance at a summer concert in Lake Arrowhead Village.“We took those small moments for granted, " she said.In a post on Facebook on Wednesday, his wife had asked for prayers. “My husband was in the meeting where the shooting happened, " she wrote. “I have not been able to get in touch with him. Please please pray that he is OK.”Note: Friends of the family have created afundraising sitefor the Mike Wetzel’s family.—Laura J. NelsonAllen J. Schaben / Los Angeles TimesInjury: Not fatalGender: MaleOccupation: Food inspectorPermalinkPatrick Baccari got up from his table to use the restroom. He had been there for three hours at a holiday training meeting for San Bernardino County food inspectors.It was just before 11 a.m., before a Christmas luncheon was to begin.Baccari was pulling a paper towel from a dispenser when he heard a blast. A puff of plaster dust rose from the wall and shards of the dispenser flew into his face.He turned to the other men in the bathroom, who looked at him as if he had caused the commotion.Blood ran into his eyes. Then he saw a hole in the wall.“Get down! Get down! Get down!” he yelled.Bullets ripped into the towel dispenser, sending shrapnel into his face, blood spilling into his eyes. The rounds pocked the walls as he dove for cover onto the floor. He and another man pushed the door closed with their legs and waited for police arrive.Read more »—Jack Dolan,Paul PringleandStephen CeasarCourtesy of familyInjury: Not fatalGender: FemalePermalinkAmanda Gaspard, an environmental health specialist, had agreed to serve as the emcee for the Department of Public Health’s Christmas party.When the shooters entered the conference room where the party was being held, Gaspard dropped to the floor and hid under a table, her parents said. Then she closed her eyes and lay motionless.After firing multiple rounds, the assailants came toward Gaspard and shot her.“Even while Amanda was lying there bleeding, she was holding [a co-worker’s] hand and praying to God with her,” Ken and Diane Gaspard said in a statement.“They stood over her and could have easily shot her in the head,” they said. “We are so grateful to God that they shot her in the leg and arm instead.”Gaspard was shot in the lower arm, upper thigh and knee, among other parts of her body. She has more than 20 shrapnel wounds.After surgery, she learned from TV news that one of the shooters was her co-worker.She is in a lot of pain, and faces a long recovery, her parents said.—Matt HamiltonMarcus YamInjury: Not fatalGender: MaleOccupation: Police officerPermalinkThe final shootout took place about three miles from the Inland Regional Center. There, San Bernardino County Sheriff’s Deputy Shaun Wallen exchanged gunfire with the attackers.As he did, San Bernardino city police Officer Nicholas Koahou got out of his vehicle to give Wallen cover and was hit in the left thigh. It felt as if he had been punched in the leg, he said.Falling to the ground, Koahou said he heard the gun battle rage as more than 400 shots were exchanged.“At some point, you just stop hearing your shots, he said. “It was overwhelming.”Read more »—Richard WintonInjury: Not fatalGender: FemaleOccupation: Environmental Health SpecialistMarital status: MarriedChildren: 3PermalinkShot three times and now released from the hospital, Anies Kondoker, 42, must now grapple with the death of 14 of her co-workers — her close friends.“She’s recovering very well, but still going through emotional trauma,” said her husband of 17 years, Salihin. They have three kids - ages 3, 13 and 16.Kondoker was shot in the right arm, left arm and in the stomach. She had been walking from the bathroom into the meeting room, when “bullets started flying,” her husband said.“Two bullets flew over her head, missed her head,” he said.He said that she was shocked to learn from him the identity of the shooter: Anies’ shy, quiet colleague Syed Rizwan Farook.Until two years ago, Farook, who grew up in Riverside, attended the mosque where the Kondokers have prayed since they were married, the Islamic Center of Riverside.Her mind races with thoughts of returning to work. Most painful is the thought of being there without her best friend, Tin Nguyen, who was killed.She “keeps on thinking, how is she going to see the office, the empty office, empty cubicles?”Read more »— Soumya KarlamanglaInjury: Not fatalGender: MaleMarital status: MarriedPermalinkKevin Ortiz, a county environmental inspector, was shot twice in the leg and once in the shoulder.Amid the chaos, the 24-year-old managed to call his wife of two weeks and father to tell them he was alive.“Kevin said he had been shot three times and that he was in pain but he was all right,” Dyana Ortiz, 23, said. “Then he said, ‘I love you,’ and I said, ‘I love you.’”Seconds later, the phone call ended.Ortiz’s family was not surprised he had found the ability to make these crucial phone calls.“That’s Kevin; he’s a fighter,” his brother David Ortiz said. “Through him, the Ortizes get to shine again.”Read more »—Louis SahagunAssociated PressInjury: Not fatalGender: FemalePermalinkAs bullets rained down, Denise Peraza, 27, felt the arm of her male coworker, Shannon Johnson, 45, wrap around her.More than 65 bullets were fired across the conference room, and Peraza and Johnson huddled under a table, using a fallen chair as a shield.“I got you,” Johnson told Peraza.It would be the last thing he said. Johnson died, but Peraza, shot once in the lower back, survived.Peraza has told friends and family members that the doors of a conference room had opened and two people dressed all in black wearing black face masks entered with “big ol’ guns” and started shooting randomly.“The guys opened fire for 30 seconds, randomly, then paused to reload and began firing again,” she said.After she was shot, the shooters were gone, and everything was silent for five minutes. Then suddenly, the doors were pushed opened again, but this time, it was law enforcement officers. Lots of them, and they yelled out: “Anyone who can move, leave immediately and find cover behind vehicles.”Peraza said they were then helped into the beds of pickups and taken to a safer location.“While I cannot recall every single second that played out that morning, I will always remember his left arm wrapped around me, holding me as close as possible next to him behind that chair,” Peraza said in a statement.“I believe I am still here today because of this amazing man. This amazing, selfless man,” she said.Read more »—Louis SahagunInjury: Not fatalGender: FemaleOccupation: Environmental technicianPermalinkJennifer Stevens was shot in the stomach during Wednesday’s attack, but is in stable condition after surgery, according to a fundraising page created by a family friend.She was hired last month as an environmental technician for the County of San Bernardino, according to her LinkedIn page.Stevens attended Redondo Union High School in Redondo Beach, and graduated from UC Riverside this spring, a university spokesman said. She previously worked as an instructor at a surf camp for adults and children.—Laura J. NelsonInjury: Not fatalGender: FemaleOccupation: Health inspectorPermalinkJulie Swann-Paez, a health department inspector, went to the department’s holiday party with high expectations. She was set to receive an Employee of the Year award and spend time with colleagues.Instead her family got a horrifying text message. “Love you guys. Was shot.”Attached to the message, sent around 11:20 a.m., was a photo of her face as she lay on the floor.“I thought she was dead,” said her son Nick Paez, 26.When they finally tracked her down, they learned she had been shot once in the upper thigh and once in the abdomen and needed surgery.A bullet shattered her pelvis, her children said.The family waited for hours to see her, but she was in a post-surgery recovery room. Doctors let them into the room for about five minutes around 10 p.m.“They think it’s your co-worker,” Nick Paez remembered telling his mother.“That doesn’t make sense,” she replied. “They were congratulating him for having a baby.”Read more »—Sarah ParviniThe perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow Us(CBS)— Five people were shot at a party at a Kankakee banquet hall early Sunday morning, according to Kankakee Police.Police responded to a report of shots fired at Guzman’s Sports Banquet Hall in the 600 block of E. Court St. and encountered a large group of people fleeing the building.Officers located one person inside who had been shot and after assisting in first aid, the victim was transported to the hospital by the Kankakee Fire Department. Four other victims were located at area hospitals who left before officers arrived at the banquet hall. Two of the wounded were listed in serious but stable condition and the other three were in fair to good condition.The banquet hall was rented for a family reunion, but police say it was a party featuring entertainers that was charging for admission. Approximately 80-100 people were inside at the time of the shooting, police said.Police say that they have identified at least two guns at the party after reviewing surveillance footage.A leading-edge research firm focused on digital transformation.SubscriberAccount activesinceFree subscriber-exclusive audiobook!“No Rules Rules: Netflix and the Culture of Reinvention”Get it now on Libro.fm using the button below.One person caught in thegunfire that erupted at a Planned Parenthood facility in Colorado Springssays what happened "is not right."In a Reuters interview, Ozy Licano tearfully recalled what happened when he found himself face-to-face with the alleged gunman."Five seconds we stared at each other, and in that five-second period those bullet holes went right through my windshield," Licano said to reporters."I just started getting away and I heard him shooting some more at me ... at the time, I wasn't scared, I was more angry." Licano said he was worried about others who were injured during the ordeal.Two civiliansand one police officerwere killed Friday during the shootout that began at the Planned Parenthood center. Five more officers and four other civilians were injured, but were listed in good condition.Police arrestedthe suspected shooter, Robert Lewis Dear, after a standoff that lasted five hours. Dear is being held without bond at theEl Paso County Criminal Justice Center. He's expected to face charges in court on Monday.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Two men were killed and two others were hurt after a gunfight broke out early Friday morning at a South Sacramento restaurant, according to the Sacramento County Sheriff's Department.Deputies went to the Vientiane Cafe in the 7900 block of Florin Road about 1:15 a.m. after a security guard reported multiple shots fired.Two men were found dead in the parking lot near a planter box and another victim was found inside the cafe, according to sheriff's spokesman Tony Turnbull.Another man was taken to the hospital with life-threatening injuries, deputies said.Turnbull said the fourth victim suffered minor injuries.Witnesses told investigators there was a fight between two groups in the cafe leading up to the shooting.Gang detectives are assisting with the investigation and the shooting may be gang-related.More than 30 evidence markers were strewn across the parking lot, which is shut down while crime scene investigators documented the incident and collect evidence.Seven men were detained by investigators and questioned at the scene, but no arrests have been made, deputies said.Stay with KCRA and KCRA.com for more information.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.A Seattle-area felon linked by police to a shooting in the city that injured five now faces federal gun charges.Investigators contend Deonte Rasul-Chiono was carrying a .32 cal. pistol when he was arrested by a fugitive apprehension taskforce in late 2015. Rasul-Chiono, 23, has not been accused in the November shooting in Seattle.Initially charged in state court, Rasul-Chiono now faces federal prosecution. A three-time convicted felon, he is prohibited from possessing firearms.Just after 1 a.m. on Nov. 22, gunfire erupted near the intersection of Harvard Avenue and East Pike Street in Seattle’s Capitol Hill neighborhood. Five people were shot, though none received life-threatening wounds.Seattle Mayor Ed Murray met with workers who were near the shooting the following day."This is a vibrant neighborhood and it's also a safe neighborhood,” he said at the time. “It's actually my neighborhood."Deonte Rasul-Chiono, pictured in a Department of Corrections photo.Witnesses told police a silver Mazda sedan was involved in the shooting, according to charging papers. Surveillance video confirmed that claim, a Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives special agent said in charging papers, and Rasul-Chiono was soon identified as a person of interest in the shooting.Ten days later, a law enforcement taskforce began planning to arrest Rasul-Chiono and a second man. Both were convicted felons under Department of Corrections supervision linked to recent shootings in and around Seattle.“Both (the other man) and Rasul-Chiono are believed to belong to the same gang and are known associates,” the ATF agent said in charging papers, noting that both have been arrested previously carrying guns.Investigators looking for Rasul-Chiono stopped the Mazda after it left a Burien apartment complex. Police seized the car during that Dec. 2 stop but released Rasul-Chiono.The second man, who does not appear to have been charged, was arrested the following day in Federal Way. Rasul-Chiono was waiting to meet him and was also stopped by police.According to charging papers, an officer frisking Rasul-Chiono found a pistol in his pants pocket. Investigators contend the pistol was loaded at the time.Writing the court, a Seattle police officer said Rasul-Chiono asked officers if “his case was going federal” during the ride to jail. He was told it likely would.Rasul-Chiono, who is also known as Deote Rasul-Chiona, was convicted of assault following a 2012 shooting. That Sept. 27, 2012 incident was the latest in a string of gun crimes committed by the young man.A month after his 20thbirthday, Rasul-Chiono opened fire on man working at an Auburn Jack in the Box. Rasul-Chiono shot at the drive-thru worker after the man complained about the volume Rasul-Chiono’s car stereo.That shooting resulted in a felony assault conviction, Rasul-Chiono’s second, and a three-year prison sentence.Rasul-Chiono served jail time for gun possession after being implicated in a 2011 shooting that saw a bystander’s car window shot out as she passed Rasul-Chiono. Police claimed at the time that Rasul-Chiono was seen leaving the scene while holding a gun to a young woman’s neck.Though not convicted in the assault, Rasul-Chiono admitted to unlawfully possessing a gun. He lost his gun rights as a child following a theft, and had been again ordered not to possess firearms following a 2010 incident in which he was convicted of assault after stomping on a man’s head during a fight.Rasul-Chiono was transferred to federal custody Monday. He is charged with unlawful gun possession in U.S. District Court at Seattle.Seattlepi.com reporter Levi Pulkkinen can be reached at 206-448-8348 orlevipulkkinen@seattlepi.com. Follow Levi on Twitter attwitter.com/levipulk.Levi is a reporter for seattlepi.comCITY OF NEWBURGH – Five people were shot at a Broadway bar early Sunday morning.City police said none of the injuries were considered life-threatening.Police said they responded to a report of a shooting at the Oasis bar at 4:40 a.m. Sunday. When they arrived, they found one victim of a gunshot wound to the leg inside. The victim, who was not identified, was taken to the Newburgh campus of St. Luke's Cornwall Hospital for treatment.Police learned there also were four other victims of gunshot wounds already at the hospital.No arrests have been made. The investigation is continuing, and police said no further details will be released at this time. Anyone with information about the shootings is asked to call police at 561-3131.CITY OF NEWBURGH – Five people were shot at a Broadway bar early Sunday morning.City police said none of the injuries were considered life-threatening.Police said they responded to a report of a shooting at the Oasis bar at 4:40 a.m. Sunday. When they arrived, they found one victim of a gunshot wound to the leg inside. The victim, who was not identified, was taken to the Newburgh campus of St. Luke's Cornwall Hospital for treatment.Police learned there also were four other victims of gunshot wounds already at the hospital.No arrests have been made. The investigation is continuing, and police said no further details will be released at this time. Anyone with information about the shootings is asked to call police at 561-3131.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordonline.com  ~ 40 Mulberry St., Middletown, NY 10940~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.BALTIMORE (WJZ) — Police are investigating after a shooting on Stricker and School Streets leaves one person dead on Saturday morning.Four people were shot, one fatally. A 26-year-old was injured, as well as a 14-year-old and a 15-year-old.The three injured do not have life-threatening injuries.A 28-year-old has died of his injuries. He has not been identified. He is the city’s 309th homicide of the year.“The motive is foolishness,” said TJ Smith. “They are stone cold killers and we have to do something about it.”Police have also blocked off a portion of Baker and Gilmor streets.If you have any information, please call police. TJ Smith asked families to hold people accountable, saying people know when those in their family are breaking the law.The shooting was in the neighborhood where Freddie Gray lived.Stay withWJZfor the latest on this developing story.Sign inorSubscribeSee OffersA former Farmington resident who retired to Texas with his wife was murdered along with 5 members of his family in 2015.BRYAN, Texas — A man was convicted of capital murder this week in the slayings of six people – including two from Farmington, Maine, and a 6-year-old boy – at a remote Texas campsite in 2015.A Brazos County jury found William Hudson, 35, guilty Tuesday on three counts of capital murder for his role in killing former 77-year-old University of Maine at Farmington professor Carl Johnson, 40-year-old Hannah Johnson, a Mt. Blue High School and UMaine graduate, and four members of their extended family.In addition to Carl Johnson and his daughter, Hannah Johnson’s 6-year-old son, Kade Johnson, Hannah’s boyfriend, Thomas Kamp, and Kamp’s two adult sons, Austin and Nathan Kamp, were killed.Both Carl and his daughter, Hannah, were found shot to death in a camper trailer on property Thomas and Hannah bought from Hudson’s father. The bodies of the other four were found in a pond near Hudson’s property, investigators said.Carl Johnson’s wife, Cynthia, also a retired UMF employee, escaped and hid in the woods until she could call 911 to report the shootings, investigators said in the days after the slayings.Prosecutors said Hudson resented the sale of the property and killed the six after plying the adults with alcohol.Hudson’s attorney didn’t call witnesses at the trial.The jury was hearing punishment testimony Wednesday. Hudson faces life in prison with no chance of parole or death by lethal injection.According to a police affidavit, Cynthia Johnson told investigators that on the day of the killing, a man riding an orange tractor approached the family and later helped them pull a vehicle from the mud. He identified himself as “William.”He returned later to socialize and had drinks with the family.“He later accompanied several family members into the surrounding woods,” the affidavit states, “after which Cynthia Johnson heard multiple gunshots.”Hudson returned to the campsite alone, and chased Carl and Hannah Johnson into a camper trailer. Cynthia Johnson told police she heard two more gunshots, according to the court document.She saw her husband, Carl, collapse on the camper steps after having been shot by the man later identified as Hudson.“Cynthia Johnson continued to hide, hearing multiple gunshots, and remained in hiding until she felt it was safe to move,” the affidavit states.Once she was able to alert police, a search for Hudson began. Police said when they found Hudson in nearby Tennessee Colony they also found his blood-stained tractor. Hudson also had blood stains on him.In the days after the killings, the Farmington community expressed shock over the loss of the Johnson family.At Hudson’s trial, Anderson County District Attorney Allyson Mitchell said the case was unusual because it had a survivor and security footage.The footage is from cameras outside Hudson’s mother’s home. While the footage doesn’t show the slayings, Mitchell said it corroborates Cynthia Johnson’s account of the events and provides enough proof of Hudson’s guilt.Comments are not available on this story.Send questions/commentsto the editors.Sign up and get all the top stories to begin the day delivered at 5 a.m.Four people are recovering after a shooting outside a Chinese restaurant.The victims were outside the restaurant along the 5600 block of Blakemore Street Sunday night when an unidentified gunman opened fire before fleeing the scene.All four victims were struck though none of their injuries were life-threatening, according to officials.Breaking news and the stories that matter to your neighborhood.No arrests have been made.Fox 59by:Kyle Hicks - Digital ProducerDavid SandersINDIANAPOLIS, Ind. (April 14, 2016) – On Thursday, a man was found guilty of murdering two men during adice game in Nov. 2015.The man, David Sanders, 26, was also found guilty of one count of robbery resulting in serious bodily injury, one count of attempted robbery resulting in serious bodily injury, and one count of unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious felon.Dontae Shields, 26,was facing the same chargesbut he was found not guilty on all counts.Clarence Sanders, 52, faced all of the same charges as well, except for the firearm possession charge. He was also found not guilty on all counts.According to court documents, a group of men got into an argument while playing dice. The three suspects got angry and started shooting at the other men. The suspects then stole all the money from the dice game.SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A 27-year-old man is facing weapons charges in connection with a fatal shooting outside a nightclub just north of Des Moines.The Polk County Sherriff's Office says Thursday that Mykael Maggett was arrested April 25 on charges of assault and intimidation with a dangerous weapon.Detectives determined multiple shooters were in the area during the Nov. 8 shooting that killed 22-year-old Dashwan Smith and wounded three others outside Evolution Nightclub.Officials say Maggett was identified on surveillance video as discharging a handgun into a crowd.He posted bond and was released from jail. A phone listing for Maggett couldn't be located, and his attorney didn't immediately return a message Thursday.Sgt. Brandon Bracelin says no one has been charged with killing Smith. Police are looking for several witnesses.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Scott Johnson, Reporter/weekend anchorScott Johnson, Reporter/weekend anchorJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– Police continue to search for the shooter in a drive-by shooting from Tuesday night after they found another body in a ditch along West 10th Street Wednesday afternoon that they said is a result of the shooting that killed an 18-year-old, 19-year-old and left three other men hospitalized.Officials said the intense rainfall the night of the shooting was so severe that the body found Wednesday was hidden by water.The Jacksonville Sheriff's Office said Tuesday's shooting occurred just before 6 p.m. on Ella Street, near Kings Road. Police identified the man killed as Anthony Ray, whose body was also found in a ditch. They have not named the other three victims, who had non-life-threatening injuries.Police identified the body found Wednesday as Trayvon Deshay Lundy, 19. They said heavy rain while they were gathering evidence Tuesday night made it difficult to spot the body.Lundy's body was also found in the ditch along West 10th Street.According to detectives, Wednesday's shooting followed some sort of argument between the men and whoever was in the car.Police said they did not know how many men were in the car, but said they think there was more than one person.JSO is searching for the car, which they described as a red Toyota Camry with a blue front passenger door.Anthony Ray's father said his family was devastated by what happened."This is outrageous for me, very outrageous. I don't know how to feel right now. It's more shocking than anything," said Roy Ray.Ray said his son was a good son but he couldn't speak for what type of activity he may have been involved in.One of the men shot Tuesday night is out of the hospital. He told News4Jax he was shot in the neck and should make a complete recovery.News4Jax Crime and Safety Analyst, Gil Smith, said that police will now use what information they've been able to get out of the surviving victims but said it may not be a lot."The survivors may not be cooperative, they may not be giving information because they may fear for their lives. With these people being so young, 18 to 19 years old, there's a strong likelihood it may be gang-involved. We don't know that for sure, but in these types of situations where you have this type of a shooting and they're that young, it usually involves gang members," Smith said.Anyone with information on the shooting or the location of the car is asked to call Crime Stoppers at 866-845-TIPS. Callers can remain anonymous and could be receive a reward of up to $3,000.Copyright 2015 by News4Jax.com. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Specializes in Clay County issues, general assignment reporting and stories off the beaten path and anchors weekend evening newscasts.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.The Anderson County Sheriff's Office is investigating the deaths of four adults as a quadruple murder, Lt. Sheila Cole said Tuesday.Mike Scott, 58, and wife Cathy Scott, 60, and their mothers, 80-year-old Barbara Scott and 82-year-old Violet Taylor, were found dead Monday afternoon at their home on Refuge Road in Anderson County, the Coroner's Office said.The manner of death was ruled homicide for each decedent and the cause of death was gunshot wound in each case, Coroner Greg Shore said Tuesday. Cathy Scott's daughter called 911 after she found Mike Scott and the mothers dead in a den and Barbara Scott in a bedroom, Shore said.No arrests have been reported. No weapon was found at the scene, Shore said. Forensic investigators on Tuesday returned to the scene to look for additional evidence, Cole said.Anyone with information about the case is asked to contact the Sheriff's Office at 260-4400 or Crime Stoppers at 888-CRIME-SC.The Scotts and their mothers were last seen alive at their home Saturday, Shore said. One of Cathy Scott's brothers went to the home about 3:30 p.m. Sunday and no one came to the door, Shore said."I feel like it happened some time Sunday, early afternoon," Shore said of the fatal shootings.There were no signs of forced entry into the home, Shore said. All of their vehicles were accounted for, he said.Mike Scott worked for the South Carolina Department of Transportation, Shore said, and went to Columbia to assist during severe flooding last month. Cathy Scott did not work but cared for the couple's elderly mothers, the Coroner's Office said.Mike Scott talked to his boss Sunday via text message, Shore said. Scott told his employer that he planned to be at work Monday after taking annual leave days late last week, Shore said.The Scotts and their mothers were the only four people who lived at the home, Shore said.Cathy Scott is survived by a daughter, who recently was married and lives at a home on the same property, Shore said. Violet Taylor, Cathy Scott's mother, was the mother of two daughters and two sons, Shore said.Fifteen murder cases are set for trial this year in Terrebonne, Lafourche and Assumption parishes, though dates are all subject to change.A first-degree murder conviction carries a mandatory sentence of life in prison without the possibility of probation, parole or suspension of sentence. Prosecutors may also seek the death penalty.The only penalty for second-degree murder is life in prison without the possibility of probation, parole or suspension of sentence.A principal, or accomplice, can face the same penalty even if he doesn’t directly commit the murder. An accessory after the fact – someone who helps an offender after a felony with the intent that he’ll avoid criminal consequences – can face up to five years in prison.This list does not include manslaughter, vehicular homicide or negligent homicide cases nor any murder cases not yet set for trial.TERREBONNEKyle Cedotal, 31; Joshua Babin, 22; and Tiffany Dardar, 32, are set for trial Jan. 9. Cedotal is charged with second-degree murder in the shooting of Robert Swan, 24, while Dardar is charged as a principal and Babin is charged as an accessory after the fact. Swan’s body was found Oct. 7, 2015, in a car in a Gibson driveway. Investigators believe the murder was drug-related.
Simon Quinn, 47, is set for trial Jan. 9. He is charged with second-degree murder in the death of Robbie Coulon, 46, whose body was found May 14, 2015, in a Cocodrie waterway. An autopsy showed the cause of death was asphyxiation. Authorities said Quinn and Coulon were close associates but had gotten into an argument.
Anthony Sylvester, 27; Elward Williams, 23; and Maurice Banks, 25, are set for trial Jan. 9 in an Oct. 28, 2015, quadruple shooting on Morgan Street in Houma that left Corey Butler, 18, dead. Sylvester and Williams are charged with second-degree murder, and Banks is charged as a principal to the crime.
Shantelle White, 28, is set for trial Jan. 9, and Charles Hammonds III, 19, is set for trial March 20. They are charged with second-degree murder in the heroin overdose of Christy Hurst, 35, whose body was found Dec. 3, 2015, inside in a room at the Economy Inn in Houma.
Zamante Alvis, 15, and Denzel Brown, 17, are set for trial Jan. 17. They are charged with second-degree murder and being tried as adults in the July 10 shooting of Roderick Davis Jr., 17, in Scott Lane Park in Houma. Investigators said an argument started after Davis and the suspects entered the park.
Ahmad Lawson, 26, and Joshua Swan, 24, are set for trial Jan. 17. They are charged with second-degree murder in an Oct. 21, 2015, double shooting that killed Willie Hart Jr., 36, on Roselawn Avenue in Houma.
Terrance Moore, 31; Michael Scott, 39; and Sophia Smith, 28, are set for trial Jan. 17 in the Nov. 11, 2015, shooting of Ernest Sims, 38, outside his Ashland North home. Moore is charged with second-degree murder, while Scott and Smith are charged as accessories after the fact.
Treyvance Fanguy, 21, is set for trial Feb. 21. He is charged with second-degree murder in the Aug. 8, 2013, shooting of Vincent Naquin, 20, at Naquin's residence on Louise Street in Houma. Authorities said Naquin sold marijuana out of his home and that the killing occurred during a botched armed robbery.
Jalen Francis, 22, is set for trial Feb. 21. He is charged with first-degree murder in the Dec. 18, 2013, shooting of Elizabeth Davis, 25, during what authorities said was a drug deal in the Smithridge community.
Kenny Veal, 28, is set for trial Feb. 21. He is charged with second-degree murder in the June 13, 2015, shooting of Roosevelt Stewart, 68, on North Bayou Black Drive in Gibson.
Brandon Robinson, 20; Tyren Joseph, 21; and Cyrus Carter, 19, are set for trial March 1 in the shooting of Kardale Johnson, 21, whose body was found Jan. 17 inside a car in a field off of Payne Street in Houma. Robinson is charged with first-degree murder, Joseph is charged with second-degree murder, and Carter is charged as an accessory after the fact. Authorities said the killing was drug-related.
Davonta Verret, 19, is set for trial March 1. He is charged with second-degree murder in the Dec. 4, 2015, shooting of Davonte Maryland, 21, during a dice game at a Houma trailer park.
Joshua Calloway, 26, is set for trial April 17. He is charged with second-degree murder in the shooting of Kerry Randolph, 56, whose body was found July 10 inside a pickup truck outside Bottoms Up bar in Houma.
LAFOURCHEToronzo Thompkins, 38, and Traveyon Blackledge, 21, are set for trial Jan. 24. They are charged with second-degree murder in the shootings of Nikki Landry, 41, and Harry Lefort, 54. The victims’ bodies were found Sept. 22, 2013, in Landry’s Larose apartment. Investigators believe Thompkins ordered Blackledge, who is his son, and Jerrard Major, 38, to kill Landry, a police informant set to testify against him in his cocaine distribution trial. Thompkins was convicted of that charge and is serving a life sentence. Major is set for a hearing Jan. 20 on a motion to suppress his police statement.
ASSUMPTIONMatthew Jordan, 28, is set for trial April 5. He is charged with second-degree murder in the Sept. 14, 2014, shooting of Franky Joseph, 33. Authorities say the killing occurred during a fight at the Alexis Sports Bar in Paincourtville.
-- Staff Writer Bridget Mire can be reached at 448-7639 or bridget.mire@dailycomet.com. Follow her on Twitter @bridget_mire.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Houma Today  ~ 3030 Barrow Street, Houma, LA 70360~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.EVANSVILLE, Ind. — Five people were shot Sunday morning in front of Sidetrack Tavern.John E. Perteet, 32, of Evansville, fired six to seven shots in front of the barshortly after 3:15 a.m., according to investigators.He was arrested on preliminary charges including aggravated battery with a firearm, criminal recklessness with a firearm and possession of a firearm by a felon.Perteet's bond was set at $500,000 cash-onlyduring a probable cause hearing Monday morning. He is being held in the Vanderburgh County Jail.Police said they are still looking for a motive and connections.The incident was the third mass shooting near an Evansville bar since 2015. Here are descriptions of the other two from the C&P archives:Oct. 26, 2015Five people were shot near the 711 Tavern on Virginia Street.Among the five people injured were three of the four men accused of trying to rob an apartment, which shares a building with the bar.Investigators said the group was believed to have targeted the apartment because there were drugs and money inside.The four men police say were involved in the robbery were identified as Marquell Jackson, 22; Jarvice Sears, 19; Diego Thomas, 21, and Oneil Bruin, 20. All but Jackson suffered gunshot wounds.The other two men injured, identified as Logan Orth, 22, and Cameron Kendall, 27, allegedly exchanged gunfire with the group on two separate occasions.Orth was one of several people inside the targeted apartment when the group — all of whom reportedly wore masks and were armed — came in and tried to carry out the robbery.None of the other eight people inside that residence were injured. Orth was visiting the apartment and was not a resident there.According to the police affidavit, Orth was shot in the neck and the chest after grabbing a gun and firing at the group during the attempted robbery.Then, as the group was trying to flee the building, police say the men encountered a neighbor who had opened the door and they shot at him.That man — Kendall — grabbed his own weapon and shot back at the group. Kendall's abdominal wound required surgery, according to investigators.Aug. 27, 2017A shooting at American Legion Otis Stone Post 354 killed one person and wounded three.More:Fatal American Legion shooting leads to decades behind bars for Darius BushrodA witness told police Darius Bushrod asked someone for $5, was refused and then got into an argument with 32-year-old Anthony Blaylock, according to a probable cause affidavit filed in the case.People separated the men and took Blaylock to the parking lot. Shortly after, Blaylock and Bushrod confronted each other again and were “face to face” near the building, police wrote in the affidavit.Bushrod allegedly fired at Blaylock while they were close and began backing away, still shooting toward Blaylock.Police say surveillance videos from the American Legion showed a man identified as Bushrod pulling up his arm and moving away from another man with “small flashes” coming from an object Bushrod had in his hand, believed to be a gun.Video also showed several people scattering when the gun was fired, according to the affidavit.Blaylock was taken to Deaconess Hospital, where he was pronounced dead. An autopsy found he died of multiple gunshot wounds.Three more people were also injured in the gunfire.More from C&P:One person died and another was seriously wounded in an early morning shooting that left a total of five victims, according to the Phoenix Police Department.Details are still unclear, but Phoenix police said officers responded to a shooting at about 5 a.m. Sunday at King's Club in the area of Broadway Road and 7th Avenue.According to witnesses, police said two individuals, supported by others, had an argument in the nightclub's parking lot when shots were fired. All of the victims were men, whose ages ranged from about 19 to 42 years old, said Phoenix police spokesman Sgt. Trent Crump.He said one person was shot to death and a second remains hospitalized in serious condition. Three other victims were injured but sustained non-life-threatening injuries.One victim was taken to a nearby residence, which is now part of the investigation in addition to other vehicles possibly hit in the shooting, according to Crump. Ultimately, all of the victims were taken to three local hospitals.One weapon was recovered at the scene, and Phoenix police have also detained two people as investigative leads."We are questioning them at this point to determine what their involvement in this was," Crump said.As investigators continued to piece together clues Sunday morning, family members and friends began to visit the property attempting to do the same.Earlier reports of the shooting taking place near St. Luke's Medical Center were incorrect.If you previously used a social network to login to WRAL.com, click the “Forgot your password” link to reset your password.Mask dispute at Fayetteville sports bar prompts fight that ends with security guard shotSlain woman, murder suspect had been friends since middle schoolCOVID-19 vaccine clinics put J&J vaccine on hold after adverse reactions; CDC finds no safety issue with vaccineAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyDuke to require proof of vaccination before students can enroll for Fall semesterNo region in the world spared as virus cases, deaths surgeIsolated showers and thunderstorms on tap again for SaturdayHail, flooding throughout central NC as more severe weather awaits on SaturdayAverage number of Atlantic hurricanes grows, 2021 could be another active seasonTriangle reels in profit, exposure when MLF comes to townPro fishing returns to Triangle with events at 3 area lakesBring back the roars: The patrons return to the MastersAmazon warehouse workers reject union bid in AlabamaBusiness owners struggling to fill open positionsJobs remain unfilled as unemployment benefits outpace wagesEditorial: Find ways to ease voting, not restrict itPATRICIA MURPHY: Fighting business, baseball and future to defend lie about the pastEditorial: Ignoring their own warnings about the N.C. LotteryExpect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodIs that a firecracker in her bag of kale from Target?Wondering about your tax refund? 5 On Your Side looks into delaysNorth Carolina families united by shared slave history connectAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyWoman who coughed on cancer patient gets 30 days in jailFoodie News: Union Special bakery is expandingVirtual Fun Roundup: Observe the moon, T. rex bites, storytimeWeekend best bets: Southern Ideal Home Show, shrimp boil and drive-in moviesWRAL WeatherCenter ForecastEvening Pick 3 Pick 4 and Cash 5Expect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodPublished: 2015-10-25 08:35:00Updated: 2015-10-25 16:38:58Posted October 25, 2015 8:35 a.m. EDTUpdated October 25, 2015 4:38 p.m. EDTFour Oaks, N.C.— Five people were injured early Sunday morning after a shooting in Johnston County, according to authorities.According to the Johnston County Sheriff's Office, shots rang out at about 2 a.m. at 2339 Stricklands Crossroads Road, near U.S. Highway 701.At least two people were taken to a local hospital and remain in critical condition, authorities said.Authorities on the scene said the situation was "developing," and no arrests have been made.Neighbors who live in the area said that there was a party at the home where the incident occurred and that several people started shooting at about 2 a.m. People who were at the party said that the victims were all men.Copyright 2015 by Capitol Broadcasting Company. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.©2021  Capitol Broadcasting Company, Inc.BAMBERG -- Four people were injured when two men opened fire in a Bamberg pool hall early Saturday. The gunmen are being sought.The incident took place at 1:12 a.m. as Bamberg Police Sgt. Christopher Sandifer was beginning a property check at Richburg’s, the pool hall located at 682 Dixie Ave.“There was an altercation and the officer heard the shots being fired,” Bamberg Police Lt. Regina Gatling said. Sandifer called for backup officers to respond to the scene.It is believed that two shooters were involved and both fled amid the confusion at the scene.Two of the shooting victims underwent surgery at the Regional Medical Center in Orangeburg early Saturday morning.Gatling said one of those victims was shot in the side and received another gunshot wound to the buttocks.The other victim was shot by at least one bullet which struck his side and leg. Gatling said a bullet also went through the victim’s abdomen and exited out the other side.A third victim left the scene prior to the arrival of EMS, Gatling said.He underwent treatment for a gunshot wound to his heel at the Colleton County Medical Center in Walterboro.The fourth victim received a wound to his leg. Gatling said it is not known if it was a gunshot woundOfficers eventually cleared the scene at 4:14 a.m., Gatling said.In the meantime, law enforcement searched for the two gunmen.Subscribe to our Daily Headlines newsletter.An Orangeburg woman is facing three counts of attempted murder and other charges after she allegedly struck a man with her vehicle and attempt…Traffic checkpoints will take place at various locations in and near Orangeburg on Saturday, April 10.“Well-mannered, great kid and kind of quiet at times,” that’s the way Marty Kinard described his brother-in-law, 14-year-old Alex Weston Ricke…Orangeburg County Sheriff’s OfficeOrangeburgA body discovered in a field near St. George back on Sept. 13, 2020, has been identified as a man reported missing in Orangeburg County a mont…EUTAWVILLE – Investigators are working to determine how a set of human skeletal remains ended up in a wooded area off of Nelson Ferry Road, ne…A man suspected of robbing a Eutawville gas station early Thursday morning remains on the run, according to Eutawville Police Chief Frankie Thompson.OrangeburgBrenda Austin has a charming personality that has endeared her to many in her community with whom she has worked in a variety of capacities.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.CALUMET CITY | The most seriously injured of six people wounded in a drive-by shooting in Calumet City Monday was well enough to speak to police Tuesday.The six were shot at a gathering following a funeral Monday night, according to Police Chief Edward Gilmore.The case is still being actively investigated and police are not releasing any information in regard to possible suspects. The victims' names were also not being released early Tuesday afternoon. He said it is possible some of the victims may have had some gang affiliations.According to Gilmore, one of the victims received a graze wound to the head and others were shot in other parts of the body, including the foot, leg and hand.The most seriously injured was a man shot six times who was transported to Franciscan St. Margaret Health Hospital in Hammond before being airlifted to Stroger Hospital in Chicago. Gilmore said that man's condition was later upgraded from critical to serious and he was able to speak to police.Gilmore said a large group of people were at a home in the 300 block of Campbell Avenue Monday for a gathering called a repast after a funeral. Many of the mourners were gathered outside when someone drove by and fired into the crowd, he said.In addition to the six shooting victims, Gilmore said one person fell and sustained an injured knee, but declined treatment.Get local news delivered to your inbox!WHITING | A woman found dead inside a burning Whiting home early Tuesday has been identified as Sheryl Denise Anderson, 61.HAMMOND | Hammond police opened an investigation Tuesday after four early morning vehicle arsons, officials said.JASPER COUNTY | A 25-year-old rookie state trooper is being treated for serious injuries at a Chicago-area trauma center after an early mornin…LANSING | A Calumet City man and a juvenile were charged last week in connection with vehicle burglaries in Lansing, South Holland and other c…CALUMET CITY | The City Council approved Sept. 24 the purchase of a truck attachment that would be a temporary stop gap until the city can buy…GARY | Prosecutors allege Devonte Hodge was involved in the killing of Deshelon Hicks Jr. while Hodge was on electronic monitoring pending ano…Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Elkhart police said four individuals suffered gunshot wounds during a large fight involving some 100 people early Saturday in a parking lot on Easy Shopping Place in Elkhart. Photo provided by Elkhart Police DepartmentELKHART — Four people were hospitalized with gunshot wounds following a fight involving some 100 individuals early Saturday in the Easy Shopping Place parking lot off East Jackson Boulevard in Elkhart, according to police.None of the injuries are believed to be life-threatening, Elkhart police said in a news release.Police were called to a fight in the parking lot of 160 Easy Shopping Place at 2:45 a.m. Upon arrival, police heard multiple gunshots and observed a large crowd running from the area.During the investigation, four individuals were found to have been wounded. Three were transported to Elkhart General Hospital by ambulance and a fourth person was driven to Saint Joseph Regional Medical Center in Mishawaka.None of the injured were identified and there were no reports of arrests.Officers collected more than 40 shell casings from the parking lot and bullet which struck a nearby building. A vehicle also was damaged by gunfire, police said.The case remains under investigation.Success!An email has been sent with a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.The news you need to start your day, sent weekday mornings.The day's top 5 news headlines, sent weekday evenings.WREG.comby:Melissa MoonMEMPHIS, Tenn. — Six people were shot and one person was stabbed to death in three separate incidents in Memphis early Saturday morning.Just before 1 a.m. police responded to a massshootingin Hickory Hill. Police said five people were shot and one person was hit by a car at the Peachtree Center on Mount Moriah Road. Investigators said the shooting was between two rival gangs and happened during a dice game in the parking lot.Saturday morning, shop owners in the Peachtree Center were sweeping up shattered glass. We counted at least four bullet holes in windows and doors at the shopping plaza.“My door was shot, and of course there is blood right there,” Wiley Jefferson of Maximum Refunds said.An hour later police responded to astabbingat the Eden at Watersedge Apartments.Mary Pace said her 19-year-old son got into an argument with his father and stabbed him several times. She was also stabbed in the leg.“He took out a knife and just started stabbing him and stabbing him,” Pace said.At the same time police were investigating the stabbing, officers were trying to figure out whoshota man found lying in the middle of Egypt Central Road in Raleigh.Wiley Jefferson, who considers himself a victim of crime after this, said the community must come together to stop this kind of behavior.“Crime is something the city needs to address, and we need to address it now,” Jefferson said.Policearresteda suspect in the stabbing but still have not made any arrests in the shootings.If you know anything, call CrimeStoppers at 528-CASH.Submit(NEXSTAR) – Pfizer and BioNTech requested Friday that the U.S. Food and Drug Administration grant emergency use approval to start administering the COVID-19 vaccine to children ages 12 to 15.The companies said in a news release that they plan to request the same authorization – which could help children return to classrooms sooner – from other regulatory authorities around the world this week.SHELBY COUNTY, Tenn. — Shelby County Sheriff’s Office detectives announced they arrested a man for a homicide on Hacks Cross Friday morning.SCSO said Theodore Cohen, 29, is charged with Second Degree Murder.KNOXVILLE, Tenn. (WATE) — How bad do you want some of Dolly Parton's limited edition ice cream?The limited-run of Dolly Parton's Strawberry Pretzel Pie Ice Cream by Jeni’s Splendid Ice Cream was so popular that it caused the company's site to crash on Thursday.Samuel Clay was sentenced for shooting one of the three people who weren't killed in the 2015 incidentPEORIA — The last man linked to the 2015 shooting death of a 14-year-old Peoria High School freshman was sentenced Friday to 19 years in prison.Samuel T. Clay, Jr., 24, was the last of five people who were charged in connection with a botched robbery that left Tommie Forest III dead and three others injured.In August, he pleaded guilty to aggravated battery with a firearm for shooting one of the three other victims. In return, he faced a maximum of 25 years behind bars – five years shy of the possible 30 years. Prosecutors agreed to drop the murder charges against him.He must serve at least 85 percent of his sentence. With credit for more than four years already spent in custody, he could be released in a bit more than 12 years.In all, five were indicted in the Oct. 10, 2015, slaying of Forest, who was sleeping over at a friend’s house in the 2400 block of North Flora Avenue when someone went to the front door, asked if a person was there, was told he wasn’t and then left. Another person returned, and that’s when a group of people, possibly as many as seven, barged into the house and the shooting started.Court records indicate that Clay was the look-out man and not alleged to have been one of the triggermen.Forest was found dead in the backyard of the house with a single gunshot wound to the head. In addition to Forest, three teens and a women were shot at, prosecutors have said.Alex F. Collins, 24, was sentenced to 95 years for the incident. Dontarius N. Berdin, 23, was sentenced to 21 years in February for aggravated battery. Kainen Lacy, 24, was sentenced to 25 years behind bars for aggravated battery in 2017. Kiangelo G. Marshall, 21, was sentenced to 65 years in prison for murder.In May 2018, Clay’s trial was delayed when a prison official told prosecutors here they couldn’t bring a witness because they had run out of gas money.Andy Kravetz is the Journal Star public safety reporter. He can be reached at 686-3283 and akravetz@pjstar.com. Follow him on Twitter @andykravetz.PEORIA — The last man linked to the 2015 shooting death of a 14-year-old Peoria High School freshman was sentenced Friday to 19 years in prison.Samuel T. Clay, Jr., 24, was the last of five people who were charged in connection with a botched robbery that left Tommie Forest III dead and three others injured.In August, he pleaded guilty to aggravated battery with a firearm for shooting one of the three other victims. In return, he faced a maximum of 25 years behind bars – five years shy of the possible 30 years. Prosecutors agreed to drop the murder charges against him.He must serve at least 85 percent of his sentence. With credit for more than four years already spent in custody, he could be released in a bit more than 12 years.In all, five were indicted in the Oct. 10, 2015, slaying of Forest, who was sleeping over at a friend’s house in the 2400 block of North Flora Avenue when someone went to the front door, asked if a person was there, was told he wasn’t and then left. Another person returned, and that’s when a group of people, possibly as many as seven, barged into the house and the shooting started.Court records indicate that Clay was the look-out man and not alleged to have been one of the triggermen.Forest was found dead in the backyard of the house with a single gunshot wound to the head. In addition to Forest, three teens and a women were shot at, prosecutors have said.Alex F. Collins, 24, was sentenced to 95 years for the incident. Dontarius N. Berdin, 23, was sentenced to 21 years in February for aggravated battery. Kainen Lacy, 24, was sentenced to 25 years behind bars for aggravated battery in 2017. Kiangelo G. Marshall, 21, was sentenced to 65 years in prison for murder.In May 2018, Clay’s trial was delayed when a prison official told prosecutors here they couldn’t bring a witness because they had run out of gas money.Andy Kravetz is the Journal Star public safety reporter. He can be reached at 686-3283 and akravetz@pjstar.com. Follow him on Twitter @andykravetz.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Journal Star  ~ Peoria, IL 61643~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Steven Jones, center, leaves Coconino County Superior Court Thursday Jan. 9, 2020 in Flagstaff, Ariz. Jones, a former Northern Arizona University student pleaded guilty Thursday to manslaughter in the shooting death of a fellow student on campus, sparing him from a second trial and the potential for a much lengthier prison term. (Jake Bacon/Arizona Daily Sun via AP)FLAGSTAFF, Ariz. (AP) — A former Northern Arizona University student pleaded guilty Thursday to manslaughter in the shooting death of a fellow student after he got punched in the face, ran to his car to grab a gun and opened fire on a group of people on campus.Until his plea deal with prosecutors, 23-year-old Steven Jones had been scheduled to face a second murder trial later this month after a jury deadlocked on charges in his first trial years earlier.Jones has long acknowledged firing the shots that killed 20-year-old Colin Brough in 2015 and wounded three other students. But he claimed he acted in self-defense after being attacked verbally and physically.Jones stood before a judge Thursday, acknowledging in a hushed tone that his actions weren't justified. He pleaded guilty to manslaughter and three counts of aggravated assault.Hearing those words from Jones was "huge" for Brough's parents, Doug and Claudia."Now it's between him, God and prison life," Claudia Brough told The Associated Press by phone after the hearing. "Quite honestly, he's out of our lives now, and we can get on with our lives remembering Colin for the young man he was and all the joy he brought to our lives.""Of course, we feel like we really can never have justice," she said. "We'll never get Colin back."Jones faces five to 10 years in prison when he's sentenced next month and was ordered to pay restitution to the Broughs and the wounded men. He had faced up to 25 years if convicted of second-degree murder at trial.Jones has been in his parents' custody and won't have to turn himself in until next week. He declined to speak after the hearing.His attorney, Burges McCowan, said Jones had considered previous plea agreements but none was "as good," and it brought closure all around."We still felt very confidently with our approach to the trial," he said. "Our decision was this offer was just made and it felt acceptable to Steven."The sound of gunfire in the predawn hours of Oct. 9, 2015, initially stoked fears of a mass shooting at Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, about 145 miles (233 kilometers) north of Phoenix. The shooting at the school with more than 25,000 students came just days after 10 people were killed, including the gunman, at an Oregon community college.Prosecutors had painted Jones as an assassin whose pride was hurt after getting punched in the face outside an apartment complex that largely housed fraternity members and where one of his friends rang a doorbell and ran off.Jones could have left what largely was a verbal argument, prosecutors said, but instead went to his car, got a loaded .40-caliber handgun from his glove box and shot four unarmed students.The initial dispute happened near an apartment complex across the street from the school and spilled over to the campus.Jones' attorneys have said he didn't shoot until after announcing he had a gun and not until after Brough lunged at him — details that varied among witnesses. Jones' attorneys said he was bullied by a group of drunken fraternity members, verbally attacked and had only seconds to respond, believing he was being chased and could be seriously hurt or killed.Brough died after being shot in the chest and shoulder. Nick Piring was shot in the arm and hip as he jumped over a bush to reach Brough, his onetime roommate. Jones said he viewed the jump as an act of aggression.Jones, who was trained to use firearms growing up, said he fired again after students dog-piled on him to subdue him and he was trying to disperse the crowd. Nick Prato was struck in the neck, and Kyle Zientek twice in the back.Police arrived found a chaotic scene, with people running around, screaming and crying. Some were giving first aid to those who were shot and calling out for ambulances. Other students were handcuffed in a parking lot as police tried to determine whether there was a second shooting suspect.Jones was detained within minutes and said he was the only shooter.Click Below to:Contents of this site are © Copyright 2021 Williams News and Western News&Info®, Inc. All rights reserved. |Terms of Service|Privacy PolicyBALTIMORE (WJZ) — Police are searching for information about a lone gunman who they say shot five people in broad daylight. The violence follows another multiple shooting days earlier.Christie Iletohas more on the investigation.Police have no suspect and no clear motive but believe at least one of the five were targeted. Now they’re hunting who pulled the trigger.Innocent eyes and a maze of yellow tape after gun violence hit Penrose and Payton.“I heard the continuous bam bam bam bam,” said resident Sylvia Roy.A flurry of emergency calls followed.Five were shot in broad daylight; the youngest was 17. Detectives say at least one was targeted.“A lone gunman came around the corner, fired a number of shots at the individuals and then took off on foot,” said Lt. TJ Smith.“I see him grab his stomach and go to the ground,” said one witness.He didn’t want his face on camera but tellsWJZhe witnessed the aftermath.“He was just hollering, `When is the ambulance going to get here? When is the ambulance going to get here?'” he said.The shooting happened just up the corner, literally a block away from an elementary school that had recently dismissed students.“It’s frightening and it’s around the time kids are coming home from school,” said one neighbor.And it’s becoming too common, residents say.Tuesday’s violence comes four days after a handful of people were shot in a city strip mall parking lot.“It’s sad. I’m tired of hearing about it, for real,” said one resident.But it’s a grim reality even for some of the city’s youngest residents, coming home to flashing lights and evidence markers.Police say the victims were shot in their lower bodies and have non-life threatening injuries.Anyone with information can call Metro CrimeStoppers at 1-866-7-LOCKUP.A 71-year-old man was killed in Friday afternoon's shooting at a Reisterstown Road shopping center, city police said Saturday.Police identified the victim as James Gaylord of the 400 block of Winston Avenue. They also released partial identities of four others who were wounded in a burst of gunfire at the busy shopping center: a 54 year-old male, a 41-year-old female, 33-year-old male, and a 26-year-old male.No arrests have been made, and police said they didn't know of any suspects or motive.A patrol officer was alerted to a wounded person on the ground at the Hilltop Shopping Center in the 5400 block of Reisterstown Road about 3 p.m. Friday and found several others wounded as well, a police spokesman said."This was an officer who called in and said, 'I have a shooting right where I am, right now,'" said city police spokesman T.J. Smith.A woman at a nearby barbershop said she heard what sounded like three or four guns firing in a "shootout." She and others in the shop ran into a back room until they heard sirens outside, she said.The woman did not want to give her name because "people are cruel," she said, and whoever opened fire in the crowded shopping center "doesn't have any compassion for others' lives."Officers shut down the block and flooded the area, dropping at least a dozen orange evidence markers on the sidewalk outside a 7-Eleven at the corner of Reisterstown Road and West Rogers Avenue. Crime tape surrounded the shopping center south to Lewiston Avenue."This was a brazen act at 3 p.m. in the afternoon," Smith said. "It's a crowded shopping center."Smith said one male who appeared to be an adult was killed and that three men and one woman were injured. He said the surviving victims had injuries ranging from "graze wounds" to "through and through" bullet wounds.Smith said he did not know whether there was one shooter or more, or if there was a person targeted in the shooting.He said no one pulls out a gun in such a manner "for any other reason than to shoot at people," but that "in all likelihood, some of them were innocent victims that were in the shopping center."He urged community members with information to come forward."We're fortunate that we're not talking about any children that were injured out here," he said. "At 3 o'clock in the afternoon, it shows you how careless and reckless these bad guys are."We want the community to understand that one of your children could have been out here, so if you know who this person is, call us."Robin Mouzone said she was trying to go to the Motor Vehicle Administration office in the shopping center when she saw police tape going up.She said she frequents the area and that her daughter works at a nearby restaurant."It's just close to home," she said. "It's just scary. You can't go somewhere and shop and not think about getting hurt."She said she is tired of the violence in the city, and scared to think how many "killers are out here for real."Erik Thompson, whose father has owned the nearby Hilltop Hardware store for more than four decades, said the area has gone downhill since police officers whom neighborhood residents knew by name stopped patrolling regularly on foot."The last 25 years, the Baltimore City Police Department has gotten away from something that was very effective when I was a kid: good old flat-footed cops," he said. "They need to get back to grass-roots policing."kevin.rector@baltsun.comliz.bowie@baltsun.comRecommended(CBS)— Chicago Police Superintendent Garry McCarthy says a split second decision saved the life of an infant rushed to the hospital after his mother and grandmother were shot and killed.Officers Michael Modzelewski and John Conneely say it was a chaotic scene when they arrived at a drive-by shooting in the 5300 block of Aberdeen.“When we arrived on scene responding to the call, we were met by the aunt who then relayed to us that the child had been shot,” said Modzelewski.It was then they say they had to make a split second decision to break protocol and take the infant to the hospital.“When we were in route to the hospital, we called ahead to the firehouse on about 43rd and Ashland to see if there was an ambulance in quarters,” Conneely said. “They relayed to us that there was no ambulance in quarters, so that’s when we made the decision that we’re going.”Conneely drove their police car to Stroger Hospital and Modzelewski, a parent himself, cradled the baby with his right hand and tried to stop the bleeding with his left.Princeton’s mom, Patricia Chew, was shot and killed.  So was the baby’s grandmother Lolita Wells.  But Princeton survived,  perhaps because of these cops.Superintendent McCarthy says the officers made the right decision and save the baby’s life.CHICAGO (STMW) —Four men were killed and at least 53 other people — including a 10-year-old girl — were wounded in shootings across Chicago between late Friday afternoon and Monday morning.The latest homicide happened Sunday afternoon in the North Lawndale neighborhood on the West Side.About 3 p.m., Quinton Dgoins, 25, was inside a car in the 3900 block of West Roosevelt Road when another car drove by and people from inside both cars began shooting at each other, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Dgoins, of the 3000 block of West Flournoy Street, was shot in the back and shoulder and taken to Mount Sinai where he was pronounced dead at 2:42 p.m., authorities said.Earlier Sunday, a man was shot to death in the Longwood Manor neighborhood on the South Side.Marcus Cox, 28, was standing outside about 4:20 a.m. in the 9600 block of South Morgan when someone fired shots in his direction, striking him in the abdomen, authorities said.Cox, who lived on the same block as the shooting, was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he was pronounced dead at 3:19 p.m., the medical examiner’s office said.About an hour earlier, a man was gunned down in the Pilsen neighborhood on the Lower West Side.Abraham Barrera, 23, and another man, 24, were driving in the 1100 block of West 18th Street about 3:20 a.m. when someone walked out of an alley and opened fire, authorities said. Both were shot in the head.Barrera, who lived in the 4100 block of West 58th Place, was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he died at 5:33 a.m., authorities said. The 24-year-old was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in critical condition.Investigators think the shooting was gang-related.The weekend’s first fatal shooting happened in a Bronzeville neighborhood apartment complex Saturday on the South Side.About noon, a 25-year-old man was arguing with a 34-year-old man inside the apartment in the 700 block of East 47th Street when the older man opened fire, police said.The younger man suffered three gunshot wounds and was taken to Stroger, where he was pronounced dead at 12:43 p.m., authorities said. Officials withheld his name Sunday.Police identified the shooter as Marvin Lee. He initially called for help saying the other man had broken into his home, but detectives determined they knew each other and had an altercation prior to the shooting.Lee, who lives on the block where the shooting happened, was charged with first-degree murder and was ordered held without bond Sunday. He is next scheduled to appear in court Monday.In the most recent non-fatal shooting, two men were shot early Monday in the Belmont Cragin neighborhood, prompting a brief police chase on the Northwest Side.The two men, ages 28 and 30, were both shot at 2:53 a.m. during argument with someone outside in the 5700 block of West Grand, police said. The 28-year-old was shot in the abdomen and was taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition was stabilized, police said. The older man suffered multiple gunshot wounds to the back and was taken in serious condition to Loyola University Medical Center.When officers responded to the scene of the shooting, a male ran away and a foot chase ensued, police said. Shots were fired from police officers in the 2700 block of North Major, but no one was struck and the suspect was subsequently taken into custody. A weapon was recovered and charges were pending early Monday, police said.About midnight Monday, a man was shot in the West Elsdon neighborhood on the Southwest Side. The 23-year-old was standing outside in the 4000 block of West 55th Street when he heard gunfire and realized he’d been shot in the right thigh. He walked into Rush University Medical Center and was later transferred to Stroger Hospital, police said. His condition was stabilized.Less than an hour earlier, a man was injured in a drive-by shooting in the West Side Austin neighborhood. About 11:20 p.m. Sunday, the 21-year-old was standing on the corner in the 5000 block of West Division when a vehicle drove by and someone inside fired shots, police said. He was shot in the hip and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where his condition was stabilized. A police source said the man is a documented gang member.About 10:40 p.m. Sunday, four people were wounded in a drive-by attack about in the Back of the Yards neighborhood on the South Side. Three men and a woman were standing outside on the sidewalk in the 5200 block of South Justine Street about 10:40 p.m. when a light-colored SUV drove by and someone inside opened fire, police said. A 30-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the groin, a 33-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the thigh and hip area, and a 35-year-old man was shot in the leg and hip. All three of them were taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition, police said. A 29-year-old woman suffered a graze wound to the shoulder, and was taken to Mercy Hospital and Medical Center in good condition.Less than 30 minutes earlier, a man was shot in the heart of Humboldt Park in the West Side neighborhood. The 50-year-old man was shot in the leg in the 1300 block of Luis Munoz Marin Drive when he tried breaking up a fight between two people, police said. That block runs through the park, between Division and Augusta, Kedzie and Sacramento. The suspect ran away after the shooting. The man was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital where his condition was stabilized, police said.Earlier Sunday afternoon, a 10-year-old girl was among three people shot in the Woodlawn neighborhood on the South Side.She was outside with an 18-year-old woman and 19-year-old man about 12:50 p.m. in the 1400 block of East 66th Place when a gunman walked out of a vacant lot and started firing, police said.A bullet grazed the girl’s neck and she was taken in good condition to Comer Children’s Hospital, police said. The man was shot in the back and taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital in critical condition. The woman suffered a graze wound to the calf was taken to University of Chicago Medical Center, where her condition was stabilized. Police said the woman and girl were not the intended targets.At least 40 other people have been shot in the city between 3:50 p.m. Friday and 3 a.m. Monday.Additionally, a Chicago Police officer shot and killed a man who charged at officers with a sharp object about 9 p.m. in Humboldt Park’s 900 block of North Central Park, officials said.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2015. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)One of Editor & Publisher’s ‘10 That Do It Right 2021’Windy with showers and thunderstorms likely. High near 65F. Winds SSW at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Showers this evening becoming a steady light rain overnight. Low near 45F. Winds SSW at 15 to 25 mph. Chance of rain 80%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:06 pmDanville — A 32-year-old Danville man is in stable condition after being shot Sunday morning outside the Green Meadows apartment complex on the city's east side, according to police.Criminal Investigation Commander Jane McFadden said police were called to the complex at 1600 Edgewood Drive at 10:57 a.m. Sunday for a subject who had been shot.She said the man, whose name is not yet being released, was rushed by ambulance to the hospital with non life-threatening injuries and is in stable condition.Police continue to investigate, she said, and have been canvassing the area to see if anyone saw anything and are asking anyone with information to call the police department or Crimestoppers at 446-TIPS.The Green Meadows complex is a privately-owned facility north of the Danville Housing Authority's Fair Oaks public housing complex.Danville police are also continuing to investigate a shooting the previous weekend that injured four people. That shooting happened at midnight Sept. 25 on the city's east side in the 1300 block of May Street. According to police, young people had gathered for a party, and at some point, shots were fired.None of those injuries was life-threatening, but four people were injured and rushed to the hospital either by ambulance or in private vehicles.McFadden said the four injured were all under the age of 21 years old and some were in their teens.No arrests have been made yet in that shooting. McFadden said police are still trying to track down everyone at that gathering.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.We'll send breaking news and news alerts to you as they happen!Get the latest local and national news.Have the latest local news delivered every afternoon so you don't miss out on updates.Each day's obituaries, delivered to your inbox.Receive occasional local offers from our website and its advertisers.Get the latest headlines on local sports!Get our expert short-term forecast, summary of the weather details and news of any severe weather.Top trending stories from the week.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.BACK OF THE YARDS — Five people were wounded, three of them critically, in a shooting in Back of the Yards Thursday evening, police said.Around 7:45 p.m., the three men and two women were standing on the sidewalk in the 5100 block of South Morgan Street when they heard gunshots and felt pain, according to Officer Jose Estrada, a Chicago Police spokesman.A 29-year-old man and a 28-year-old woman were taken to Stroger Hospital in critical condition, Estrada said. The man had been shot in his legs and back, and the woman had been shot in her hand, foot and thigh.A 27-year-old woman was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where she was in critical condition with a gunshot wound in her upper chest, Estrada said.The other two men, 27 and 32, were taken to Stroger Hospital, where their conditions stabilized, Estrada said. The 27-year-old had been shot in his shins, and the 32-year-old was grazed in his shoulder.Police said all three of the men are documented gang members.No one is in custody, Estrada said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Less than 24 hours after Fort Myers was rocked by four shootings, officials established an emergency task force to root out the "bad guys" where they live.Council members voted 6-0 Thursday for city administration to work with local and state law enforcement in hopes of putting an end to the violence that has plagued the community.Fort Myers councilman says city needs help from National Guard"I want to send a message to citizens that we're all over this and are going to be relentless," Mayor Randy Henderson said. "If there was ever a reason to push the envelope, we're there."While interim police Chief Dennis Eads was updating the council on the shootings, his officers were almost three miles down the road raiding a home on Davis Court – the scene of two shootings the night before. Police arrested three men on drug or probation violation charges and removed an assault rifle from a house on the 2100 block.Fort Myers police spokesman Lt. Victor Medico confirmed Friday that the arrests of the three men were not connected to the shootings.Fort Myers' Davis Court the 'worst street in Fort Myers'One of the men, 36-year-old Corey Lee Cobb, who lives at the house, was arrested by the throng of officers on a misdemeanor charge of possessing less than 20 grams of marijuana.The other two arrested are Quinton Marquiz Lubin, 32, of Braman Avenue, on a probation violation charge and Lemar Young, 45, of Live Oak Drive, on a charge of possessing cocaine with intent to sell within 1,000 feet of a park."Hopefully this will show the community that we're trying to do our part," said Lt. Jay Rodriguez, police spokesman.Police have not made any arrests in the shootings, nor had Crime Stoppers received any tips.In just under 6½ hours Wednesday night, seven people — ages 5 to 44 — were shot and rushed to the hospital. All seven are expected to survive their injuries.The first shooting occurred at 4:25 p.m. in the 2100 block of Davis Court. Leonard Burger, 35, was transported to Lee Memorial Hospital with non-life-threatening injuries.Editorial: Shootings demand immediate actionAlmost four hours later, police officers responded to shots fired near the Pepsi plant on Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. They could not locate the victims because they drove themselves to the emergency room. All four people in the car were hurt, including 5-year-old Tazyhion Matthews. Chancey Isom, 26, Jatravia Isom, 24, and 17-year-old Orvasia Green.As a police spokesman updated the media on the shooting at Veronica S Shoemaker Boulevard and Dale Street, 20-year-old Ezekiel Burger Jr. was shot at the intersection of State Road 82 and Colonial Boulevard before driving himself to a closed Marathon gas station at 4561 Colonial Blvd. Lee EMS transported him the rest of the way to the hospital.The final shooting of the night occurred where it all began: in the 2100 block of Davis Court. Anthony Quinn Williams, 43, was driving his blue Dodge Durango north on Davis Court when the bullets struck. He got out of his car and ran to a nearby home for help.During Thursday's budget meeting, Eads told the council he believes three of the four shootings are related and based on retaliation, but he would not explain in detail.A SWAT team, mobile command center, K-9 units and about a dozen officers swarmed the Davis Court house with a warrant just before 5 p.m.The neighbors went through their well-practiced routine — peeking past curtains, coming outside their house pocked with bullet holes, milling about the scene swapping speculation with neighbors and eyeballing the cops.UPDATE 5 things to know: Fort Myers shootingsAn undercover officer whose face was covered by black fabric walked out of the house toting an AK-47 he recovered from inside the house near the scene of two shootings the night before."We don't have nothing against the police if they protect us," said James Brown, who lives across the street from the house that was raided.That same house was the scene of a shooting July 26 in which an 18-year-old was found lying on his back in the driveway. Diante Davis was taken to Lee Memorial Hospital with non-life-threatening injuries, and told authorities he was walking through Harlem Lakes when he heard gunshots but said he only saw a shadow.Council and community leaders had met to discuss gun violence Wednesday."The irony is while people were meeting to discuss that topic, there were instances of gun violence occurring at that very time," City Manager Billy Mitchell said. "It's the reason why the city and residents are concerned."Henderson said Gov.Rick Scott and Rep. Curt Clawson, R-Bonita Springs, offered their support for the task force.SHREVEPORT, LA (KSLA) - Shreveport police are investigating a drive-by shooting that left multiple people wounded in north Shreveport.It happened around 7:45 p.m. Wednesday in the 2900 block of Peach Street. According to police, preliminary reports suggest a group of people in a dark-colored sedan were traveling east on Peach Street near Knox Street when they started shooting at a group of people standing along Knox Street. That's when police say the group standing on the street shot back at the vehicle.Police say 5 people were struck during the shooting. Of those, 4 were taken to University Health hospital for treatment of wounds authorities said appeared not to be life-threatening. The fifth victim was treated at the scene after refusing to be taken to the hospital.All of the wounded people were from the group standing on the street; and all were shot in their lower extremities, authorities say.No arrests have been made at this time.Anyone with information about this crime is urged to call Shreveport-Caddo Crime Stoppers at (318) 673-7373 or visit itswebsite,lockemup.org.Copyright 2015KSLA. All rights reserved.1812 Fairfield Ave.Shreveport, LA 71101(318) 222-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Summerdale-Philadelphia Police cars and crime scene tape block off the Tanqueray Tavern on Pratt Street in Summerdale.Earlier investigators say a group of feuding bikes locked in a gunfight is the reason why a 34-year-old man is dead, and three others are in the hospital.It happened just before 6:30 p.m. Police say 15-30 bikers took off after the gunfire, but we found one motorcycle smashed down on its side not far away.LaBrian Dale Parker, 34, was transported to Albert Einstein Medical Center and pronounced at 6:44 p.m. He was from Fredericksburg, Virginia.A 53-year-old male with multiple gunshot wounds was transported to Aria-Frankford Hospital by private vehicle and listed in critical condition. He was later transported to Aria-Torresdale Hospital.Another 34-year-old male suffered a gunshot wound to his right thigh. He was taken to Lankenau Hospital by private vehicle and is in stable condition.A 42-year-old male with multiple gunshot wounds was first taken to Aria-Frankford Hospital by private vehicle and then transferred to Jefferson Hospital.AdvertisementAt least one victim is wearing a 'Wheels of Soul' jacket. Cops say two other victims are in critical condition and considered in police custody.A police source called it a "Biker War" and that has neighbors puzzled.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsCHICAGO (STMW) —Four people were killed — including a 14-year-old boy — and at least 35 others have been wounded in shootings across Chicago since Friday night.The latest homicide happened Sunday morning in the West Pullman neighborhood on the Far South Side, according to Chicago Police.About 5:25 a.m., officers responding to a call of shots fired in the 11700 block of South LaSalle found a man unresponsive inside a car parked in an alley.He had been shot multiple times and was taken to Roseland Community Hospital, where he later was pronounced dead, police said. His age was not available.About three hours earlier, six people were shot — one fatally — in an Englewood attack, police said.At 2:08 a.m., six people were outside in the 5700 block of South LaSalle when another group of people walked out of an alley and started shooting, police said. At least one person in the first group returned fire.Six people in a vehicle caught in the crossfire were also taken to hospitals when the car flipped over.A 28-year-old man shot in the chest was taken to Saint Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center, where he later was pronounced dead, police said. The Cook County medical examiner’s office did not immediately confirm the fatality.A 19-year-old woman whose face was grazed by a bullet was also taken to Saint Bernard, police said. She is listed in serious condition.A 29-year-old woman shot in the face was taken in serious condition to Mount Sinai Hospital, as was a 28-year-old woman who suffered a graze wound to the buttocks. Her condition stabilized, police said.A 29-year-old man shot in the arm and leg was taken to Stroger Hospital along with a 23-year-old woman shot in the left foot. Their conditions also stabilized, police said.Saturday evening in Kenwood, a teenage boy was killed and another wounded in a drive-by attack, police said.The boys, 14 and 15, were outside in the 4400 block of South Greenwood at 7:30 p.m. when someone fired from a passing car, police said.The younger boy was shot in the head and pronounced dead at the scene, police said. The 15-year-old suffered two leg wounds and was taken to the University of Chicago Comer Children’s Hospital.Witnesses told officers there’d been an altercation in a nearby park before the shooting, but it wasn’t clear whether that was connected to the killing.About 6 p.m., a 38-year-old man was fatally shot in Humboldt Park. He was standing with a group of people in the 1200 block of North Keeler when two people walked up and started shooting.The man was shot in the back of the neck and pronounced dead at the scene, police said.The Cook County medical examiner’s office did not immediately confirm the deaths.The most recent non-fatal shooting happened early Sunday at an Edgewater neighborhood gas station on the North Side.Shortly before 4 a.m., a 35-year-old man got into an argument with someone who pulled out a gun and shot him in the left hip and leg at the station in the 5700 block of North Broadway, police said. A friend drove him to Presence Saint Francis Hospital in Evanston, where he is listed in good condition.At least 28 other people have been shot across Chicago in separate attacks since 7:20 p.m. Friday.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire &copy; Chicago Sun-Times 2015. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2015. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)Saturday marks 5 years since theshooting death of 10-year-old DeShaun Swansonin Indianapolis, and investigators are still searching for leads in the case.Last month, city leaders and federal officials announced an award of up to $25,000 for information about Swanson's death. The announcement came as part ofOperation Legend, a coordinated effort between federal and local law enforcement to fight violent crime in cities across the country, including Indianapolis.Swanson was killed on Sept. 19, 2015, at a home on the 3900 block of Graceland Avenue, where he and his family were attending a memorial service.When they arrived at the home, someone opened fire in a drive-by shooting. Swanson, who was standing just inside the front door, was one of four people shot. He was rushed to an area hospital but did not survive.Known as “Little Man,” the fourth-grader dreamed of being a basketball player.According tothe FBI, the shots came from the front and rear seat passengers in a newer model, silver or gray vehicle with window tint. The vehicle was seen slowly driving by the house multiple times.Anyone with information is encouraged to call the FBI Indianapolis Field Office at 317-595-4000, the FBI tip line at 1-800-CALL-FBI, or Crime Stoppers of Central Indiana Tips Hotline at 317-262-TIPS.Tips can also be submitted online at tips.fbi.gov.Contact Pulliam Fellow Jordan Erb at jerb@gannett.com. Follow her on Twitter:@jordanparkererb.ByChristopher Brennan For Dailymail.comPublished:17:04 EDT, 26 September 2015|Updated:11:40 EDT, 28 September 201511ViewcommentsFour children killed by their father in a murder-suicide where the family house was set on fire were remembered in funeral services on Saturday.Michael, Connor, Jaeci and Kailey Westerhuis were shot dead along with their mother Nicole, 41, before flames engulfed the home they shared near Platte, South Dakota, on September 17.Husband and father Scott Westerhuis, 41, who was also buried on Saturday, is believed to have killed his children and wife with a shotgun before he is thought to have turned the gun on himself.Scroll down for videoFuneral services were held for four children who died after their father is thought to have shot them and then set fire to the family home near Platte, South Dakota, earlier this monthMichael, (left) 16, Connor, (back center) 14, Jaeci, (right) 10, and Kailey, 9 (front center) Westerhuis were killed along with their mother Nicole in an attack that has shaken the community of 1,200The funeral ceremony for the children, who were 16, 14, 9 and 10, was held at the Platte-Geddes Elementary School gymnasium, according to theArgus Leader.Classmates carried the coffins of the youngsters in the service. Private services for Nicole Westerhuis will be held later.The community of Platte, a town of 1,200 about 110 miles south of Sioux Falls, has been shaken by the act of violence.Platte-Geddes School District released a statement saying it was 'deeply saddened' by the crime, and added that the Westerhuises were a 'big part' of life at the school.Classes at school were dismissed the day of the fire after news spread.The family, including father Scott (second from right), were remembered as a big part of life in Platte before the husband is thought to have killed his children and wife Nicole (right)A neighbor of the Westerhuises said they were a 'nice family' and added he couldn't 'put his mind around it'. Above, a window display remembers Michael Westerhuis, who played football at the local high schoolThe two boys played football at Platte-Geddes High School, according toKeloland.com.Before Friday's homecoming game a moment of silence was held before the game and balloons were released into the air on a celebratory day tinged with sadness.Beyond athletics, Michael was remembered for playing the trumpet and Connor was remembered for his prankster sense of humor.Jaeci, who participated in sports and cheer, was remembered for her laugh and Kailey was remembered for giving the principal a hug every day.Neighbor Marcus King said that the Westerhuises were a 'nice family' and toldKDLT'it’s devastating. When you lose the whole family, all six of them. you can’t put your mind around it'.Charles Mix County Sheriff's Office said firefighters were called around 5.30am September 17 to the home, about three miles south of PlatteBoth Scott and Nicole Westerhuis worked at an educational cooperative that had recently lost a large state contract after an audit from the Department of EducationThe Charles Mix County Sheriff's Office and state investigators are looking into the exact circumstances of what happened at the house the morning of the fire and possible motives.Both Scott and Nicole Westerhuis worked at an educational cooperative where the GEAR UP program to help Native Americans attend college was being audited by the state Department of Education.Scott Westerhuis had reportedly been the focus of the audit, according toKOTATV, and he had recently been stripped of a $4.3million contract.Documents show that Scott was listed as CFO and Nicole was listed as business manager of two organizations that GEAR UP gave $2million to, according to the Associated Press.Investigators are looking through the company and business manager's financial records, as well as what is left in the family home.The National Suicide Prevention Lifeline is 1 (800) 273-8255Published by Associated Newspapers LtdPart of the Daily Mail, The Mail on Sunday & Metro Media GroupFour people were shot outside a public housing complex in Newark Tuesday night, according to police.The shooting happened in a driveway of the Betty Shabazz housing complex at the corner of Irvine Turner Boulevard and West Kinney Street in Newark, police said.The victims sustained non-life threatening injuries, police said.A senior official said shell casings have been recovered but declined to discuss the nature of the shooting.Shootings in New Jersey's largest city have spiked this year, TheWall Street Journal noted last month. Mayor Ras Baraka has acknowledged the city is struggling to reduce gun crime with a smaller police force and fewer resources.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Ocala.com  ~ 2121 SW 19th Avenue Rd., Ocala, FL 34471~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Shreveport Police Violent Crimes detectives are seeking the identities and whereabouts of those reponsible for a drive-by shooting which sent four people to the hospital Saturday evening in west Shreveport.Just before 8:30 p.m., SPD patrol officers were called to a home in the 1500 block of Clanton Street relative to a shooting in which multiple victims were injured, said SPD spokesman Cpl. Marcus Hines.Four victims, three juveniles and one adult, 25-year-old Tadaruis Kennedy, suffered minor to potentially life-threatening gunshot wounds. Kennedy was shot in the hand, a 17-year-old male was shot in the upper torso, a 16-year-old girl's head was grazed and a 12-year-old boy's jaw was grazed, Hines said.The 17 year old reportedly suffered the more serious injury and remains in critical but stable condition. All victims were taken to University Health for treatment and are expected to survive, according to Hines.Preliminary information gathered in SPD's investigation suggests the shooting took place after a dark colored sedan driving near the intersection of Clanton Street at Dowdell Street  reportedly fired multiple gunshots from the moving car. Evidence of the shooting was recovered at the scene of the crime and is being processed in efforts to help identify the culprits responsible for the heinous act, Hines said.Detectives are working to determine what events led to the incident. While no exact motive has been determined, investigators don't believe the incident was a random act of violence.Authorities are urging anyone with information about the crime to contact Crime Stoppers at (318) 673-7373 or visit their website atwww.lockemup.org.Crime Stoppers is offering a reward for information leading to the arrest of those responsible for the crime.A Rochester man pleaded not guilty Monday morning in a fatal shooting that happened early Saturday.William B. James, 30, of 120 Garson Ave., ischarged with one count of second-degree murderin connection with a shootingat 36 Woodward St. that left two people dead and at least three others wounded. He is being held without bail.Killing of two continues summer violenceJames is accused of killing John Rudolph, 36, of Rochester, by shooting him several times at the party with a handgun, according to the criminal complaint filed with the Rochester City Court clerk's office.James also allegedly made a recorded video statement to police in which he waived his Miranda rights and "admits to being at the location and being involved in a dispute with the victim which led to the shooting," according to the criminal complaint.The other person killed was Herbert Thomas, 34, of Rochester, according to police.Police on Monday also released the names of three others shot at the party: Elizabeth Washington, 24; Shaquanda Moody, 25; and Imani Williams, 26. All are from Rochester.Police previously said there were two people fatally shot and four wounded. Assistant Monroe County District Attorney Brian Green said the sixth victim was James, who was shot in a leg.James was in a wheelchair when he was arraigned in Rochester City Court Monday.Police would not release a mug shot of James."We are not releasing the photo at this time of the suspect because we still have to conduct ID procedures. Once the ID procedures have been conducted, I will release the photo," Rochester Police Investigator Jacqueline Shuman said in an email.Wendell Washington, who attended the arraignment, said his daughter, Elizabeth Washington was shot in the back and the bullet went through her spine and she was not able to communicate. She has two children, ages 3 and 5, he said."She was there with her cousins celebrating somebody's birthday," Washington said.James' birthday was Friday.Arrest made in Woodward St. shooting"Things got to stop when it comes down to violence," he said."A lot of things go through my mind, but at the end of the day I've got to thank God just for my baby being alive fighting for her life," Washington said.Police said 30 to 50 people were in the house during the dispute. Police were at the house about two hours prior to the shooting, but when police arrived, only two people were on the porch and they were dispersed.Ciminelli said that police are not looking for another suspect.BLOUDON@Gannett.comVictim's mother begs for violence to endMINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)— The Hennepin County Medical Examiner’s Office released more information in thefatal north Minneapolis shooting on Sept. 12, 2015.According to the medical examiner, 25-year-old Miguel Yobani Garcia Silvestre died of a gunshot wound to the abdomen in the incident. His manner of death has been determined to be homicide.On the day of the incident, police responded to a report of a shooting inside a residence at about 4:30 a.m. on the 1200 block of 22nd Avenue North.When officers arrived at scene, they located three  victims who were suffering from gunshot wounds. One victim, Garcia Silvestre, was pronounced dead at the scene, and two others were taken to North Memorial Medical Center. Their injuries were considered serious, but not life-threatening. Another victim, who fled the home, was found a few blocks away with non-life threatening injuries.Minneapolis police are investigating. Anyone with information should call Minneapolis Police or CrimeStoppers at 1-800-222-8477.Thunderstorms likely. High 69F. Winds SSW at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 80%..Mostly cloudy skies. A stray shower or thunderstorm is possible. Low 62F. Winds SSW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:09 pmMoultrie, GeorgiaMOULTRIE — Deputies responded to a reported shooting in Berlin Tuesday morning. The initial call said one man was shot at and four people had been shot but were refusing treatment by EMS. While the officers were still en route, the dispatcher added that the man with the gun was high on narcotics and that the caller was being uncooperative, the deputy said in his incident report.When the deputy arrived, he saw a man walking from the residence where the shots had allegedly been fired. He and Berlin Police Chief Timothy Weathers forced the man to the ground at gunpoint, and another officer handcuffed him without further incident.The man “appeared under the influence and was hallucinating,” the deputy reported.A neighbor said the man had been shooting at objects and acting out of his head. The man was taken to Colquitt Regional Medical Center for evaluation. The deputy said a 12-gauge pump shotgun, a Taser and a .22-caliber pistol were taken into evidence.Other violenceSheriff’s Office• Heather Tucker, 100 block Lighter Knot Court, reported Saturday that her brother had pointed a pistol at her and other relatives when they were at his residence to retrieve some property. The other relatives agreed that’s what happened, and one provided a description of a black .45-caliber handgun they said he used.Police contacted Tucker’s brother, Eric Chafin, at his residence, 191 Fireplace Lane. Chafin and another witness said there was a verbal argument but no firearm was pointed at anyone. Chafin acknowledged owning a pistol that fit the relative’s description, and the deputy recovered it from a closet in the residence.The reporting deputy said Chafin was arrested on a charge of pointing a pistol at another. No booking paperwork was available at the Colquitt County Jail on Tuesday; usually that paperwork isn’t available until after a warrant is issued officially charging a suspect.• A Colquitt County woman reported she was sexually assaulted Friday night on the side of Edmondson Road.• A Colquitt County woman reported Sunday that her juvenile daughter returned from her father’s house with what looked like a hickey, and she said her daughter told her that her father had poked her and touched her inappropriately. The daughter, however, would not talk with the deputy preparing the initial report.MOULTRIE [mdash] Ricky Nelson Smith, 62, of Moultrie, died Friday, March 26, 2021 at his residence. Arrangements have been entrusted to Baker Funeral Home.MOULTRIE [mdash] Karen Louise Evans Goble, 56, of Moultrie, died Tuesday, March 30, 2021 at Colquitt Regional Medical Center. Arrangements have been entrusted to Baker Funeral Home.MOULTRIE [mdash] Joseph Clifford Cooper, 27, of Moultrie, died Monday, March 29, 2021 in Moultrie, Georgia. Arrangements have been entrusted to Baker Funeral Home.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up now to get our FREE breaking news coverage delivered right to your inbox.First Amendment:Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.GARY | A dispute over money at a Miller bar might have led to a neighborhood shooting that left two Gary men dead and four wounded, police said.The early morning dispute between two groups Saturday started at Murphy's Tavern, 5425 U.S. 12, Police Chief Wade Ingram said.One of the groups apparently went to another location to arm themselves with guns while the other group of eight went to a house in the 9300 block of Sunrise Boulevard, Ingram said.The group that went back to the Sunrise Boulevard home was congregating outside at 3:45 a.m. when at least one car without its headlights on drove by and began firing into the crowd.The dead have been identified by the Lake County coroner's office as Vincent E. Wainwright, 32, of the 9200 block of East 6th Avenue, and Da'Vaughn Pitts, 18, of the 300 block of North Lake Street.Wainwright died from a single gunshot and Pitts died from multiple gunshot wounds, the coroner's office reported.Wainwright was pronounced dead at 5 at the scene. Pitts was pronounced dead at 5:30 p.m. at the Methodist Hospitals Northlake Campus in Gary.Four others were shot in the incident, including a Portage woman and a Gary woman. The other two gunshot victims are Gary men.One of the wounded men is in critical condition, Ingram said.All of the wounded were transported to area hospitals.Investigating officers told witnesses to stay at the scene when one man began to run at 5:14 a.m. Officers stopped David Pitts, 20, and took him into custody after discovering he was carrying a handgun. David Pitts is the older brother of Da'Vaughn Pitts.Pitts was arrested and is being held on charges of resisting arrest and possessing a gun without a permit.Police are asking anyone with information about the shootings to contact Sgt. Dan Callahan, Detectives Alex Jones, Lorenzo Davis, Daryl Gordon or Simon Lillie at (219) 881-1210.Get local news delivered to your inbox!This is a map showing the locations of all the Gary homicides in 2013. There were a total of 55 homicides compared to the 43 homicides in 2012.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Support UsAbout Us,Contact Us,Staff,Careers,Circulation,Privacy,Terms,HelpWelcome,InsiderThe independent voice of Denver since 1977Support the independent voice of Denver and help keep the future of Westword free.On Friday, we posted on our Music blog about the13th annual White Party, a bash sponsored by the venerable 3Deep Productions crew that was set to featurerapper Wale and attendees clad in white— hence the name of the gathering.From what we hear, the party itself, which got underway at Club Beta, 1909 Blake Street, on Sunday night, September 6, went off without a hitch.But amid let-out during the wee hours of yesterday, September 7, shots rang out and four people were hurt. Their wounds were not life-threatening.At this writing, no arrests have been made in the shootings, and the Denver Police Department hasn't released any information about possible suspects despite the prevalence of surveillance cameras in this very busy section of Lower Downtown.Here's an excerpt from our preview post, written by Addison Herron-Wheeler:Denver’s infamous White Party, which gets its name from the fashion rule about wearing white after Labor Day, celebrates its 13th anniversary this year with a star-studded line-up.This year’s White Party, sponsored by 3Deep Productions and Ciroc, will take place as usual at Club Beta, on September 6, the night before Labor Day. To gain entry to the event, you must be decked out in your finest white club clothes. This party is a traditional marker of the end of summer, and the last big party of the season for Denver, so it usually generates quite a bit of hype.This year should be no different, as the famed Wale, who rose to success around the turn of the century with his hit “Dig Dug,” will be acting as the party’s host....“I love seeing everyone come out to BETA in their all-white, ready to party,” says Francois Baptiste of 3Deep Productions. “We have the best deejays, the number 1 club in the country and an incredible host to push excitement over the top. Each year the party grows bigger and better and that shows that Denver knows how to push the envelope and create one huge night of fun.”The photo shared by 3Deep that's on view atop this post shows attendees enjoying the sort of entertainment Baptiste promised.But around 2:30 a.m., shots rang out and four people — three women and one man — were hit.Cell-phone video shot by people in the vicinity captured images like this one.......as well as this striking, overhead view of the police response shot by Brian McCulley and aired by7News.McCulley told the station that law enforcers appeared to be looking into another shooting in the 18th and Arapahoe area and were surrounding a white SUV when the shots from near Club Beta rang out.The initial Denver Police Department tweet about the shooting was issued at 2:51 a.m. on the 7th; it spoke about just two victims.Later in the day, however, the DPD put out this followup about the people shot.Update-19th/Market Shooting: 3 female and 1 male victim. 2 treated and released, 2 still at hospital with non-life threatening injuries.A number of vehicles were hit by gunfire during the incident.So, too, was the window of The Wine Cellar LoDo:But while the damage is clear, who inflicted it is not.Indeed, investigators have floated the possibility that multiple shooters may have been involved. Thus far, however, the cops have not issued any reports about a person or persons taken into custody.Whatever the case, the violence is the latest to raise concerns about safety in LoDo, particular during the let-out period.Below, see reports about the shooting fromFox31,CBS4and7News.Keep Westword Free...Since we startedWestword, it has been defined as the free, independent voice of Denver, and we would like to keep it that way. Offering our readers free access to incisive coverage of local news, food and culture. Producing stories on everything from political scandals to the hottest new bands, with gutsy reporting, stylish writing, and staffers who've won everything from the Society of Professional Journalists' Sigma Delta Chi feature-writing award to the Casey Medal for Meritorious Journalism. But with local journalism's existence under siege and advertising revenue setbacks having a larger impact, it is important now more than ever for us to rally support behind funding our local journalism. You can help by participating in our "I Support" membership program, allowing us to keep covering Denver with no paywalls.Use of this website constitutes acceptance of ourterms of use, ourcookies policy, and ourprivacy policyThe Westword may earn a portion of sales from products & services purchased through links on our site from our affiliate partners.©2021 Denver Westword, LLC. All rights reserved.CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS:California Privacy Policy|California Collection Notice|Do Not Sell My InfoWe use cookies to collect and analyze information on site performance and usage, and to enhance and customize content and advertisements. By clicking 'X' or continuing to use the site, you agree to allow cookies to be placed. To find out more, visit ourcookies policyand ourprivacy policy.Join the Westword community and help support independent local journalism in Denver.Get the latest updates in news, food, music and culture, and receive special offers direct to your inboxBecome a member and go ad-free!Join the Westword community and help support independent local journalism in Denver.Get the latest updates in news, food, music and culture, and receive special offers direct to your inboxBecome a donor and go ad-free!Windy with rain likely. High near 50F. Winds WNW at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 100%. Rainfall around a quarter of an inch..Becoming partly cloudy after some evening rain. Low 43F. Winds WNW at 15 to 25 mph. Chance of rain 100%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:16 pmWindy with rain likely. High near 50F. Winds WNW at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 100%. Rainfall around a quarter of an inch..Becoming partly cloudy after some evening rain. Low 43F. Winds WNW at 15 to 25 mph. Chance of rain 100%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:16 pmCOLUMBIA — Louis Lee Green Jr. was arrested Friday afternoon in connection with a September shooting at a VFW post.Green was arrested at 5:30 p.m. in the 700 block of Demaret Drive  and is being held on $500,000 cash-only bond. He faces four charges of first-degree assault and a felony armed criminal action charge.Police asked for the public's assistancein finding Green last month. Green is a suspect in a shooting at the VFW Post 280, 1509 Ashley St., during a promotional event for a hip-hop album, according to previous Missourian reporting.During the event, two men got into a fight and were pepper-sprayed by a post security officer,according to previous Missourian reporting. Green is suspected to be one of the men involved.Four people suffered gunshot wounds. Three people sustained injuries that weren't life threatening. One woman was hospitalized and had emergency surgery.Supervising editor isDaniela Sirtori-Cortina.Louis Lee Green Jr. faces four charges of first-degree assault as well as a felony charge of unlawful use of weapons and armed criminal action. He is considered to be armed and dangerous.Louis Lee Green Jr. faces four charges of first-degree assault as well as a felony charge of unlawful use of weapons and armed criminal action. He is considered to be armed and dangerous.I'm a state government reporter studying print & digital news and Spanish at the University of Missouri. See a detail I missed? Have a story tip to provide? Contact me at TSFGZ8@mail.missouri.edu or in the newsroom at 882-5720.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Receive top local news and columns every morning. (View a sample.)Receive a roundup of the news of the day each evening. (View a sample.)A look back and a look ahead every Monday morning. (View a sample.)Get the latest Mizzou, local preps and other sports headlines every day. (View a sample.)Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Receive top local news and columns every morning. (View a sample.)Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByElizabeth RosnerandLia EustachewichSubmitJune 12, 2017|5:16pmA notorious Crips gang leader was arrested Monday – just as he was about to be sprung from prison – on fresh murder charges stemming froma 2015 hookah bar slaying in Brooklyn, authorities announced.Larry Pagett, the head of the Eight Trey Crips, was indicted by feds in Brooklyn for allegedly gunning down Chrispine Philip inside the Buda Hookah Lounge in Prospect-Lefferts Gardens.Prosecutors say surveillance video shows Pagett, 37, removing a gun in the crowded bar and shooting Philip several times in the back and head as he tried to flee.Pagett, aka “Biz,” “Biz Loc” and “Molotovbizzz,” was due to be released Monday after served two years for violating his supervised release through his involvement in Philip’s slaying. He had never been formally charged in the killing.He was arraigned in federal court in Williamsport, Pa. and will be transferred to Brooklyn to face charges.Read NextDe Blasio calls John Flanagan to end mayoral control stand...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 158,176 times.158,176This story has been shared 61,566 times.61,566This story has been shared 61,538 times.61,538© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.The man accused of stalking his estranged wife, attempting to kill her in Salinas, and slaying her aunt and uncle, was identified in court documents Friday morning.Court documents state that the suspected killer is Sammuel Ejaz, 50, of Garden Grove, Calif.Documents also identify the aunt and uncle who were shot to death Thursday morning outside a federal office building as Felicidad Legaspi, 51, of Salinas, and Oliver Legaspi, 64, of Salinas.Ejaz's 32-year-old estranged wife was not identified. She is recovering in a trauma center from gunshot wounds and is expected to recover."She’s serious but stable. We know that law enforcement officers have talked to her again today, and she’s able to communicate with them," prosecutor Jeanine Paccione said.PHOTOS: Domestic violence erupts in Salinas quadruple shootingEjaz was booked into the Monterey County Jail on two counts of premeditated murder, attempted murder, and spousal abuse. Jail guards placed him on 24-hour suicide watch.Police Chief Kelly McMillin said Ejaz worked in health care and is of Pakistani descent. The wife and her family are Filipino.Neighbors of Felicidad Legaspi and Oliver Legaspi described the Salinas couple as hardworking and pleasant."I’m shocked, I really am. They're really good people," said neighbor Gail Rapacon.At 8:45 a.m. Thursday, two people were murdered and two others critically wounded after a quadruple shooting unfolded outside the U.S. Social Security Administration office on the 900 block of Blanco Circle."This incident was purely domestic violence," Police Cmdr. Vince Maiorana said.VIDEO: 2 dead, two wounded in Salinas shootingMaiorana said the husband and wife were having marital conflicts. The woman wanted to get away from her husband, so she drove from their Garden Grove home to Salinas to stay with her aunt, uncle, and cousin, he said."The wife had come up to Salinas to get away from martial difficulties they were having in Southern California," Maiorana said.Ejaz decided to follow and stalk her, police said. He found her Thursday outside the Social Security office while she was with her family. They argued until Ejaz pulled out a 9mm handgun and opened fire on everyone, according to police.The woman's aunt and uncle died at the scene. Ejaz's wife and her 28-year-old cousin, Alfaro Legaspi, were also shot and rushed to a trauma center in critical condition.Witness Mark Keszler told KSBW that the gunman showed little emotion immediately after the shooting."The scariest part of it was that he was so stoic. He just didn’t have any kind of emotion, anything in his face. That was really chilling. It was like watching a horror film," Keszler said.More than 10 people called 911. Officers surrounded and locked down the area. The suspected shooter was pointed out to officers by witnesses, and he was taken to the police station."Our suspect completely confessed to what he did," Maiorana said.If convicted of premeditated murder with special circumstances, Ejaz could face the death penalty, prosecutor Jeanine Paccione said."We haven’t charged it that way, but we have the opportunity to do that later," she said.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.BROOKLYN CENTER, Minn. (KMSP)-Brooklyn Center police are searching for 4 suspects after 4 people suffered gunshot wounds in an early morning home invasion. Just after 3 a.m. on the 5000 block of Drew Avenue North, the 4 victims -- 3 men and 1 woman -- were transported to an area hospital with non-life-threatening injures.On a street that rarely deals with crime, Tara Hubbard says a Brooklyn Center police officer woke her family up around 3:30 a.m. to say the next door neighbors had been shot.“I didn't think anything like this was going to happen,” she said.Investigators say four armed men burst into this house on the 5000 block of drew avenue early this morning, shot three men and one woman, searched the house, and took off.“And they're still out there and so it's even more scary,” Hubbard said.The female victim who lives there is Blanca Pimentel, she spoke to Fox 9 briefly on the phone from her hospital bed and says for now she does not want to reveal the identities of the other victims. But she did say they were all shot in the knee caps, nothing was stolen from her house, and she did not recognize her attackers.Advertisement“We have a basic description of 4 male suspects as being the suspects involved in the incident,” Cmdr. Tony Gruenig said. “This is basically all the information we have at this time.”None of the victims or suspects have been publicly identified at this time.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsFiled under:Bond was set at $1 million Saturday for the second man charged with a shooting that left two people dead and two more wounded at a West Side park last summer.Ricky Dortch, 29, was arrested Thursday and charged with two counts of first-degree murder and two counts of aggravated battery with a firearm, all felonies, according to Chicago Police.The shooting happened at Horan Park in the 3000 block of West Van Buren at 10:36 a.m. Aug. 26, 2015, police said.The other man charged with the shooting, 19-year-old Frank Robinson, was recognized by witnesses who saw him out of his car before opening fire, Cook County prosecutors alleged at his bond hearinglast month.Kwamaine Lovette, 22, was shot in the chest and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he died at 11:37 a.m., according to the Cook County medical examiner’s office. Lovette lived in the 2900 block of West Wilcox.Kortney Blakes, 23, was shot in the head and taken to Stroger Hospital, where he died at 2:07 p.m., authorities said. He lived in the 3200 block of West Polk.Another 23-year-old man was shot in the upper left shoulder and a 22-year-old man in the right leg, police said. Both were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in good condition.Prosecutors said the shooting stemmed from a gang feud. Police have not detailed Dortch’s alleged involvement.Dortch, of the 2900 block of West Harrison, appeared in court Saturday, where Judge Laura Marie Sullivan set bond at $1 million, according to Cook County Circuit Court records. He is due in court again Tuesday.Robinson of Forest Park, remains held without bond. His next court date is scheduled for Sept. 20.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Doctors at Lurie Children’s Hospital said Kayden Swann "continues to demonstrate positive improvements," though he is still in critical condition in the pediatric intensive care unit.New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A woman reacts at the scene as New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)Olive and Fern streets in New Orleans.New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A woman reacts at the scene as New Orleans Police investigate a quadruple shooting at Olive and Fern Streets that left one person dead on Tuesday, August 25, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)Olive and Fern streets in New Orleans.A 19-year-old man who was killed Tuesday (Aug. 25) in aquadruple shooting near Fern and Olive Streetshas been identified as Kentrell Jones by the Orleans Parish Coroner's Office.New Orleans police said Jones and three adult men were shot while standing on the corner around 7 p.m.Jones was pronounced dead at the scene. The three other victims arrived at the hospital via private conveyance.Police said they were looking for a dark-colored Ford F-150 truck that was seen leaving the shooting scene.Jones was amongtwo killed and six injuredin a violent four-hour span in New Orleans Tuesday.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?Three men walked into a Pine Hills gas station with gunshot wounds Saturday night as a fourth shooting victim was found about six miles away, officials said.The shooting victims, all in their 20s, were taken to Orlando Regional Medical Center where their conditions remain unknown, according to Lourdes Clayton, spokeswoman for the Orange County Sheriff's Office.The incident began unfolding around 8 p.m. when Orange County deputies responded to the ramp onto State Road 408 near Pine Hills Road in reference to a shooting, Clayton said.At the same time, three shooting victims walked into the Circle K on West Colonial Drive near Powers Drive, according to Clayton.The fourth shooting victim was found near Orange Center Boulevard and Goldwyn Avenue, Clayton said.Deputies said it's unclear where the victims were actually shot, but shell casings were found on the 408 ramp.Pine Hills Road was closed for several hours from Colonial Drive to the 408 as the investigation continued.An Orange County sheriff's helicopter was spotted flying overhead late Saturday night as deputies investigated the three active crime scenes.David HarrisRecommendedNecessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. This category only includes cookies that ensures basic functionalities and security features of the website. These cookies do not store any personal information.Any cookies that may not be particularly necessary for the website to function and is used specifically to collect user personal data via analytics, ads, other embedded contents are termed as non-necessary cookies. It is mandatory to procure user consent prior to running these cookies on your website.In order to provide you with the best experience, this site requires that you allow JavaScript to run. Please correct that and try again.In order to provide you with the best experience, this site requires that you allow JavaScript to run. Please correct that and try again.If you previously used a social network to login to WRAL.com, click the “Forgot your password” link to reset your password.Mask dispute at Fayetteville sports bar prompts fight that ends with security guard shotSlain woman, murder suspect had been friends since middle schoolCOVID-19 vaccine clinics put J&J vaccine on hold after adverse reactions; CDC finds no safety issue with vaccineAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyDuke to require proof of vaccination before students can enroll for Fall semesterNo region in the world spared as virus cases, deaths surgeIsolated showers and thunderstorms on tap again for SaturdayHail, flooding throughout central NC as more severe weather awaits on SaturdayAverage number of Atlantic hurricanes grows, 2021 could be another active seasonTriangle reels in profit, exposure when MLF comes to townPro fishing returns to Triangle with events at 3 area lakesBring back the roars: The patrons return to the MastersAmazon warehouse workers reject union bid in AlabamaBusiness owners struggling to fill open positionsJobs remain unfilled as unemployment benefits outpace wagesEditorial: Find ways to ease voting, not restrict itPATRICIA MURPHY: Fighting business, baseball and future to defend lie about the pastEditorial: Ignoring their own warnings about the N.C. LotteryExpect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodIs that a firecracker in her bag of kale from Target?Wondering about your tax refund? 5 On Your Side looks into delaysNorth Carolina families united by shared slave history connectAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyWoman who coughed on cancer patient gets 30 days in jailFoodie News: Union Special bakery is expandingVirtual Fun Roundup: Observe the moon, T. rex bites, storytimeWeekend best bets: Southern Ideal Home Show, shrimp boil and drive-in moviesWRAL WeatherCenter ForecastEvening Pick 3 Pick 4 and Cash 5Expect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodPublished: 2015-08-21 23:55:00Updated: 2015-08-22 18:32:14Posted August 21, 2015 11:55 p.m. EDTUpdated August 22, 2015 6:32 p.m. EDTDurham, N.C.— A Durham neighborhood erupted into chaos Friday night after eight people were injured in a drive-by shooting that happened during a late-night cookout.According to Durham police, the shooting happened at about 10:30 p.m. at a home in the 2700 block of Hinson Drive.One person remained hospitalized in serious condition Saturday afternoon. The other seven people, including a second person who was taken to a local hospital, did not suffer life-threatening injuries, police said. Their names have not been released.Deanna Wilson, who lives on Hinson Drive, said she heard between 15 and 20 gunshots that sounded like "a roll of firecrackers.""You didn't hear anything but gunshots, and then you heard a bunch of yelling and commotion," she said. "The whole neighborhood erupted into chaos. Everybody came out of their house. You only see stuff like that on TV."No arrests have been made, but a Durham Police Department spokesman confirmed that officers had canvassed the neighborhood earlier Friday because of increased tensions that resulted from a separate shooting earlier this week.“They were out canvassing, just knocking on doors,” Wilson said.Authorities said Saturday that they are looking for a white vehicle that may have been involved in Friday’s incident.Anyone with information about the shooting should call Durham Crime Stoppers at 919-683-1200.Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards for information leading to arrests in felony cases and callers never have to identify themselves.Copyright 2018 by Capitol Broadcasting Company. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.©2021  Capitol Broadcasting Company, Inc.A man shooting at others at a Madisonville party late Friday was one of the two who died in the barrage of gunfire.Timothy Murphy, 30, was one of the shooters in the incident that also killed  Barry Washington, 56, and left five others injured, said Sgt. Mike Miller.Murphy was a suspect in a July incident also in Madisonville. In that incident, Murphy was accused of brandishing a handgun and threatening to shoot two women during a verbal altercation, according to court documents.Two survivors from the shooting Friday, Dale Pennington, 49, and Dewaun Wallace, 36, were acquainted with the shooters, according to police. The other victims, Wayne Evans, 52, Cameron Green, 23, and  Jerry Oliphant, 57, did not know the gunmen.Miller said the victims were not the intended targets but would not go further into detail because of the ongoing investigation.The shooting erupted at a party at Elks Lodge in the 6100 block of Prentice Street shortly at 11:57 p.m. Friday night.Neighbors reported hearing numerous shots.Eugene Warner, 83, who has lived in Madisonville for more than 30 years, said gunshots and screams woke him up. He said he heard more than 25 shots in a five-minute period.Around 30 or 40 people were at the party before when a fight broke out between a group at the party and an outside group, said Capt. Jeff Butler.The fight began in the bar area of the lodge and moved outside into the street, said Sgt. Mike Miller. The police incident report states that the five survivors were shot inside of the lodge.No arrests have been made in the shooting. Officers arrested three people for fighting at the scene.Washington's death at the shooting and Murphy's later at University of Cincinnati Medical Center were the 49th and 50th homicides in Cincinnati so far in 2015, according to Cincinnati Police Department data.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — Four people were left wounded after gunfire erupted at a party in Austin, police say.At 3 a.m. Sunday, three men were at a party in the 5400 block of West Division Street when an argument started, said Officer Bari Lemmon, Chicago Police spokeswoman. Shots were fired, striking the men and a woman who was driving by, Lemmon said.The woman, who is 25 years old, was treated at West Suburban Medical Center for a graze wound to her shoulder and is in good condition, Lemmon said.A 33-year-old man was shot in his leg and was in good condition at Loyola University Medical Center, Lemmon said. A 29-year-old man was shot in his armpit and was in serious condition at Mt. Sinai Hospital, Lemmon said, and a 26-year-old man was shot in his leg and was in good condition at West Suburban Medical Center.The four victims have been uncooperative with police, police said.No one is in custody for the shooting, Lemmon said.See DNAinfo's map of every shooting in Chicago since 2010.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.BENNETTSVILLE, S.C. -- A North Carolina man was arrested in connection with the shooting at the State Line Club in Bennettsville.Traquan D. Wall, 19, of 1324 Couthen Drive of Rockingham, North Carolina, was taken into custody Wednesday -- three days after the shooting -- by the Rockingham Police Department, according to a press release from the Marlboro County Sheriff's Office.Marlboro County Sheriff's Office investigators were able to piece together the events and found witnesses that came forward. Investigators obtained warrants on Wall and contacted the Rockingham Police for assistance.Rockingham Police also charged Wall with marijuana possession with the intent to distribute. Wall is awaiting extradition back to South Carolina and is in the NC Detention Center facing his current charges in North Carolina.He is charged in South Carolina with five counts of assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature and possession of a firearm during the commission of a violent crime. Investigators met with Solicitor William B. Rogers Jr. on the case and charges.The case is still under investigation as to the motive and other violations inside the club. The MCSO and SLED are working with North Carolina law enforcement to get background on Wall and anyone else who may be involved.Traquan D. WallGet local news delivered to your inbox!LAKE CITY, S.C. – The results of Darla Moore's April 5 letter to the University of South Carolina Board of Trustees reads like the first few lines of a story recapping a typical South Carolina-Clemson football game: Tigers could take advantage of Gamecocks' mistake. The Post and Courier reported Tuesday evening that Moore sent a letter to the board on April 5, four days after the death of her mother, Lorraine.LAKE CITY, S.C. – The results of Darla Moore's April 5 letter to the University of South Carolina Board of Trustees reads like the first few lines of a story recapping a typical South Carolina-Clemson football game: Tigers could take advantage of Gamecocks' mistake. The Post and Courier reported Tuesday evening that Moore sent a letter to the board on April 5, four days after the death of her mother, Lorraine.FLORENCE, S.C. -- Florence County Sheriff's deputies with the agency's narcotics unit with support from two SWAT teams served a search warrant at a Tara Village residence knows as Margaweedaville, arrested two people and seized drugs and cash.FLORENCE, S.C. -- Florence County Sheriff's deputies with the agency's narcotics unit with support from two SWAT teams served a search warrant at a Tara Village residence knows as Margaweedaville, arrested two people and seized drugs and cash.TIMMONSVILLE, S.C.-- Two people are dead after shots were fired into their car Tuesday evening.TIMMONSVILLE, S.C.-- Two people are dead after shots were fired into their car Tuesday evening.FLORENCE, S.C.-- A Florence man faces drugs and weapons charges following a Tuesday traffic stop on TV Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- A Florence man faces drugs and weapons charges following a Tuesday traffic stop on TV Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence Police are searching for a Chevrolet Z-71 pickup truck in connection with an early Friday morning incident in which two people were wounded and several buildings along Church Street sprayed with gunfire.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence Police are searching for a Chevrolet Z-71 pickup truck in connection with an early Friday morning incident in which two people were wounded and several buildings along Church Street sprayed with gunfire.FLORENCE, S.C. — The Black Lives Matter mural in front of the Pearl Moore Basketball Center on Barnes Street has been removed.EFFINGHAM, S.C. — Florence County Sheriff T.J. Joye has a list of accomplishments to his credit, a long-term community-improvement project to …TIMMONSVILLE, S.C. – Count Timmonsville in on Florence County’s industrial building development plan.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence County Sheriff's investigators are asking for the public's assistance to locate three people they want to talk to in connection with the slaying of two motorists on US 76 near Alligator Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence County Sheriff's investigators are asking for the public's assistance to locate three people they want to talk to in connection with the slaying of two motorists on US 76 near Alligator Road.DARLINGTON, S.C. –  A major road connecting Florence and Darlington may soon be renamed the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway. South Carolina House Speaker Jay Lucas and Rep. Robert Williams are sponsoring a resolution to request the state department of transportation name the portion of Hoffmeyer Road between between the Florence and Darlington County line and west of the Timmonsville Highway (SC Route 340) the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway.DARLINGTON, S.C. –  A major road connecting Florence and Darlington may soon be renamed the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway. South Carolina House Speaker Jay Lucas and Rep. Robert Williams are sponsoring a resolution to request the state department of transportation name the portion of Hoffmeyer Road between between the Florence and Darlington County line and west of the Timmonsville Highway (SC Route 340) the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WATCHVIDEOSEmergency personnel are shown at the scene of a shooting at 57th Street and South Normandie Avenue in South Los Angeles on Saturday, Aug. 15, 2015.(KABC)The manager of Pit Stop Pub says the business is unfairly being singled out. "We don't have more or less trouble than anyone else," he says. Incidents occur because of "a few bad apples," he says, adding that 98 percent of the club's clients "are good people."A man injured in an August incident at an Orangeburg nightclub in which one person was killed is suing the club's owners for negligence in allowing a "culture of lawlessness" to prevail at the business.Maurice Jones, who was one of three people injured by gunshots during the early morning Aug. 15 incident, filed the lawsuit Aug. 26 against John W. Carter, Walter A. Pruitt and the Pit Stop Pub.The lawsuit claims the defendants "allowed a general condition of lawlessness to exist on the premises, thereby putting patrons at risk of serious bodily injury, and that the risk was both known ... and reasonably foreseeable to them, based on the long history of violent crimes committed on the premises.""If the alcohol licensing board can't close it, it is going to be individuals filing lawsuits and forcing them to change their ways," Jones' attorney Janek Kazmierski said."We will fight it," Pit Stop Pub Manager Bobby Barfield said, describing the lawsuit as "frivolous.""Mr. Jones is wrong. He is completely wrong," Barfield said.The lawsuit comes on the heels of a fatal shooting Aug. 15 at the Pit Stop Pub, located about two miles south of Orangeburg. Nazdric Gates, 30, of Mt. Airy, North Carolina, was charged with killing 22-year-old Christavius De'Shean Darby of Orangeburg.Gates was taken into custody Aug. 26 by a joint task force made up of the U.S. Marshals Service and the Colorado Fugitive Task Force. He was found in Colorado Springs, Colorado.Gates faces a murder charge and three attempted murder charges as well as a weapons charge. He has yet to appear in court in Orangeburg County.The eight-page lawsuit contends the defendants "took no actions to make improvements to the premises to make them reasonable safe for ... invitees."The lawsuit goes on to say the defendants were "willful, wanton, reckless, grossly negligent and negligent" in failing to take the necessary precautions such as increasing security at the club and properly training employees to respond to criminal activity.Jones is seeking actual and punitive damages. A jury trial has been requested.Kazmierski said his client was shot through the left knee and was grazed on the right knee."He is slowly recovering," the attorney said. "His left leg is propped up ... and there is lack of sensation in the left leg below the knee. It is a significant injury. Whether he walks normally again is a question only time will tell."He said Jones also suffered a flesh wound to his right upper hip and left shoulder.Jones was at the pub with a relative and was shot as he was getting ready to leave the premises, Kazmierski said."He was not involved in any of the altercations and neither was the family member. He was truly an innocent bystander," the attorney said.Barfield feels the Pit Stop is being unfairly singled out."Why just us?" he said. "I hear stories about every other club around all the time, but we are the ones in the paper. We don't have more or less trouble than anyone else."Incidents occur because of "a few bad apples," Barfield said, adding that 98 percent of the club's clients "are good people.""They don't cause any trouble," he said. "They dance, have a good time and go home.""We try to weed them out, but you can't read minds before something happens," Barfield said, noting those who cause trouble are thrown out of the club by security.Pit Stop Pub has five security personnel working on Friday nights and seven on Saturday nights, he said."We can't be everywhere at all times and see everything," he added.Barfield said Orangeburg's Williams & Williams Law firm will represent the defendants in the case. The law firm declined comment Friday.Witnesses at the club on Aug. 15 say the shooter was in a physical altercation with a group of men, according to an Orangeburg County Sheriff's Office incident report. The men jumped the person matching Gates’ description in the parking lot behind the Pit Stop Pub.That’s when Gates allegedly opened fire on the men who had jumped him, then drove away in a tan Saturn with dark-tinted windows and chrome-rimmed tires.Darby, who was fatally shot, was a bystander, witnesses said.The lawsuit points to alleged criminal activity including shootings, stabbings, assaults, excessive drinking and loitering at the club over the past year.Thus far, Jones has been the only one to file a lawsuit, Kazmierski said. However, he said the Darby family is also planning to file a lawsuit once their estate is established. Kazmierski said this process could take two months or more.According to the Orangeburg County Sheriff's Office, deputies responded to Pit Stop Pub an average of 1.3 times a month over the past 11 years and that number has increased to twice a month this year.Earlier this year, three men were charged in two separate assaults that took place during a fight at the nightclub. One person ended up in ICU after the altercation.A few days before the fatal shooting, two people suffered stab wounds at the club and one had a broken jaw.Johnathan Gore, who lives near the Pit Stop Pub, appeared before Orangeburg County Council once in June and again in August expressing his concerns about the club and his desire to have it shut down. Other concerned citizens have also spoken out against the club.County officials say they are reviewing various ordinances to help address the situation with the club.This story has been corrected to reflect Maurice Jones is not a former employee of the Pit Stop Pub.Contact the writer:gzaleski@timesanddemocrat.comor 803-533-5551. Follow Zaleski on Twitter @ZaleskiTD.Get local news delivered to your inbox!Staff WriterGene Zaleski is a reporter/staff writer with The Times and Democrat.
To get local news all the time, become a member at https://thetandd.com/members/join/Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WATCHVIDEOSA police vehicle is parked near the scene of a shooting in the 1700 block of East 10th Street on Monday, Aug. 11, 2015.(KABC)Detroit —Disputes between drug dealers are believed to be partially responsible for more than two dozen shootings in which three people were killed over the weekend, Detroit police said.From Friday through Sunday, gunfire wounded 26 people across the city, according to police.“Almost half of these cases, we believe, have a narcotics nexus,” Sgt. Cassandra Lewis said Monday afternoon.Lewis said investigators don’t believe any of the shootings are related to each other, despite the involvement of drugs in some of them.“We don’t have anything that connects these cases,” she said. “But there were several shootings with multiple victims.”From Sunday evening into Monday morning, police reported two fatal shootings and 15 nonfatal shootings.One of the fatal shootings occurred around 8:40 p.m. Sunday at West McNichols and Parkside on the city’s west side.“Witnesses reported that they heard shots and observed the suspect running in an alley,” Officer Nicole Kirkwood said. “The suspect is a black male, about 5-foot-8, with short hair, wearing a green shirt and blue jeans.”The victim was transported to a local hospital where he was pronounced dead, Kirkwood said.According toWDIV-TV(Channel 4), the 51-year-old was shot after an argument inside a liquor store at West McNichols and Wildemere. The suspect forced the victim at gunpoint into the victim’s vehicle, police said. The victim began to drive but was shot about a block away while attempting to escape.The suspect ran eastbound, according to the report. Police are investigating with help from eyewitnesses and surveillance video from inside the liquor store.About two hours later, a 25-year-old man was killed at 10:50 p.m. on the 15200 block of Hazelridge near Kelly on the city’s east side, Kirkwood said.Three other male victims, ages 24, 25, and 41, were wounded in the shooting.Further details about the incident are unclear as police continue to investigate, Kirkwood said.Police confirmed the two fatalities were a small fraction of the shootings that occurred late Sunday into early Monday morning.Four other overnight incidents left eight people wounded, police said.A 15-year-old girl was shot in a drive-by around 11:20 p.m. on the 15000 block of Manor, Officer Dan Donakowski said. She was standing outside when an unknown suspect opened fire from inside a dark-colored vehicle, possibly a Dodge Caravan.Ten minutes later, two women were shot at 11:30 p.m. on the 300 block of Rosedale, Donakowski said. The women, ages 26 and 25, heard the gunshots and felt pain while standing on a porch.Two men, ages 28 and 25, were shot around 12:30 a.m. on Yacama near Remington, Donakowski said.“Unknown suspects pulled up in a dark-blue minivan, and the sliding door on the passenger side opened up,” he said. “Someone inside started firing shots.”The 28-year-old victim was in temporary-serious condition and the 25-year-old victim was stable Monday.About a half-hour later, three people were shot at 1:05 a.m. on the 2000 block of Cadillac, Donakowski said. The 19-year-old man, 38-year-old woman and 21-year-old woman were standing outside when they were wounded.Two vehicles may have been involved in the Cadillac shooting, including a Chevy Trailblazer. The three victims were in temporary-serious condition.Details about at least four additional people shot overnight were not immediately available.HFournier@detroitnews.com(313) 223-4616@HollyPFournierSign inorSubscribeSee OffersJody Herring was seeking revenge after losing custody of her 9-year-old daughter in 2015.BARRE, Vt. — A Vermont woman who shot and killed a state social worker and three of her own relatives as revenge for losing custody of her then 9-year-old daughter was sentenced Wednesday to life without parole.Vermont Superior Court Judge John Pacht announced the sentence at the end of a three-day hearing for Jody Herring, 43.Herring shot and killed Lara Sobel, a social worker as she was leaving work at the state’s Department for Children and Families in Barre on Aug. 7, 2015. Police later discovered that she also had killed her two cousins, sisters Rhonda and Regina Herring, and an aunt, Julie Falzarano, in their Berlin home.The shootings rattled the small state, which has been among the safest states in the country, and led to fears among social workers, threats against them and changes in security measures at state office buildings.“The case had consequences far beyond the severe damage it has done to the four individuals who were killed and their extended families,” said Matthew Levine, an assistant state attorney general who helped prosecute the case.“By targeting Lara Sobel as a DCF worker at her place of employment, she was really assaulting the justice system as a whole,” he said.Relatives of those killed spoke of how the murders ripped their lives and families apart.Randy Herring, who lost his two sisters and mother, said doctors have told him he has depression and post-traumatic stress disorder.“My wife told me that she lost her husband because I can no longer feel happiness,” he said.Herring pleaded guilty in July to three counts of second-degree murder and one count of first-degree murder. Prosecutors say she has shown no remorse.Herring’s attorney, David Sleigh, had asked the judge for leniency because Herring has suffered a lifetime of abuse and had reached out unsuccessfully to state officials for help.Levine said the evidence didn’t support Sleigh’s argument.“The reality is that childhood abuse, substance abuse, mental health problems are all too common in our society, and while we should do everything we can to combat them, they don’t and shouldn’t justify, excuse or mitigate a planned brutal, savage, multiple murder,” he said.Herring spoke in court, saying she understands how it feels to lose a child because she has lost custody of three children.“I’m very sorry. I can’t take back that day,” Herring said.Success. Please wait for the page to reload. If the page does not reload within 5 seconds, please refresh the page.Enter your email and password to access comments.Forgot Password?Don't have a Talk profile?Create one.Hi{SUB NAME}, to comment on stories you mustcreate a commenting profile. This profile is in addition to your subscription and website login.Already have one?Login.Invalid username/password.Please check your email to confirm and complete your registration.Create a commenting profile by providing an email address, password and display name. You will receive an email to complete the registration. Please note the display name will appear on screen when you participate.Already registered?Log into join the discussion.Only subscribers are eligible to post comments. Pleasesubscribeorloginto participate in the conversation.Here’s why.Use the form below to reset your password. When you've submitted your account email, we will send an email with a reset code.Send questions/commentsto the editors.Alerts for major local, national and world news, plus local weather and traffic info, delivered to you.ST. LOUIS• Another violent night in St. Louis has claimed the lives of at least two men and injured eight other people in six shootings, police say.Just before 8 p.m. Tuesday, Quincy Hardy, 37, was fatally shot in the 4700 block of Greer Avenue, near Natural Bridge Avenue and North Kingshighway Boulevard, police said. Hardy, who lived in the 2400 block of Sharidge Drive in Jennings, was found lying unconscious in the street with a gunshot wound to his chest. He was pronounced dead at the crime scene. Police said Hardy had what detectives believe were drugs when he was found. Witnesses told police they heard gunfire and saw a black sport utility vehicle drive off.Three hours later, about 11:15 p.m., Dominique Young, 21, was fatally shot and four people wounded in a drive-by shooting in the 2500 block of Semple Avenue, the same block whereDorain Valentine, 23, of St. Louis, was killedin a shooting about 4:30 a.m. Sunday. Along with Young, two women, 40 and 27 years old, and two men, both 23, also were shot. The victims told police they were standing near a front porch when shots were fired from a passing four-door sedan. Police said the surviving victims were listed as "stable" at hospitals. It was not immediately clear if Tuesday's and Sunday's shootings were connected.Twenty minutes later, a man, 30 suffered a graze wound to his stomach as he was walking in the 3700 block of Ohio Avenue, police said. He refused medical treatment.At 1:25 a.m., a man, 62, was shot in the arm at Montclair and Etzel avenues. Police said the man and a 40-year-old woman were sitting in a vehicle when six men approached the vehicle, banging on the outside while one of them pointed a gun at the victims and demanded property. As the male victim backed up the car in an attempt to get away, the gunman fired shots, hitting the driver in the shoulder. The victims drove to a hospital seeking treatment. Police said he was "stable."Then a man, 43, was hit by gunfire in his right side in the 5200 block of Maple Avenue about 2:20 a.m. Police said he was in a vehicle when a gunman approached. The man feared being robbed and tried to drive off when the shooter fired multiple shots, hitting him in the chest, police said. The victims went to a gas station in the 900 block of Goodfellow Boulevard where someone called for help. The man was taken to a hospital where he was in critical but stable condition.About 4:40 a.m., a man was shot near West Florissant and Genevieve avenues. Police said arriving officers found the man, 34, suffering from gunshot wounds to his upper torso and thighs. Police said he was in critical and stable condition Wednesday night. Police had no suspects.The city has had at least 119 homicides so far this year, a more than 60 percent increase over the same time last year. The city is on pace to have 200 homicides this year.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Joel Currier is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch. Follow him on Twitter here: @joelcurrier.At least three fatal shootings have occurred in the 2500 block of Semple Avenue this year.At least three fatal shootings have occurred in the 2500 block of Semple Avenue this year.Track each of the homicides in the region.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A fourth arrest was made in a drive-by shooting in Brooklyn that left an unborn baby dead and the mother seriously injured.Ronald Williams, 22, was busted three weeks after Elijah Wells, Quamari McAllister and Marquise Frederickswere arrested for allegedly shooting five people at the Red Hook Houseson Aug. 3.One of the victims of the Dwight St. shooting was Special-Caijae Houston, who was five months pregnant and is still in the hospital, officials said.Williams was ordered held without bail Monday for a laundry list of charges including attempted murder.All four have pleaded not guilty.If convicted, they each face up to 25 years in prison.WATCHVIDEOSBrooklyn Borough President launches 'Take Five to Stay Alive' campaignSeven people were shot — all of them in the leg — in a single incident overnight on Baltimore's west side, police said early Sunday.Police responded to an area hospital at 2:26 a.m. Sunday, where five people walked in with gunshot wounds. Shortly thereafter, officers encountered two additional victims from the same incident — which police said transpired in the 2700 block of Garrison Avenue in the Central Park Heights neighborhood.All seven victims suffered gunshot wounds to their legs, and were listed in stable condition, police said.The victims included 20- and 23-year-old women, and men ranging in ages from 22 to 25.Northwest District detectives are investigating and anyone with information may call 410-396-2466.The shootings transpired amid a violent two-hour span in Baltimore in which 10 people were shot and one man was killed.The homicide was the second of the first weekend in August after45 people were killed in July— equaling the most in a given monthin at least four decades.sjwelsh@baltsun.comTwitter.com/seanjwelshEditor's note:This story has been updated from an earlier version, which — based upon information from Baltimore police — misstated the block in which the shooting occurred.RecommendedThree men have died and at least 12 other people have been wounded in separate shootings since Saturday afternoon across the city, police said.A 21-year-old man and a 31-year-old man were shot early Sunday along the lakefront on the South Side and one of them died. The younger man was pronounced dead at 9:40 a.m. at Northwestern Memorial Hospital, according to the Cook County medical examiner's office.He was later identified by the Cook County medical examiner's office as Vaughn King, Jr., of the 1000 block of North Milwaukee Avenue in Chicago (updated on 8-10-2015).The men were critically wounded in a shooting about 3:15 a.m. Sunday in the Oakland community area on the South Side, said Officer Ronald Gaines, a spokesman for the Chicago Police Department. They were sitting on the lakefront in the 4300 block of South Lake Shore Drive when two gunmen walked up to them and fired gunshots, Gaines said.The 31-year-old was hit four times in the stomach and once in the arm and was taken to Stroger Hospital. The 21-year-old was wounded in the abdomen and was taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital. Both were initially listed in critical condition.Another fatal shooting occurred about 5 a.m. Sunday in the 11700 block of South LaSalle Street in the city's West Pullman neighborhood, according to Officer Janel Sedevic, a spokeswoman for the Chicago Police.The 20-year-old victim was found unresponsive in an alley with multiple gunshot wounds to the back, according to Sedevic. The man was dead on the scene, according to the medical examiner's office.He was later identified as Chris Green, of the 12000 block of South Parnell Avenue in Chicago, according to the Cook County medical examiner's office. (updated on 8-10-2015).Area South detectives are investigating.Separately, a 22-year-old man was shot to death and four other people were hurt in a shooting at a house party at 1:03 a.m. Sunday in the North Austin neighborhood on the West Side, Gaines said.All five men were at a house party outside with several other people in the 4800 block of West Kamerling Avenue when two male attackers walked up and fired shots into the crowd, police said.A 22-year-old man was shot in the head and was pronounced dead at the scene, Gaines said. He was later identified by the Cook County medical examiner's office as Spencer Stewart, of the 3600 block of West 80th Street in Chicago (updated on 8-10-2015).A 22-year-old man was struck in the back and chest and was taken in critical condition to Mount Sinai Hospital, Gaines said.A 20-year-old man was shot in the stomach and was also taken to Mount Sinai, where his condition stabilized.A 19-year-old woman was shot in the thigh and was taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition, police said.A 24-year-old man was grazed in the arm and was treated and released by paramedics at the scene, Gaines said.Nobody was in custody as a result of the shooting, and police were still investigating.Police officers cordoned off about a half-block of Kamerling Avenue with yellow tape.The body of the 22-year-old man who was killed lay in the front yard of a one-story home.Minutes after the shooting, dozens of partygoers and neighbors gathered on both sides of the crime scene at the street, which is lined with red brick bungalows on both sides.Kiera Robinson, 18, said she and her three friends just arrived at the house party and were walking through a crowd of people outside when two gunmen walked out of a gangway across from the house and fired shots."I just stared and stood there for a minute," said Robinson, adding that she heard about 10 gunshots. "I didn't know what to do."Once gunfire erupted, chaos ensued and people started running away, she said.Robinson, who lives in the Englewood neighborhood on the South Side, said she has witnessed shootings before. But the shooting early Sunday was the first time she saw someone die in front of her."I just want to get outta (Chicago)," Robinson said.Neighbor Ozzy Rendon, 23, said he was talking to his girlfriend on the front porch of his home when he heard about eight gunshots.Rendon, who grew up in Humboldt Park, said he moved to the neighborhood about three months ago with his family because of the affordable housing prices."I'm used to (the shootings)," Rendon said as he stood outside his home early Sunday morning. "It's another night in Chicago."At least nine were wounded in other shootings since Saturday afternoon.• A 17-year-old male was wounded around 5 a.m. Sunday in the Englewood neighborhood on the South Side, police said. The teenager was standing on a corner in the 4300 block of South Wells Street when he heard gunshots and realized he was struck in the groin, police said. He was taken to St. Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center, where his condition stabilized.The teen is being uncooperative with the police, and no other information was available about the shooting.• About midnight, a 31-year-old woman was wounded in a shooting in the Washington Park neighborhood on the South Side, Gaines said. The woman was outside in the 5200 block of South Calumet Avenue when she heard gunshots and noticed a cut behind her ear, Gaines said. The woman suffered a graze wound and was treated and released by paramedics on the scene.• Around 9:55 p.m. Saturday, a 25-year-old woman was critically hurt after getting shot in the South Austin neighborhood on the West Side, Gaines said. The woman was driving a car in the 5200 block of West Adams Street when she heard gunshots and realized she was struck in the neck, Gaines said. She was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in critical condition, Gaines said.• About 9:30 p.m. Saturday, a 48-year-old woman walked into Weiss Memorial Hospital after getting shot in the Uptown neighborhood on the North Side, Gaines said. The woman was shot in the abdomen in the 5000 block of North Kenmore Avenue.She was transferred to Advocate Illinois Masonic Medical Center, where her condition stabilized, Gaines said.No other information about the shooting was immediately available.In that same neighborhood about 24 hours earlier about 4:20 a.m. Friday, a 21-year-old man was seriously hurt after getting shot in the backon the same block of North Kenmore Avenue,police said.• Around 8:30 p.m. Saturday, a 20-year-old man was shot in the shoulder and chest while he was outside in the 7700 block of South Chappel Avenue in the South Shore neighborhood, police said. The man was listed in serious-but-stable condition at Stroger Hospital, Gaines said.• Around 6:40 p.m. Saturday, a 28-year-old man was shot in the leg in the Burnside neighborhood on the South Side, Gaines said. The man was in the 8800 block of South Cottage Grove Avenue when he was shot. He was taken to Jackson Park Hospital and Medical Center, where his condition stabilized, Gaines said.• An 18-year-old man was shot in the hand about 3:05 p.m. Saturday in the 400 block of North Lawler Avenue, police said. The man went on his own to West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Park, where he was in good condition. The man told police he was walking in the area when he heard shots and felt pain, police said.No one was immediately in custody as a result of the shootings, and police were investigating.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneP.O. Box 8086Savannah GA 31412(912) 234-1111A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.At least 15 people were shot, including a 5-year-old girl and a 7-year-old boy, in shootings across Chicago between Sunday afternoon and early Monday morning, according to police.The largest single shooting incident Sunday evening occurred in the West Englewood neighborhood on the South Side when four men were shot in the 6700 block of South Winchester Avenue, accroding to Officer Ron Gaines, a police spokesman. At 9:50 p.m., someone approached them, fired shots, and fled, said Gaines.A 25-year-old man was shot in the buttocks and taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center; a 25-year-old man was shot in the back and taken to Stroger Hospital; a 19-year-old man was shot in the leg, arm and finger and taken to Stroger; and a 24-year-old man was shot in the back, buttock, leg and finger and taken to Christ. All their conditions had stabilized except for the 25-year-old taken to Stroger, whose condition was unknown, police said.A strong wind swept through the cul-de-sac where they were shot Sunday night, whipping crime scene tape back and forth and muffling the voices of neighbors who had gathered on their porches and stoops.Ten people and a small dog were clustered on a porch right next to the scene. One woman tried to calm a crying baby by pointing out the flashing lights on parked police cars."Look at the blue lights? See the blue lights?" she said.In other shootings:•  At 1:40 a.m. Monday, a 20-year-old man was shot, also in West Englewood neighborhood, Gaines said. He was in the 6300 block of South Bell Avenue when he was shot in the leg, said Gaines, who did not immediately have information on the circumstances of the shooting. The man was transported to Holy Cross Hospital, where his condition was stabilized.• At 9:30 p.m. Sunday, a 19-year-old man was shot in the Cabrini Green neighborhood on the Near North Side, Gaines said. He was out in the 800 block of North Hudson Avenue when a white vehicle pulled up and someone inside began firing shots, said Gaines. The man began running away when he realized he had been shot in the hip. He was taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital, where his condition stabilized.• A 7-year-old boy and a 19-year-old man told police they were shot at about 8:45 p.m. Sunday in the Belmont Central neighborhood on the Northwest Side, Gaines said. They were inside a vehicle near the 2500 block of North Parkside Avenue when a gray vehicle approached and someone inside fired shots, Gaines said. The boy was shot in the shoulder and the man had a graze wound to the head. They took themselves to Community First Medical Center.• A 5-year-old girl was shot in the leg about 8:40 p.m. Sunday in the 5600 block of South Bishop Street in the city's Englewood neighborhood on the South Side, Gaines said. Police initially said the girl was 7 years old. She was shot during a fight between two other people, one of whom pulled a gun and began shooting, then fled in a white SUV. The girl was hit in the leg and taken to University of Chicago Comer Children's Hospital in serious condition.• Earlier, two women and a man were shot about 7:55 p.m. Sunday in the 8300 block of South Brandon Avenue in The Bush neighborhood on the South Side, said Officer Thomas Sweeney, a Chicago police spokesman. A 34-year-old woman was shot in the back and taken to Northwestern Memorial; a 39-year-old woman was shot in the leg and buttocks and taken to Stroger; and a 26-year-old man was shot in the abdomen and taken to Christ, said Gaines.• A 16-year-old boy was shot in the foot and a 23-year-old man was shot in the leg when someone inside a passing vehicle fired shots about 7:15 p.m. Sunday in the 200 block of West 108th Street in the Roseland neighborhood on the Far South Side, said Sweeney. The two got themselves to Roseland Community Hospital, where they were in good condition, Sweeney said.• A 17-year-old boy was shot about 4 p.m. Sunday in the 600 block of East Pershing Road in the Ida B. Wells / Darrow Homes neighborhood on the South Side. The boy suffered a wound to his leg and was taken to Northwestern Memorial, where he was listed in good condition, Sweeney said. Police said the victim was uncooperative and the shooting may have been gang-related.No one was in custody, and police were investigating.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneWhen Gloria Perez returned home from doing laundry Saturday night, she saw her 10-year-old grandson running toward her car while screaming and covering his bleeding left eye.The boy, Victor Hernandez, had been hit by a stray bullet about 7:30 p.m. while looking out of his bedroom window at a fight outside his residence at Pacifico Place Apartments on Shenandoah Way in east Orlando.He was rushed to Arnold Palmer Hospital for Children with likely permanent damage to his left eye.Meanwhile, three others showed up at a local hospital with gunshot wounds about 15 minutes later.The three were identified as a 17-year-old boy, Louis Suarez, 21, and Diego Hernandez, whose age wasn't released by police.A police update Monday included surveillance photos "of interest" of the vehicles in the parking lot at the time of the shooting.One of the wounded victims didn't cooperate with detectives. While another said he heard a verbal altercation and gunfire before realizing he was shot.The 17-year-old boy was arrested Sunday on a warrant, a police spokeswoman said, but the charges weren't immediately available.Additional details emerged Monday in the police report.Perez declined comment Monday. But her account, along with other witnesses, were included in the report. The incident happened about 7:30 p.m., according to police, when a fight broke out in the parking lot of Pacifico Place Apartments — near Semoran Boulevard and Lake Underhill Road.Witnesses said they heard between seven and 15 gunshots.One witness looked out of her window and saw a man hop the fence in front of her home on nearby Diego Street to get to an apartment complex beside hers. She eventually lost sight of him but later saw two vehicles speed away from the area.Another witness was sitting in a vehicle on nearby Pablo Lane — waiting for her mother to come downstairs — when she heard shots.She then heard a man say, "Let's go! Let's go! I got it!" The man, who was limping, jumped inside a vehicle and sped away. Police found several vehicles with bulletholes. There was one gunshot through the window of the 10-year-old boy's bedroom."I could see blood trails all along the hallways and in the parking lots," an officer said in the report.twalden@tribpub.comRecommendedSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A 12-year-old boy remained in critical condition Friday after a shooting that also injured three other people on Brushton Avenue in Homewood North.Zaire Thomas was shot in the back and the leg Thursday night, his mother told Pittsburgh's Action News 4. A bullet pierced the boy's liver and his spleen, which was removed in surgery, she said.VIDEO:Watch Sheldon Ingram's reportA person who heard the gunfire told Pittsburgh's Action News 4 that he rushed over to help Zaire as the boy was driven to the hospital in a private vehicle."I heard the shots outside and I heard a lot of screaming," said the man, who did not want to be identified. "I saw a little boy on the ground, and we rushed him to the hospital and I put pressure on the wound. He said, 'I'm OK, just get me to the hospital.'""A 12-year-old gets shot? When is the violence going to stop?" the man said, adding that he hears gunshots "every other day" in the area.Zaire's mother said a small group of people was standing near her house and talking when the gunman walked by and started firing. She said they did not recognize him. A Pittsburgh Public Safety spokeswoman said the shooter wore all black clothing.Authorities said a female victim also suffered a gunshot wound. Two other victims were grazed and also went to the hospital.No arrests have been made.PHOTOS:Allegheny County's 20 most wanted fugitivesHearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.New Orleans police said a man with an assault rifle opened fire on a group of people at Samson Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets around 6:20 p.m. Sunday (July 26, 2015), leaving at least one man critically wounded.A man armed with an assault rifle opened fire at a crowded park in Desire Sunday (July 26), shooting at least four people, including a man left critically wounded, New Orleans police said.Theattack came around 6:20 p.m., when Edith Sampson Playground Park at the corner of Piety and Treasure streets was crowded with family gatherings and several children were playing inside two inflatable "space walkers," witnesses said."I was scared for my life," said one woman, who asked that her name be withheld for fear of retaliation. "All those children was out there. I just got down and was saying, 'Everybody lay on the ground!' It was sad."One man, described as about 28 to 30 years old, was gravely wounded in the attack, suffering multiple gunshot wounds to his chest and side, police said. He was transported by New Orleans EMS ambulance to Interim LSU Hospital in critical condition, NOPD spokesman Officer Frank Robertson said."He was covered in so much blood, I honestly couldn't even see the entry wounds," said one man who came to his aid until rescuers arrived. "He lost a lot of blood. And he's not a large fella."The man, who also declined to give his name, said the victim was "gagging for air" as blood from his wounds appeared to flow into his lungs. Police did not have an immediate update on the wounded man's condition."It was terrifying for the children," the man said. "They was all crying to be taken home."Another man and two women also suffered gunshot wounds, but were transported to Tulane Medical Center in private vehicles. Police said their injuries did not appear to be life-threatening. The older of the two women, who is believed to be in her mid-50s, was shot in the arm, according to the woman who asked that her name be withheld.A fifth person also was reportedly hurt, but NOPD 5th District Cmdr. Christopher Goodly said investigators were waiting to learn if the injury was from a gunshot or some other cause in the chaotic attempt to find safety.Goodly said the shooter entered the park at the corner of Treasure and Piety, emerging from the front passenger seat of a black sedan, believed to be an Acura TL with darkly tinted windows and a rear spoiler. The suspect was described as having long dreadlocks and was last seen wearing a white tank top and khaki-colored shorts or pants.After firing several shots, the gunman retreated to the car and escaped eastbound on Treasure Street, Goodly said. At least two suspects, including the shooter, were believed to be in the car, he said.Goodly said Housing Authority of New Orleans (HANO) police were nearby and responded immediately to the scene. NOPD and New Orleans EMS responders quickly followed, he said.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?HOPEWELL, VA (WWBT) - Hopewell Police arrested a man they say fired a shotgun that injured four people.William Timothy Faust, 24, is charged with aggravated malicious wounding, use of a firearm in the commission of a felony and brandishing a firearm.According to police, the shooting happened in the 500 block of N. 7th Ave. around 12:36 a.m.on July 25. Four people were struck by pellets from the shotgun. All four victims were treated at local hospitals for non-life threatening injuries.The victims originally said a car pulled up to the intersection and an unknown person fired a single shotgun blast from inside the vehicle. However, police say this was fabricated by the victims - Faust knew the victims, and he retrieved a shotgun from the vehicle and shot the victims after an argument.Copyright 2015WWBTNBC12. All rights reservedReport an ErrororSubmit a Tip to NBC125710 Midlothian TurnpikeRichmond, VA 23225(804) 230-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.ERIE, Pa. (AP) — One man has been convicted of first-degree murder and another was acquitted in the 2015 shooting death of a teenager in Pennsylvania.The Erie Times-News reports that jurors deliberated for nearly seven hours before convicting 20-year-old Keshawn McLaurin and acquitting 21-year-old Demond Mitchell on Friday.TRENDING NOW:A judge acquitted 20-year-old Jahaun Jones and 22-year-old Stephen Russell on Thursday after a prosecution witness failed to appear.All were charged in the July 2015 death of 16-year-old Shakur Franklin, who was killed by gunfire from a sport utility vehicle driving through an Erie party. Four other people were wounded. Another teen was killed in a separate shooting.Three defendants said they weren't at the scene. McLaurin's lawyer acknowledged that his client was there but said he had nothing to do with the shooting.5:20 p.m.At a press conference at 5:15 p.m. Friday, Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft said shooter John Russell Houser exited the Grand Theatre through a side door after shooting several people.When he saw a police unit pull into the parking lot, Houser re-entered the theater and fired three more rounds, then a fourth, that took his own life, Craft said.Fifteen shell casings were recovered in various parts of the theater, he said."That was an horrific scene," Col. Mike Edmonson, Louisiana State Police, said.Houser purchased a 40-caliber semi-automatic handgun at a Phenix City, Alabama, pawn shop in February 2014, Craft said.It's still unclear why Houser was in Lafayette. Craft said he entered Louisiana around July 2 or 3 and visited various locations up and down the interstate."He was out and about. We know he was doing some drinking," Craft said. "He was circulating while he was here."Houser appears to have visited Lafayette more than once, possibly looking for 'a soft target," he said.Five people shot by Houser inside the theater remain hospitalized, Craft said. Four have been treated and released.2 p.m.Three shooting victimsremained hospitalizedat Lafayette General Medical Center on Friday, but officials said all three are in stable condition and expected to be released in a few days.The hospital received five patients from the scene of the shooting Thursday night, said David Callecod, president of Lafayette General Health. Three of the patients were transported by ambulance, while two were brought via private vehicle.Callecod said all five victims had sustained gunshot wounds. Three were classified as Level One trauma patients, while one was a Level Two trauma patient.12:18 p.m.Grand Theater headquarters released this statement following last night's shooting:“All of us offer our thoughts and prayers to the victims and to the community of Lafayette. We are grateful to all local officials and to the governor for their efforts.”Grand Theater is one of three brands operated by Southern Theaters, LLC, based in New Orleans.11:42 a.m.ReporterSeth Dickersonis out on the street talking to Lafayette residents who are shocked and saddened but strongly believe their community will unite in this tragedy."It was tragic. Just to stand up and shoot people, he must have had a mental illness. It was horrific," said Leon Simmons. "I'm hurt. We're a very resilient community. We'll get through this, but we'll have to get through the grieving first."Nurse Ashley Brinkhaus said the shooting was crazy."It hurts to the depths of my soul to know this happened in our own backyard," she said. "We raise our kids here."Resident Alex Thibodeaux had only one thing to say about the suspect."(Houser) was a coward," he said.10:40 a.m.John Russel Houser, the alleged theater shooter, had been accused of arson and damaging a rental home, had a history of mental illness and was denied a gun permit, according to Russell County, Alabama, Sheriff Heath Taylor.The Associated Press is reporting that Houser’s wife removed guns from their home in 2008 because of his mental state.Taylor said Houser was treated at a local mental health facility between 2008 and 2009, but he does not know details.In 2006, Houser applied for a concealed carry gun permit but was denied because of an arson arrest in Columbus, Georgia, from around 1989 or 1990, Taylor said. He believes the charge was dismissed.The last known address Taylor has for Houser was the 1100 block of 32nd Street in Phenix City, Alabama.“We evicted him from that address on March 25, 2014,” he said. “Once we evicted him he apparently did some damage to the property.”The property owners filed a report claiming Houser damaged a gas line, fireplace and other smaller things, Taylor said.On Houser’s Linked-In page he identifies himself as an entrepreneur and investment management in Phenix City, Alabama, who attended Faulkner University, a private Christian university in Montgomery, Alabama.“We’re praying for everybody down there,” he said. “It’s another crazy tragedy that we’re having to deal with. Everybody up here’s keeping y’all in our prayers.”Houser is also known as Rusty Houser, and apparently has a presence on social media as an outspoken conservative.The last thing someone posting as Rusty Houser posted on Facebook was in 2013, when he linked to an article called "A woman's place in the church and the weak church elder," according to KATC-TV.He wrote, "The bible doesn't ask me to like what it says, only to obey it. Death comes soon to the financially failing filth farm called the US."He only had two things liked on Facebook, among them "I hate liberals!"8:20 a.m.Lafayette City-Parish President Joey Durel said this morning that this community, recently identified as "the happiest" in the country, will pull together and recover from Thursday night'sshooting at the Lafayette Grand theateron Johnson Street.Three died in the incident, including shooter John Russel Houser, 59, described as a drifter from Alabama who was staying at a hotel on University Boulevard.Durel returned to Lafayette this morning from out of state. Police met him at the airport and drove him to the Lafayette Grand, where he joined Gov. Bobby Jindal, Col. Mike Edmonson of the Louisiana State Police and Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft at a news conference.Speaking to reporters from around the region and country, Durel described Lafayette to them as a "family oriented community" that extends beyond the city's proper borders and across Acadiana, an eight-parish region.8:10 a.m.Col. Mike Edmonson of the Louisiana State Police said he was at a loss as to why John Russel Houser, 59, the identified shooter at the Grand 16 movie theater in Lafayette, opened fire on patrons around him at 7:30 p.m. Thursday."It's easy to speculate," Edmonson said. "Why did he come here? Why did he do that?"But Edmonson said police were continuing their investigation in the shooting, and motive has not been made clear."There are a lot of moving parts to bring together," he said.8 a.m.The identified killer in Thursday night's shooting at the Grand 16 movie theater in Lafayette had apparent plans to shoot, then leave the scene, officials said in a news conference this morning.John Russel Houser, 59, of Phenix City, Ala., had parked his vehicle, a 1995 Lincoln Continental, near an exit from the theater and was apparently attempted to flee when police arrived at the scene, perhaps within a minute of the shooting. Their quick response forced the gunman back inside the theater, where he took his own life, Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft said.Craft suggested that the quick response may have saved other lives.He said very little is known of Houser, and he urged anyone with knowledge of him to contact authorities at 337-291-8650, a line set up to gather information about the shooting. He said authorities believe Houser was operating alone.Craft said investigators had "worked through the night" at the Johnson Street theater, which he described as "a pretty horrific scene."They recovered a variety of materials and items, some personal property of people who fled the theater.7:45 a.m.The shooter in Thursday night's shooting at the Grand 16 Lafayette movie theater has been identified as John Russel Houser, 59, of Alabama, according to Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft.Craft also identified the deceased victims asMayci Breaux and Jillian Johnson. Breaux died on the scene and Johnson died at the hospital. Breaux, 21, was from Franklin. Johnson, 33, was from Lafayette.One victim was still listed in critical condition Friday morning, Craft said. Two victims have been released from the hospital.Craft described Houser as a "drifter" from Phenix City, Alabama. He had been estranged from his family, he said. Police are still searching for a motive. During a search of Houser's room in Motel 6 on University Avenue, police found wigs and other items that could be used as disguises, Craft said. His car was parked near a theater exit and police believe his intent was to escape after the shooting. Craft said he spotted police approaching him in the theater and decided to take his own life.An emotional Craft said it's frustrating not knowing the shooter's motive. "Why would you come here and do something like this?" he asked during a news conference Friday morning.Other updates from overnight:5:15 a.m.About a dozen law enforcement personnel were gathered at a Motel 6 in Lafayette early Friday as authorities investigate the shooting that killed three people, including the gunman.Louisiana State Police spokesman Maj. Doug Cain said the theater investigation led them to a room at the Motel 6. Cain said authorities were investigating whether the shooter had stayed there. He said the bomb squad swept the room before going in as a precaution.About a dozen police personnel could be seen outside the motel. At one point, an officer carried out a cardboard box from the room and other officers could be seen knocking on neighboring doors.___3:50 a.m.The White House says President Barack Obama has been briefed on the shooting at a Louisiana movie theater that left three people dead, including the gunman.Obama was briefed aboard Air Force One on Thursday by Lisa Monaco, his homeland security adviser, while on his way to Africa for a two-nation visit.Obama asked his team to keep him updated on the investigation and the status of those wounded in the shooting.He also offered his thoughts and prayers to the community of Lafayette, Louisiana, where the movie theater is located, and to the families of those who were killed.___3:30 a.m.Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft told reporters that nine people in total were wounded in the shooting.He said at least one of those was in critical condition and being operated on at an area hospital."At this point we have three dead, nine wounded and of the three dead one is definitely the shooter," he said.___2:30 a.m.Lafayette Police Chief Jim Craft told reporters that based on the investigation so far, they believe the shooter stood up in the theater, started shooting, and then as people started fleeing, he began to leave as well.But, investigators believe, he spotted two police officers, who had been out in the parking lot when the shooting happened. The shooter then turned around against the crowd before firing a single shot."It looks like he spotted the officers coming in and he turned around and he went against the crowd, and he fired a single gunshot," he said. "He was seated in the theater just like everybody else.""The information we have at this time indicates that he was by himself, sat by himself and the first two people he shot were sitting right in front of him," Craft said.Read the original storyhere.ST. LOUIS   •Homicide detectives are investigating a suspicious death in the Midtown neighborhood of St. Louis.Police say family members found Garrett Weddle, 51, lying unconscious on the floor, where he lived at the 300 block of South Grand Boulevard around 6 p.m. Wednesday. They had been unable to reach him by phone.First responders pronounced him dead on the scene.The investigation is ongoing and police are awaiting autopsy results.There were also several non-fatal shootings Wednesday afternoon and evening in the Gate District, Gravois Park, Walnut Park East and Greater Ville neighborhoods. The latter incident involved six victims who were injured from shots fired from a silver Dodge Ram around 4 p.m. on Fair and Ashland avenues. Two suspects in that shooting were arrested at a home, where police also found heroin and three guns.Police are investigating all of the shootings. So far there have been no arrests. Six victims went to the hospital in all. Each was listed as stable Thursday, though their specific conditions were not available.EDITOR'S NOTE:An earlier version of this story gave an incorrect neighborhood for the suspicious death incident. This version has been corrected.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Jennifer S. Mann is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Seven people were killed in weekend violence in the city, bringing the unofficial homicide toll for the year to 105.Seven people were killed in weekend violence in the city, bringing the unofficial homicide toll for the year to 105.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByNatasha VelezandChris PerezSubmitJuly 20, 2015|9:11amDavid TorresDavid TorresDemetrius LoadholtDemetrius LoadholtDemetrius LoadholtDemetrius LoadholtDavid TorresDavid TorresView SlideshowSix men were shot at a late-night party inside a Bronx park when an argument broke out between two groups, cops said.The two sides were separately gathered in Franz Siegel Park in Concourse Village when a dispute broke out at around midnight near East 153rd Street and the Grand Concourse, according to police.As the argument escalated, police believe Amidu Sall, 20, pulled a pistol and pumped six bullets into the legs, arms and feet of a small group of men, ages ranging from 14 to 20, according to law-enforcement sources.Six people were shot in the hail of gunfire — and all of them managed to go to nearby hospitals, police said.Sall was spotted running from the scene and was later taken into custody as a person of interest, sources said.He has not yet been charged.Sall has a lengthy criminal record, with 10 prior arrests, including for robbery, assault and drug possession.Four of the victims who were shot have also had several run-ins with the law in the past, sources said.Read NextDriver rammed man with car after argument: copsShare SelectionThis story has been shared 158,176 times.158,176This story has been shared 61,566 times.61,566This story has been shared 61,538 times.61,538© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationWATCHVIDEOSInfant seriously injured in shooting on Highway 64SAN DIEGO (CBS 8) - Police are searching for a man who shot four men in Logan Heights Saturday night from his car.The incident happened around 7:15 p.m. Saturday night in the200-block of South Bancroft Street.Officers say a group of men were approached by a vehicle and someone inside the vehicle asked if they had any marijuana. At one point, police say a man in the vehicle fired several shots at the group. Two men were hit in the torso, one was hit in the neck, and another man was hit in the head.All four were taken to area hospitals with non-life threatening injuries. The car is described as a tan or gold colored late model Ford Taurus. The shooter was described as black, 5 feet 4 inches, 235 pounds and wearing a Chargers hoodie.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Five people were shot, including one who suffered critical injuries, in the West Garfield Park neighborhood Friday evening.The shooting incident happened just after 5 p.m. in the 4400 block of W. Maypole, according to Chicago Police News Affairs.One victim was transported to Mount Sinai Hospital with life-threatening injuries to the back, police said. The others suffered gunshot wounds to the hand, elbow and leg.Police did not release further information on the victims or their conditions.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Police are investigating a quadruple shooting in Westwood.The shooting happened on the front porch of a home in the 3100 block of Sunshine Avenue shortly after 8 p.m. Friday.Investigators said it started at a party of about 20 people at the home on Sunshine Avenue.Watch this storyPolice said the four victims were out on the front porch when two people started shooting at them from around the corner.Police said a 15-year-old girl, two women and a man were shot. Officials said the teen was taken to Children's Hospital in serious but stable condition. Her mother was also taken to UC Medical Center in serious but stable condition. The other female and man were shot in the arms and legs. They are expected to be OK, officials said.Detectives are processing multiple shell casings at the scene and police believe the victims may know the shooters.There were several witnesses at the time of the shooting and many are cooperating with police.Anyone with information is asked to call CrimeStoppers at 513-352-3040.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.A spate of shootings Friday night and early Saturday in the District left three men dead and three others injured, outbursts of violence that police are investigating as separate and unrelated cases.D.C. police said there were several other shootings overnight but are uncertain of the motives. The three fatal shootings happened in three quadrants over several hours.Bryan Perkins, 18, of Northeast was killed about 9 p.m. Friday on Edgewood Street NE, in the Edgewood neighborhood. Just before 1 a.m., Wesley West, 25, of Southeast was shot on 13th Place SE in Congress Heights, and about 2 a.m., Charles Douglas, 33, of District Heights was killed on Riggs Street NW, about halfway between Logan Circle and U Street NW.Three other men were shot and wounded where Perkins was killed and were taken to a hospital. Police did not have updated information on their conditions Saturday afternoon.The violent night came during an increase in the city’s homicides. As of the end of June,homicides were up 20 percent in the Districtcompared with the same time period last year. About 30 people were killed in the District between May and the end of June.[Homicides up 20 percent in D.C. this year, with nearly 30 killed since May 1]The number of homicides is on track to surpass that of recent years. In 2014, 105 people were killed in the city. The 2013 count was similar — 104, which included the 12 victims of the Washington Navy Yard shootings. The District had a 40-year low in 2012, when 88 people were killed.D.C. Council member Kenyan R. McDuffie (D-Ward 5) called the slew of shootings a result of senseless violence.“The recent spike in crime in our city is unacceptable,” McDuffie said in a statement. “Let us come together as a community to stem the tide so we no longer have to wake up to news like this.”Perkins, who lived in Edgewood, graduated from Eastern High School this year and had been on its football team. Friends and family said he was planning to attend college in the fall and hoped to start a fashion business, having launched a clothing line in high school.“He cared about everyone. He was respectful, well-mannered, funny,” said Passion Perkins, a cousin. “Just happy, all around. Just happy.”Kourtni Stewart, also one of Perkins’s cousins, described him as goofy but dedicated to the fashion industry. Stewart said he had created a pair of shoes in collaboration with Adidas, mixing pink, purple and green snakeskin and sporting gold stripes.“He loved fashion,” Stewart said. “He loved to look good. . . . He loved labels. Whatever was fly to him, that was his style.”Perkins was with a friend outside his mother’s house, talking on the phone to his girlfriend. She called 911 when the connection dropped, Stewart said.“You can’t even go outside and walk your dogs without looking behind your back,” Stewart said.This was not the first time Perkins’s family has had to cope with violent tragedy close to home. His older brother, Dezmine,was fatally shot in 2010a block from where Perkins was slain. Dezmine Perkins was 16.“I wouldn’t even say they were at the wrong place at the wrong time — they weren’t,” Stewart said. “This is where they live; this is where their moms live.”Stewart said that the Perkins brothers, as well as the three others shot in Edgewood, were not the type to be involved in violence. “That was the most unexpected thing ever,” Stewart said. “These are not street guys. They don’t sell drugs or get locked up. These are young boys that went to school, helped older people with their groceries and had manners.”McDuffie said that too many families in the District have been enduring multiple tragedies but that the violent crimes are not raising the kind of alarms they should because of their increasing volume. “When you grow up in the District, you need to know that this kind of violence is not a normal part of life,” McDuffie said in an interview.Council member Jack Evans (D-Ward 2) said in a statement that Douglas was sitting in his car when he was shot on Riggs Street.“We have worked too hard for too long to combat the terrible crime that once plagued our city,” Evans said.The community where Douglas was shot had hosted a meeting July 9 to talk about crime. A similar meeting is scheduled for the night of July 30 at New Samaritan Baptist Church on Florida Avenue NE.[From the archives: Teens who left trouble behind get recognition and a reminder]West, who was killed in Southeast, had at one point worked with the nonprofit group ­Peaceoholics to help curb violence in his neighborhood of Congress Park.In 2007, West, then 17, told The Washington Postthat after running into trouble at Ballou Senior High School, he worked to straighten himself out and was speaking with teens about preventing neighborhood conflicts from turning violent.Ron Moten, the co-founder of Peaceoholics, said he last saw West in 2011 when he checked in with the group.“It seemed like he was going down the right direction,” Moten said. “He was working to better his life.”“Wesley wasn’t about going out to hurt nobody, but it’s a culture,” Moten said.According to Moten, West had recently been working in construction and had just become a father.Family and friends of Douglas and West did not respond to requests for comment Saturday.newsCrimeByClaire Z. Cardona8:11 PM on Jul 28, 2015 CDTAn 18-year-old Dallas man suspected of shooting a security guard during an attempted robbery is in custody, according to police records.Police say Frederick Boise, who also goes by Aaron James Stanley, shot a uniformed guard in the chest multiple times July 16 at the Minyard Food Store in the 2100 block of Singleton Boulevard in West Dallas.According to police documents, Boise pulled out a 9mm handgun and demanded money from the store’s assistant manager. Police say Boise grazed the assistant manager when he shot at him and struck the guard. Two others were wounded. The security guard fired back and Boise fled on foot, according to police documents.The next day, detectives received information from Grand Prairie police that a man had been dropped off at a hospital with a gunshot wound to the chest. Detectives determined the man was Boise, police documents state.Boise told detectives July 20 that he was under the influence of drugs when he pointed his gun at some people and was shot by the guard before fleeing, according to the affidavit.Boise is being held in the Dallas County jail on $165,000 bond. He has been charged with aggravated assault against a public servant and aggravated robbery.Records show Boise also has holds from the Tulsa County Sheriff's Office for eluding a police officer, robbery with a firearm, leaving the scene of a collision involving property damage, feloniously pointing a firearm, possession of a stolen vehicle and petit larceny.Claire Z. Cardona, Breaking News Producer. Claire joined The Dallas Morning News as an intern in 2012. She now writes about crime, other breaking news and the Dallas Zoo. She grew up in New Orleans and graduated with a journalism degree from the University of Texas at Austin.Stay up-to-date with the crime and public safety news your neighbors are talking about.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North Texas© 2021Baltimore Sun Media Group.

          Data current as ofApril 10, 2021.Credits|Terms of Service|Privacy PolicyFox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Peggy Gallek,Darcie LorenoCLEVELAND — Cleveland police are investigating a drive-by shooting that injured several people Wednesday night.Police sources say at least seven people were hurt in the shooting, which happened at about 11 p.m. Wednesday in the 700 block of Thornhill.Police reports state that a 44-year-old female and a 21-year-old male were taken to MetroHealth Medical Center with gunshot wounds to their lower body. A 25-year-old male was shot in the knee, and a 21-year-old female was shot in the back. They were taken to MetroHealth Medical Center as well.A 22-year-old male was also hit in the foot and taken to University Hospitals. A 31-year-old male was shot in the thigh, and a 23-year-old male was shot in the hand and grazed on the hip. They were also taken to University Hospitals.Police say the majority of the seven victims described the vehicle involved as a white or gold-colored mini-van. They say the van pulled up, and multiple people began firing shots.A van believed to have been the suspect’s vehicle has been recovered in East Cleveland.There have been no arrests.SubmitCOLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.Four people, including a 1-year-old boy, were struck by bullets in a shooting Wednesday night on Detroit's west side, Detroit Police said.The victims were outside in the 9200 block of Memorial, near the Southfield Freeway and I-96, when a green Buick drove by and began firing shots at around 7:35 p.m., said Sgt. Cassandra Lewis, a police spokesperson.A 24-year-old man was shot three times, and an 18-year-old woman was shot as well, Lewis said. Bullets grazed a 25-year-old male and a 1-year-old boy.All four were treated at hospitals, and are in stable condition, Lewis said. Police did not say what might have led to the shooting, and no arrests have been made yet.Contact Daniel Bethencourt: dbethencourt@freepress.com or 313-223-4531. Follow on Twitter at @_dbethencourt.Christopher Dean Wright, center, represented by attorney David Williams, has been charged with three counts of unlawful neglect of a child, one count of obstruction of justice and one count of trafficking cocaine base. Wright is the father of two children killed as part of a quadruple homicide last month.Orangeburg County Sheriff Leroy Ravenell points to a newspaper clipping about Christopher Wright’s July 17 bond hearing.Christopher Dean Wright hasn’t been accused of murder, but Orangeburg County Sheriff Leroy Ravenell says his drug dealing is responsible for four people being killed and another being injured."This case is directly connected to his style of living -- drug dealing," Ravenell said Friday. "He placed his children in an environment that was dangerous."Wright was taken into custody on Thursday in Manning, according to First Circuit Solicitor David Pascoe. He is newly charged with three counts of unlawful neglect of a child, obstruction of justice and trafficking crack cocaine.“Because of this man, because of his lifestyle, because of the way he wanted to live, we have four people dead and one in the hospital,” Ravenell said.Four people were found shot to death in Wright’s home at 7050 Old State Road, Holly Hill on July 15. They were two of Wright’s daughters – Tamara Alexia Perry, 14 and Shamekia Sanders, 17 -- his fiancée, Krystal Hutto, and a male acquaintance, Jerome Butler.His 8-year-old son, Dreamzz Nelson, was also shot in the head. Nelson is receiving medical care at a Charleston-area hospital.Pascoe said at Wright’s bond hearing Friday that the killer shot each of the victims “execution-style.”Ravenell said Wright has not shared what he knows about the July 15 killings with the authorities.“I believe Mr. Wright knows more than what he’s telling us, which is nothing,” Ravenell said.“The incident that occurred on July 15 at 7050 Old State Road is because of Christopher Dean Wright,” Ravenell said.He noted that Wright could face additional charges.“He’s the father and because of his lifestyle, his kids are no longer here. And not only that, why would you not cooperate with investigators?” Ravenell said.“It frustrates me,” he said.Wright’s attorney, David Williams, said at the bond hearing that Wright has talked with at least three Orangeburg County Sheriff’s Office investigators and taken a lie-detector test.Williams said Wright is cooperating with investigators.Wright wasn’t at 7050 Old State Road when the murders took place, Williams said. He returned to the home to discover the bodies and called 911."He was the first to come on the scene. He was the first to call 911. He had to see this unfortunate event," Williams said.Outside the hearing, Williams said the sheriff’s office is investigating a tough case.Wright provided law enforcement with information and possible leads to help with the investigation, he said.“His suggestions on possible leads haven’t panned out, but that doesn’t make him a liar,” Williams said.Pascoe, however, said in court that Wright “has repeatedly provided misstatements and outright lies which have impeded this investigation.”Pascoe described Wright as a “career drug dealer” and read a list of Wright’s convictions extending to the 1990s.Last month, Wright was charged with two counts of trafficking in methamphetamine or cocaine.Wright allegedly sold 13.2 grams and 14 grams of crack cocaine to a confidential informant on June 21, 2013. The State Law Enforcement Division conducted those “controlled purchases,” according to arrest warrants, at 7050 Old State Road.During Wright’s bond hearing last month, Orangeburg County Magistrate Rob Clariday set a $30,000 bond.Wright told Clariday that he wanted to be out of jail so that he could attend his fiancée’s funeral and visit his 8-year-old son in the hospital.Pascoe claimed on Friday that Wright didn’t do either of those things and that he continues to sell drugs.Williams said that shortly before Friday’s hearing, someone told him that he has given Wright rides to the Charleston-area hospital several times to try and visit his surviving son.Bond could not be set on the new trafficking charge on Friday because it is considered a violent crime, and Wright was already out on bond on two other trafficking charges. Williams asked that bond on all of Friday’s charges be considered by a circuit court judge at a later date.Ravenell said Michael "Rambo" Deroaknel Smith, 26, of Disciple Way, Moncks Corner is still considered a "person of interest" in this case.Deputies arrested Smith about a week after the July 15 slayings. He was charged with second or subsequent offense failure to stop for blue light and two counts of possession of a controlled substance.He has not been charged in the July 15 deaths.A special hotline has been set up for tips in the Holly Hill case. Anyone with information, no matter how seemingly insignificant, is asked to call 1-888-825-7172. A reward of $2,500 has been set up for anyone who has information leading to an arrest and a conviction.Contact the writer:mbrown@timesanddemocrat.comor 803-533-5545 Follow on Twitter: @MRBrownTandD.Get local news delivered to your inbox!Staff WriterMartha Rose Brown covers crime and other topics. She's worked as a journalist in the region for the past 18 years.Three months after four people were executed in Holly Hill, Orangeburg County Sheriff Leroy Ravenell says the “case is not standing still.”Christopher Wright has been charged with three counts of unlawful neglect of a child, one count of obstruction of justice, and one count of tr…Christopher Dean Wright, center, represented by attorney David Williams, has been charged with three counts of unlawful neglect of a child, one count of obstruction of justice and one count of trafficking cocaine base. Wright is the father of two children killed as part of a quadruple homicide last month.Orangeburg County Sheriff Leroy Ravenell points to a newspaper clipping about Christopher Wright’s July 17 bond hearing.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Trending:NORWALK >> Three gunmen shot and wounded four men at a local park Monday night in what deputies believe was a gang-related incident.Sgt. Ralph Gama of the sheriff’s Norwalk Station said Tuesday that one victim was in critical but stable condition at a nearby hospital and the other three are in stable condition.He said the victims were shot several times.The shooting broke out around 9:40 p.m. at Hermosillo Park, 11959 162nd St.Gama said the four were sitting on a bench in the park when three men got out of a vehicle and started shooting at them.Five male suspects were last seen driving westbound on 162nd Street in a newer, dark-colored Chevy Impala with tinted windows.The Norwalk station received a 911 call at 9:47 p.m. about a gunshot victim at the park. Lt. Shawn Kehoe said three victims were found at the scene, and a fourth turned up at a local hospital for treatment.The gang unit at the Norwalk station is investigating the shooting, according to Gama.This is the second shooting at a Norwalk park in recent days.A23-year-old Bellflower manwas killed and another man was injured in ashooting at Gerdes Parklate Saturday. It wasn’t immediately known if the two incidents were related.Sheriff’s homicide Lt. Steve Jauch said an armed man walked up to a group in the parking lot at Gerdes Park and opened fire. Detectives couldn’t verify a report that the shooter got in a dark-colored sedan. He may not have left in a car, Jauch said.Detailed descriptions of the suspects in both shootings weren’t available.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.STOCKTON (CBS13) – Police are investigating a deadly shooting this morning in Stockton.Officers say five people were shot during a house party last night in the 400 block of McCloud Avenue.A 41-year-old man died at the scene. Four others are recovering in local hospitals and are in stable condition. Officers say someone shot at the house multiple times. They believe it might have been gang-related.“We don’t know if it was a drive-by shooting or if they walked up to the house. But definitely multiple shots were fired in the direction of the house,” said Ofc. Joe Silva, a spokesperson for the Stockton Police Department.Police say no one is in custody yet, and it’s too early to know a motive.Oak ParkA hyperlocal news site committed to in-depth reporting on issues concerning Oak Park and River Forest, Illinois.The River Forest Police Department has remained silent following the police-involved shooting on July 12 of Matthew Watson, 24, in the 100 block of Lathrop Avenue. The department has denied Freedom of Information requests submitted by Wednesday Journal for police reports prior to the incident at the address where the shooting occurred.Watson was killed in front of his home in the early hours of a Sunday morning after firing a shotgun at River Forest police officers. Police found the body of William S. Carlson, 60, of Markesan, Wisconsin inside the house. Watson’s mother, Susan Watson was also wounded by a shotgun blast.The evening of the shooting, Green Lake County, Wisconsin, sheriff’s police discovered an illegal marijuana grow operation in the late William Carlson’s garage at W2813 Kahl Road, Markesan, with more than 3,400 grams of marijuana and 25 live plants, valued at $10,000.According to Green Lake County Sheriff’s Chief Deputy Mark Putzke, the investigation is still open because the department is waiting for the local district attorney to close the case.“If the district attorney confirms [William Carlson] really is the guy who owns the grow, we can simply close the investigation,” Putzke said Monday.Also on Monday, River Forest Deputy Chief James O’Shea said Susan Watson was released from Loyola Medical Center on Aug. 4 and returned to her home in Wisconsin.It is unclear whether Susan Watson resides at the Kahl Road address, which was purchased by William Carlson in 2012, according to the Green County Register of Deeds.Two officers were injured by Watson’s shotgun fire, but O’Shea said both have recovered and are back on patrol duties. Those two officers, Sgt. Chris Pate and Officer Dan Humphreys, were honored Monday at the meeting of the River Forest Village Board and presented with commendations.The Illinois State Police were asked to investigate the shooting of Matthew Watson, as part of the protocol for any police-involved shooting in River Forest. Illinois State Police Chief Public Information Officer Sgt. Matt Boerwinkle said in an email Monday the investigation is still ongoing and no further information would be released at this time.In July, Freedom of Information requests by Wednesday Journal for records of past incidents at 116 Lathrop Ave. or email contact with Watson family members were denied by the department pending the closing of the investigation.Wednesday Journal appealed those denials to the Public Access Counselor at the Illinois Attorney General’s Office.On July 22, the attorney general’s office sent a letter to River Forest Police asking for copies of the documents in question and received no response. On Aug. 18, Assistant Attorney General Shannon Barnaby sent a second letter to the River Forest Police.“The department must provide this office with copies of the records for our confidential review,” Barnaby wrote.  “As we have not yet heard from the department, we hereby reiterate our requests.”Donna Ludvik of the River Forest Police Department told Wednesday Journal the department would be sending the police reports in question to the attorney general’s office Monday.Jean Lotus loves community journalism. She covers news, features, two school boards, village council, crime, park district and writes obits for Forest Park Review. She also covers the police beat for...More by Jean LotusJersey City police carFour people were injured early this morning in a shooting in Jersey City, police say.(Jersey Journal file photo)JERSEY CITY- Four people were shot in their legs around 4:15 a.m. this morning near Sip and Van Wagenen avenues, police say.Three of victims fled the scene but were later questioned by police, said city spokeswoman Jennifer Morrill.The victims sustained non-life threatening injuries and were uncooperative in providing details about the incident, Morrill added.Gallery: The Jersey Journal photos of the week: June 27-July 3, 2015Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesDemagio Callahan, 22CLEVELAND, Ohio -- Prosecutors have identified and charged a suspect in a July 2015 drive-by shooting that left one man dead and another man wounded on East 163rd Street.Demagio Callahan, 22, of Maple Heights is charged with aggravated murder and multiple counts of attempted murder in the drive-by shooting that killed 20-year-old Maple Heights resident Veron Black last summer.Black was shot as he stood near the corner of East 163rd and Sorrento Avenue.Prosecutors identify Callahan as the man who opened fire on the block from a silver sedan, raining gunfire on a home there and hitting Michael Dixon, according to court records.Bystanders Deandre Turner and Manautica Boyd were also shot.Callahan is currently at the Lorain Correctional Institution, serving time for a drug trafficking charge he pleaded guilty to last month.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.City police have identified the three people killed Tuesday in aquadruple shooting near the University of Maryland-Baltimore campus in west Baltimore.Gerald Thompson, 34, Jacqueline Parker, 53, and Lamont Randall, 39, were killed in the shooting, which was reported shortly after 10:30 p.m. Tuesday in the 900 block of West Fayette Street.Police said two vans stopped and one person got out of each van and started shooting into a crowd of people. A fourth woman who was shot in the buttocks went to a hospital. She is listed in good condition, police said.City police said the incident was believed to be a targeted crime and is not associated with the University of Maryland. It did not occur on campus and is not related to any aspect of the university."We do want to make sure the community knows there is no affiliation with the University of Maryland," said Baltimore Police spokeswoman Lt. Sarah Connolly on the shooting. "It was a targeted event. It did not happen on campus."After a preliminary investigation, police said they determined that two vans were involved, one burgundy and the other white. Three to four people are believed to be involved, police said.Homicide detectives are investigating and ask anyone with information to call 410--396-2100. Callers may remain anonymous.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.SHREVEPORT, LA (KSLA) - A third man is now wanted by police in connection with a shooting that injured eight people last week in west Shreveport.Police said the shooting is believed to have been the result of a dispute between 2 groups gathering in adjacent parking lots in the 3500 block of Hearne Ave. early on the morning of July 5.The victims, including a 16-year-old female, are expected to recover.Two other arrests have already been made in the case. Antonio Rhines, 20, and Treveon Wilson, 19, were arrested Tuesday for the shooting.Rhines is charged with 2 counts of illegal use of a weapon, convicted felon in possession of a firearm, and parole violation. Wilson is charged with illegal use of a weapon.Shreveport police investigators say they now have a warrant for the arrest of 17-year old Gerod T. Ward in connection with his alleged involvement in shooting.Ward, whose is believed to live in the 500 block of Janet Lane in Shreveport, is now wanted on a warrant charging him with a single count of illegal use of a weapon.Bond has been set at $100,000.00.Anyone with information regarding the whereabouts of Ward are urged to contact Crimestoppers at (318) 673-7373.Copyright 2015KSLA. All rights reserved.1812 Fairfield Ave.Shreveport, LA 71101(318) 222-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A shooting early today in east-central Fort Wayne left nine people injured, including one person in critical condition and one person in serious condition, city police said.Officers responded to a report of a disturbance in the 1400 block of McCulloch Street, about four blocks south of Maumee Avenue, at 1:11 a.m., Fort Wayne police said in a statement. While on the way, police received reports of gunshots being fired and multiple people being struck.In total, five men and four women were injured -- one in critical condition, one in serious condition and seven in good condition, police said.Six victims were found at the scene, police said. They said one woman was found to be in critical condition, and five other victims there were found to be in good condition. All six were taken to a local hospital, police said, where the woman first described in critical condition was upgraded to serious condition.A short time later, police said, they received reports of three victims walking into a local hospital. They said a man was in critical condition and two other victims were in good condition.Police said it appears there was a party at a home on McCulloch Street, and a disturbance began that escalated to shots being fired. Police said early today they did not know what led to the disturbance,had no suspects or persons of interest, and no weapons had been recovered.They said they were interviewing witnesses, and crime scene units were searching for and collecting evidence. They askedanyone with information about the shooting to call the police department at 427-1222 or Crime Stoppers at 436-7867.Share this articleShowers and thundershowers likely. High 69F. Winds S at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Some clouds. Low 49F. Winds SW at 10 to 20 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:02 pmLOUISVILLE, Ky. (WDRB) -- A MetroSafe dispatcher has confirmed that multiple victims were shot near 25th Street and Broadway in west Louisville.A call about the shooting was placed around 3:30 a.m. Sunday.A WDRB photographer who went to the scene said the incident appeared to have happened near Legends Nightclub.A dispatcher said each of the victims suffered non-life threatening injuries.The shooting remains under investigation.Copyright 2015 WDRB News. All rights reserved.D.C.Police Chief Cathy L. Lanier and Mayor Muriel E. Bowser announced the arrest of three men allegedly involved in a July 4 gun battle that resulted in one death and multiple injuries.Through surveillance-camera footage and witness testimony, police were able to identify three men and charge them in the killing of Dwayne Gene Dillard, who was shot in the 2600 block of Douglass Place SE around 11 p.m. on the holiday. Authorities arrested Shakim Lyons, 23, of Southeast, Jonathon Taylor, 24, of Southeast and Harry Herbert, 27,and charged each with second-degree murder.At a news conference, officials discussed a surveillance video that shows men holding guns and one of them firing across the street with bystanders nearby. According to court records, police recovered 52 bullet casings after what authorities called a reckless exchange of gunfire on a crowded street.Four people were injured in the gunfire, including Lyons and Dillard. Earlier that night, a fight on that block involved at least one of those charged.“This video shows multiple people with guns having a shootout in the middle of the street on the Fourth of July. That’s a big deal,” Lanier said. “Anybody that’s going to be that bold and take shots on a public street like that on the Fourth of July when there are kids out . . . we need to get them off the street.”Lanier and Bowser (D) thanked the community for helping in the investigation, applauding residents for not fearing retribution for talking with police.Police are still working to identify at least four others seen in the video, and they continue to try to find other possible suspects.Court records show that a detective familiar with the area recognized Herbert from the video.The police found Taylor through an Instagram picture in which he is wearing the same clothes as in the video.In a separate case, Taylor is charged with first-degree murder in the slaying of Dexter Motley on 46th Place NE on Aug. 14, 2014, according to court documents.Shooting on E Fayette St. SyracuseSyracuse police chief Frank Fowler went to the scene of a shooting at an empty lot on the 1600 block of East Fayette Street the Sunday after the Fourth of July. Syracuse Police responded to multiple shootings over July 4th weekend.(Dennis Nett | dnett@syracuse.com)SYRACUSE, N.Y. -- Four people were struck by bullets when someone opened fire on a crowd watching Fourth of July fireworks in Syracuse Saturday, police said.A group of people were watching fireworks on the southeast corner of Bellevue Avenue and Rich Street around 10:24 p.m., Lt. Eric Carr said in a news release.An unknown suspect or suspects fired shots into the crowd, striking four people with bullets, Carr said.The victims included a 24-year-old woman who was shot in the shoulder and transported by Rural Metro Ambulance to Upstate University Hospital, he said.The other victims, a 17-year-old man who shot in the elbow, a 24-year-old man shot in the arm and a 19-year-old man shot in the back, all arrived at Upstate in private vehicles, police said. The victim's injuries were all considered to be not life-threatening, Carr said.Investigators do not have suspect information at this time, he said.Police have asked anyone with information on the shooting to call 315-442-5222.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesSAN ANTONIO - Police say two shootings early Saturday were sparked by fighting over women on the North Side.The first incident occurred when a fight broke out between two men at 1:45 a.m. in the parking lot of a bar in the 300 block of Sourrey Avenue.Investigators said the two were fighting over a woman, noting one of the men had a relationship with the woman. Allegedly, the other man had a previous relationship with the woman.The two men fought until one of them pulled out a gun and shot the other man twice, police said, noting he was treated at the scene and transported to University Hospital in stable condition.The suspect fled the scene but was caught a few hours later, police said. Charges have yet to be determined as the investigation continues.In a separate incident, two men were fighting over a woman inside a hookah bar at 3:45 a.m. in the 1100 block of West Avenue, according to police.One of the men pulled out a gun and began to wave it around, witnesses told police.That's when he fired several shots, which hit four men in their feet, investigators said.The injured were taken to University Hospital in stable condition, police said, adding that the suspect fled the scene and is at large.jbeltran@express-news.netTwitter: @JBfromSAJacob Beltran is a staff writer on the evening public safety beat at the San Antonio Express-News. He is completing a bachelor's degree in journalism from Texas A&M-San Antonio. Since beginning his journalism career in 2010, he's worked at local college newspaper The Ranger and The Mesquite.He is a San Antonio native who enjoys video games, photography, and exploring during his free time.INDIANAPOLIS (WISH) — A 23-year-old Indianapolis man received a six-year prison term Wednesday for his role in the 2015 death of a 20-year-old man, online court records show.Steven Eldridge Jr. was arrested in November 2015 for his involvement in the fatal shooting of Tavin Yeakey on July 2, 2015. Yeakey was among four people shot from a passing car; the others had injuries considered to be nonlife-theatening, police said in 2015.The shooting occurred west of downtown near Michigan Street and Belmont Avenue.Eldridge pleaded guilty to assisting a criminal who committed murder in Marion Superior Court, Criminal Division 3. Three charges of attempted murder and a murder charge were dismissed as part of the plea deal.The sentence connected to the shooting will be served concurrently with another sentence he received Wednesday. He agreed to plead guilty to carrying a handgun without a license and received a 180-day sentence on that charge. The handgun charge was filed in the same court in September 2015.Download the WISH-TV app for your iPhone/iPad in the App StoreDownload the WISH-TV app in the Google Play storeLike WISH-TV on FacebookINDIANAPOLIS (WISH) — A 23-year-old Indianapolis man received a six-year prison term Wednesday for his role in the 2015 death of a 20-year-old man, online court records show.Steven Eldridge Jr. was arrested in November 2015 for his involvement in the fatal shooting of Tavin Yeakey on July 2, 2015. Yeakey was among four people shot from a passing car; the others had injuries considered to be nonlife-theatening, police said in 2015.The shooting occurred west of downtown near Michigan Street and Belmont Avenue.Eldridge pleaded guilty to assisting a criminal who committed murder in Marion Superior Court, Criminal Division 3. Three charges of attempted murder and a murder charge were dismissed as part of the plea deal.The sentence connected to the shooting will be served concurrently with another sentence he received Wednesday. He agreed to plead guilty to carrying a handgun without a license and received a 180-day sentence on that charge. The handgun charge was filed in the same court in September 2015.© 2021 Circle City Broadcasting I, LLC. | All Rights Reserved.WISH-TV InstagramWISH-TV TwitterWISH-TV YouTubeWISH-TV FacebookIndy Style FacebookAll Indiana FacebookNews /32 mins agoInternational /1 hour agoInternational /2 hours agoLocal /2 hours agoEDWARDSVILLE — Madison County State’s Attorney’s Tom Gibbons filed charges Friday against two Alton brothers stemming from a shooting last month at a nightclub in Venice.Vincent Gordon, 32, and Vontarius Gordon, 31, are facing multiple charges in connection with the June 28 shooting.On June 28, a physical altercation between Vincent Gordon and a female patron occurred at the C & M Lounge, according to a release from the State’s Attorney’s Office. He is alleged to have punched the female in the face, which led to a confrontation between multiple people that eventually spilled out into the parking lot.At that time, Vontarius Gordon began shooting into the crowd with a semi-automatic handgun, hitting people on the parking lot, the C & M Lounge itself and a vehicle, the release said. It is also alleged that Vincent Gordon began firing shots with his own weapon, an assault rifle. Both men fled the scene before police arrived.Officers with the Venice Police Department, in conjunction with investigators from the Illinois State Police (ISP), the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives (ATF), and the Granite City Police Department worked the case and were able to identify the brothers as the shooters.Both men are facing six counts of aggravated battery with a firearm, a Class X felony, for the six victims who were injured at the scene. None of the injuries were life-threatening. They also face two counts of aggravated discharge of a firearm, a Class 1 felony, for shooting the Lounge and a vehicle on the parking lot. Finally, both men were on parole and were therefore charged with one count of unlawful possession of weapons by a felon, a Class 2 felony.Bond was set at $1 million by Associate Judge Neil Schroeder.Vincent Gordon is currently in custody at the Madison County Jail in Edwardsville. He is awaiting transfer to Missouri for his parole violation on a kidnapping conviction. Vontarius Gordon, who was convicted in Illinois for aggravated battery with a firearm, has already been transferred to Menard Correctional Center on his parole violation.Gibbons thanked Assistant State’s Attorney Crystal Uhe, chief of the Criminal Division, and the officers from the multiple police departments for sorting out a difficult case that led to Friday’s charges.“We are very fortunate that no one was killed that night,” said Gibbons. “It was a very chaotic scene and thanks to the diligent work of everyone involved, both of these violent men are back in custody.”Maximum penalty for a Class X felony is 6-30 years in prison; maximum for a Class 1 felony is 4-15 years in prison and 3-7 years on the Class 2 felony.The charges, as well as the statements made by the State’s Attorney’s Office, are based upon probable cause. The defendants are presumed innocent unless proven guilty.Detroit— As the summer heats up, so apparently are the number of mass shootings at block parties in the city.Overnight, there were two separate incidents of shootings at two block parties, injuring five people at one party, four of them teenagers, on Sunday night. Several hours later, one person was reportedly shot early Monday morning at a second party about a mile away.According to the Detroit Police Department five people, four of them teenagers, were shot at about 9:30 p.m. Sunday at a party in the area of Gratiot and Whitmore on the city’s east side.Police listed the ages of the victims as 14, 18, 19, 19 and 29.All are listed in temporary serious condition at a local hospital. Police have no information on the shooter or shooters at this time, according to Sgt. Cassandra Lewis.Information on the second shooting Sunday night is scarce but one person was reportedly wounded at a gathering near Wilshire and Roseberry. The condition of that victim is currenty unknown.On Friday night, four people were shot at a block party on Stringham Court, near E. Conner and Warren, that was attended by about 100. All of the injuries were reported as non-life threatening.On June 20, 11 were shot in the city at a block party held on a basketball court at the intersection of Webb and Dexter. One person, age 19, was killed.The other victims are expected to recover.Police were especially upset that none of the 400 in attendance at the party came forward as witnesses to the incident. No arrests have been made.TGreenwood@detroitnews.com(313) 222-2023WPRI.comby:Shaun TowneTAUNTON, Mass. (WPRI) — Taunton police have charged a suspect in a recent shooting that claimed the life of one man and injured three other people.Lorenze C. DaVeiga, 19, previously of Lowell Street, will be arraigned Thursday on a murder charge for the death of 24-year-old Marques McCassie, according to the office of Bristol County District Attorney Thomas Quinn.Four people were taken to nearby hospitals after they wereshot in the area of Weir Streetat about 5:45 p.m. on June 27. McCassie was pronounced dead at Morton Hospital an hour later.DaVeiga is also charged with assault and battery with a dangerous weapon, unlawful possession of a firearm and unlawful possession of ammunition.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.LONDON (AP) — Buckingham Palace officials say Prince Philip's funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle in a family service that will be closed to the public.The palace said Philip, also known as the Duke of Edinburgh, took part in planning his funeral and the focus on family was in accordance with his wishes. The 99-year-old duke died Friday.PAWTUCKET, R.I. (WPRI) -- The City of Pawtucket has partnered with the Rhode Island Department of Health (RIDOH) and the local branch of AccuReference Medical Lab, opened a mobile COVID-19 testing site for residents in the city.The lab will be set up from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m. today at the Elizabeth Baldwin Elementary School.WEST GREENWICH, R.I. (WPRI) - A 45-year-old man from New Hampshire was killed in a single-car crash on the highway early Saturday morning, according to Rhode Island State Police Lieutenant John Charbonneau.Troopers form the Hope Valley Barracks, as well as members from the West Greenwich Police and Fire Departments were called to I-95 South near Exit 6 around 3:30  a.m.Detroit— As the summer heats up, so apparently are the number of mass shootings at block parties in the city.Overnight, there were two separate incidents of shootings at two block parties, injuring five people at one party, four of them teenagers, on Sunday night. Several hours later, one person was reportedly shot early Monday morning at a second party about a mile away.According to the Detroit Police Department five people, four of them teenagers, were shot at about 9:30 p.m. Sunday at a party in the area of Gratiot and Whitmore on the city’s east side.Police listed the ages of the victims as 14, 18, 19, 19 and 29.All are listed in temporary serious condition at a local hospital. Police have no information on the shooter or shooters at this time, according to Sgt. Cassandra Lewis.Information on the second shooting Sunday night is scarce but one person was reportedly wounded at a gathering near Wilshire and Roseberry. The condition of that victim is currenty unknown.On Friday night, four people were shot at a block party on Stringham Court, near E. Conner and Warren, that was attended by about 100. All of the injuries were reported as non-life threatening.On June 20, 11 were shot in the city at a block party held on a basketball court at the intersection of Webb and Dexter. One person, age 19, was killed.The other victims are expected to recover.Police were especially upset that none of the 400 in attendance at the party came forward as witnesses to the incident. No arrests have been made.TGreenwood@detroitnews.com(313) 222-2023The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.MANHATTAN — Four people were shot, one critically, in a daylight shooting that started outside a neighborhood deli across from theLincoln HousesWednesday, authorities said.The shooter, who has not been identified and is still at large, fired several shots from the street into 20 Stars Deli/Grocery at 2110 Madison Ave. about 3:30 p.m., sources said. A 25-year-old man was struck in the head and grievously wounded. A 17-year-old man who was also in the shop was hit in the chest.The gunman also wounded a 43-year-old man in the chest and neck and a 24-year-old woman was grazed in the arm by a bullet in the courtyard of the public housing project across the street, sources said.Angel Rivera, 25, a construction worker from Queens working on 132nd Street, said "We heard four or five shots."The police department had no immediate information on the shooting.Wanda Machin, 35, mother of three who lives across the street from the shooting, expressed frustration over the rise of shootings in the area."Broad daylight! It's gotten worse since the last administration, way worse," Machin said. "I purchased in that store before. It could have been anyone."Reporting by Murray Weiss, Janon Fisher, Ben Fractenberg, Alice Guilhamon and Gustavo Solis.Next inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemNext inHarlemCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.WILKINSBURG (KDKA)- Shots rang out in Wilkinsburg overnight, and at least four people may have been injured.Allegheny County homicide detectives were called to the scene near the intersection of Rebecca and East Swissvale Avenues. The shooting took place around 11:45 p.m. Sunday.“We heard about four or five rounds and I turned to him and I said. ‘What was that, do you think that was gunshots?’” Vanessa Young said.Forensic investigators gathered evidence, and at least 18 evidence markers were on the ground at the scene. There were multiple shell casings from the shooting.Two of victims are brothers who were on the stoop of an apartment building.Two of the victims were taken to area hospitals and had to undergo surgery. The third victim was in less serious condition.“It was just really scary because I have children. They were in bed sleeping and the last thing I want to think about when I just put my kids to sleep is if I got to get down for fear that shots come through my apartment,” Young said.Police are not revealing any information about a possible motive or how many were involved in the shooting.The scene of the shooting was cleared around 2:15 a.m.  A few minutes later, there was a report of another shooting just four or five blocks away.In that incident, a man was shot in the leg along the 1600-block of Wesley Street. He was taken to the hospital and was last listed in stable condition.Meanwhile, people in the neighborhood are worried about the reckless shooting.“Them shooting, hitting your house, hitting you. It could be all different types of situations,” one woman said.“It could affect my family and it could affect my family horribly. Someone in my family could be gone because of what’s going on out here,” Young said.So far, there have been no arrests in either shooting.Join The Conversation On The KDKA Facebook PageStay Up To Date, Follow KDKA On TwitterDetectives have identified two men who they say opened fire on a block party filled with family members and children with a shotgun last Saturday.Kyleif Harley and Dominic Lamar, both 23, are wanted for the drive-by shooting on the 4100 block of Ogden Street in West Philadelphiaon June 20, Lt. John Walker said.It was around 9 p.m. that night when the men drove to the street and opened fire at least once with the shotgun and then fired several times with a handgun, police said.Breaking news and the stories that matter to your neighborhood.The gunfire injured 11 people, eight from the same family, with the youngest victim being a 1-year-old girl. Two boys, an 11- and 12-year-old, were also struck. Police discovered the 11th victim over the course of their investigation."It's a blessing though that they made it, seriously," Tyrone Jones, who helped organize the party,told NBC10 this week.The victims have all been released from the hospital, but some are continuing to be treated because they have shotgun pellets embedded in their bodies that cannot be removed without inflicting more damage, according to the lieutenant.Walker said Harley and Lamar were looking for a person in that area and appeared to open fire randomly. Both have a criminal background and will face several charges when arrested including attempted murder and aggravated assault.Anyone with information is asked to call Philadelphia Police's tip line at 215.686.TIPS.Authorities have arrested one suspect and have a warrant for another following a triple shooting in Morven on Saturday.Authorities suspect Frank Hall, 22, of Polkton and Oscar Willoughby Jr., 42, of Charlotte were involved in a shooting at the Boom Boom Room in Morven at 2:43 a.m. on Saturday. Natasha Leak, Anthony Lewis Gaddy, Consquelo Little and Anthony Griffin were all shot with a .32 caliber Smith and Weapon six-shot revolver, according to the arrest warrants for Hall.According to a release from the Anson County Sheriff’s Office, deputies found Hall walking along U.S. Highway 52 in Morven after seeing that he matched the description of the suspect. He had a small caliber pistol with him and was taken in for questioning before being charged with the shootings.Detectives from the Sheriff’s Office and agents from the North Carolina State Bureau of Investigation identified Willoughby as a second suspect but did not reveal what led them to him. “[We] determined that the shooting incident occurred during a dispute between Hall and Willoughby,” the release said.Consquelo Little, 30, of Morven, is seven months pregnant. She was shot in the back and taken first to Chesterfield General in South Carolina, then transported to McLeod Regional in Florence.Natasha Leak, 34, of Morven, was shot in the mouth and taken to Chesterfield General before being taken to McLeod Regional.Both women are listed as being in serious condition.Anthony Gaddy, 44, of Monroe was shot in the chest and taken to CHS — Anson. He was later taken to CMC — Main in Charlotte in serious condition.Joseph Hall, 47, of Wadesboro suffered an unknown injury and was also taken to CHS-Anson before being transported to CMC-Main in Charlotte. He was not shot, but the sheriff’s office had no information on his injuries.Both men were still in the hospital as of Monday at 11:43 a.m.Hall was charged with two counts of assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill inflicting serious injury. He is being held in the Anson County Jail under a $400,000 secured bond.Willoughby will also be charged with assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill inflicting serious injury, according to the sheriff’s office. “He lives in Charlotte, so we may have to go another route or get assistance from Mecklenburg County,” Sheriff Landric Reid said.Willoughby’s warrant will not be public record until the Anson courthouse has received notice that it has been served, a court clerk said.Hall is due in court on July 7 at 9:30 a.m.The Boom Boom Room is currently closed. “Sheriff Reid spoke with Glenn Byrd, the owner and operator of the Boom Boom Room, and advised him that the club could not be reopen (sic) without proper paperwork and permits, and that if it was reopened without these items Byrd will be charged,” the release said.Several departments responded to the scene of the shooting. “Sheriff Reid would like to thank the deputies from the Anson County Sheriff’s Office, other officers from the Wadesboro Police Department, N.C. Highway Patrol, N.C. SBI, Chesterfield County Sheriff’s Office, members of the Anson Rescue Squad, and Anson EMS for all their hard work during this stressful and chaotic situation,” Reid said in the release.Follow the story at www.ansonrecord.com for more details as they are released and see Wednesday’s issue for a full story.Anson gets $76,400 in United Way fundingCounty commissioners continue budget talksApril 08, 2021ROCKINGHAM — The candlelight vigil for the 92 lives lost in Richmond County due to COVID-19 scheduled for Friday has been postponed to an undetermined date in May due to threat of thunderstorms.[…]April 08, 2021The U.S. Supreme Court last week upheld the Federal Communications Commission’s wrongheaded decision to allow more media consolidation.[…]April 08, 2021The thousands of migrants trying to enter the United States at the southern border have sparked a fresh wave of political debate over who should be let into the country and how minors and others seeking asylum should be treated.[…]April 08, 2021As Americans continue to grapple with racial violence and the legacies of slavery, it is worth remembering the roots of the movement that created the nation’s first federal civil rights law, passed by Congress 155 years ago this week.[…]April 08, 2021In a press conference following a “CBS 60 Minutes” report that Covid-19 vaccination distribution was influenced by campaign donations in Florida, Gov. Ron DeSantis says he’s “punching back” against a lying media narrative. The deceptively edited banter between Florida’s governor and CBS correspondent Sharyn Alfonsi sparked a firestorm of controversy. For good reason. DeSantis’s aggressive response provides a lesson that when it comes to woke bullying and fake narratives, sometimes you have to hit the bully back.[…]April 08, 2021The deadline for all Community Calendar items is 12 p.m. every Tuesday and will appear in the following Wednesday’s paper each week up until the day of the event. To list your event, emaileditor@yourdailyjournal.com, call 910-817-2673 or drop off information in person at 607 E. Broad Ave., Suite B. Please email or call as soon as possible if your event is canceled.[…]April 07, 2021Anyone who has visited China in the past decade knows why President Joe Biden is pushing so hard to overhaul U.S. infrastructure.[…]April 07, 2021HAMLET – Jason Blevins is a long way from his hometown of Loudon, Tenn., but the 19-year-old is right at home in the Electric Lineman program at Richmond Community College.[…]April 07, 2021Imagine: It’s election night, Tuesday, November 8, 2022. As election results come in, it is looking increasingly likely that Republicans will take control of the House and Senate. Democrats are trying to figure out why this happened — after all, they spent the midterms airing ads all about how dangerous right-wing conspiracy theories are and how horrible it is that Republicans support them. There’s a simple answer to why Democrats lost: they have spent the last two years passing incremental half-measures that do not change the lives of any Americans and that do not make the country better.[…]April 07, 2021North Carolina is poised to make great gains as we recover from the pandemic. We are becoming a major hub for life sciences companies. Real estate sales and construction (especially in urban areas) are booming, unemployment rates are declining, and most economic sectors are recovering. Unless there is another major surge in the coronavirus, we can expect our economy to continue growing for at least the next year or so. Confirming North Carolina’s attractiveness are the thousands of people moving into our state each month.[…]April 06, 2021ROCKINGHAM — The Richmond County Board of Commissioners unanimously approved a tolling agreement with Hamlet and Rockingham which puts mediation on hold for six months while the three government entities discuss a solution to the dispute over the sales tax distribution method.[…]April 06, 2021Image courtesy of Glenn Poplin Photography and Terry Clark Photography[…]Call:T:704-694-2161F:704-694-7060Mail:123 E. Martin St. Suite 400,Wadesboro NC, 281702018 Champion MediaDetroit— Decrying the no-snitch silence that descended over a west side neighborhood after a block party erupted in violence, leaving one dead and 11 others shot, Police Chief James Craig on Sunday pleaded with witnesses to come forward and identify the "urban terrorists."The chief and detectives canvassed the area of Dexter and Webb looking for clues to the shooting that marred the start of summer in a barrage of gunshots Saturday. Police called the shooting retaliatory and labeled the shooters "cowardly thugs."Craig said officers are seeking two men believed to have exchanged gunfire with the victim, 19-year-old Malik Jones.But Craig said the "neighborhood is not talking" and urged witnesses to help them catch the two shooters. He said 47 shots were fired at the annual neighborhood basketball game, attended by families."We're making a passionate plea to the community to talk. They need to respond," Craig said. "They're fed up and we're fed up."As I have said time and again, the police cannot do this alone."Craig said he didn't have statistics with him but believed the past weekend was one of the most violent weekends of the year in Detroit.In a separate incidents, a 19-year-old woman was wounded by gunshot while walking on Monroe in Greektown on Saturday night, police said. And early Sunday morning, a would-be robber entered Pete's Grill and Coney Island at Outer Drive and Dequindre announcing a holdup. A cook in the restaurant shot the man several times, killing him.The shootings extended to Sunday evening, injuring a woman and her 2-year old, innocent bystanders in neighborhood argument over dogs.Jones, the homicide victim in the Dexter and Webb shootout, was killed three blocks from where he lived. Craig said Jones had been shot about a month ago in the neighborhood.The other victims ranged in age from 19 to 47, Craig said, adding that seven are recovering at home and four remain in the hospital in stable condition.Police say someone opened fire about 8:30 p.m. Saturday at a party on a basketball court where about 300 people were gathered.Community activist Helen Moore, president of the Dexter Elmhurst Community Center, said the basketball game was not sponsored by the center, which owns the parking lot used as a basketball court.Moore, who was not present, said the area often hosts community events. She said she was not aware of any notification that an event was planned there Saturday night."We are going to have a community meeting and encourage people to talk so this doesn't happen again," Moore said. "We can work with them and work with police for additional patrols."Moore said the community center has been the target of vandals and thieves in recent years, including rooftop thefts of equipment and metal, which have affected the center's operations.Jerome Thompson, 65, lived in the neighborhood most of his life, but said he recently moved to Warren because of break-ins and other crime."It's sad," he said, looking at the scene of Saturday's shooting. "I was raised on this court."The neighborhood surrounding the run-down parking lot is filled with dilapidated, abandoned store fronts.Craig stayed in the neighborhood talking with a handful of passers-by for about 20 minutes after the Sunday afternoon news conference. That included two teens, one bouncing a basketball, who walked down Dexter."Do you know who I am?" Craig asked them, before peppering them with questions and telling them the department needed their help to catch the shooter.Another, who pedaled past the basketball courts on a bicycle, shouted out his appreciation to Craig for helping to make the city safer."You're doing a good job," the youth shouted out, to which Craig wearily replied, "Not today."Jones was well-known and popular in the neighborhood, said Melissa Brown, a childhood friend who watched the Sunday news conference from a bus stop across Dexter."He loved to smile," Brown said. "Everybody out here loved Malik, and the police aren't going to find his killer."She said witnesses likely won't come forward because they don't believe police will protect them. Brown said she's angry that officers didn't do a better job of monitoring the game. It has been an annual event for years, and police should have been better prepared, she said."The police should have been out there," Brown said. "You need to treat this area like you do downtown. None of these cops care about this neighborhood.""It's been going on too long for them not to know."Police said they had been in the area a few hours before the shooting, clearing the streets of cars, and that participants had cooperated."We had made our presence known, " said Capt. Nick Kyriacou, who said a preliminary investigation indicates someone was in pursuit of Jones, who "for whatever reason decided to conceal himself in a crowd" before the shooting."This (shooting incident) is an anomaly," Craig said. "Crime in general and violent crime specifically have both been trending down (here). At least, until recently."You have 12 people shot in one incident, and that is going to make the numbers go up."The shooting came two days before Detroit's annual fireworks show, set for 10:06 p.m. Monday. The fireworks caps the city's four-day River Days festival.Craig had pushed for a citywide curfew from 8 p.m. to 6 a.m. for minors ages 17 and younger for four nights beginning Friday and ending Monday for River Days, but it was defeated by the Detroit City Council in a 4-3 vote Tuesday. The council narrowly favored a curfew for the fireworks show Monday that will run from 8 p.m. to 6 a.m. and be limited to downtown.Kyriacou said efforts were being made to arrange a community meeting "as soon as possible" this week to discuss the shooting."We want to bring all the stakeholders together — the neighborhood's residents, the people who were at the shooting, community groups — so we can get the people responsible," said Kyriacou. "We are not going to let them bring the community or the city down."One person who plans to attend the community meeting is Garland Hardeman, a member of a neighborhood block group, who said numerous concerns need to be addressed."We have to get together," Hardeman said after talking briefly with Craig. "The neighborhood and police and everyone."Police were passing out (800) SPEAK UP leaflets to residents and putting them in doorways with the hope of getting tips with information about those responsible for shooting.Anyone with information can also call (313) 596-1616.mmartindale@detroitnews.comAssociated Press contributed.PROVIDENCE – Zackary Alvarado, age 20, of 285 Main St., Woonsocket, was sentenced Wednesday to 55 years with 35 years to serve in prison and the remainder suspended with probation.Alvarado will be eligible for parole in 10 to 15 years. If he violates conditions of his probation, he would serve the rest of his sentence without the chance for parole, according to the Office of the Attorney General(these two sentences correct information previously included from the AG's office making it appear that Alvarado would not be eligible for parole for the duration of his sentence).Superior Court Justice Robert Krause sentenced Alvarado for multiple robberies and assaults that took place over a four-month period in 2015 that culminated with Alvarado shooting four people outside Aly’s Riverside Pub in Woonsocket on June 19, 2015. Alvarado had pleaded guilty Judge Krause on March 23.Had the case proceeded to trial, prosecutors say they were prepared to prove that Alvarado robbed at gunpoint the Metro PCS store on Main Street in Woonsocket three times in March and April of last year. During the April 27 robbery, he fired the weapon into the air. On June 13, 2015, the defendant robbed at gunpoint the Metro PCS stor  on Social Street in Woonsocket.  During the robbery, the defendant fired the gun into the front desk of the store.In the very early hours of June 19, 2015, Alvarado, armed with a .22 caliber Luger, shot four people who were gathered outside Aly’s in a parking lot on River Street.Alvarado then fled the scene. He turned himself over to the Woonsocket Police later that day, and had been held without bail since his arrest.Shell casings from the scene on River Street matched the shell casings from two of the Metro PCS robberies. Victims of the robberies also identified the defendant.“Armed with an illegal firearm, Zachary Alvarado was a one-man crime spree who wrought havoc through the city of Woonsocket,” said Attorney Gen. Peter Kilmartin. “Today’s sentence sends a strong message that gun violence in our communities will be met with stiff criminal penalties.”Woonsocket Police Detectives Kevin Sanford and Thomas Gormley investigated the case and Special Assistant Attorneys General Peter Roklan and Joseph McBurney prosecuted the case on behalf of the Office of Attorney General.© 2021 Breeze Publications, Inc. All Rights Reserved. | 6 Blackstone Valley Place, Suite 204, Lincoln, RI 02865 |Top of PageWATCHVIDEOSBy providing my email address, I agree to theTerms of Useand acknowledge that I have read thePrivacy Policy.Eyewitness News Weekend UpdateNY to receive 85% decrease of J&J vaccine next weekNY warning residents about sites charging for COVID-19 vaccineA man wanted in connection to a quadruple shooting during a party at a Miami Gardens apartment complex turned himself in to police Wednesday, officials said.Ivan Clark, 21, turned himself in and will face four counts of attempted second-degree murder, Miami Gardens Police said. It was unknown if he has an attorney.The shooting was reported in the 600 block of Northwest 177th Street Tuesday afternoon.Investigators say it happened in broad daylight as people were gathering for a birthday party. Right after the shots were fired a woman pulled into the complex to visit a friend. When she arrived she said she found out her friend's son was one of those hit by a bullet."I didn't see nothing... I just pulled up at the wrong time to visit my friend, whose son got shot," she said.Police officials said two victims were critical but stable, one was transported to the hospital on the ground and the fourth was treated at the scene.All of the victims are adults and are believed to be males.Police said Clark has a criminal past and has done prison time for burglary and grand theft.Investigators said the motive for the shooting is still under investigation.He was hanging out at a Brooklyn bar to promote his new clothing line when he was nearly killed in hail of bullets.A fight broke out, gunfire cracked and patrons scurried for safety about 2:50 a.m. Monday. Four people were shot — one was stabbed — adding to a troubling rise in the number of gunshot victims in the city.Eugene Davison, 30, was the most seriously wounded in front of D Avenue Sports Bar on Flatbush Ave. in Prospect Lefferts Gardens. Davison, the youngest of 10 children and the father of three, was shot in the neck, but is expected to survive."My brother was not out there causing problems," said his sister Dolores Williams, who drove to Kings County Hospital from Lancaster, Pa., after hearing about the shooting. "Eugene didn't have problems with anybody. ... From what we've heard it was a stray bullet."Police statistics released on Monday show the number of shootings citywide is up 10% through Sunday compared with the same time period last year. The number of murders has spiked an alarming 19% — with 150 people killed this year compared with 126 at this point in 2014.The increase in violence comes even as overall crime is down 6.6% across the five boroughs.No one has been arrested in the Monday morning spray of gunfire in Brooklyn. Video surveillance shows a group of men in their 20s fleeing the scene after a fight began inside the bar and spilled outside. One of the victims appears to stumble back inside for help, the video shows.The bar's owner, Richard Raphael, 37, said the fight started when a man sucker punched another man on the street in front of the bar.The other victims include Marvin Bland, 34, who was shot in the arm, Eric Rollins, 24, who was grazed in the elbow, and William Cheathom, 30, who was shot in the leg and groin. All were treated at Kings County Hospital. Kadeem Earle, 24, was slashed in the back of the head but did not require medical treatment.Sources said most of the victims were not cooperating with police."Its getting worse," said neighborhood resident James Jessmon, 55. "It's getting bad."For the week ending Sunday, 55 people were shot across the city in 45 different incidents. In the same week last year, there were 21 shooting incidents. Murders for the week were also up — eight this year, compared with five last year.A police source said there has been a spate of shootings involving more than one victim. The numbers have not changed significantly from last year. Records show 1.168 people have been struck in every shooting incident this year, compared with 1.165 last year.About 45% of the shootings last year were tied to street crews or gangs, police said. And many of the shootings this year have been linked to hardcore criminals suspected in multiple shootings.TheNYPD launched its Summer All-Out initiativelast week, flooding troubled neighborhoods with additional police. The strategy was successful last year in curbing the rise in violence during warm-weather months.ON A MOBILE DEVICE?WATCH THE RAW VIDEO HEREANDWATCH THE OTHER VIDEO HERE.rparascandola@nydailynews.comPoliceOne man was killed and three injured in an early morning shooting in Camden.(File photo)A man was killed and three others injured in a shooting that occurred early Sunday morning inCamden.Camden County police received reports of gunshot victims in the 2800 block of Mitchell Street at approximately 12:05 a.m. Sunday.Upon arrival, officers found Camden resident Tito Gomez, 44, lying in a parking lot with a gunshot wound. Gomez was taken by ambulance to Cooper University Hospital and was pronounced dead at 1:11 a.m.A 23-year-old Camden man and a 22-year-oldPennsaukenman were also shot and later found at an apartment on the 2800 block of Saunders Street.The fourth man shot in the incident, a 22-year-old Camden man, was driven to the hospital by a friend before police arrived.The three survivors were treated for gunshot wounds at Cooper hospital and later released.There have been no arrests and the shooting is still under investigation.Kelly Roncace may be reached atkroncace@njadvancemedia.com. Follow her on Twitter@kellyroncace. Find theSouth Jersey Times on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFour people were hospitalized after a gunfight erupted at an overnight party, according to police.Officers responded to a reported shooting victim in the 6200 block of East Marshall Place about 4:25 a.m. and found one victim with a gunshot wound to the chest, police said.Police discovered the shooting took place at a building in the 1800 block of North Kingston, where an after-hours party was taking place. Three more gunshot victims also were taken to area hospitals.Officers interviewed more than 20 witnesses at the party, including three security guards who had been armed, according to police. Three handguns were recovered from the guards. Several shell casings, apparently fired from multiple weapons, were found in the street in front of the building.Police believe the shooting started after an altercation broke out at the party. At least one shot was fired inside the building, moving the crowd outside, police said. Security followed the assailant — or assailants — outside and exchanged gunfire.Four people were shot, at least one in critical condition. The conditions of the other three are unknown. It is unclear whether the victims were the shooters or bystanders, but no security guards were struck, police said.Officers are waiting on a search warrant.Anyone with information may contact Crime Stoppers by phone at 918-596-COPS (2677), online atbit.ly/crimestopperstipsor via text message at CRIMES (274637). Text tips should begin with “Tip918.”Kyle Hinchey 918-581-8451kyle.hinchey@tulsaworld.comGet local news delivered to your inbox!Benjamin Robert Cole Sr., who turns 56 Thursday, now faces a federal charge of first-degree murder in Indian Country in connection with the 2002 murder of his 9-month-old daughter, Brianna Cole.Feds file murder charge in 2008 Tulsa County killing linked to McGirt rulingBenjamin Robert Cole Sr., who turns 56 Thursday, now faces a federal charge of first-degree murder in Indian Country in connection with the 2002 murder of his 9-month-old daughter, Brianna Cole.Feds file murder charge in 2008 Tulsa County killing linked to McGirt rulingDeputies responded to the eastbound lanes of U.S. 412 near Adams Road about 11:20 p.m. Tuesday to assist the Sand Springs Police Department with a crash that revealed three shooting victims.Deputies responded to the eastbound lanes of U.S. 412 near Adams Road about 11:20 p.m. Tuesday to assist the Sand Springs Police Department with a crash that revealed three shooting victims.The tribe has filed 440 criminal cases in federal court in recent weeks and spent $10 million on the effort, the tribe's attorney general said.McGirt v. Oklahoma: Supreme Court decision and aftermathThe tribe has filed 440 criminal cases in federal court in recent weeks and spent $10 million on the effort, the tribe's attorney general said.McGirt v. Oklahoma: Supreme Court decision and aftermathA Broken Arrow Second Amendment activist filed a federal lawsuit against the city and two police officers alleging he was subject to civil rights violations during his arrest at a park in 2019, though he was not charged with a crime.A Broken Arrow Second Amendment activist filed a federal lawsuit against the city and two police officers alleging he was subject to civil rights violations during his arrest at a park in 2019, though he was not charged with a crime.Officers responded to a midtown residence about 1:25 a.m. Monday and found the victim "beaten severely," according to a police news release.Officers responded to a midtown residence about 1:25 a.m. Monday and found the victim "beaten severely," according to a police news release.A stalking situation involving a former co-worker escalated into a violent kidnapping attempt Friday morning that left law enforcement officials grateful a south Tulsa woman and her husband survived.A stalking situation involving a former co-worker escalated into a violent kidnapping attempt Friday morning that left law enforcement officials grateful a south Tulsa woman and her husband survived.The 20-year-old suspect is charged with first-degree murder and shooting with intent to kill, among other charges.The 20-year-old suspect is charged with first-degree murder and shooting with intent to kill, among other charges.Jimmy Glenn Hendrix, 41, faces a first-degree murder charge in Tulsa federal court in connection with the shooting death of Jerrod Young, 26.Grand jury indicts death-row inmate whose state conviction, sentence are in jeopardy due to McGirtJimmy Glenn Hendrix, 41, faces a first-degree murder charge in Tulsa federal court in connection with the shooting death of Jerrod Young, 26.Grand jury indicts death-row inmate whose state conviction, sentence are in jeopardy due to McGirtDallas Gene Hastings, Justin Dale Little, Steve Wayne Lockler Jr. and Gary Dewayne Boggs are the latest state inmates to see charges filed against them in Tulsa federal court.Dallas Gene Hastings, Justin Dale Little, Steve Wayne Lockler Jr. and Gary Dewayne Boggs are the latest state inmates to see charges filed against them in Tulsa federal court.Oklahoma's multicounty grand jury returned an indictment against attorney Winston Connor II in 2018 on 10 charges, the most serious of which were solicitation for first-degree murder and a violation of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations, or RICO, Act.Oklahoma's multicounty grand jury returned an indictment against attorney Winston Connor II in 2018 on 10 charges, the most serious of which were solicitation for first-degree murder and a violation of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations, or RICO, Act.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.ST. LOUIS• Four teenagers were recovering after being shot about 11:08 p.m. Saturday in a drive-by shooting in the 1400 block of North Market Street.Authorities said that three of the four victims were in stable condition after being grazed by bullets. A fourth remained in critical but stable condition after being shot in the neck, police said.The victims, all in their late teens, were shot when a party was letting out. A black SUV drove by and a shooter or shooters fired shots, hitting all four.EDITOR'S NOTE:An earlier version of this story gave an incorrect time for the shooting. This version has been corrected.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Margaret S. Gillerman is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Police are looking for a man who shot and injured five people Saturday in the Bronx.The suspect approached a group of men at about 9 p.m. on Creston Avenue and brandished a 40 caliber handgun, firing it several times at the group and injuring five people, police said.The victims, between 20 and 26 years old, received several gunshot wounds and were taken to nearby hospitals. One victim who received a gunshot wound to the chest was listed in critical condition while the others were treated and released.The shooter fled and was last seen walking northbound on Creston Avenue.Police released surveillance footage of the suspect. Anyone with information is asked to call Crime Stoppers at 800-577-TIPS.NBC4 WCMH-TVby:Joe ClarkCOLUMBUS  (WCMH) — Robert Lee Adams was sentenced to life without parole for his part in the quadruple murders at a South Linden home in June of 2015.Adams was sentenced on each of the four counts of murder, and 11 years on the attempted murder. He also received an additional two years for the gun specification. His sentences are to run consecutively, according to the judge.During the sentencing hearing, Adams addressed the court and apologized.Adams pleaded guilty Tuesday to four execution style murders and a fifth attempted murder.According to Franklin County Prosecutor Ron O’Brien Adams, 29, pleaded guilty to the murders of Michael Ballour, 41, Daniel Craig Sharp, 26, Angela D. Harrison, 35, and Tyajah N. Nelson, 18, that occurred in the basement of Ballour’s house located in the 1600 block of E. Hudson Street in South Linden, June 13, 2015.Adams was accompanied by juvenile Jordyn D. Wade, age 16 at the time of the murders. Wade was sentenced to 172.5 years to life on September 13, 2016.The pair robbed the victims, ordered them to the basement, and Adams then shot the victims, murdering four of them, while Wade stood at the top of the stairs with his gun drawn. After the shooting Adams and Wade fled the scene.One of the five victims survived the shooting and stumbled from the residence where they sought help. Wade was picked up shortly thereafter.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.The weekend is off to a very mild start, as temperatures climb well into the 70s, despite increasing clouds.Low pressure over northern Illinois will trigger a few rounds of showers and storms later today through the overnight hours, with a gusty storm possible in spots. A broad upper-level disturbance will move slowly from the Missouri Valley to the Great Lakes, keeping showers in the picture into Sunday.COLUMBUS (WCMH) — The Ohio Department of Health has released the latest number of COVID-19 cases in the state.As of Saturday, April 10, a total of 1,037,600 (+2,048) cases have been reported since the pandemic began, leading to 54,047 (+87) hospitalizations and 7,529 (+11) ICU admissions.CAIRO (AP) — Egypt’s best-known archaeologist on Saturday revealed further details on a Pharaonic city recently found in the southern province of Luxor.Zahi Hawass said that archaeologists found brick houses, artifacts, and tools from pharaonic times at the site of the 3,000-year-old lost city. It dates back to Amenhotep III of the 18th dynasty, whose reign is considered a golden era for ancient Egypt.Four people were shot in an incident outside of an Allapattah nightclub early Friday, with the gunman still at large.The incident began when a fight erupted inside The Flow Bar & Lounge, located at 24th Avenue and 36th Street in Allapattah, around 5:30 a.m. and spilled out into the street, according to Miami Police.Surveillance video showed people rushing in a panic away from the clubTomico Mortimer, a bouncer at the lounge, told NBC 6 South Florida in the midst of that fight, someone involved in the melee started shooting."Everybody just started dropping, one by one," Mortimer said.Mortimer said one of the waitresses was heading home when she was caught in the gunfire."I took a belt and made sure I tied it off so it wouldn't bleed, make sure to stop the blood," he said.Police said four people were shot. Three of those people were taken to the hospital by friends, while one was taken to the hospital by Miami Fire Rescue teams.All of the shooting victims are expected to be okay. All sustained gunshot wounds in their outer extremities.Mortimer said one of the shooting victims, a woman, also works there as a waitress and bartender. Mortimer assisted her by tying her wound area.The gunman is still on the run. Police say they do not yet know a motive for the shooting, other than the fight inside the bar.No further details on the incident were immediately available.Traffic to the area was closed for several hours Friday morning as police investigated. The lanes have since been reopened to traffic.Anyone with information is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPSThis is a developing story and will be updated as new information becomes available.BRIDGEPORT - It was chaos.Gunfire seemingly came from everywhere as dozens of people enjoyed a summer evening in the parking lot of the Trumbull Gardens housing project last year, witnesses testified in court Wednesday.But none of the witnesses could identify Jamal “MooMoo” Hamilton as the shooter who killed one person and wounded eight others.“We were just talking, hanging out, drinking liquor,”Kimberly Mirandarecalled under questioning by Senior Assistant State’s AttorneyMichael DeJoseph.Then, Miranda said, she heard the gunshots.“I turned to Vahn (Savonie “Vahnnie” McNeil) and Vahn told me to run and duck, and I hid between two cars,” Miranda continued. “I got up to check if Vahn was OK and Vahn was on the ground, he was lifeless and bleeding from the head. I got scared, I screamed and I told him we were going to be OK.”Miranda didn’t realize until a short time later that she had been shot twice.“Shauna told me to sit on the curb because I had a bullet sticking out of my stomach,” she testified. “It was total chaos, massive noise, people screaming.”Hamilton, 24, is facing a 12-member jury. He is charged with murder and eight counts each of first-degree assault for the June 11, 2015, shooting spree. The trial began Wednesday morning.It’s a case that arguably propelledJoe Ganimto the mayor’s seat.The shooting came the same dayBill Finchwas to announce his re-election bid, armed with a claim that his administration was responsible for a decrease in violent crime in the city.Instead, Finch was forced to postpone his announcement, giving Ganim — who announced that day the opening of his own police substation just outside the Trumbull Gardens housing project — the upper hand.Bruce Nelsontestified Wednesday that he was shot in the right hip and right leg.“At first I thought it was a firecracker, until people began running,” he said.A bullet brokeJared Fleming’s left leg but he was reluctant to talk about it in front of the jury.“No offense to my friend Vahnnie,” he added under questioning by DeJoseph.Under cross examination by Hamilton’s lawyer,Michael Riley, neither Fleming nor Nelson, both who grew up with Hamilton, recalled seeing him at the shooting scene. Neither they nor Miranda said they saw the shooter.Ellen Paytontestified she didn’t see anything. She had been taking a shower in her second-floor bathroom when a bullet came through the wall and struck her in the leg.“I can’t sleep and I’m afraid,” she told the jury.Police DetectiveThomas Harperwas the first police officer on the scene.“It was one of the most chaotic scenes I have been on,” he testified. “There was a large crowd of people who were screaming and yelling.”Harper said he found McNeil, 37, of Shelton, lying on his back between two parked cars, with a gunshot wound to the head.“I requested more officers and ambulances to the scene, and then I started going to other victims,” Harper said.Testimony is to continue Thursday morning.Daniel Tepfer has been reporting on legal issues and covering criminal cases for many years.A new father was killed and three others were hurt in a daytime shooting police believe is gang related in South Los Angeles.Sheriff's officials said the four victims were in or near a car on 88th Street and Vermont Avenue when another vehicle pulled alongside about 12:30 p.m.One of the occupants of the vehicle stepped out of the vehicle and fired at the victims, sheriff's Lt. Holly Francisco said. There is a possibility it is gang-related, she said.Local news from across Southern CaliforniaA separate shooting with similar circumstances occurred about an hour later seven blocks away in the 2000 block of West 83rd Street.Authorities said they were still investigating whether the shootings were related.Police said the second shooting involved a suspect in a possibly white Lexus, and the shooting victim was conscious and talking with paramedics before being taken to a hospital.Witness Larry Carter said he knew the dead man."He just had a child about a yaer and a month," he said. "He's trying to straighten out his life."He said he didn't know why anyone would shoot him, but "it's idiotic."Community activist Kevin Orange was saddened by this latest violence."It doesn't matter if it's gang related or not," he said. "It's a loss of life."Sun., June 14, 2015DEER LODGE, Mont.  – The brother of the woman killed in a murder-suicide described his sister as caring, tenacious and giving.Phil High-Edward has been in Montana this week to claim the bodies of his sister, Arie Arlynn Lee, 5-year-old Augustine, 4-year-old Woodrow, and 16-month-old Arie.Police said they were slain by Lee’s husband Michael Augustine “August” Bournes in their log cabin in rural southwestern Montana on June 7.High-Edward, of Spokane, told the Montana Standard that he and Lee were close as kids.High-Edward said he viewed Bournes as a “nice, great guy,” and he was happy his sister was happy.“(August) was always attentive. I never got one bad vibe from him,” he said.High-Edward said despite the urge to make sense of what led Bournes to kill his family, the reason will remain unknown.“We will never know. August and Arie are the only two people who know what happened from beginning to end. We can speculate, we can guess, we can theorize, but we will never know,” he said.KENNEWICK – Former classmates who attended Kamiakin High School with Arie Arlynn Lee in the early 1990s are still mourning their longtime friend.Miriam Byerly of Milton met Lee their freshman year in 1991. She remained friends with Lee, who was known as Arie Edward in school, the rest of Lee’s life.Byerly last talked to Lee, 37, on May 25, less than two weeks before Lee and her three children were shot dead by Michael Augustine “August” Bournes, 59, her companion and the kids’ father.Bournes then set fire to their southwestern Montana log cabin, laid down next to the children’s bodies and shot himself with a .45-caliber pistol.Friends say there were signs of trouble with Bournes, who had recently had an argument with the closest thing to neighbors in the remote wilderness area they lived in.“At the end, you could only talk to her for a little bit before she would have to go,” said Byerly, who has lived off-and-on in the Tri-Cities for years.That was a change from the woman her friends knew.“She exuded confidence, was strong, spoke her mind and had a great sense of humor,” Byerly said. “She was also kind, loyal, smart and the most loving person I’ve ever met. She was and always will be a beautiful soul.”Lee was born in Spokane and moved to the Tri-Cities at a young age, said her brother, Phil High-Edward.Tashia Flieger of Pasco took her children to visit Lee and her family at their Montana cabin in 2013, when they were in the area for her son’s baseball tournament. Her son helped Bournes get firewood for the long winter, while she watched Lee cook on a propane stove.“Everything she did was homemade,” Flieger said. “I must have a million pictures on my phone of something she would bake.”Flieger and Lee last saw each other a year later, when Lee visited them in Kalispel when Flieger returned for another tournament. Flieger cried for hours after they said goodbye, only to talk to Lee and learn that she did the same.After Lee’s youngest child, Arie, who was 1 when she was killed, was born, Flieger noticed a change.“I sent her a picture of the kids back in November and it took her a week to respond,” she said. “She said she was too busy.”Flieger feels bad because she did not try harder to find out what was going on with her friend.“I let her phase out,” she said. “Arie was not the kind of person who would share if she was going through hard times.”Lee hadn’t lived in the Tri-Cities since graduating from Kamiakin in 1995, but her friends continued to keep up with her. They have scheduled a celebration of life service at 6:30 p.m. Thursday at Calvary Chapel Tri-Cities, 10611 W. Clearwater Ave. in Kennewick.“There is an outpouring of people here who knew her and loved her,” Flieger said. “She was a huge part of the community, and her mother was a huge part of the community.”High-Edward, who lives in Spokane, will return to the Tri-Cities for the event.“I think it’s a perfect time to come together and remember Arie for the very sweet, nice, kind person she was,” he said.Local journalism is essential.Give directly to The Spokesman-Review's Northwest Passages community forums series -- which helps to offset the costs of several reporter and editor positions at the newspaper -- by using the easy options below. Gifts processed in this system are not tax deductible, but are predominately used to help meet the local financial requirements needed to receive national matching-grant funds.Get the day’s latest Coronavirus news delivered to your inbox by subscribing to our newsletter.UPDATED: 7:52 p.m.If you suffer from joint pain, you know how it can greatly affect the quality of your life.© Copyright 2021, The Spokesman-Review |Community Guidelines|Terms of Service|Privacy Policy|Copyright PolicyThree people, including a teenager, were killed and at least 12 others were wounded in separate shootings since Friday evening across the city, police said.The latest fatal shooting happened about 2:15 a.m. Saturday in the Bridgeport neighborhood on the South Side, police said.Richard Edwards, 17, of the 3900 block of South Lake Park Avenue, was fatally shot and an 18-year-old man wounded in the 700 block of West 36th Street, according to the Cook County medical examiner's office and Chicago Police News Affairs Officer Amina Greer, who was citing preliminary information.Edwards suffered a fatal wound to his armpit and was declared dead at the scene, according to police and the medical examiner's office. The 18-year-old was shot in the hand and shoulder and was taken to John H. Stroger, Jr. Hospital of Cook County, where his condition stabilized, Greer said.At the crime scene, police officers put handcuffs on a man and appeared to take him into custody. Officers blocked off about half a block of 35th Street east of Halsted Street.The 17-year-old's body lay under a white sheet on a sidewalk on the south side of 35th.Half a block south, at 35th Place and Halsted, a black revolver lay on the ground, cordoned off by yellow police tape.A woman grieved loudly, leaning on a parked car, just south of the crime scene at 35th and Halsted. A man joined her and hugged her, trying to calm her down."I just need to touch him," she cried out repeatedly, referring to the teenager who was lying dead on the sidewalk nearby. "I just need to see it's my child. Please."Over the course of the next two to three hours, several other family members and friends joined the woman. As the relatives walked up to her they started sobbing louder and louder.Three police officers stood near the group of relatives and friends. One officer rubbed the woman's shoulder with her hand as she wept.A handful of nearby residents, who stumbled upon the crime scene on the way home, watched and listened to the grieving from across the street.Daniel Lakemacher, 32, said he was on his bicycle on his way home from work when he saw crime scene tape and the teenager's body, which was still uncovered."There is literally a dead body lying across a sidewalk I walked hundreds of times," Lakemacher said.In another fatal shooting that happened about 9:55 p.m. Friday,a 27-year-old man was fatally shot in the Little Village neighborhoodon the West Side, Greer said.Officers discovered Juan Ugalde lying unresponsive on a sidewalk in the northwest corner of 23rd Place and Washtenaw Avenue with a gunshot wound to the side of his face, according to the medical examiner's office and police.Ugalde, of the 2800 block of West 21st Street, was dead at the scene, according to the medical examiner's office.Shortly after 6 p.m., a 34-year-old man died after being shot on the Far South Side in the city's West Pullman neighborhood on the Far South Side, police said.Laurance Boyd, of the 12700 block of South May Street in south suburban Calumet Park, was sitting inside a parked vehicle in the 1300 block of West 122nd Street when someone approached and started firing in his direction, according to the medical examiner's office and Officer Bari Lemmon, a spokeswoman for the Chicago Police Department.The gunman fled east from the scene.Boyd was shot twice in the back and was taken in critical condition to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he was pronounced dead at 8:24 p.m., according to the medical examiner's office and police.In other shootings:• A 21-year-old man was shot in the shoulder at 9:15 a.m. Saturday in the 1800 block of West 71st Street in the city's West Englewood neighborhood on the South Side, said Officer Janel Sedevic, a spokeswoman for the Chicago Police who was citing "very preliminary"' information.• Another shooting took place at 6:45 a.m. Saturday in the 10700 block of South Champlain Avenue in the Roseland neighborhood on the Far South Side, Sedevic said. The victim, a 21-year-old man, was shot in the left forearm while walking. "An offender with whom he'd had a previous verbal altercation with approached and fired shots," Sedevic said. He was in good condition at Roseland Hospital, Sedevic said, and no arrests were made.• Three women and two men were wounded about 3 a.m. Saturday while they were outside during a party in the South Austin neighborhood on the West Side, Greer said. All five were standing outside in a courtyard in the first block of North Lorel Avenue when an unknown attacker approached from a nearby gangway and fired several gunshots, Greer said.A 33-year-old woman was struck in the neck area and was taken in serious condition to Mount Sinai Hospital, Greer said. A 38-year-old woman was shot in the hand, and a 37-year-old woman was shot in the buttocks. Their conditions stabilized at Mount Sinai, Greer said.In addition, a 26-year-old man and a 23-year-old man were wounded in the leg. Both were taken to Stroger hospital, where they stabilized, Greer said.No one was in custody as a result of the shooting early Saturday.• About 2:40 a.m. Saturday, a 39-year-old man was wounded in a shooting in the West Englewood neighborhood, police said. Police officers responded to a call of gunshots being fired in the 6500 block of South Oakley Avenue and found the man, who was struck in the arm and leg, according to police. The man was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where his condition stabilized, police said.• About 11:22 p.m. Friday, a 27-year-old man was wounded in a shooting in the Marquette Park neighborhood on the Southwest Side, police said. The man was standing outside in the 7300 block of South Artesian Avenue when someone in a passing dark-colored van fired gunshots, police said. The man wad struck in the leg and was taken to Holy Cross Hospital, where his condition stabilized, police said.• About 8:30 p.m. Friday, a 35-year-old man was wounded in a shooting in the 400 block of East 111th Street in the Roseland neighborhood, police said. The man was shot in the lower back and was taken to Advocate Christ, where his condition had stabilized, police said. The man was not being cooperative with police.• At 7:45 p.m. Friday, a man was shot in the 1000 block of North Monticello Avenue in the Humboldt Park neighborhood on the West Side, police said. The 25-year-old man was shot in the leg and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in good condition. The man, who is a gang member, may have been shot in a drive-by shooting, police said.Saturday morning, police were still investigating the shootings.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneAn officer stands by a shoe and clothing as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)An ambulance prepares to leave the scene as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)At Laharpe and N. Roman, New Orleans Police investigate after a fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away from where four others were shot in the 2100 block of Gov. Nicholls, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)An officer stands by a shoe and clothing as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)An ambulance prepares to leave the scene as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)At Laharpe and N. Roman, New Orleans Police investigate after a fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away from where four others were shot in the 2100 block of Gov. Nicholls, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)A crime scene technician shoots 16 evidence cones in the street as New Orleans Police investigate after four males were shot in the 2200 block of Gov. Nicholls. A fifth shooting victim was found several blocks away at Laharpe and N. Roman, but police aren't sure the shootings are related. Photographed on Friday, June 5, 2015. (Photo by Michael DeMocker,NOLA.com| The Times-Picayune)The Orleans Parish coroner has identified the victim of a quadruple shooting inTremeearlier this month as 27-year-old Dominique Cosey.Cosey and three others - ages 15, 19 and 21 - were hit by gunfire around 2:15 p.m. June 5 in the2100 block of Governor Nicholls Street. Cosey was taken in critical condition to Interim LSU Hospital,New Orleans policesaid, where helater died of his injuries.The other three victims received non-life-threatening injuries, police said.In a separate, almost simultaneous shooting, a 29-year-old man wasshot in the legduring a 7thWard robbery atNorth Roman and Laharpe streets, police said. Detectives believe two gunmen in a red Nissan Versa with an out-of-state license plate were responsible for shooting the 29-year-old.Anyone with information about either shooting should contact Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?WATCHVIDEOSBy providing my email address, I agree to theTerms of Useand acknowledge that I have read thePrivacy Policy.Eyewitness News Weekend UpdateNY to receive 85% decrease of J&J vaccine next weekNY warning residents about sites charging for COVID-19 vaccineOne person was killed and three others injured from a drive-by shooting at a Prince George’s County park Sunday afternoon.The incident occurred at the Ardmore Park in Springdale, Maryland.Two people, including the deceased, went to the St. Joseph Fire Station, on St. Joseph Drive, east of the park, after suffering a gunshot wound. She said another person was treated at a nearby MedStar office before being taken to the hospital.A fourth person was injured after a witness said his friend was hit by a stray bullet while playing horseshoes. The victim was taken to the hospital, but the injury was not life-threatening.The Prince George's County Police Department and the Maryland-National Capital Park Police Department are jointly investigating.Anyone with information should call Prince George's County Police at 301-772-4925, or call Crime Solvers anonymously at 866-411-TIPS or text PGPD plus a message to CRIMES.Stay with News4 and NBC Washington for more on this developing story.New Haven police have arrested a suspected ofshooting five people at a private party in May.Fayzon “Suki” Reboyras, 22, of New Haven, was taken into custody on Wednesday night after detectives saw him getting into a car, police said.He has been charged with five counts of assault in the first degree, reckless endangerment in the first degree, carrying a pistol without a permit and unlawful discharge of a firearm.The shooting was reported just before 2 a.m. on May 31, sending police to a private space on the second floor over Evolution Tattoo Parlor, at 849 Chapel Street.Three of the victims at the scene were transported by ambulance to Yale-New Haven Hospital and two others were taken to the hospital in a private car.Jamie Rodriguez, 21, was the most badly injured. He was shot in the lower back, knee, groin and thigh and was listed in critical condition. Police said he was released from the hospital on Wednesday, weeks earlier than expected.Joshua Agosto, 25, was shot in the chest and buttocks, Gerald Pugh, 28, was shot twice in his leg and also in his right buttocks and thigh and Jovanni Leon Vargas, 23, was shot twice in one arm, once in the other and a bullet grazed his abdomen.A gunshot grazed 30-year-old Hector Martinez's upper back. All have been released from the hospital, police said.The event the shooting happened at was a themed "white party," where the guests wore white clothes.Two groups were seen arguing earlier in the party and again toward the end, but private security guards separated them twice before the shooting, the initial reports indicate, according to police. Security brought the smaller group outside and kept the larger one inside so the dispute wouldn't "spill out into the street," police said.Moments later, witnesses told police, a man re-entered the second floor space and opened fire with a semi-automatic handgun, emptying the weapon of all its bullets.A suspect fled the scene on his motorcycle and then crashed it on the 805 freeway where he was arrested by police.Unsure if there were any armed suspects inside the building, a SWAT team was called in and the building was surrounded. At 11:30 a.m., SWAT officers entered the building and found no suspect inside, bringing the standoff to an end.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A man was seriously hurt after getting shot in the back Thursday night.Police said the incident happened near an apartment complex off 84th and Q streets around 9 p.m.The man, identified as Isaiah McKissick, 22, ran to the apartments for help. He was taken in serious condition to CHI Health Creighton University Medical Center.Police found McKissick's vehicle had been shot multiple times and was found running and crashed into a tree.McKissick was uncooperative with the on-scene investigation, police said.Three other people with gunshot wounds walked into CHI Health Bergan Mercy Hospital on Thursday night. They told officers they were in McKissick's vehicle at the time of the shooting.All victims are expected to survive their injuries, according to police.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A 2-year-old old girl and four other people were wounded in a shooting in West Englewood Thursday night, police said.Around 10:30 p.m., the girl was standing on the sidewalk with two men and two women in the 6200 block of South Honore Street when they heard shots and felt pain, said Officer Janel Sedevic, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.The 2-year-old suffered a graze wound on her chest and left leg and was taken to Holy Cross Hospital in good condition, Sedevic said.A 25-year-old man was shot multiple times and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in serious condition. The other man, 31, was shot in his leg and taken to Holy Cross Hospital in fair condition, Sedevic said.The women, both 22, were taken to Stroger Hospital. One woman was shot in her right thigh and buttocks and the other was shot in her legs. Both women were listed in fair condition, Sedevic said.According to police, the 25-year-old man is a documented gang member.No one is in custody, and police are investigating the shooting.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Police in Chester, Delaware County confirm a 14-year-old male was among those wounded in a quadruple shooting that killed one person overnight.Police said two gunmen opened fire on four males out along the 2700 block of West 3rd Street around 11:30 Thursday night.Police said the victims ranged in age from 14 to 47-years-old. A 21-year-old man who was shot multiple times died at the scene.Breaking news and the stories that matter to your neighborhood.Two juveniles and a 47-year-old man were transported to Crozer Chester Medical Center with gunshot wounds to the legs and buttocks.There was no word on the conditions of the victims and no arrests in the case.BROCKTON - Two Brockton men who police said were involved in recent shootings in the city were arrested Sunday and are being held without bail.Stephen Cabral, 24, and Kelby Correia, 23, were both arrested at 20 Winter St. in Taunton by Brockton and State police Sunday morning.Cabral shot five people outside Bar Dino's on 1002 Main St. in Brockton Sunday May 24, said Brockton Police Lt. Kenneth LeGrice. One man was seriously injured but survived.Correia shot a 29-year-old Stoughton man in the leg Saturday night outside a busy strip mall at the corner of Oak and Belair streets across from DW Field Golf Course, police said.LeGrice said both men were "part of the same crew."Inside the Taunton house, police found 300 grams of heroin, LeGrice said. They are expected to face drug charges in Taunton.Cabral was charged with five counts of assault and battery with a dangerous weapon, unlawfully carrying a firearm and unlawfully discharging a firearm within 500 feet of a building.Correia was charged with two counts of assault and battery with a dangerous weapon and unlawful carrying a firearm.The men pleaded not guilty at their arraignment in Brockton District Court Monday. They were ordered held without bail.Police believe they may have been involved in other shootings in Brockton recently, LeGrice said."We believe that they’ve been responsible for some of the gun play that’s gone on in the city," he said.In both cases, LeGrice said, they used video surveillance and information from the public to identify Correia and Cabral as suspects."We got the public’s cooperation which was great," LeGrice said.In addition to Brockton police, other agencies that assisted in the investigations were State Police assigned to Plymouth County District Attorney Tim Cruz's office, the Southeastern Massachusetts Gang Task Force attached to the FBI, the Violent Fugitive Apprehension section of the State Police, the State Police gang unit, the State Police Special Tactical Operations team, State Police Air Wing and members of the State Police Troop D Community Action Team."This has taken a lot of work," LeGrice said. "I personally think Brockton is safer now with the actions of all those units that participated yesterday (Sunday)."© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Enterprise, Brockton, MA  ~ 5 Cohannet St., Taunton, MA 02780~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Gallery: Seven people shot in parking lot outside Flint high schoolFLINT, MI -- A man once accused of a shooting in a high school parking lot that left seven people injured could spend up to 17 years behind bars after investigators linked his DNA to that found on a face mask used in a 2013 Popeyes restaurant robbery.Rayshawn Lareese HolmesIn Genesee County Circuit Court on Tuesday, Feb. 14, Judge Richard B. Yuille sentenced Rayshawn Lareese Holmes, 20, of Flint, to spend 3 to 17 years in state prison -- with nearly a year and half's worth jail credit -- for his involvement in the robbery.Holmes pleaded guilty Wednesday, Jan. 18, to reduced charges of unarmed robbery and felony firearm. As part of the plea agreement, prosecutors dismissed two additional charges of armed robbery."I just want to say I'm sorry for wasting everyone's time," Holmes told Yuille and the court on Tuesday. "This is something I did when I was 16 years old. Then, I was young and dumb, and I've spent a lot of time thinking about my decisions."During the hearing, Yuille cautioned Holmes on the impact of any future criminality."I would hope that you understand that now this is on your record, if you were to go before any judge, your sentence would be much more severe," said Yuille.Flint Township Police were able to link Holmes to a face mask used in the January 2013 robbery with a previous DNA swab. Three people were victims in the robbery."It was a 2013 incident that we charged based off a CODIS hit from a mask ... that was used," said Genesee County Prosecutor David Leyton. "The only victim who ever participated in circuit court wanted the case resolved. So [Holmes] pleaded to unarmed (robbery) plus felony (firearm), naming all three of the victims."In June 2015, Flint District Judge William Crawford dismissed two counts of assault with intent to murder and gun charges against Holmes in connection to a shooting at Southwestern Academy after a witness failed to appear to testify against him.Holmes was arrested and charged after police responded to sounds of multiple gunshots at the school shortly after 2 a.m. on Sunday, May 24, 2015.When officers arrived at the school, they saw a large crowd of people and vehicles fleeing the scene.Seven gunshot victims arrived at local hospitals from the scene of the shooting, according to police. All of them survived.A preliminary exam was scheduled to begin in June 2015 for Holmes, but the charges were dismissed after a key witness failed to respond to a subpoena to testify."The one witness that we thought could ID the shooter didn't show up," Leyton said at the time. "The witnesses that did show up couldn't ID the shooter."Holmes' attorney in that case, Barry Wolf, asked the judge to dismiss the case after the Michigan State Police and Flint police were unsuccessful at tracking down the suspect.The case was dismissed without prejudice, meaning prosecutors could refile the charges if they are able to locate the witness.According to Leyton, while there are no immediate plans to refile any charges in the Southwestern shooting, "the case will remain open till solved."Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMONTGOMERY, AL (WSFA) - The Montgomery Police Department has charged a fourth suspect in connection to the May 24 shooting on East Smiley Court that left one person dead and three others injured.According to jail records, Ladarren Seawright, 16, is charged with reckless murder. He was booked into the Montgomery County Detention Facility Friday. His bond was set at $75,000.Seawright and three others are accused of killing 18-year-old Rodriquez Smith, of Montgomery. Three others were injured in the shooting around 7 p.m. on May 24.Adrian Banks, Olando Harris and Jezereel Pett, all 23 and from Montgomery, were arrested in June and charged with one count each of reckless murder.According to court documents, gunfire was exchanged in a large crowd between several people in "rival groups."Smith and another were listed with life-threatening injuries. Smith later died. The other three victims were all later upgraded to non-life-threatening conditions.Police ask individuals with knowledge of this homicide to call CrimeStoppers at 215-STOP, Secret Witness at 262-4000, or the Montgomery Police Department at 625-2831.Copyright 2015WSFA 12 News. All rights reserved445 Dexter AvenueSuite 7000Montgomery, AL 36104(334) 288-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A 24-year-old man was arrested and charged Tuesday ina 2015 East Baltimore quintuple shootingthat killed one and injured four others, police said.Antonio Melvin, of the 3000 block of Grindon Avenue in Northeast Baltimore, was charged with first-degree murder and four counts of attempted murder, police said. No phone number was listed for Melvin's address.The shooting killed Darrell Alston Jr., 26, of the 2600 block of Beryl Avenue, and injured four others. Alston was a local rapper, known on social media as "Natzy."Two other men, Andrew Parmele and Shilo Thomas,were charged with handgun violationsat the time after guns were found in a vehicle they were running from at the scene. Thomas, also a rapper, is known as "Shymoney," and he and Alston had gained attention in the months before the shooting for producing "diss tracks" attacking other rappers, who filmed response videos.Parmele and Thomas were friends of Alston's, according to police.Homicide detectives identified Melvin as the shooter, police said, by sifting through evidence, interviewing many people and reviewing video footage from the scene, which stretched nearly a half-mile, shutting down traffic along East Monument Street for the afternoon.Melvin was arrested in the 3200 block of Eastern Avenue in Highlandtown Tuesday and taken to Central Booking, where he is waiting to see a court commissioner, police said.Baltimore Sun reporter Justin Fenton contributed to this article.cmcampbell@baltsun.com@cmcampbell6RecommendedA 15-year-old boy was killed and four men were injured in a shooting at an apartment complex in northwest Miami-Dade, police say.The young victim has been identified as Joewuan Coles, a freshman at Miami Northwestern High School. According to police, Joewuan was not with the group and was not the intended target. He was simply standing nearby and became caught in the crossfire.Coles' mother Nadia trying to make sense of her loss while signing “Mommy Loves You” on a shirt at the growing memorial for her son.She, along with so many friends a family, are just beginning the mourning process for the teenaged victim shot and killed Monday night.“This is my baby. Why, why would you take my baby?” asked Coles.According to investigators, four men, aged 22, 23, 25 and 28, were in an open area of an apartment complex located at Northwest 75th Street and Northwest 16th Avenue late Monday night. Police say that around 9:30 p.m., two unknown men, armed with what may have been high powered assault rifles, approached them and opened fire.The four men and the teen ran as they were peppered with bullets. The suspects took off in an unknown direction, police say.Miami-Dade Fire Rescue crews took four of the victims to Ryder Trauma Center, while friends took the fifth victim to North Shore Hospital.Joewuan was pronounced dead at the hospital. Police are asking anyone with information about the tragedy to speak up."Once again, we have now a family that of course is hurt, is mourning the loss of their child." said Detective Alvaro Zabaleta of the Miami-Dade Police Department. "As a community, I think we owe it to them to be able to come together and give the information to the police department in order to find these individuals responsible."The condition of the four men is not immediately known.This morning the community gathered around Coles for support with a prayer, "And right now we put this on you’re hands father."After the prayer, Coles remembered her son, whose nickname was "Popcorn."“The best dream come true I couldn’t ask for a better child,” Coles said. She said he was an aspiring athlete. At the center of his memorial sits his football trophy.In basketball he wore number 23 after Michael Jordan. But the real reason he wanted to succeed was to take care of his mom.“He told me, 'Mom when I make it you’re not going to eve have to worry again. I have you.'” Now, Coles said she’ll have him in her memory forever.“I’m going to always love you Popcorn. Mommy loves you so much,” she said.The Miami-Dade School Board says Coles was a freshman at Northwestern High School in Miami-Dade.Superintendent of Schools Alberto CarvalhoTweeted, in reference to the shooting, "Once again a murderous bullet steals the life of a child in our community. The cowardly code of silence is tantamount to complicity. #Enough"And so many others are also talking about the silence that comes after these kinds of crimes. No one speaks up and the shooters go free.At this point, police have no description of the shooters. Coles' family and police are asking for anyone with information to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at (305) 471-TIPS.newsTexasByDana Branham9:02 PM on Apr 2, 2019 CDTProsecutors will dismiss all remaining criminal cases stemming from the 2015 shootout between rival biker gangs in Waco, meaning no one will be held responsible for the brawl that left nine people dead and 20 injured.McLennan County District Attorney Barry Johnsontold theWaco Tribune-Heraldall the charges were dropped to "end the nightmare" the county has been dealing with since the May 17, 2015, shootout between the Bandidos and the Cossacks motorcycle clubs outside a Twin Peaks restaurant.Bikers from the various groups began to argue that afternoon, and gunfire broke out. Waco police monitoring the gathering shot at the bikers, killing two.After the shooting, law enforcement arrested 177 bikers, charging 155 of them with engaging in organized criminal activity. The former district attorney, Abel Reyna, dropped charges against all but 24 of the bikers and re-indicted them on riot charges.Only one man was ever tried in connection with the shootout: Christopher "Jake" Carrizal, the Dallas chapter president of the Bandidos. His case ended in a mistrial in 2017, and most of the jurors favored acquitting him, theTribune-Heraldreported.Carrizal and several other North Texas men are among those whose cases will be dropped following the district attorney's announcement Tuesday, including Bandidos Jeff Battey of Ponder, David Martinez of Terrell, Jerry Edward Pierson of Dallas and Reginald Weathers of Forney, theTribune-Heraldreported.William Joseph Flowers and Richard Luther of Garland, both Cossacks, and Nathan Champeau of McKinney will also have their cases dismissed, according to theTribune-Herald.Johnson, the district attorney, said any further effort to prosecute the cases would be a "waste of time, effort and resources.""In my opinion, had this action been taken in a timely manner, it would have, and should have, resulted in numerous convictions and prison sentences against many of those who participated in the Twin Peaks brawl," Johnson said. "Over the next three years, the prior district attorney failed to take that action, for reasons that I do not know to this day."The previous district attorney, Reyna, said in a statement that he disagrees "with the overall result as well as several statements and accusations within Mr. Johnson's press release," but said it was up to Johnson to determine how to proceed on any criminal case presented to his office.The Associated Press contributed to this report.Dana Branham, Breaking news reporter. Dana is a reporter at The Dallas Morning News covering crime and breaking news. She graduated in 2017 from the University of Oklahoma, where she studied journalism. Before coming to The News in 2018, Dana interned at the Cincinnati Enquirer and the Tulsa World.Get email alerts on breaking news stories as soon as they happen.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasThree men with prior convictions charged in connection with Kendrai Walker`s death, shooting at his vigilMILWAUKEE (WITI) -- Three men, who each have prior criminal convictions, are now facing charges in connection with the shooting death of 18-year-oldKendrai Walker, and a shooting that occurred one day later at a vigil held in Walker's honor.Those charged include:35-year-old Brian Echols of Milwaukee38-year-old Lonell Echols of Milwaukee27-year-old George Eskridge of Des Moines, IowaAdvertisementOn Friday, May 15th, police were dispatched to 28th and Auer, where they found 18-year-old Kendrai Walker suffering from several gunshot wounds. Walker was pronounced dead at the scene.Three .380 caliber cartridge casings were recovered near Walker's body.An autopsy revealed Walker died as a result of multiple gunshot wounds, and his death was ruled a homicide.Kendrai WalkerOne day later, officers were called back to the scene for several wounded individuals. A shooting occurred as loved ones gathered for a vigil for Walker. At the scene, police recovered five 9mm casings, one .22 caliber casing and a .380 caliber casing. Five people were found to have been shot and injured.Kendrai Walker's own mother was found on the ground in the 3100 block of N. 29th Street -- suffering from three gunshot wounds (one to the right rear, one above her left knee and one to her inner thigh).A woman sustained a gunshot wound to her left arm. She said she heard gunshots while on the scene of a vigil, and raised her hand to cover her face when she felt pain in her left arm. She told police she did not see who was shooting.Another woman sustained a single gunshot wound to her right leg. She said she was caught in gunshots while on the ground. This woman was able to positively identify Eskridge and Lonell Echols as being two of the individuals who shot toward the group during the vigil. She identified them via a lineup.A man sustained a single gunshot wound to his left shoulder. He said he was at the vigil when he heard one shot and then saw someone shooting toward the group that had gathered for the vigil. He then ran from the scene.Another man was shot in his left flank. He was able to identify Eskridge and Lonell Echols as being two of the individuals who shot toward the group during the vigil -- identifying them via a lineup.Two days after Kendrai Walker was shot and killed, on May 17th, police stopped a vehicle in the 800 block of W. Hampton Avenue in Glendale. George Eskridge was located in the rear passenger seat. Brian Echols was in the rear driver's seat.Police found an unloaded 20 gauge shotgun, a 9mm semiautomatic firearm loaded with .380 ammunition and a loaded .357 magnum revolver in the vehicle.The three .380 caliber casings police recovered near Kendrai Walker's body were sent to the Wisconsin Crime Lab for analysis. It was determined that these casings were fired from the same firearm -- and it was further determined that the casings came from the 9mm firearm recovered during the traffic stop.Kendrai WalkerPolice spoke with Brian Echols about the firearms recovered from the vehicle. He admitted to purchasing all three weapons recently.When police spoke with George Eskridge, he said that he witnessed Brian Echols shoot Kendrai Walker. He said that he was driving with Brian Echols after the incident, and during the drive, Echols said he had shot Walker in the head.Eskridge told police he was also present during the shooting that occurred during the vigil for Walker. He said Brian Echols wasn't there, but Lonell Echols had a weapon, as did another man. After the shooting, Eskridge told police Brian Echols returned to the scene. Eskridge admitted to police that the shotgun recovered during the traffic stop in Glendale was his.In a separate interview, police say Eskridge admitted to discharging the .357 caliber revolver.Lonell Echols told police he observed Eskridge to have several weapons -- including a machine-type gun, a revolver and a shotgun. Echols admitted to handling a revolver as well as a 9mm firearm -- saying it was probable that his fingerprints and/or DNA would be found on them. Echols told police he saw Eskridge discharge the machine-type gun toward the group that had gathered for the vigil. Echols said after the shooting, he asked Eskridge why he had done it, and Eskridge admitted it was his fault.The complaint indicates Brian Echols has previously been convicted of attempted murder in Cook County, Illinois.George Eskridge has previously been convicted of second degree robbery in a case out of Johnson County, Iowa.Lonell Echols has previously been convicted of robbery out of Racine County.Eskridge, and Brian and Lonell Echols will be in court on June 1st for their preliminary hearings.Meanwhile, if you'd like to help out with Kendrai Walker's funeral costs, you can do so byCLICKING HERE.29th and Burleigh shooting with five victimsThis material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsThe Rochester area's four mass shootings in 2015 put Monroe County at the top of the list of upstate regions, according to data fromshootingtracker.com.Brooklyn, with its five mass shootings in which five people died and 25 were wounded, is the only one of New York City's boroughs or any other region of the state to challenge Rochester's four.Rochester's mass shootings resulted in six dead and 18 people injured — the highest number of dead for any community in the state. At the same time, Rochester's overall homicide rate in 2015 is not abnormally high. And "mass shooting" is in the eyes of the beholder.The website defines a mass shooting as "four or more people shot in one event.""The only requirement is that four or more people are shot in a spree or setting, likely without a cooling off period," the site reads. "This may include the gunman himself (because they often suicide by cop or use a gun to kill themselves to escape punishment), or police shootings of civilians around the gunman. The reasoning behind the latter being that if the shooter is arrested, he will often be charged with injuring people the police actually shot, as that is a foreseeable result of a shooting spree."The Rev. Lewis Stewart, president of the United Christian Leadership Ministry, said he was surprised Rochester was at the top of the list in the state, but placed the blame at the feet of the proliferation of guns in the United States and "a disconnect, a devaluation of human life.""A lot of these guns are stolen ... we have to head off this illegal gun trafficking that is going on in this country," Stewart said."This shows you that both the community and the police have to put their heads together and do a lot more teamwork in trying to head off this influx of guns and the killers using them against each other and taking each other's lives."John Klofas, a criminal justice professor at Rochester Institute of Technology, said the city has suffered through a difficult year (35 homicides and 208 shootings as of Thursday) but said the term "mass shooting" can conjure images of the Sandy Hook massacre and Columbine, which is not what has happened here.“There is a shared notion of mass shootings where the victims and the suspects don’t necessarily know one another on a personal basis so the motives are more general and less defined," Klofas said. "Usually when people think of these things, they think of Columbine or the movie theater or something like that. But it’s hard to define things by those relationships, so a count or a threshold is the appeal to measuring this stuff in some way. But I don’t think the Rochester shootings have born any resemblance to what we usually think of in the Colorado movie theater shooting or any of these, including San Bernadino."Rochester is on pace to reach shooting numbers of 2013 (228) and 2012 (218), after seeing a drop in 2014 (187).Homicides are about average at 35. There were 31 in 2014, 42 in 2013, 36 in 2012, and 31 in 2011."I think Rochester has not had a big history with these things (mass shootings)," Klofas said. "But this has been a year where we’ve seen a number of these and some bad ones.”Rochester Police Chief Michael Ciminelli said his department treats each case individually, believing that this year isn't abnormal or unusual."I don’t think there’s anything about the city of Rochester or the Rochester community that makes these things happen," Ciminelli said. "There are a lot of conditions and circumstances that lead to this."It’s just as hard as to say why was the incident in San Bernardino yesterday as opposed to somewhere else; or why was there a school shooting in Newtown; why did it happen in Columbine and not somewhere else. We try to understand the factors that are leading to violence. We’re very much focused on early identification of the disputes that result in violence and work on intervention and prevention. That’s how we’re focused."Rochester police said the availability of guns, which can quickly escalate disputes, and gang activity have played a role in the increase in mass shootings."We have noticed that the gang activity is causing a lot of disputes and violence," Rochester Police Captain Korey Brown said. "It’s between one gang and another gang. We’ve been aggressively going after different groups that are hanging out and that are causing a lot of our violence. A lot of the same people are causing our violence. A lot of them have been picked up and arrested since then. We’re actively going after other groups that are causing violence in the city."Rochester Police Commander Joe Morabito said each of the city incidents share similarities."The common denominator in these mass shootings that we’ve had in Rochester, all three of them were large groups, a person with a dispute, and indiscriminate gunfire," he said. "Two of them are directly related to unsanctioned house parties. Since two of the incidents that occurred were house parties, we’ve been aggressive in shutting down and not allowing these unsanctioned, spur-of-the-moment house parties. We’ve tried to attack the root of the problem."Here are the four mass shootings in Monroe County in 2015:April 25:A shooting spree in a crowded Gates bar claimed seven victims, one of whom died.David Alligood, 31, of Rochester, has been charged with opening fire in the Gates Pub shortly before last call on a Saturday morning. He killed his apparent intended target, Ricky C. Jones of Rochester. Bullets from Alligood's handgun also struck six other bar patrons, police said at the time. He is awaiting trial.Alleged Gates Pub shooter indicted on murder chargeMay 16:Four men were shot near188 Lewis St.and all four went in private vehicles to the hospital. Rickey Harvey, 29, Patrick Carter, 34, Joel Allen and Darelle Scott, 26, were were shot at least once in the upper body.4 men shot near Lewis StreetAug. 19:Six people have been indicted in connection with theAug. 19 mass shootingoutside the Boys & Girls Club on Genesee Street that killed three and injured four others.Raekwon Manigault,Johnny "JJ" JohnsonandJonah Barleywere killed by gunfire.Triple homicide on Genesee St.Sept. 9:Two people were killed and four others wounded in a shooting at a house partyon Woodward StreetWilliam James, 30, of Rochester has been charged with second-degree murder. Thirty to 50 people were in the house during the shooting and police had been at the house two hours prior to the shooting.Victim's mother begs for violence to endBuffalo had two mass shootings in 2015 with two fatalities and seven wounded. Syracuse had one with four injured. Albany and Binghamton had none. Newburgh had one that left five wounded.JHAND@Gannett.comWCLEVELAND@Gannett.comSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Baltimore police are investigating a shooting Saturday afternoon that injured five people.City police said officers were called about 4:36 p.m. to the 1700 block of North Broadway, where two men and three women were shot.Police said a 52-year-old woman was shot in her lower extremities, a 36-year-old woman was shot in the foot, a 27-year-old woman was shot in the chest, a 30-year-old man was shot in the stomach and leg, and a 23-year-old man was shot in the ankle.All of the victims were taken to area hospitals.No further information was immediately released.Anyone with information is asked to call police at 410-396-2433.Refresh wbaltv.com and our app, and watch 11 News for late-breaking updates.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.A District man died Tuesday night after he and four others were shot in front of a home near Capitol Heights.Officers were called to Pard Road near Glacier Avenue after a report of a shooting about 11:15 p.m. Tuesday, Prince George’s County police said. When officers arrived, they found Reginald B. Brown III, 18, and four others suffering from gunshot wounds, authorities said.Brown died shortly after he was taken to a hospital, and the other victims suffered wounds that didn’t appear to be life threatening, police said.Police said the shooting didn’t appear to be a random incident and detectives are still working to determine a motive or suspect.On Wednesday afternoon, friends and relatives gathered at the scene of the shooting.“He was getting a job and he was turning his life around,” said Brown’s cousin Nikki Washington as she sat on some steps surrounded by a dozen friends. “When it gets close it hurts.”Up and down the 4700 block of Pard Road, people were talking about the shooting and Brown.“He made everyone smile; people wanted to be around him,” said one man with a big smile who asked for anonymity for fear of reprisal. “He was good in football but not basketball.”Another young man in the block, who spoke on the condition of anonymity, said, “Reggie wanted to do something for himself.”Friends say Brown moved around often to avoid trouble and said they believe he wasn’t meant to be the target of the shots fired Tuesday. “He was a good guy, but sometimes good guys hang out with bad people,” said another elderly man who knew Brown and also feared giving his name.On social media, photos of a memorial appeared from friends who apparently knew him. Some posted pictures of “Lil Reggie,” saying he was “the last person I would expect this to happen” to, and his “life ended so early.”A $25,000 reward is available for any information leading to an arrest or indictment in this case.Police are asking anyone with information to call 301-772-4925 or, to remain anonymous, 866-411-TIPS.Dana Hedgpeth contributed to this report.Dana Hedgpeth contributed to this report.CLEVELAND, OH (WOIO) - A man was sentenced to at least 31 years in prison for killing one person and shooting four others on Mother's Day in Cleveland in 2015. Erik J. Vicario was sentenced to life without the possibility of parole for 31 years.On May 10, 2015, Vicario's girlfriend and her sister got into a physical altercation with several people who lived in an apartment building on Bosworth Avenue near Thrush Avenue in Cleveland.Investigators said Vicario who was 25 at the time went to the building with a 9mm handgun with the intention of shooting the people who fought with his girlfriend.He approached a crowd of people who were in front of the apartment building and opened fired.According to a press release form the Cuyahoga County Prosecutors Office four of the people shot were not involved in the altercation. Six children ages 6 months to 13 years were in the apartment building at the time of the shooting, they were not injured.Download theCleveland 19 News appandFirst Alert Weather app.Copyright 2017WOIO. All rights reserved.1717 E. 12th StreetCleveland, OH 44114(216) 771-1943A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Gallery: Bostwick Ave. Jersey City May 11, 2015JERSEY CITY-- Four women were shot on Bostwick Avenue in Jersey City late last night and five people, including one minor, have been charged in connection with the incident, police said.The women, three from Jersey City and one from Bayonne, all told police that they heard gunshots, but none saw who shot them at 11 p.m. on Bostwick near Martin Luther King Drive, police said.A 42-year-old woman was grazed by a bullet in the hamstring area; a 19-year-old from Bayonne was shot in the left shoulder; a 19-year-old from Jersey City was shot in the right thigh; and a 25-year-old from Jersey City was shot twice in the left foot and twice in the left pelvis area."Police responded immediately to the scene and witnessed a handgun being tossed from a fleeing vehicle, as well the discarding of another handgun from a separate vehicle in the area," Jersey City spokeswoman Jennifer Morrill said. "Both handguns were recovered."Decota Chisolm and Robert Warren, both 22, and Steven Howard and Hassan McNair, both 18, and a 17-year-old, all of Jersey City, have been charged with weapons offenses related to the shooting, police said.All four men appeared in Central Judicial Processing court this afternoon in street clothes with their hands cuffed behind their backs.Chislom's bail was set at $65,000 cash or bond. There was also a warrant from his arrest on a simple assault charge related to a Dec. 10 incident. His bail on that matter was set at $5,000 with a 10 percent cash option and that charged will be heard in Jersey City Municipal CourtWarren has an open robbery charge before Hudson County Superior Court John Young and Young will set his bail on the new charges.Bails for Howard and Hassan and were set at $50,000 cash or bond.Meanwhile, a resident of the neighborhood said this morning that she stayed inside after hearing the gunfire last night."I heard five, six, seven shots and I was in my house and I didn't run out to see who was shooting," said the resident, who chose not to be identified. "Everyone in my family was accounted for and we stayed inside."At 11 p.m. there are usually people out here, but it's not crowded and rowdy."The investigation, by the Jersey City police Cease-Fire Unit, is continuing, "and additional charges are pending," Morrill said.Jersey Journal Staff Writer Michaelangelo Conte contributed to this report.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesNEWARK, N.J. (CBSNewYork) —Four people have been arrested in connection withthe Mother’s Day shootingthat claimed the life of a 15-year-old boy in Newark, officials announced Friday.The shooting occurred during an annual event marking the opening of the motorcycle season, called “Blessing of the Bikes.” More than 2,000 people were in attendance when gunfire erupted at South 16th Street and 19th Avenue just before 8 p.m. last Sunday.High school football starAl-Shakeem Woodsonwas shot and killed.“All I know is that he was a good kid. … He did not deserve it,”Woodson’s heartbroken mother told 1010 WINS’ Rebecca Granet.Three other people were wounded in the shooting.Officials said Woodson was an innocent bystander caught in the crossfire between two groups involved in a longstanding dispute.“Two rival high school-aged groups had an ongoing dispute, which on Sunday they took to another level,” said Acting Essex County Prosecutor Carolyn A. Murray, who called the shooting tragic and senseless.Jaqeuce Spinks, 19, and a 16-year-old boy have been charged with murder and weapons offenses. Marquise Cephus, 18, and a 17-year-old boy are charged with gun possession.“Gun violence has taken the life of a young man destined for better,” said Police Director Eugene Venable. “This is the beginning of justice for the victims as their families continue on a long and arduous road through the healing process.”Mayor Ras Baraka said there was no link between the shooting and event, but he admits the city and organizers have to do a better job of planning such a large event.“I think the community, rightfully so, was outraged,” Baraka said, WCBS 880’s Levon Putney reported.“The reality is the police were there on the scene,” the mayor added.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Four people were wounded in a shooting in Northwest Fairmount on Thursday.The shooting happened in the 2300 block of Baltimore Avenue at around 2 p.m.Police said the victims were standing on the corner of Baltimore and McHenry avenues when a car pulled up and someone inside fired a shotgun at them.Watch this storyThebirdshotfrom the shell wounded the victims generally below the waist, police said.Dispatchers said it appeared none of the wounds were life threatening. No names have been released.Cincinnati police are calling this a targeted drive-by shooting.Police don't have a description of the car or who pulled the trigger, but officers said several people were inside the car.Police said this was not a random shooting and police are familiar with more than one of the victims.A few businesses on the corner have surveillance cameras.Investigators will try to use the video to track down the shooter.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Gallery: Vice Lords indictmentDETROIT -- A Detroit-based leader of the Vice Lords is headed to prison for more than 13 years after admitting he ordered attacks on two brothers who dared to leave the street gang.Burney Everett, 29, of Detroit, who's known by gang members as "Tank," ordered members "to search for two brothers who had left or attempted to leave the gang in order to harm them," the U.S. Attorney's Office says.Everett sent multiple cars to the victims' house, according to investigators."After a brief confrontation with the brothers' family members, Vice Lords member Antonio Clark admitted in connection with his own plea that he fired an AK-47 23 times, hitting the two brothers, their mother and a 15-year-old sister," the U.S. Attorney's Office said. All of the victims survived the shooting.According to federal prosecutors, Vice Lords gang leaders "have often targeted members who sought to leave the gang for physical beatings or murder."In exchange for pleading guilty to two counts of assault with a dangerous weapon in aid of racketeering and a count of using a firearm during a crime of violence, federal prosecutors dismissed more than a dozen other charges, including racketeering, witness tampering and continuing a criminal enterprise.In addition to Everett, eight other gang members have been indicted and pleaded guilty to crimes connected with the shooting:"The convictions related to the May 7, 2015, shooting are just one component of the federal government's prosecution of the Vice Lords street gang, which has led to the arrests and convictions of dozens of Vice Lords leaders and members over the last few years," the U.S. Attorney's Office said in a statement."In two trials during March and May 2015, juries convicted eight leaders and members of the Phantom Outlaw Motorcycle Club, many of whom were also leaders and members of the Vice Lords, for various crimes, including a mass-murder plot against a rival organization and the shooting of a member of another rival organization."(Related:Convicted Phantom Outlaw Motorcycle Club members want convictions reversed)Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesEvidence tape marks a dozen places where bullets struck a house in the 1600 block of South William Street during a gunfight early Sunday morning. SBT Photo/SANTIAGO FLORESChristopher L. AccetturaEvidence tape marks a dozen places where bullets struck a house in the 1600 block of South William Street during a gunfight early Sunday morning. SBT Photo/SANTIAGO FLORESChristopher L. AccetturaSOUTH BEND — One man faces criminal charges for his alleged role in a flurry of gunfire that left four people wounded early Sunday morning, but police were still trying to identify several more shooters a day after the melee.Christopher L. Accettura, 23, was charged with one felony count of criminal recklessness with a firearm and a misdemeanor count of carrying a handgun without a license in connection with a fight that broke out in the 1600 block of South William Street about 2:30 a.m. Sunday.Four men were injured in the shooting. The most seriously wounded, a 25-year-old man, was shot multiple times in the torso, but he was considered to be in stable condition soon after the shooting, said Capt. Phil Trent, a South Bend police spokesman.Another 25-year-old man was shot in the leg and elbow, a 28-year-old man was shot in the leg and a 19-year-old man was shot in the hand, Trent said.The violence started shortly after the end of the televised boxing match between Floyd Mayweather Jr. and Manny Pacquiao. Large crowds had gathered for the match at two separate houses — one on the east side of William Street and one on the west side. At one point, people from each house got in a dispute, and a crowd spilled into the street, Trent said.That’s when the shooting erupted, with multiple people exchanging gunfire.“Someone starts firing shots, and we have reason to believe shots are being fired in both directions,” Trent said. “By the time we get there, dozens of people are out there, and dozens of shots have been fired.”When police arrived, Accettura was still firing shots, but it was unclear whether he was responsible for any of the injuries, Trent said. Police were still waiting to interview some some of the injured men and were trying to speak with witnesses who could help sort out exactly who took part in the shooting, he said.Success!An email has been sent with a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.The news you need to start your day, sent weekday mornings.The day's top 5 news headlines, sent weekday evenings.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByDana Sauchelli,Kenneth GargerandTom WilsonSubmitMay 4, 2015|12:15amA University Heights man has been charged with murdering his roommate with a baseball bat, law-enforcement sources said Sunday. Cleto Chalche-Rivera, 39, beat the victim to death over a financial dispute, according to a police source. Israel Ramos-Lopez, 45, was found with his head split open in the bathroom of the apartment he shared with Chalche-Rivera on Morris Avenue near Commerce Avenue at about 12:30 p.m. April 13, police sources said. His roommate was arrested at around 8:15 p.m. Saturday, and faces weapons charges in addition to murder, according to police.Four people were shot Sunday after a Morris Heights party, cops said. The victims were leaving the house party on University Avenue near West Burnside Avenue at about 1:20 a.m. when a man believed to be in his 20s began to shoot at the crowd, according to police sources. A 25-year-old man was shot in the leg, another man, 55, was struck in the torso, and a woman, 22, sustained a leg wound. A 26-year-old man was grazed in the shoulder. The victims took themselves to Lincoln Hospital. No arrests have been made.Police knocked down the door of a Mott Haven apartment to rescue a woman in a domestic dispute with her boyfriend Sunday, cops said. When officers arrived on the 12th floor of the building on East 137th Street near Willis Avenue at about 7:30 a.m., they heard a woman inside crying and screaming, police sources said. Her boyfriend refused to open the door for the cops, so they smashed their way in and arrested the man, the sources said. The woman and her three children were taken to an area hospital with minor injuries. The boyfriend was also taken to the hospital for evaluation, the sources said. The name of the man has been withheld pending the filing of charges, cops said.A man studying in a Sheepshead Bay park was slashed and robbed Sunday morning by a pedaling pilcher, according to cops. The 28-year-old victim was sitting in Yak Playground at Coyle Street and Avenue Y at about 9:30 a.m. when a man on a bike approached him and asked to use his cellphone, according to police. As the victim handed over his phone, cops said, the thug reached into the man’s pocket and grabbed his wallet while proclaiming, “You are beat!” The victim tried grabbing the thief’s bike, but his attacker slashed him in the stomach with a pocket knife, police said. The thug then dropped the man’s wallet and phone and fled with just $10, cops said.The crook was described as being in his 20s, about 6-foot-2 and 160 pounds.An elderly woman was killed when she smashed her car into a pillar in Ozone Park, cops said Sunday. Carmela Ruotolo, 88, crashed her 2000 Hyundai at 7:40 p.m. April 20 at Crossbay Boulevard and Liberty Avenue, according to police. Ruotolo, from Howard Beach, was rushed to Jamaica Hospital, where she died April 24, cops said.A man was walloped in the head with a bicycle security chain in the West Village, cops said Sunday. An argument escalated into violence at West 13th Street and Washington Avenue at about 1 p.m. April 22, according to law-enforcement sources. Carl Wu, 20, picked up his bicycle lock-chain with the intent to cause physical injury and hit the victim, also 20, in the face, the sources said. The victim’s lip was split, and he was rushed to a nearby hospital, where he got several stitches, police sources said. Wu was charged with felony assault.A fight broke out in front of a Greenwich Village bar, and one man hurled a glass at a window, injuring people, cops said Sunday. Nathaniel Johnson, 40, allegedly chucked the glass at an open window in front of Author’s Tavern at Grove Street and Seventh Avenue at about 10:30 p.m. on April 23, sources said. The glass hit a bar on the window and shattered, striking two people with shards, the sources said. A witness followed Johnson north on Seventh Avenue for some time, and then police nabbed him, the sources said. He was charged with assault and criminal possession of a weapon.Police arrested two women who attacked each other outside an East Harlem party Sunday, cops said. The fight erupted on East 108th Street near Park Avenue at about 3:15 a.m., police said.Catianna McLeod, 30, told cops that Jessica Johnson, 38, bit her and used a Taser on her, police sources said. Johnson said McLeod punched and kicked her, leaving her with swollen eyes and a bloody nose, thee sources said. It is not clear what started the dispute. Both women were treated at Metropolitan Hospital and charged with assault, the sources said.Read NextIt’s war as DeFrancisco lobbies for Skelos’ spotShare SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationA gunman opened fire early Sunday, killing one man and wounding six others at a large party at a Germantown Street house.KEY POINTSUPDATE @ 12:30 p.m. (May 4)According to a news release from the Dayton Police Department, one female, 27, is in serious condition, and five others, aged 22 to 31 years of age, suffered non-life-threatening injuries.Victims conditions:Sex: M Race: B Age: 27 Condition: DeceasedSex: F Race: B Age: 27 Condition: SeriousSex: M Race: B Age: 24 Condition: Admitted/non-life threateningSex: M Race: B Age: 31 Condition: Non-life threateningSex: F Race: B Age: 22 Condition: Non-life threateningSex: M Race: B Age: 25 Condition: Non-life threateningSex: M Race: B Age: 24 Condition: Non-life threateningLt. Wendy Stivers said the location of the incident is an illegal liquor establishment, and the deceased male had been ejected due to his behavior. He reportedly returned with a gun and forced his way in. Shots were exchanged and there were multiple injuries.At this time, no arrests have been made.UPDATE @ 11:50 p.m. (May 3)A victim speaks out tonight about the incident around 4 a.m. that sent six people to the hospital with gunshot wounds and left one man dead early Sunday.” … so it was just crazy, fire, bullets was just flying everywhere, (he) came inside and was shooting inside,” said Desiree Johnson, a mother of four recovering from a gunshot wound.Dwayne Curtis, 27, of Trotwood, was found dead inside Germantown Street house in Dayton.Police are still searching for the suspect.Johnson described the chaotic scene as she and her friend tried to leave a party.“That’s all I heard was gunfire and the crowd turned around and was saying ‘no, go back, go back, go back they’re shooting.’ I never looked back after that, I just took off running.”Johnson wasn’t quick enough. The 22-year-old was shot in her right leg.“I felt a burning then a cooling sensation and I thought to myself, ‘I’ve been shot but I just have to keep going.’ ”She managed to get away and her friend drove her to the hospital. At least five other gunshot victims were treated when the person opened fire at the house on Germantown Street in Dayton.The police report lists the address as a “boot joint,” which is a phrase used to describe a place where alcohol is sold illegally.Johnson said someone checked her ID when she arrived, and that she thought it was a club.Neighbors said there’s never been an issue there before.“I don’t know what was going on in there. I know there was always people out there, you know, barcecuing and I thought it was a nice, quiet establishment,” said Martin Caldwell.Johnson said she didn’t know Curtis, but she had seen him at the event. It wasn’t missed on her that she and he were shot by the same man.“From the same gun, the same bullets took somebody’s life,” she said. “I’m leaving here alive, so emotions are just crazy because, like I said, I’m a single mother of four so instantly I think about my babies and … (feel) relieved that I could come home to them and I’m alive.”The bullet is still in Johnson’s leg, and she’ll have to get it checked out in a few days.UPDATE @ 12:30 p.m.:The Montgomery County Coroner’s Office identified the man killed in this morning’s shooting at a house party.Dwayne Curtis, 27, of Trotwood was fatally shot around 4 a.m. in the 2800 block of Germantown Street. Six other people were treated for gunshot wounds at Miami Valley Hospital after shots rang out during a large party at the residence.UPDATE @ 5:30 a.m.:A man was killed and at least six others shot at a residence on Germantown Street.About 100 people were partying when shots rang out around 4 a.m. at the house in the 2800 block of Germantown Street, said Dayton police Sgt. Andrew Zecchini.One man was pronounced dead at the scene. Medics took a woman with gunshot wounds to Miami Valley Hospital. Five other gunshot victims from the same party arrived on their own to Miami Valley Hospital.An eighth gunshot victim had a bullet wound to the leg. He was a block away at Lakeview Avenue and Blanche Street, but police are still investigating whether his injuries are connected to the house party shooting.Police are interviewing multiple witnesses and have not released information on potential suspects.FIRST REPORTPolice were called to reports of multiple people shot near the intersection of Germantown Street and McArthur Avenue.Crews responded to the call shortly after 4 a.m. today. Initial reports indicate at least eight people suffered gunshot wounds, and some of the victims have driven themselves from the scene to Miami Valley Hospital.We have a crew on the scene and will update this page when new information is available.HOUSTON - Six people were injured in a mass shooting at a downtown nightclub early Sunday morning, according to Houston Police.Around 1 a.m. police responded to a call about a shooting at Empire nightclub on San Jacinto at Elgin and found six people shot.According to HPD, two groups got into an argument inside the club earlier Saturday night.One of the groups left the club and as the second group was standing outside, the first group drove by and opened fire, shooting randomly.The victims' injuries were not life-threatening and they are all in stable conditions at local hospitals, police said.No other information is available at this time. This investigation is ongoing.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Released: Menasha police issue final report on Trestle Trail bridge shootingMENASHA -- Menasha police released a report on Thursday, June 11th on the shooting that resulted in four deaths on a recreational bridge. The report says the shooter had a long history of depression, alcohol dependency, suicidal and sometimes homicidal thoughts.Investigators say Sergio Valencia del Toro was intoxicated when he fatally shot two men and a child on the bridge before taking his own life on May 3rd.The report cites del Toro's behavioral health history which showed that while in the Air Force he had either sought or had been ordered to a number of behavioral health interventions. The report says in October 2010, he had gone to an emergency walk-in clinic because he was concerned about the intensity of his mood swings.Authorities say del Toro killed Jon Stoffel, his 11-year-old daughter Olivia and Adam Bentdahl. Stoffel' wife, Erin, was injured.The report also notes a surveillance camera located within a pavilion at Fritse Park captured some of what happened on May 3rd. The report says:Police interviewed Erin Stoffel three days after the shooting -- while she was recovering. The report indicates she told investigators she was walking on the bridge with her family when "she heard a loud bang; however, didn't recognize what it was." Her husband, Jon, and Olivia were behind her at the time. The report states when Erin Stoffel turned around, she saw a man had something in his hand -- "he said something to the effect of, 'you didn't see anything," and almost simultaneously brought the item that he had in his hand out of the bag and at that point he started to shoot all of them." Erin Stoffel told police "she remembers both she and Jon were shot almost simultaneously." She also told police "that her husband Jon said, 'May God forgive you' to the shooter.""It's still our belief that this was completely a random act," said Tim Styka, Menasha Police Chief.Erin Stoffel was released from the hospital on Friday, May 22nd. Prior to that release, she issued the following statement from her surgeon at Theda Clark Medical Center:This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsSecond suspect has been charged in connection with the fatal shootings on May 1 near 37th and Nash Street.Mario Lovert Granville was charged with two counts of first degree reckless homicide and three counts of first degree endangering safety.The first suspect to these shootings was arrested on May 8.Devon Loggins, who resides at the house where the homicides occurred,was arrested on May 8 for this crime.Loggins was charged with two counts of first degree reckless homicide, three counts of first degree recklessly endangering safety and possession of a firearm by a felon.The two homicides happened just before 1:00 a.m. on May 1 in the 3700 block of N. 37th Street.Two victims, a 25-year-old Milwaukee man and a 26-year-old Milwaukee man, died at the scene. Three victims, a 25-year-old man, a 26-year-old man, and a 33-year-old man, were all transported to a local hospital for treatment of non-life threatening injuries.CBS 58's reporter Sarah Barwacz spoke with the mother of the victim on the phone.The mother said the homicides stemmed from a family dispute that spiraled out of control.That mother said the homicide victims are an uncle, Damario Jones, and his nephew, Montrell Burdine.Family told CBS 58, Jones had a child with a women and the two families got into fight and it turned to gun shots.Many in the neighborhood were surprised by the loud gun shots early in the morning.Milwaukee Police continue to search for the known suspect.A pastor from Pastors United said their will be a vigil today at 37th and Nash Street for the victims. The vigil will be at 6:00 p.m. The pastor also says he's gathering with other pastors to create a center for people to resolve their resolutions.Pastor Malcolm Hunt says, \"We are looking to set up a conflict resolution center where people have a problem and they want to resolve that problem before violence they can give us a call we can sit down and talk it out instead of shooting it out or fighting it out.\"IMG_2104.jpegTrenton police investigate the scene of the crime on Wood Street.(Rich Cuccagna/Times of Trenton)TRENTON— Trenton police are investigating a shooting on a city street Saturday that left four people wounded, police said.One person was shot in the torso, two suffered leg wounds and the fourth person was grazed by a bullet in the 6 p.m. shooting on Wood Street, said Lt. Stephen Varn. The person shot in the torso was rushed into emergency surgery, Varn said.Additional details about their conditions was not immediately available.Wood Street was blocked off by emergency vehicles as the investigation by the Shooting Response Team was ongoing.Rich Cuccagna may be reached atrcuccagna@njtimes.com. Follow him on Twitter@RichCuccagna. FindThe Times of Trenton on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesPolice have released more information about the survivors of adeadly shooting at Gates Pubover the weekend.Officials had earlier identified Ricky C. Jones, a 37-year-old Rochester resident, who was killed in the shooting early Saturday morning.On Monday, Gates police identified the six other individuals who were wounded. They are:• Clinton Hankerson, 37, of Rochester• Shana Forte, 26, of Rochester• Timothy H. White, 29, of Rochester• Shirley Barnes, 33, of Rochester• Johniesha Hartzog, 27, of Rochester• Kamara Snead, 30, of RochesterHankerson remains hospitalized in intensive care and is listed in guarded condition. Forte and White are both in satisfactory condition. The other three victims have been released from local hospitals.David Alligood, 31, was charged with second-degree murder in the fatal shooting of Jones. Police said he was on parole for an earlier drug-sales felony. He was taken into custody near the Gates Pub, which is located on Hinchey Road in the town of Gates.Gates police chief James VanBrederode said the bar was filled with a normal Friday-night crowd when Alligood allegedly began firing at about 1:30 a.m. Police have said that they believe Jones was Alligood's intended target.The other six victims apparently were innocent bystanders who happened to be standing near Jones when the firing began."To my knowledge, the people didn't know each other and just got caught in the gunfire," VanBrederode said. "When you're in a confined area like that and someone decides to discharge a gun, every round is likely to hit someone."On Monday, VanBrederode said that his department was working with multiple agencies on the investigation, but that there was no new information to pass along at this time.SLAHMAN@Gannett.comTwitter.com/SeanLahmanAbundant sunshine. High 77F. Winds NNE at 10 to 20 mph..Clear skies. Low 47F. Winds E at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:08 pmBELTON — Twelve jurors decided the fate of Rico Doyle Tuesday afternoon, finding him guilty of capital murder after an afternoon of deliberations in the 426th District Court of Judge Fancy Jezek, according to media reports.Doyle pleaded not guilty in September 2015 to the shooting deaths of Kysha D. Edmond-Gray, 42, and Deanna Louise Buster, 38, in downtown Killeen on April 21, 2015. Doyle was also accused of injuring three others in the shooting.Lawyers for both the prosecution and defense in the capital murder trial rested their cases earlier Tuesday morning after testimony by a police officer. Closing arguments took a little over 90 minutes.The jury was comprised of four women and eight men.“Don’t let him get away, literally, with murder,” said Paul McWilliams, Bell County first assistant district attorney, in the last sentence of his closing argument. Leslie McWilliams, assistant district attorney, was co-counsel for the state.More than a dozen family members of Edmond-Gray and Buster crowded behind the district attorney's table during closing statements.In their closing arguments, Doyle’s defense attorneys, John Donahue and Jon Evans, outlined inconsistencies among the statements of the four civilian witnesses called to the stand. Some witnesses said Doyle was shooting from different places in the apartment complex and that he had been out at a club for most of the evening.The prosecution countered with the argument that while witnesses might have not been consistent on details of the chaotic scene, but they were consistent on several key points: "No one else had a gun that night and the only person shooting a gun was Rico Doyle, and that he shot all five victims," McWilliams said. "The defense is trying to distract and confuse."The final witness in the case was one of the first Killeen Police Department officers on the scene on April 21, 2015, recalled to the stand to answer questions for McWilliams and Evans. Lane Copelin, who is no longer a patrol officer with the Killeen Police Department, was one of the first officers to respond to the apartment where shots had been fired, according to court testimony on Tuesday.Testimony concerned the witness accounts of people at the scene, at least four minutes of which was recorded on Copelin's body camera and shown to the courtroom last week."You can see that people were not calm," McWilliams said to the jury while Copelin was on the stand. "Lots of people were saying lots of things."One witness told Copelin that Doyle "had entered the apartment and just started shooting, and he didn't know why," according to testimony.McWilliams said that witness account of events that night "never wavered.""He gave a description of the shooter, what he was wearing and what he was driving," McWilliams said.Doyle's attorney, Evans, said the witness gave a different statement at another time.McWilliams addressed the witness statements during closing arguments.McWilliams said forensic evidence indicates that all five people were shot with one firearm, a .45 caliber that belonged to one of the victims, Edmond-Gray. “It doesn’t matter how Rico got that gun,” McWilliams told the jury. “You need to put witness statements in context and look at the physical evidence.”Doyle also pleaded not guilty to aggravated assault with a deadly weapon on allegations of wounding three other people during the same incident, according to court records.If convicted, Doyle could be sentenced to death, said Bell County District Attorney Henry Garza.The trial officially began April 2 with the start of jury selection. Tuesday was the sixth day of testimony in the case.Doyle has been in the Bell County Jail on bonds totaling more than $1.2 million since being arrested in April 2015.RICHMOND, VA (WWBT) - Richmond Police said there are no suspects yet in a quadruple shooting in Gilpin Court Sunday afternoon.Police said the shooting happened around 3:45 p.m. Sunday in the 200 block of W. Hill Street, in the area of the Tiger Market. When police arrived on the scene, they found two people who had been shot in the leg, one who had been shot in the back, and a fourth victim that police said was grazed by gunfire. Adults and children were at the scene, police said, and a van parked nearby had been hit by gunfire.Police described all of the injuries to the victims as non-life-threatening, although all were sent to VCU Medical Center for treatment.Anyone with information that could help investigators can call Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000.Copyright 2015 WWBTNBC12. All rights reserved.5710 Midlothian TurnpikeRichmond, VA 23225(804) 230-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MONTGOMERY, AL (WSFA) - Five people were injured in a shooting in west Montgomery late Saturday night.Police responded to the scene in the 1800 block of Gibbs Court just before midnight, according to a news release from the Montgomery Police Department.Four women and a man were transported to the hospital with non-life-threatening injuries.At this time, there is no one in custody in connection to this shooting, according to police.Copyright 2015WSFA 12 News. All rights reserved.445 Dexter AvenueSuite 7000Montgomery, AL 36104(334) 288-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.They were three immigrant brothers who were trying to make their mark on the highly competitive limousine-service business.On Thursday, police say, a dispute over how to run the business sent the middle brother into a rage that left four members of his family dead before he turned the gun on himself in the north Phoenix home they shared."It's obvious that he went through great lengths to make sure each of them were dead," said Phoenix police Sgt. Trent Crump. He said each of the victims appeared to have been shot multiple times.Officers identified the killer as Driss Diaeddinn, 50. The victims were both of Diaeddinn's brothers, one of their wives and their mother.Diaeddinn's wife and his two children, ages 3 and 10, along with his sister, managed to escape and dial 911.Crump, a Phoenix police spokesman, identified the slain brothers as Dodi Fayed, 56, and Reda Diaeddinn, 38. Also slain were Kenza Benzakour, 76, the gunman's mother, and 26-year-old Meriem Ben Yahia, his sister-in-law. Court records show an alternate spelling of the last name as Diaeddine."Witness information at this time indicates there had been an ongoing business dispute between the three brothers. One of the brothers, who is considered the suspect at this time, obtained a semi-automatic handgun and ultimately shot and killed four family members," Crump said in a statement.He said the two slain brothers and the siblings' mother, Benzakour, were found downstairs. Police believe Benzakour heard gunfire in the 2,300-square-foot home and was walking down the stairs when she was slain.Police arrived after the shooting was apparently over and prepared for a standoff situation. They used a megaphone to try to communicate with the occupants, addressing the family in Arabic.After receiving no response, a SWAT team used a robot to search the house prior to sending in a dog and officers.When police went inside, they found Diaeddinn dead in an upstairs room with an apparent self-inflicted gunshot wound, Crump said. Ben Yahia was also found in an upstairs bedroom.Friends and acquaintances said.the brothers operated ExStyle, a discount transportation company, using SUVs and luxury cars such as Cadillac Escalades and Lincoln Town Cars.They launched their own business after working for ExecuCar, a large transportation company. Fellow drivers said the spinoff business initially appeared to be successful but said the brothers were under pressure to sustain their low-cost, high-volume business model."I knew Dodi really well, also kind of knew Reda, not Driss," driver Sunny Singh said. "I would hang around with Dodi; we'd go to the gym together. He never said anything about Driss or Reda, just always said, 'My brothers worked very hard.' Dodi was a very friendly person."He said Dodi Fayed had an easygoing manner."He was a forgiving person. He'd give me a second chance," Singh said. "Don't go to work on time? He'd let it go."Fayed also was a pastry chef who dreamed of opening his own Moroccan restaurant, called Chez Dodi, in Scottsdale. He worked on the restaurant for months, but the project dragged on and apparently never came to fruition.Zahi El-Rahi, another driver, said he worked with the brothers for a year and a half, ending in 2012.El-Rahi said he knew the entire family and would often visit home near 44th Street and Bell Road, where the slayings occurred.While El-Rahi described the family as close and hardworking, he said that Driss Diaeddinn was known as a hothead and that others knew to be wary of him."Some of the other drivers didn't like working with Driss; he had a temper," he said.Neighbors in the normally quiet neighborhood were shocked by the bloodshed. Don LeTendre said he used the transportation service at least seven times for trips to Phoenix Sky Harbor International Airport."They were very neat, very kind, great people," LeTendre said. "We had no issues at all.""I feel for whoever is left. It's a damn shame," he said. "My heart goes out to them."The family owned a second house on the south side of 44th Street and Bell Road, where they would store their cars to avoid encountering problemswith a homeowners association."It's unbelievable," said Keith Bronston, another neighbor. "You didn't have any idea what was going on behind closed doors."Gawi Mos, a family friend who came to the scene Friday afternoon, said he was shocked to hear what had happened. He said he was aware there were business issues, but the family members themselves were fine."It's a nice family," he said.LOUISVILLE, KY (WAVE) - One person is dead and four others are injured after a shooting in the early morning hours of Easter Sunday that spread to two different scenes.Just after 12:30 a.m., Louisville Metro Police received reports of multiple gunshots and/or victims in the areas of 40th Street and Grand Avenue in the Chickasaw neighborhood and also 28th and Dumesnil Streets in the Parkland neighborhood.[OTHER NEWS: Man shot dead in Portland Saturday]When they arrived at 40th and Grand, they found one male shot to death and two others with gunshot wounds.The deceased was identified as Ray Anthony Joseph Jr., 19.The other two victims were taken to University Hospital with injuries that did appear to be life-threatening.At 28th and Dumesnil, officers discovered two additional victims with gunshot wounds - a male and a female. Both of them were transported to the hospital and are expected to live, said police.All of the surviving victims are also in their late teens or early 20s, according to Smiley.Investigators believe the two scenes are related and all of the victims were shot during an altercation at 40th and Grand.However, these shootings do not appear to be connected to a homicide that happened a few hours earlier in the Portland neighborhood, said police.Police are looking for leads. If you have any information, please call the anonymous tip line at 502-574-LMPD (5673).Copyright 2015WAVE 3 News. All Rights Reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Fox 59by:Greg Margason - Digital ProducerDomonique StoneUPDATE: Domonique Stone was placed under arrest on April 12, 2015. He pleaded guilty to robbery resulting in serious bodily injury on Jan. 1, 2017. His other charges were dismissed. He was sentenced to 15 years in DOC followed by 5 years Community Corrections.INDIANAPOLIS, Ind. (April 10, 2015)– Police are searching for a man wanted for his alleged involvement in a shooting that lefttwo women and three children injured.On April 5 officers responded to the 5000 block of Wildflower Court, near West 59th Street and Georgetown Road, on a report of multiple people shot. Five victims were located inside the residence with apparent gunshot wounds and other injuries.An arrest warrant has been issued for Domonique Stone, 24, who is one of three suspects believed to be involved in the shooting. Stone faces charges of burglary, armed robbery, robbery and carrying a handgun without a license.A different suspect was seen entering a 2002 silver Ford Focus with Indiana license plate number WOJ856. This same vehicle was stolen during a carjacking earlier in the same afternoon.Anyone with information on the whereabouts of Stone, the identities of the other two suspects involved, or the whereabouts of the suspect vehicle is urged to call Crime Stoppers of Central Indiana at 262-TIPS (8477). Stone is to be considered armed and dangerous.SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.The victims in a shooting that took place late Sunday in Benton Harbor have been identified, according to our news reporting partners at WSBT.Benton Township Police Chief Vincent Fetke told WSBT 22 that officers from several different police agencies – including the FBI Violent Crimes Task Force – are investigating but said he will not speculate about what happened.Darell W. Craft, Jr. -- 20 was shot once in the torso and Deontae M. Poindexter was shot once in the abdominal area. Both are in good condition. Tevin T. Hayes, 24, was shot in the right hip and Dina D. Welch was shot once in the lower back. Both were treated for their injuries and released. A fifth person, Priscilla M. Anderson, 46, may have suffered a heart attack. Anderson was not involved in the incident. Police say that Anderson is in critical condition.Two people were treated and released, two other remain hospitalized after incident at Blossom Acres housing development.Two people were treated and released, two other remain hospitalized after incident at Blossom Acres housing development.Success!An email has been sent with a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.The news you need to start your day, sent weekday mornings.The day's top 5 news headlines, sent weekday evenings.Suspects in a stolen car twice fled from police who attempted to pull them over Thursday before arriving at a West Baltimore corner, shooting into a crowd and hitting four adults and a teen.The victims were taken to hospitals and expected to survive, police said. A 37-year-old woman was shot in the torso; a 39-year-old woman was shot in the leg; a 22-year-old man was shot in the leg; and a 15-year-old girl was shot in the arm, police said. They were not identified.On Friday, police said a fifth victim was discovered: A 39-year-old woman shot in the lower back. She was expected to survive.Officers heard gunfire in the 1900 block of W. Lanvale St. in Midtown-Edmondson about 3 p.m., but by the time they arrived, the suspects had fled, police said."What we know is that there were people in this vehicle that were brazen shooters," Baltimore police Capt. Eric Kowalczyk said. "They were willing to do whatever it took to get to this corner and fire those shots, and we need to get them off the street. ... They came to this corner, and they opened fire on a crowd."Police said they were looking for a blue Honda Pilot with Maryland tag 5BE1423.The Regional Auto Theft Task force, a team of officers from the city and surrounding areas, was investigating stolen cars about 1 p.m. when a police car's tag reader scanned the Pilot's plate, which generated an alert that the vehicle had been stolen. Officers tried to stop the Honda, but it quickly accelerated, police said, and the pursuit was called off to protect other motorists.Officers spotted the vehicle again and tried to pull it over, but it fled again, police said. The vehicle's description was broadcast over police radio, and officers were searching for it in West Baltimore when the shooting occurred, police said.Police said the Pilot pulled up to West Lanvale and Appleton streets, and an "unknown number of people inside the car fired an unknown number of shots," Kowalczyk said."I was at the window and I heard eight shots," said Janai Lewis, who lives nearby. She said she looked from her backyard and saw a teen or young man in a bush who appeared to be shot in the shoulder. From the front of her house, she said, she saw a woman in the street and another sitting on the curb bleeding from the leg.Police said they did not know of any motives Thursday.Lewis said the last few days have been marked by gunfire in the neighborhood, including five shots she said she heard Wednesday night. She and other residents said the string of gunfire began after Sterling Day was shot dead in the 800 block of Monroe St. on March 23 — about a block from Thursday's shooting scene."His funeral was today," said Lewis, 21.She said more officers should be posted on the surrounding blocks to watch for retaliatory shootings."They need to be here more, especially with the killing that happened and what's going on," she said.There have been at least 13 shootings this year involving multiple victims in the city, including two shootings that wounded at least four people each.Antoine Scott, 21, said residents are afraid they might get caught in the gunfire."I'm scared to raise my kids up in here," he said. "Killings after killings."Scott said he grew up with Day, who never knew his father and whose mother died several years ago. He described the homicide victim as well-liked and a good father to his young daughter."We were putting together money for his funeral," Scott said. "Bunch of crazy shooters. People just need to stop. … The black community is better than that."jgeorge@baltsun.comcmcampbell@baltsun.comtwitter.com/justingeorgetwitter.com/cmcampbell6RecommendedThere may be an issue with the delivery of your newspaper. 
				This alert will expire atNaN.Click here for more info.Recover passwordRegisterSuccess! —Manage subscriptionsShare.......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... ..........ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. — A month and a half after a shooting at Los Altos Skate Park left one person dead and six injured, police told a news conference Friday afternoon that the man who shot and killed a 17-year-old at a Northeast Albuquerque skate park did so in self-defense.Police said cellphone video of the encounter shows that the teen who was shot and killed, Jaquise Lewis, was one of the shooters firing at the skaters. However, they do not believe he was the first one in his group to fire shots.The fight began after members of one group asked to borrow a couple of skateboards from the other group, said officer Tanner Tixier, a spokesman for the Albuquerque Police Department. The first two skateboards were returned, but when someone asked for the third back, a fist fight broke out.ADVERTISEMENTSkipIt turned into a gunfight.Tixier said there was no indication the shooting was race-related or gang-related.Stills taken from a cellphone video depict many people fighting in a crowd before four muzzle flashes are seen, indicating shots were fired in the air. Two of the injured skateboarders – one wearing a yellow shirt and the other in red – can be seen in the video, and Tixier said one man in his 20s is now paralyzed and just gave his first statement to police at the beginning of the week.“We do believe that Jaquise Lewis was the one that fired those rounds against the other young man in yellow,” Tixier said. “We can’t see everything in the video, so we can’t say 100 percent, but we’re fairly confident that this is a picture of Jaquise Lewis shooting the individual in the yellow shirt.”Detectives have identified the man who they believe shot Lewis but are not pressing charges. He was not injured in the shooting.“We have had four meetings with the district attorneys showing them what we know at this point and showing them the full video,” Tixier said. “We’ve all come to the conclusion at this point that Jaquise Lewis was shot in self-defense.”Tixier asked for additional witnesses to come forward with information and said detectives have mostly only been able to interview the skaters, not anyone who was part of Lewis’ group of friends.No guns were recovered from the scene, he said.In an autopsy report obtained by theJournal, the Office of the Medical Investigator ruled Lewis was shot in the left back and left upper arm and “the range of fire for both injuries is best classified as distant.”Police said a person does not have to be facing another for a shooting to be considered self-defense.“He was walking back toward another group,” Tixier said. “He had already showed propensity to not only fire rounds but also threatened numerous individuals with a gun, and he was rushing back in the direction where there was a group of people.”Lewis should not have been at the park that night, according to Larry Gallegos, a spokesman for the Bernalillo County Youth Services Center.Lewis was under house arrest after being charged with negligent use of a deadly weapon and unlawful carrying of a handgun by a person under 19 in early March, according to his order of release.[photoshelter-gallery g_id=”G0000Nf2hN9XTxHM” g_name=”Los-Altos-Skate-Park-shooting-03-22-2015″ width=”600″ f_fullscreen=”t” bgtrans=”t” pho_credit=”iptc” twoup=”f” f_bbar=”t” f_bbarbig=”f” fsvis=”f” f_show_caption=”t” crop=”f” f_enable_embed_btn=”t” f_htmllinks=”t” f_l=”t” f_send_to_friend_btn=”f” f_show_slidenum=”t” f_topbar=”f” f_show_watermark=”t” img_title=”casc” linkdest=”c” trans=”xfade” target=”_self” tbs=”5000″ f_link=”t” f_smooth=”f” f_mtrx=”t” f_ap=”t” f_up=”f” height=”400″ btype=”old” bcolor=”#CCCCCC” ]“Being on house arrest means the CCP (community custody program) officer would have to give him permission to leave the house,” Gallegos said. “The night of the shooting, he did not call for permission to leave the house.”If Lewis had requested permission to leave the house, he would have had to be accompanied by a guardian. Lewis’ grandparents were acting as his guardians. They refused requests for an interview.On March 1, Lewis was at a friend’s house learning how to disassemble a gun, according to a court document filed in the 2nd Judicial District Court. Witnesses told police the gun went off and Lewis’ 14-year-old friend was struck in the buttocks by the bullet.Lewis took off but later returned to the scene and cooperated with police, according to the document.He told police he would show them where he had thrown the gun, but they were unable to find it, according to the document.Lewis’ friend told police it was a black Ruger 9mm handgun.Police have not found any of the guns fired in the Los Altos shooting, although they found casings. Tixier refused to say what kinds of guns police believe were fired.The assistant district attorney who was prosecuting the charge against Lewis of negligent use of a deadly weapon wonders if there is a connection between the shootings.“I’m certainly wondering whether the gun used in the case I was prosecuting was the same as in the skate park shooting,” Alma Rosa Delgado said.An attorney for Lewis’ grandparents said he does not believe the March 1 shooting is relevant to Lewis’s death.“If they’re taking the position today that suggests Jaquise Lewis died from someone acting in self-defense, give us the entirety of the evidence, let us, the community, judge this process,” said Ahmad Assed, a defense attorney representing the family. “Don’t let APD call the shots in this conversation. The African-American community deserves better; the whole community deserves better.”Assed said he requested all pertinent documents, including police reports, recordings and documentation of evidence from the Police Department, under the Inspection of Public Records Act. He said he was told his request was too burdensome and could not be completed at this time.“It’s been seven or eight weeks since this young man died, and we don’t have anyone charged in this process,” Assed said. “They presented an opinion based on certain photos, I want to be able to look at the entire video.”Tixier said police are not showing the full video at this time in the hopes that some of the people identified in the stills will come forward as witnesses.“If we show the video, there will be no way for us to corroborate if what they told us is accurate, or if they’re just reciting back what they saw in the video,” he said. “We need to hold it so we can compare their statements to us with it.”Copyright © 2021 Albuquerque Journal | Albuquerque, N.M. | www.abqjournal.com$14/moSubscribeOther OffersAlready a subscriber? Sign InOklahoma City Police are investigating after multiple people were shot in an apartment complex, Friday night.The incident occurred around 9:30 p.m., when police responded to the 1300 block of N. Stiles in Oklahoma City.Police confirmed there were four victims, one in critical condition.Witnesses said the victims were all shot inside an apartment complex in the area.Stay withNews9.comfor updates on this developing story.Donovan Worker raises his hand in a fist, pressing it to his neck. It's there, he says, that the man with rage in his eyes had pointed a syringe needle just inches from his throat."He said, 'I'm going to kill you,'" recalls Worker, a lean 24-year-old with a crew cut.Worker says he took a few steps backward, into his apartment bedroom, away from the man.The man followed him. He demanded car keys, Worker says, and kept screaming, "I'm going to kill you."Worker pleaded with the screaming man to believe him: No one in the apartment — not he, not his girlfriend in their room and not his terrified grandparents there in the living room — owned a car.Next came the punch to the nose, Worker says. Next came the gunshot.Mesa police say the gunman who terrorized Worker and his family on March 18 is Ryan Giroux, 41. Giroux was hit with a raft of 35 charges ranging from murder to kidnapping.Worker was the fifth man wounded in the Mesa shooting spree last week that injured five people and left one man dead.Ultimately, police say, the gunman fled Worker's grandparents' apartment on foot across the street and shot the sixth and final victim, Marcus Butler, 25, who survived.The morning manhunt ended when police arrested Giroux at a condo complex just east of where Worker and Butler were shot.The Republic'sinterview was the first for Worker and his girlfriend, Calisha Nez. Worker says his grandparents, Madeleine and Joe Holiday, are too scared to talk about the shooting.In one sense, Worker was victim number five in a string of six shootings — after the first, which killed a man David Williams at the Tri-City Inn in Mesa, the gunshots were seemingly random, the victims happening to step into the gunman's meandering path as he attempted to steal vehicles and flee.But in another sense, the family at the Mesa apartment was unique in their terror: Unlike the others, their home was invaded. When the gunman forced his way into their apartment, Worker says, he stole their sense of security.Photos: Mesa shootingA better lifeThis small apartment, an upstairs unit on the eastern end of an apartment complex called Sorrento, is where Worker and Nez planned to make their dreams come true. The young couple have dated for five years. They had saved money to leave their home in Page and move to the city.Worker would start barber school while Nez studied massage therapy.Worker's grandparents had been living in the Valley with an uncle. The four would find an apartment to share at Sorrento, near Emelita Avenue and Dobson Road.Nez got a job at Talking Stick Resort in Scottsdale. They learned how to use the bus system, and got lost so often that they taped a transit map to their living-room wall.They saved money for school by living together as a family, sharing expenses. Slowly, they were making a home in the city, Nez said.Until that morning when a gunman, who had seen Worker's grandmother on the balcony, knocked on the Army-green door.It's difficult to relive what happened that day because the terror is still fresh, said Nez and Worker, speaking from the doorway of their second-floor apartment.It was morning. No one inside the apartment could have imagined a gunman had already shot four people and was now on their doorstep. Worker said his grandparents unknowingly answered the door.When Worker heard voices in the living room, he came out of his bedroom, where he had been asleep with Nez. He figured it was a friend or a relative.That's when the man grabbed one of his grandfather's insulin needles and threatened to kill Worker, he says. That's when Worker stepped back into his room.Worker's girlfriend, Calisha Nez, a petite 24-year-old with raven-black hair, had been sleeping next to Worker that morning. It was her day off work. She had planned to tackle chores and take her family out to eat.She woke that morning to the sound of a stranger attacking her boyfriend. She sat paralyzed with terror as Worker bargained for their lives."I told him we don't have a car," Worker says. The man didn't believe him."He punched me," Worker says, putting his hand to his nose where he had been struck. The blow caused Worker to fall. The man raised a gun. He loomed over Worker's body."He shot me," Worker says, his eyes growing wide with fear as he relived the attack. He glanced at his arm where a bullet had ripped through his muscle, fracturing his bone.Having just wounded Worker, Nez says, the gunman ran from the apartment as quickly as he'd forced his way in.Nez, with her eyes cast down, fixed on the ground, recalls rushing to Worker's grandparents in the living room. "I said stay in the house, lock the door," she said. "I ran back to Donovan."She found her boyfriend on ground. There was blood everywhere."I called 911," she says. Nez waited by Worker's side. Soon a police SWAT team arrived. They rushed Worker to an ambulance that took him to Chandler Regional Medical Center.Fear remainsWorker was released that day. But the family didn't return to their home until Sunday, four days after the shooting, Nez said. Reporters had left them notes asking for interviews."We didn't want to talk about it," Nez says.They can't find peace of mind there."There's ambulances all the time around here," Nez says. "Grandma and Grandpa hear that and get scared."Now, a knock at the door brings to mind the sound of gunshots. And the sick fear of death.Fear keeps Worker's grandparents awake at night. Nez hasn't been able to go back to work. Worker looks out the small kitchen window before answering the door.His arm and shoulder are covered with purplish-black bruises from the bullet wound. Doctors haven't said how long it will take for Worker to regain use of his hand. He worries the injury will delay his job search and his dream of starting barber school.Nez is sad when she says that they are moving out. It's the only way they can think to shake their fears.They are hoping apartment managers will understand and let them out of their lease.They're worried about money, but hopeful for a fresh start in a new apartment. They imagine a place with a locked gate, high fences and security cameras to monitor the grounds."Somewhere we'll feel safe," Nez says.STOCKTON, Calif. — Three people were killed and four people were wounded in an apparent drive-by shooting at a Northern California convenience store that one official called one of the worst mass shootings in the city’s recent history.Stockton police spokesman Officer Joe Silva also says the shooting was in a crime-ridden area known for drug deals and is likely gang-related.A 27-year-old woman was shot to death Tuesday night on a sidewalk outside the Madison Market, and a 24-year-old man and a 20-year-old woman died later at a hospital, police said.Four men in their 20s and 30s were found inside the small market and taken to hospitals. The victims — ages 24, 25, 32 and 38 — are expected to survive, Silva said.No arrests have been made, and it is not yet known if there were multiple shooters.Police are interviewing witnesses, some of whom said they heard up to 40 gunshots. Dozens of people gathered in the area after the shooting, and additional officers were called in to help control the crowd.Police did not release the names or any other details on the victims.Commenting is no longer available on Columbian.com. Please visit ourFacebook pageto leave comments on local stories.COMPTON (CBSLA.com)— Two female minors and two adult men reportedly were shot at a birthday party in Compton shortly after midnight Sunday.Around 30 people, including women and children, were at a home in the 2700 block of West Alondra Boulevard when shots rang out around 12:15 a.m., the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department reported.Deputies listed one of the victims as an 8-year-old girl and two of the men were said to be in their 20s.The four victims were transported to a hospital and all are expected to survive their injuries.A man was seen fleeing the scene but officials have not made any arrests.Anyone with information is urged to contact police.A Chicago church deacon was gunned down on his couch as bullets ripped through his family's home.Odell Branch Sr., 77, was settling in for ice cream and westerns with his 5-year-old great-grandson on Monday when the gunfire erupted, killing him and grazing the boy's arm,the Chicago Tribune reported."They took my soul," Branch's wife, Irene Branch, told reporters gathered on her doorstep. "I can't help but be angry."The bullets also shattered a mini van's windows and wounded a mother and her 2-year-old son who were outside the house.The toddler was shot in the right shoulder,ABC 7 reported.It was a quiet evening before the 6:30 p.m. shooting.Irene Branch had just returned from the store when bullets rained through the family's door, inches below a "Stop Killing People"sticker. Relatives dived for safety, and Branch never got up."They said, 'Dad, dad,' and he didn't move,"Irene Branch told the Chicago Tribune. "And they touched him, and they saw blood, and they called the paramedics."I felt him — I believe he was gone, right there on that floor."The 2-year-old was in critical condition, and his mother was in stable condition, the paper reported.Police suspect the victims were caught in the crossfire of rival gangs,CBS Chicago reported. Branch's grandson may have been with the second group, which returned fire, according to the station.Police detained several people while investigating the attack but hadn't filed any charges."They took my husband's life,"Irene Branch told WGN-TV. "Oh my God."ON A MOBILE DEVICE?SEE THE VIDEO HERE.dmmurphy@nydailynews.comTrending:San Bernardino forensics investigators work a shooting scene in March at an Arco gas station that left one man dead.A man wearing a white hoodie glanced up at a surveillance camera at a San Bernardino convenience store and moments later, he was a shooter involved in one of two incidents early March 4 that led to the deaths of three men, police investigators testified in court.A string of San Bernardino police investigators testified during a preliminary hearing Thursday, April 16, in a case against Richard Allen Wynne, 30, of Victorville, in San Bernardino County Superior Court.After the hearing, Judge William Jefferson Powell ruled there was sufficient evidence to try Wynne on charges he killed Petetrial Michael Terry Scott, 28, of Inglewood, and attempted to kill Scott’s his cousin, Richard Ford, 28, of Victorville, and that the acts were committed in furtherance of a criminal street gang.Wynne faces a court hearing April 30.Ford was not injured outside the Arco gas station at Redlands Boulevard and Waterman Avenue, but Powell said the shooting took place very quickly, and it was a close call.A second shooter seen in the store video has not been identified.About 10 minutes earlier, gang-related gunfire fatally wounded two other men outside the Stinger’s Bar & Nightclub in the 100 block of West Club Center Drive, about three blocks from the Arco AM/PM gas station and market.Deputy District Attorney Donna Kaufman showed about five minutes of the Arco surveillance video in two segments, one where the man police identified as Wynne entered the store and a longer segment that shows Ford pulling up to the store and the moments leading up to the shooting.In the footage, the two assailants “asked Mr. Ford and his cousin where they were from,” San Bernardino police Detective Albert Tello testified.Ford was wearing a vest associated with a motorcycle club and told the suspects he was from Compton. During cross examination by Wynne’s attorney, Richard Forquhar, Tello said Ford was sergeant at arms for a motorcycle club that was not identified. A sergeant at arms is considered an “enforcer” for the club, according to testimony.A heated argument ensued and as Ford tried to pull Scott away, “they opened fire on them,“ Tello said of the suspects.Tello had testified that Ford was not a member of the Deuces Motorcycle Club.Members of the Deuces had been at Stinger’s. Police have said gunfire erupted outside the nightclub hours after a security guard recognized members of an out-of-town street gang, considered possible rivals of the Deuces. The guard wouldn’t let the gang members inside the bar and they left at the request of police. After the bar closed, the gang members returned and the gunfire erupted. Police estimated 30 to 40 shots were fired.Killed outside the nearby bar were Teron Kenwood James Reed, 33, and Jerry Jamale Jackson, 37, of San Bernardino.Though Scott was gunned down at the gas station, police say both incidents were related and Ford’s car had been seen in video surveillance at Stingers.Detective Brian Lewis testified he recognized Wynne in the video because he had been a person of interest in a homicide case in 2014.Detective Joshua Simpson, a San Bernardino police gang expert, testified he consulted with Rialto police and determined that Wynne is a “shot caller and has a lot of juice” in his gang.Simpson said that violence is intended to “instill fear in the public and rival gangs” when gang members are willing to commit a brazen crime in public.Contact the writer:951-368-9075 orgwesson@pe.comGet the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.TANGELO PARK, Fla. — Orange County sheriff's deputies said they are searching for a gunman who shot four men in the Tangelo Park area.The shooting happened along Steyr Street shortly after 9 p.m. Sunday, deputies said.Deputies said two of the victims are in their late teens.Officials said three of theshooting victims were brought to Orlando Regional Medical Center in serious condition, but two victims-- an 18 year old and a 19-year old -- have since been upgraded to critical condition. A fourth person,who was shot in the leg,declined treatment.According to detectives, one person was hit outside of the home and the other three were believed to be hit in passing vehicles."We believe this is isolated to this one address here. After the shooting, everyone spread out to different parts of Tangelo to call 911," said Lt. Paul Hopkins of the Orange County Sheriff's Office.Investigators said there were three separate scenes in the Tangelo Park area connected to the shooting.The names of the victims have not been released.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.With 58 outbreaks tied to indoor dining in the past week, Gov. Whitmer is urging people to get carry out rather than eat inside.A bystander livestreamed the melee on Facebook where it went viral. Only one person tried to intervene in an attack on a postal worker in Flint.People spend all day staring at their phones, so when they get into the float therapy tank in Clarkston, they're introduced to a new kind of immersion. One separated from stress and anxiety that comes with the current events we keep up with.New details from the deadly US Capitol riot show Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand: “Clear the Capitol.”Franmil Reyes homered twice and Zach Plesac pitched seven dominant innings after getting an early lead to give the Cleveland Indians a 4-1 win Friday night over the Detroit Tigers, who scratched starter Julio Teheran just before the first pitch.Michigan State Police are investigating after a freeway shooting Friday night.A Georgia couple wanted to continue taking trips and long walks with their 16-year-old dog who had become immobile, so they created a specialized mobile dog bed just for their beloved Cocoa.The number of Americans applying for unemployment benefits rose last week to 744,000, signaling that many employers are still cutting jobs.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsBALTIMORE (WJZ)—A violent end to February in Baltimore, with a quadruple shooting that left one dead on Saturday afternoon.Alex DeMetrickhas the details.Most of a block was taped off, as Baltimore Police sealed off a mass shooting scene on the 4300 block of Welbourne Road in the northeastern part of the city.When officers arrived just before 4 o’clock one person was found dead in the street, which was littered with shell casings. That victim was identified by authorities on Sunday as 40-year-old Dwayne Reid.“They found four individuals that were met by gunshot. At this point, it looks like one person has passed. The other three victims have been taken to area hospitals where they are being treated for their wounds,” said Darryl Desousa, Baltimore Police Department.Collecting physical evidence is the easy part, determining what sparked the violence will take digging.“We have no indication what it may be about. We know the one victim that is deceased is not from this area,” said Rich Worley, Northeast Commander, Baltimore City Police Dept.Connecting the four victims to each other, and then to a motive and possible suspects, is still complicated by more questions than answers:“We’re trying to fit the pieces to the puzzle together at this time. It’s way too early for any descriptions of persons or vehicles,” Desousa said.When police cleared the crime scene, one patrol car was left, just in case someone might know something. But Welbourne Road sat mostly deserted, and neighbors kept to themselves.The identity and condition of the three victims’ hospitalized remains unknown at this time.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Daytona Beach News-Journal Online  ~ 901 6th Street, Daytona Beach, FL 32117~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.3:10 p.m. update: The man accused of killing four people, including himself, on Sunday in Killeen has been identified as Atase Giffa, according to police.Giffa fatally shot Lydia Farina, 31, and Larry Guzman, 40, around 10:25 p.m. at 1706 Godman St., police said in a statement. Giffa shot another person, a 41-year-old woman who has not been identified, who remains in critical condition at Scott & White Hospital-Temple, police said.Giffa then fled to his house at 1710 Godman with his 28-year-old wife, Dawn Giffa, police said. When officers entered the house around 12:25 a.m. they were both dead with gunshot wounds.Earlier: A man shot his wife and three other people before turning the gun on himself, according to the Killeen Police Department.Only one woman, 41, survived, according to police. She is in serious condition at Scott & White Hospital-Temple.Police have not identified her or the others involved because they are notifying family members about their deaths.But police think the man, 30, shot her, a 40-year-old man and a 31-year-old woman around 10:25 p.m. Sunday at 1706 Godman Street before fleeing with his wife to his house at 1710 Godman.Shots were heard coming from that residence soon after, and when officers entered the house around 12:25 a.m. Monday they found the bodies of the man and his wife, 28, according to police.They were pronounced dead at 1:19 a.m. and 1:21 a.m., respectively.3:10 p.m. update: The man accused of killing four people, including himself, on Sunday in Killeen has been identified as Atase Giffa, according to police.Giffa fatally shot Lydia Farina, 31, and Larry Guzman, 40, around 10:25 p.m. at 1706 Godman St., police said in a statement. Giffa shot another person, a 41-year-old woman who has not been identified, who remains in critical condition at Scott & White Hospital-Temple, police said.Giffa then fled to his house at 1710 Godman with his 28-year-old wife, Dawn Giffa, police said. When officers entered the house around 12:25 a.m. they were both dead with gunshot wounds.Earlier: A man shot his wife and three other people before turning the gun on himself, according to the Killeen Police Department.Only one woman, 41, survived, according to police. She is in serious condition at Scott & White Hospital-Temple.Police have not identified her or the others involved because they are notifying family members about their deaths.But police think the man, 30, shot her, a 40-year-old man and a 31-year-old woman around 10:25 p.m. Sunday at 1706 Godman Street before fleeing with his wife to his house at 1710 Godman.Shots were heard coming from that residence soon after, and when officers entered the house around 12:25 a.m. Monday they found the bodies of the man and his wife, 28, according to police.They were pronounced dead at 1:19 a.m. and 1:21 a.m., respectively.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Austin American-Statesman  ~ 305 S Congress Ave, Austin, TX 78704~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKTrending:LONG BEACH >> An adult and four juveniles from Long Beach have been arrested and charged with attempted murder in connection with adrive-by shooting Sundaynight north of downtown, police said Thursday.David Ham, 27, was the only adult charged; the juveniles were all 16. Ham is being held at the Los Angeles County Jail on $10 million bail.The Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office has charged the suspects with attempted murder, firearms and gang enhancements.The shooting happened around 9:40 p.m. on Sunday in the 200 block of W. 14th Street, near Cedar Avenue. When the officers arrived, they found four victims who had been struck by gunfire.Three of the victims were male adults and one was a 17-year-old male juvenile.  A fifth male adult victim who was struck by gunfire was found later at a hospital outside the Long Beach.All of the victims sustained non-life threatening injuries and are in stable condition.The day after the shooting at about 9:15 p.m., officers from the West Patrol Division observed a vehicle in the area of Orange Avenue and 17th Street that matched the description of the suspect vehicle from the shooting, police said. The officers observed the vehicle committing traffic violations and conducted a traffic stop to investigate.Inside, they found five individuals. The driver was found to have a suspended license and an outstanding traffic warrant for his arrest. A firearm and other evidence were recovered from inside the vehicle.Anyone with information regarding the shooting is urged to contact the Long Beach Police Department Gang Enforcement Section at 562-570-7370. Anyone wishing to remain anonymous may call 1-800-222-TIPS (8477), or text TIPLA plus your tip to 274637 (CRIMES), or visit www.LACrimeStoppers.org.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.CROCKETT COUNTY, TN (WMC) - Six people were hit in a Crockett County shooting early Sunday morning.The shooting happened outside the Malone Bar and Grill in Maury City. According to the Crockett County Sheriff's Office, approximately 30 rounds were fired.Two victims remain in extremely critical condition. One victim is in critical condition, and the other is stable.Three people suffered non-critical injuries, and may have been released from the hospital.Crockett County Sheriff Troy Klyce says they have no suspects in custody, but they are still investigating the situation.Copyright 2015 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.FACING MURDER CHARGESChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:The two alleged gang members were bound over for trial in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber and an innocent bystander in the Feb. 7 shooting at the Gifted Hands and Beauty Shop, 1219 N. Sheridan Road. They are also charged with three counts of assault and battery with a deadly weapon in the wounding of four other people at the shop.FACING MURDER CHARGESChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:The two alleged gang members have been bound over for trial in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber and innocent bystander in the Feb. 6 shooting at the Gifted Hands and Beauty Shop. They are also charged with three counts of assault and battery with a deadly weapon in the wounding of other people at the shop.CO-DEFENDANTSChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:Both were charged in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber who was shot while cutting the hair of the intended gang target.Related story:Rash of shootings in north Tulsa result of years of fighting among gangs, police sayRelated story:Two men Chadrick Colbert and Dezmen “Dash” Smith charged with murder in Tulsa barber shop shootingsTwo men charged with first-degree murder in a gang-related shooting at a Tulsa barber shop were bound over for trial Wednesday.Chadrick Colbert and Dezmen “Dash” Smith, both 24, arechargedin the death of Keith Liggins, a barber at the Gifted Hands Barber & Beauty Shop. He was shot as the business was closing around 9 p.m. Feb. 6.The defendants are also charged with three counts of assault and battery with a deadly weapon in the wounding of four others at the shop, located at 1219 N. Sheridan Road.Colbert and Smith were named in an affidavit for a search warrant filed in early July in Tulsa County District Court listing recent shootings that have resulted from agang feudbetween the Hoover Crips — Tulsa’s largest street gang — and the “Squeeze Team,” which includes members of several gangs.Three homicides have been linked to the feud, which has resulted in countless documented shootings with many more going undocumented, police say.The affidavit states that Colbert and Smith are certified Hoover Crips members, and that two members of the 5Trey Crips and the Neighborhood Crips — two gangs involved with the Squeeze Team — were shot at in the barber shop when Liggins, a barber innocently standing by, was shot and killed. A toddler was also receiving a haircut at the barber shop at the time, according to the affidavit.In court Wednesday, District Judge William LaFortune read the evidence that he found sufficient to take the case to a jury trial.He said Colbert had gone into the barber shop earlier that day, where he was threatened by the Neighborhood Crips member. Colbert then left and returned with a .40-caliber pistol and Smith, who was carrying an AK-47 assault rifle.Colbert entered the shop with Smith following him, and then shots were fired, LaFortune said.Court records allege that Smith intended to shoot a man whose hair was being cut by Liggins. Tulsa police homicide Sgt. Dave Walker has said the intended target fired back and that Colbert was struck in the buttocks.Colbert’s attorney, M.J. Denman, filed a motion Wednesday claiming that the state had not provided enough evidence to go to trial because no one who testified at the preliminary hearing could clarify who fired the first shot.LaFortune ruled against the motion, saying that regardless of who fired the first shot, Colbert and Smith chose to return, armed, to the shop where Colbert had been threatened and where they knew there would be an altercation.Colbert was previously arrested Aug. 19 after being named in the federal Operation Battlefield indictment, which addressed the Hoover Crips’ drug business in Tulsa. Fifty-one people were charged in the indictment, which alleges that the gang brought $10 million worth of cocaine and marijuana into Tulsa during a three-year period.LaFortune set the trial for Colbert and Smith on Feb 29and a status conference Jan. 11.Arianna Pickard 918-581-8413arianna.pickard@tulsaworld.comGet local news delivered to your inbox!Benjamin Robert Cole Sr., who turns 56 Thursday, now faces a federal charge of first-degree murder in Indian Country in connection with the 2002 murder of his 9-month-old daughter, Brianna Cole.Feds file murder charge in 2008 Tulsa County killing linked to McGirt rulingBenjamin Robert Cole Sr., who turns 56 Thursday, now faces a federal charge of first-degree murder in Indian Country in connection with the 2002 murder of his 9-month-old daughter, Brianna Cole.Feds file murder charge in 2008 Tulsa County killing linked to McGirt rulingDeputies responded to the eastbound lanes of U.S. 412 near Adams Road about 11:20 p.m. Tuesday to assist the Sand Springs Police Department with a crash that revealed three shooting victims.Deputies responded to the eastbound lanes of U.S. 412 near Adams Road about 11:20 p.m. Tuesday to assist the Sand Springs Police Department with a crash that revealed three shooting victims.The tribe has filed 440 criminal cases in federal court in recent weeks and spent $10 million on the effort, the tribe's attorney general said.McGirt v. Oklahoma: Supreme Court decision and aftermathThe tribe has filed 440 criminal cases in federal court in recent weeks and spent $10 million on the effort, the tribe's attorney general said.McGirt v. Oklahoma: Supreme Court decision and aftermathA Broken Arrow Second Amendment activist filed a federal lawsuit against the city and two police officers alleging he was subject to civil rights violations during his arrest at a park in 2019, though he was not charged with a crime.A Broken Arrow Second Amendment activist filed a federal lawsuit against the city and two police officers alleging he was subject to civil rights violations during his arrest at a park in 2019, though he was not charged with a crime.Officers responded to a midtown residence about 1:25 a.m. Monday and found the victim "beaten severely," according to a police news release.Officers responded to a midtown residence about 1:25 a.m. Monday and found the victim "beaten severely," according to a police news release.A stalking situation involving a former co-worker escalated into a violent kidnapping attempt Friday morning that left law enforcement officials grateful a south Tulsa woman and her husband survived.A stalking situation involving a former co-worker escalated into a violent kidnapping attempt Friday morning that left law enforcement officials grateful a south Tulsa woman and her husband survived.The 20-year-old suspect is charged with first-degree murder and shooting with intent to kill, among other charges.The 20-year-old suspect is charged with first-degree murder and shooting with intent to kill, among other charges.Jimmy Glenn Hendrix, 41, faces a first-degree murder charge in Tulsa federal court in connection with the shooting death of Jerrod Young, 26.Grand jury indicts death-row inmate whose state conviction, sentence are in jeopardy due to McGirtJimmy Glenn Hendrix, 41, faces a first-degree murder charge in Tulsa federal court in connection with the shooting death of Jerrod Young, 26.Grand jury indicts death-row inmate whose state conviction, sentence are in jeopardy due to McGirtDallas Gene Hastings, Justin Dale Little, Steve Wayne Lockler Jr. and Gary Dewayne Boggs are the latest state inmates to see charges filed against them in Tulsa federal court.Dallas Gene Hastings, Justin Dale Little, Steve Wayne Lockler Jr. and Gary Dewayne Boggs are the latest state inmates to see charges filed against them in Tulsa federal court.Oklahoma's multicounty grand jury returned an indictment against attorney Winston Connor II in 2018 on 10 charges, the most serious of which were solicitation for first-degree murder and a violation of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations, or RICO, Act.Oklahoma's multicounty grand jury returned an indictment against attorney Winston Connor II in 2018 on 10 charges, the most serious of which were solicitation for first-degree murder and a violation of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations, or RICO, Act.FACING MURDER CHARGESChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:The two alleged gang members were bound over for trial in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber and an innocent bystander in the Feb. 7 shooting at the Gifted Hands and Beauty Shop, 1219 N. Sheridan Road. They are also charged with three counts of assault and battery with a deadly weapon in the wounding of four other people at the shop.FACING MURDER CHARGESChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:The two alleged gang members have been bound over for trial in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber and innocent bystander in the Feb. 6 shooting at the Gifted Hands and Beauty Shop. They are also charged with three counts of assault and battery with a deadly weapon in the wounding of other people at the shop.CO-DEFENDANTSChadrick Colbert (left) and Dezmen Smith:Both were charged in the death of Keith Liggins, a barber who was shot while cutting the hair of the intended gang target.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Kevin McKinneyOpening statements began Friday in the trial of Kevin McKinney, who faces aggravated murder and conspiracy charges in the June 2015 killing of a witness against McKinney's brother, Douglas Shine Jr.(Cory Shaffer, cleveland.com)CLEVELAND, Ohio -- A prosecutor and a defense lawyer on Friday each called the case against a man accused in a conspiracy that resulted in the death of a key witness in a triple murder at a Warrensville Heights barbershop an "attack on the criminal justice system."But each claimed it was an attack for very different reasons.Kevin "Buffy" McKinney, 31, is accused of plotting the death of Aaron "Pudge" Ladson who was a state witness in the 2015 gang-related triple murder at the Chalk Linez barbershop.Assistant Cuyahoga County prosecutor Andy Santoli in opening statements said that McKinney helped hatch a plot, along with his younger brother Douglas Shine Jr., to hire a third man to kill Ladson to prevent him from testifying against Shine at trial."What this case is about is an attack on our criminal justice system," Santoli told the jurors. "It's about an attack on our constitution, and our community, to conspire to execute and eliminate a state's witness."Shine was eventually sentenced to life in prisonin December after he was convicted of a string of shootings including the Feb. 5, 2015 killing of William Gonzalez, Walter Barfield and Brandon White. Shine was also convicted of conspiracy to kill Ladson, who was White's brother.Defense attorney Jeffrey Saffold characterized the state's case as weak and relies solely on circumstantial evidence. He noted that investigators never found the gun used in Ladson's death, or any physical evidence like fingerprints or DNA that tied McKinney to Ladson's death."This is a murder, and it's still unsolved," Ladson said. "That's the real attack on justice."Prosecutors are expected to rely on a great deal of evidence from Shine's trial to lay the foundation for the conspiracy charge against McKinney.Ladson was in a car outside the barbershop when he told police that he watched Shine leave the shop with pistols. He later told investigators that Shine stopped at the car and told him "I spared your life." Shine threatened him in phone calls later that night, police said.Shine and McKinney came to believe that he was the only witness that the prosecution had, Santoli said.McKinney ran into Ladson at the Cuyahoga County Justice Center several weeks after Shine's arrret and called him a "snitch," Santoli said.A series of recorded phone calls between Shine in the Cuyahoga County Jail and McKinney show that the two men discussed how to find Ladson's name and address in court records. They used a burner phone to text Ladson's address to Lawrence Kennedy, and McKinney received a text message from Kennedy minutes after Ladson was killed that said "checkmate," Santoli said.Santoli said phone records, including data gleaned from cellphone towers, will show that the burner phone and McKinney's phone were near the same location in the weeks leading up to Ladson's death.Saffold sought to separate McKinney, whose nickname was Buffy, from his younger brother Shine, saying that McKinney moved out of the home when Shine was 6 or 7 years old, before Shine's stints in youth prisons began.When McKinney found out Shine was accused of killing three people inside the barbershop, he couldn't believe it, Saffold said. He "didn't give up" on Shine and continued to talk to him in jail, Saffold said. Then, police and prosecutors began listening to their conversations."Maybe the mistake Buffy made was he continued to maintain a relationship with Duke," Saffold said, referring to McKinney and Shine by their nicknames.Prosecutors are asking jurors to "lower the standard" of convicting a man of murder by not presenting physical evidence, Saffold said.To comment on this story, please visitFriday's crime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMcAvan Pub shootingA man walks into McAvan's Pub, at 1217 W. Fayette St., Syracuse, hours before the Super Bowl begins, the afternoon after a shooting at the bar injured six.(Michael Greenlar | mgreenlar@syracuse.com)SYRACUSE, N.Y. -- All six people shot at McAvan's Pub in Syracuse's Tipperary Hill neighborhood Feb. 1 are out of the hospital, an official said.A friend of 28-year-old Lawrence Gabriel's family, who is helping run a fundraiser to benefit the "hero of McAvan's," confirmed that Gabriel was recovering at home from four critical gunshot wounds.Gabriel, a bouncer at the pub, Army veteran and reservist, wrestled the shooter out of the bar after he opened fire, striking six people, police said.Gabriel was shot in his right arm and leg and twice in the abdomen, according to his uncle Jeff Gabriel. A metal rod was put in his leg and a metal plate was put in his arm, Jeff Gabriel said. In the week after the shooting, Lawrence Gabriel took steps, started eating solid food, and talked a little bit with his loved ones.The fundraiser for Gabrielhas collected more than $17,000.Lawrence Gabriel helped wrestle a shooter out of McAvan's Pub Feb. 1, 2015.The other five victims are no longer listed as patients at the hospital, the official said. Another was initially listed in critical condition, while two others were determined to have serious injuries.The other victims were identified as Douglas Spossey, Joshua Kennedy, Rich Lighton, Jake Palmer and Christina Voultsios.The shooting happened after Michael Morris, 22, of 1613 W. Onondaga St., kidnapped Spossey's sister and Morris' ex-girlfriend, Rebecca Spossey, after encountering her at a market on the city's South Side, police said. Morris forced his ex-girlfriend into a car at gunpoint, drove her to a cemetery twice and threatened to kill her, police said.Morris then forced Spossey to bring him into the bar, where her family and friends were celebrating a birthday, police said. When Douglas Spossey sensed something was wrong and tried to split them up, Morris shot him and continued to fire the gun, police said.Morris has been charged with five counts of second-degree attempted murder, second-degree kidnapping, second-degree criminal possession of a weapon and first-degree reckless endangerment, all felonies. He has also been charged with misdemeanor second-degree menacing.Morris is being held at the Onondaga County Justice Center without bail.Contact Julie McMahon anytime:Email|Twitter| 315-412-1992Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWATCHVIDEOSSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Three people were hurt and a teenager died in a Stockton shooting Monday evening, police said.Gunfire rang out about 7 p.m. at a home in the 1500 block of East Ninth Street, near Airport Way, the Stockton Police Department said.The three surviving victims, all hospitalized, have been identified as a 20-year-old man, an 18-year-old man and a 13-year-old boy, police said.The 18-year-old was listed in critical condition as of just before 10 p.m.The other two are expected to survive, officers said.It was one of the victim's homes where the shooting took place, officers said. The victims were found in the garage when police arrived, officers said.When police got to the house, just before 7:05 p.m., the 17-year-old -- now identified as Jose Novoa, per the coroner -- had already died at the scene.Detectives are now conducting a homicide investigation. They're not clear on a motive.There's no word on who is responsible, and a suspect description hasn't been released, either.This is considered a high-crime area of Stockton, a police spokesman said.A family member of two of the victims told KCRA 3 that his brother and cousin were among the injured.The relative who asked only to be identified as Miguel said the pair remained at the hospital as of late Monday night.The man who was killed was a barber, Miguel said.Miguel wasn't sure on the identity of the third person.Police on scene wouldn't comment.KCRA 3's Kathy Park contributed to this report.Stay with KCRA and KCRA.com for the latest information.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByLarry Celona,Georgett RobertsandDaniel PrendergastSubmitJanuary 26, 2015|3:33amThe Queens dad whomassacred his familySaturday blasted his baby mama to death in a fit of jealousy and shot his two daughters because he’d rather see them die than go into foster care after the attack, sources said.Jonathan Walker, 34, was overheard at a liquor store the night before the attack, telling anyone who would listen that he was convinced his common-law wife, Shantai Hale, was being unfaithful.“He believed she may have been cheating on him — possibly with more than one person,” a law enforcement source said. “He went and got drunk that night before heading home.”After pounding drinks, Walker skipped his nightclub security gig Friday evening. Flowing with liquid courage, the murderous man instead showed up around 5:30 a.m. Saturday at his gal pal’s Springfield Gardens home, where he methodically executed 7-year-old daughter Kayla and badly wounded her 12-year-old sister, Christina.“He wanted to kill the two kids because he didn’t want them in foster care” after he killed their mom, a source said.Walker then went to another bedroom and fatally shot Hale, 31, and her mother, Viola Warren, before committing suicide in his parked car at JFK Airport.“He destroyed a whole family,” said Hale’s cousin Joseph Simmons. “There are no words to describe how angry the family is. He is a loser. He is a coward.”Christina survived the rampage and managed to dial 911 to explain her father’s barbaric deed. She even opened the door for first responders.Relatives said Christina is in a medically induced coma and undergoing intensive care following surgery that involved cutting open her skull to ease brain swelling.“The doctors are hopeful,” said the girl’s uncle, Silford Warren. “Thank God the bullet passed through the part of her head that it did. She moved her head backward at just the right moment when [her father] fired and that probably saved her life.”Additional reporting by Kevin SheehanRead NextMore cops being attacked at Penn StationShare SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationGET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XTrending:Six people were shot and one victim was rushed to the hospital with life-threatening injuries Friday night after violence erupted at an 18-year-old’s birthday party in Jamaica Plain, authorities said.Five men and one woman, all between the ages of 18 and 22, were shot when an argument spilled onto the street about 11:15 p.m., according to Boston Police Department spokeswoman Neva Coakley. The unidentified victims were all taken to area hospitals.The fight erupted at a birthday party for a former resident of the Bromley-Heath housing project, which was taking place at the Anna M. Cole Community Center, according to Bill McGonagle, head of the Boston Housing Authority.Coakley said preliminary investigation shows the shootings may have been gang-related.One resident who lives near the community center told the Herald he heard about 15 shots. Another said she heard shots and saw people fleeing.“I looked out the window and saw all the teenagers running away. I saw everybody running and going crazy, the kids and the police,” she said, adding such violence occurs frequently in the neighborhood.“I can’t wait to get out of here, it’s not safe, not at all somewhere I want my kids growing up,” she said.Mayor Martin J. Walsh said the city still has work to do to combat gang violence.“Last year our shootings were down; we took guns off the street, but it just seems like a never-ending cycle here, and we have some real plans to address that,” he said. “There’s a whole host of gang activity in the city … it concerns me, and you have a lot of people caught in this lifestyle that think it’s the way to go, and it’s not.”McGonagle said proper procedures were followed Friday at the BHA-run community center.“I don’t know if there’s anything that could have been done to prevent this. We are going to take a look at the use of that hall to see if there are steps that can be taken so this doesn’t happen again,” McGonagle said. “Obviously what happened last night is tragic; the community center there has been used for decades for social functions like that, without an outcome like we had.”Mildred Hailey, the former head of the Bromley-Heath Tenant Management Corp., said the sense of community has diminished since the days the TMC ran Bromley-Heath.“It is not as strong, and that’s something that we have to recognize. We’re still committed to working to rebuild our community, because it’s our community,” she said.Sign up for email newslettersAdrian Perkins, 24, is one of three suspected gunmen in a Martin Luther King Day shooting that left two dead on the East Side.The last of three men charged with capital murder in the gang-related shootings last year at an East Side carwash on Martin Luther King Jr. Day has pleaded guilty to two counts of murder.Adrian Perkins, 26, waived his presentencing investigation hearing Friday before state District JudgeKevin O’Connelland was sentenced to 35 years in prison, according to court documents.Perkins,Jacquay Howard, 32, andEdwin Joseph, 26, had been charged with capital murder after their arrests in the wake of the shootings, which killed Royal Wylie Willrich, 30, andVontay Jamar Price, 22. Five other people were wounded.The three were known gang members who saw rival gang members and shot at them in a crowd around 10 p.m. Jan. 19, 2015, at North New Braunfels Avenue and Gibbs, police said. The incident occurred just hours after the city’s annual MLK Day march and celebration, which was held nearby.Video surveillance footage of the shooting helped police identify the men, who used an AK-47-style assault rifle, a .40-caliber handgun and a .380-caliber handgun.According to court documents, Joseph told investigators that he only shot once into the air after Howard pointed out their targets, told him to park, waited a few minutes and led the trio around a fence to begin shooting.Court records indicate Howard told a detective he fired four or five shots at Price and Willrich because they were the first two people he saw and that he fired in self-defense.After entering a plea, Howard was sentenced last week to 45 years. Joseph, who reached a plea agreement in July, was sentenced Friday to 25 years, according to court records.All three men pleaded to two counts of murder. They will have to serve at least half of their sentences before they are eligible for parole.ezavala@express-news.netTwitter: @elizabeth2863Elizabeth Zavala is a reporter and editor on the Express-News Crime Team. Born and reared in San Antonio, she graduated from Fox Tech High School in 1981 and has been a newspaper journalist since she graduated from Texas Woman's University at Denton in 1985. She has worked at five daily newspapers in Texas, including The Dallas Morning News, Fort Worth Star-Telegram and the Denton Record-Chronicle.MenuPortsmouth, Va. - Five people were wounded in a shooting at Pure Diamonds Lounge in the 4100 block of Portsmouth Boulevard early Tuesday morning.Police were called to the lounge around 2:00am for a large crowd and gunshots fired in the parking lot.Officers were unable to locate any victims on scene and began calling local hospitals.Two men and a woman were being treated at Maryview Hospital for gunshots wounds. One of those men was transported to Sentara Norfolk General Hospital for further treatment.Another man later walked into Maryview Hospital with a gunshot wound.A fifth victim was located at the scene. A man was grazed by a bullet but was not transported to the hospital. He was evaluated at the scene and released.The shooting remains under investigation.Anyone with information is asked to call the Crime Line at 1-888-Lock-U-Up.Report a typoWATCHVIDEOSZachary Locklear and Kathy Bell. Photos Courtesy: Cumberland County Sheriff's Department.Trending:The front door of the Fiesta & Restaurant Night Club, where five people were shot and wounded early Sunday during an event that included a visit by popular and controversial R&B star Chris Brown. According to San Jose police, gunfire was reported about 1:20 a.m. Sunday, Jan. 11, 2015 at the nightclub on Monterey Road near Rancho Drive and across the street from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. (Josie Lepe/Bay Area News Group)Bartender Edgar Jimenez, talks to the media at the Fiesta & Restaurant Night Club, where five people were shot and wounded early Sunday during an event that included a visit by popular and controversial R&B star Chris Brown. According to San Jose police, gunfire was reported about 1:20 a.m. Sunday Jan. 15, 2015 at the nightclub on Monterey Road near Rancho Drive and across the street from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. (Josie Lepe/Bay Area News Group)A Chris Brown's Capricorn Bash ticket on the floor at the Fiesta & Restaurant Night Club, where five people were shot and wounded early Sunday during an event that included a visit by popular and controversial R&B star. According to San Jose police, gunfire was reported about 1:20 a.m. Sunday, Jan. 11, 2015, at the nightclub on Monterey Road near Rancho Drive and across the street from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. (Josie Lepe/Bay Area News Group)Bartender Edgar Jimenez, center, talks to a woman who lost her car keys at the Fiesta & Restaurant Night Club, where five people were shot and wounded early Sunday during an event that included a visit by popular and controversial R&B star Chris Brown. According to San Jose police, gunfire was reported about 1:20 a.m. Sunday, Jan. 15, 2015 at the nightclub on Monterey Road near Rancho Drive and across the street from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. (Josie Lepe/Bay Area News Group)The scene at the Fiesta & Restaurant Night Club, where five people were shot and wounded early Sunday during an event that included a visit by popular and controversial R&B star Chris Brown,  According to San Jose police, gunfire was reported about 1:20 a.m. on Sunday, Jan. 11, 2015 at the nightclub on Monterey Road near Rancho Drive and across the street from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. (Josie Lepe/Bay Area News Group)SAN JOSE — Five people were shot and wounded early Sunday inside a packed San Jose nightclub that was hosting a visit by popular and controversial R&B star Chris Brown. The shooting sent the crowd into a panic, with many ducking for cover and jamming club exits.“There was screaming, pushing and running,” said Edgar Jimenez, a bartender at the Fiesta nightclub who ducked under the bar at the nightclub at 3840 Monterey Highway. “Of course I was scared, because you’re in the middle of a shooting.”According to San Jose police, the shooting started at about 1:20 a.m. at the club across from the West Wind Capitol Drive-In. Officers arrived to find four people suffering gunshot wounds, and they were rushed to a hospital. A short time later, another shooting victim walked into a hospital.The conditions of the victims were not immediately available, but police said all of the victims are expected to survive. Brown was not injured.The performer, with 13.9 million followers on Twitter, later tweeted “I’m 100,” a reference to being 100 percent OK﻿. Later, however, the official Chris Brown online forum was “temporarily closed.” A note on it asked fans to “check back later.”Video postedPolice said several people were detained in the aftermath of the shooting but would not release additional details.According to promotional materials and event attendees, Brown was at the nightclub as part of a VIP birthday event with celebrants including the singer’s manager. Local KMEL DJs Big Von and Black Marc were advertised as providing music for the event. The event fetched ticket prices starting at $50 and going as high as $2,500.Some celebrants captured the panic inside the nightclub and quickly posted the videos and audio recordings on social media, where news media picked them up. In the videos, Brown is seen performing when shots are heard and a scramble ensues inside the venue.According to promotional materials and attendees, the party was moved at the last minute from the Rockbar Theater on Saratoga Avenue in San Jose, site of the former Garden City Casino, because of capacity demands.The Fiesta usually features live Mexican “banda” music, a western genre featuring brass and percussion, but the venue occasionally hosts rhythm-and-blues and hip-hop performers.On Sunday morning, the grimy parking lot around the boxy nightclub was strewed with the signs of panic — broken cocktail glasses and abandoned scarves and women’s high-heeled shoes. Several celebrants who had dropped their car keys, purses or identification cards in the rush to get out showed up in the morning to retrieve them, only to be told they could not enter the crime scene.Most of them declined to speak to journalists, but the few who did requested anonymity out of fear for their safety. One woman said the shooting started when Chris Brown finally got on the stage near the end of the party.“The shooting started when he started the third verse of the song,” she said. “That’s when everybody leaned back or dived.”Footsteps awayBrown, who in the video is seen being swarmed by his security team and ushered away amid the commotion, is preparing to embark on a national arena tour at the end of the month, with a concert stop in San Jose on March 6 at the SAP Center.The best-selling, Grammy-winning artist has a fiercely loyal fan following even as he battles image issues stemming from a string of run-ins with the law. Those include violent incidents involving other celebrities and singers, most infamously a 2009 domestic-violence charge involving pop icon Rihanna, Brown’s girlfriend at that time. In August, Suge Knight and two others were shot at party co-hosted by Brown at a Los Angeles nightclub.Sunday’s shooting occurred just footsteps away from a Rancho Drive home that was the site of a double shooting in September that killed a San Jose man and his son. Two Pittsburg men were arrested in that case.The management of the Fiesta nightclub could not be reached for comment. Most employees leaving the building declined to speak to reporters.Contact Joe Rodriguez atjrodriguez@mercurynews.comor 408-920-5446.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersAuthorities in Orinda are looking into the possibility a deadly Halloween night shooting during a house party at an Airbnb rental was linked to aquadruple fatal shooting in San Franciscoin 2015.A victim in the Orinda shooting, Tiyon Farley, 22, of Antioch, is the younger brother of Lee Farley Jr., the man charged in the killings of four young men in San Francisco's Hayes Valley on Jan. 9, 2015, San Francisco police sources told NBC Bay Area.Another Orinda victim, Ramon Hill Jr., also was being investigated as a possible suspect in the 2015 homicides. Both Tiyon Farley and Hill allegedly were members of the "Page Street Mob gang, police sources said.San Francisco police are assisting in the Orinda investigation as to the possibility it was a retaliatory attack, sources said.In all, five people died in Thursday night's shooting at a home in the 100 block of Lucille Way in Orinda. No suspects have been arrested or identified, police said.In the Hayes Valley shooting four years ago, the four young men were killed while they sat double-parked in a stolen car in what was likely a gang-related attack, police said.The San Francisco Medical Examiner identified the victims in that 2015 shooting as: Yalani Chinyamurindi, 19; Harith Atchan, 21; and Manuel O’Neal, 22, all of San Francisco; and David Saucier, 20, of Antioch.In the wake of the Orinda shooting, city leaders there were set todiscuss the city's policies on short-term rentalsduring their regular City Council meeting Tuesday night.Meanwhile, an attorney for the owners of the home where the shooting took place released a statement late Tuesday:"The owners of 114 Lucille Way, Orinda are deeply concerned about the tragedy that occurred last Thursday night in Orinda and at the house they own. They are shocked at what occurred, and share the same sorrow that the Orinda community feels. The owners will not be conducting any future short-term rentals at their property, they have cancelled all their November Airbnb bookings, and they will not be renewing their short-term rental registration when it comes up for renewal in mid-November."A shooting on the night of Thursday, January 8, killed 24-year-old Alex DoSouto of Dorchester,according to Boston police.Three others were injured in the shooting. The two men, ages 20 and 22, sustained non-life threatening injuries, while a 24-year-old woman in the car was transported to Brigham and Women’s Hospital with life-threatening injuries.Residents in the area say to have heard between five and 10 shots, close together, around 10:45 p.m. A law enforcement official told theBoston Globethat the victims appear to have been targeted. No arrests have been made, and an investigation is ongoing.DoSouto is the first homicide victim of 2015.BPD’s full initial statement is below:At about 10:45PMon Thursday, January 8, 2015, officers from District B-2 (Roxbury) responded to a radio call for persons shot in the area of 104 Harrishof Street.Upon arrival in the area, officers observed four victims in a motor vehicle, all suffering from apparent gunshot wounds. One 24-year-old male victim was pronounced deceased at the scene, while two other male victims in their 20’s were transported by BostonEMSto Boston Medical Center with non-life-threatening injuries. A fourth female victim in her 20’s with life-threatening injuries was transported by BostonEMSto Brigham and Women’s Hospital.The Boston Police Department is actively investigating the facts and circumstances surrounding this incident. Anyone with information is strongly urged to contact the Boston Police Homicide Unit at (617) 343-4470.Community members who wish to assist this investigation anonymously may call the CrimeStoppers Tip Line at 1-(800)-494-TIPS. You may also text the word ‘TIP’ toCRIME(27463). The Boston Police Department stringently protects the identities of those who wish to remain anonymous and is interested only in your information, not your identity.Filed under:Alex DoSoutoHomicide Watch Boston is a community-oriented news site that aims to provide clear information about homicides and the tools necessary to record, report and share our experiences and losses within the City of Boston.Read more…Featured VideosHomicide Watch Boston is a community-oriented news site that aims to provide clear information about homicides and the tools necessary to record, report and share our experiences and losses within the City of Boston.Read more…Featured VideosOne person was killed and three others were injured in a shooting in Miami Tuesday night, police said.Miami Police said the shooting happened on the 1300 block of NW 62nd Street in Miami. Two men were shot at the scene and taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital.One of the shooting victims was in critical condition and later died, police said. The other victim's condition was unknown.Two women at the scene were grazed by bullets and treated at the scene, Miami Fire said.Witnesses reported hearing dozens of shots fired, possibly as many as 80. Other witnesses said they saw two men jump out of a car, open fire and jump back in and take off.The shooting remains under investigation.First-degree murder indictments have now been brought against three Roanoke men charged in two separate fatal shootings.On Monday, a Roanoke grand jury indicted Joshua D’andre Brown on a first-degree murder charge stemming from the May 17 death of Andre Dequan Webb.Webb, 24, was found shot in the 500 block of 36th Street and later died at the hospital.Brown, also 24, turned himself in to police the next day and initially was charged with second-degree murder.Search warrants have indicated that police believe that several people were present when Webb was shot and that multiple weapons were fired. Investigators searched a black Infiniti at the scene that had multiple bullet holes in it, and seized cellphones and bullet fragments, according to the warrants.Brown was also indicted on one count of using a weapon to commit murder. Because of his indictments, Brown’s case will now proceed into Circuit Court without a preliminary hearing.The grand jury also brought first-degree murder indictments against William Cabbler and Demetrius Wade.Cabbler, 36, and Wade, 39, were arrested separately aftersix men were shot early Jan. 4 during a large, late-night party in the 3600 block of Shenandoah Avenue. Four men were injured by gunfire and two others — Lenard Antonio Hamlett and Ronald Lee Ramey — died from gunshot wounds. Roanoke Police Chief Chris Perkins has said that based on the shell casings found at the scene, investigators believe more than one shooter was involved.Immediately after the incident Cabbler and Wade were charged with possessing firearms as felons, but in March they were indicted on offenses that included felony murder from discharging a firearm in a building. Felony murder is classified by state law as a killing that isn’t premeditated but results during the commission of a crime. The law does not require proof of intent to kill, merely that someone died as a result of a defendant committing a felony.A charge of first-degree murder, however, calls for prosecutors to prove premeditation. It carries a minimum of 20 years in prison and the possibility of a life sentence.“We’re tweaking our charges to make sure we’ve covered all the bases when we go to trial,” Roanoke Commonwealth’s Attorney Donald Caldwell said Monday. “Basically these are additional indictments in the respective cases to give us the opportunity to present legal arguments on different theories.”Both men still remain charged with a variety of lesser of offenses, including felony murder, and additional weapons offenses.Cabbler and Wade are slated to go to trial in July and November, respectively.With regard to the Shenandoah Avenue shooting — a crowded scenethat drew criticism from the police chief because of a lack of witness cooperation— Caldwell said additional information was still coming to light.“The circumstances about what happened were pretty confused at the time and continue to be developed,” he said. “People have been more forthcoming than they originally were.”Joshua D’andre BrownDemetrius Jermaine WadeWilliam Christopher CabblerGet local news delivered to your inbox!Neil Harvey covers state courts in Franklin County and the cities of Roanoke and Salem. Follow him on Twitter @newsharveyThe offense happened in July 2019, federal authorities say in a recent indictment.The offense happened in July 2019, federal authorities say in a recent indictment.Joshua D’andre BrownDemetrius Jermaine WadeWilliam Christopher CabblerGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.SHELBY COUNTY, TN (WMC) - Two men arrested in connection to a New Year's Eve party bus shooting were indicted and charged with 25 counts of attempted first-degree murder, according to the Office of the Shelby County District Attorney General.On January 1, investigators said two men began arguing with another man outside Ice Bar in the 4200 block of Hacks Cross Road. The man then got onto a party bus with 24 other people.Shortly afterward on Interstate 240, a Nissan Maxima corralled the bus by pulling in front and hitting the brakes, causing the driver to slow down. Investigators say two men inside at 2005 Chevrolet Tahoe pulled up alongside the bus. Investigators say the driver of the Tahoe, lateridentified as Robert Sanders, began firing shots into the bus.Sanders, 32, and the passenger in the Tahoe,24-year-old Ladarius Berry, were later arrested. Each man was charged with 25 counts of attempted first-degree murder, one for every person on the party bus.Copyright 2015 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WDTN.comby:wdtnmegankennedyMANSFIELD (WCMH) — Five teenagers were shot at a hotel in Mansfield overnight, officials say.All were males between the ages of 17 and 19,according to WKYC.The shootings happened around 12:30 a.m. at Spruce Hill Inn & Cottages, which is next to the Snow Trails ski resort.All victims are being treated at OhioHealth Mansfield Hospital, a representative of the Richland County Sheriff’s Officetold WKYC.There have been no arrests made.The victims include 18-year-old Marvin Patrick Parker, 19-year-old Darion Eugene Edward, 18-year-old Andre Cortez Craig, 17-year-old Jaquan Jabree Durrell, and 17-year-old Damauri Rawls, all of Mansfield.Deputies arrived after reports that one person had been shot. They arrived “to find three victims and numerous other people present,” according to WKYC. Two of the victims had already left to be taken to the hospital in a private vehicle.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.DAYTON, Ohio (WDTN) - One person was taken to the hospital after a car flipped on its top Saturday.Regional Dispatch told 2 NEWS that a car was reported on its top on North Gettysburg Avenue at Kings Highway at approximately 12:14 p.m.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY/AP) — A second lieutenant in the U.S. Army is suing two Town of Windsor police officers over a traffic stop during which the officers drew their guns, pointed them at him and used a slang term to suggest he was facing execution.Body camera footage shows 2nd Lt. Caron Nazario had his hands held in the air outside the driver’s side window as he told the armed officers, “I’m honestly afraid to get out.” One of the officers told Nazario, “Yeah, you should be!”CLEVELAND (AP) — An Ohio police officer who stuffed snow into the mouth of a man being arrested for domestic violence has resigned.Akron's interim police chief said Thursday that John Turnure submitted his resignation March 30. OP Akron Lodge 7 issued a statement Thursday defending the actions of Turnure, who is white, during the arrest of Charles Hicks II, who is Black.WALLINGFORD — One of the men arrested in connection with the killing of two people outside the Toyota Oakdale Theatre in 2016 alleges it was self-defense, according to the arrest warrant affidavit.Kyle Hampton, 23, of Half Mile Road, North Haven, is charged with two counts of first-degree manslaughter with a firearm, carrying a pistol without a permit and tampering with physical evidence. He is being held in lieu of $1 million bail and is scheduled to appear in court  Tuesday, according to online judicial records.Travis Ward, 31, and Jaquan Graves, 20, both of New Haven, were killed during a shootout following the performance of hip-hop artist Meek Mill. Concertgoers were leaving around 11:15 p.m. when gunfire was exchanged in the parking lot of the theater.Responding officers found Ward and Graves, both unresponsive with gunshot wounds, next to a dark-colored Mazda Protege MP3, along with three other victims who had gunshot wounds that were not life-threatening.It was determined Ward and Graves arrived in the Mazda with three other men, all of whom were initially “uncooperative” with investigators. Two of the men later told investigators an argument ensued in the parking lot between them and another group of men who were in a BMW and almost ran them over, the arrest warrant affidavit says.One of the men described Graves, who allegedly was in the middle of the altercation, as “highly aggressive.” The other alleged Graves threatened to kill the occupants of the BMW, according to the warrant affidavit,Shortly thereafter, the two men who spoke to police said, gunfire was exchanged on both sides, with multiple shots striking Graves and Ward. One of the men said he recognized the BMW’s occupants as members of a rival gang who had had previous feuds with Graves, the warrant affidavit says.A victim and a witness also provided investigators a detailed account of the incident. The victim told officers that, as the two separate groups were arguing, the driver of a blue BMW got out of the car and fired several shots toward the area where Graves and Ward were standing, the warrant affidavit says.The witness provided police with a description of the alleged shooter’s BMW and the first two letters of the license plate. Officers then cross-referenced the possible vehicles with a list of tickets purchased for the concert, and identified Hampton as a person of interest.On Jan. 20, 2017, officers obtained search and seizure warrants for Hampton, his residence and his BMW, and found 4.2 ounces of marijuana in his possession. He was charged with possession of marijuana greater than 4 ounces and taken to the police station, the warrant affidavit says.During an interview, Hampton admitted he attended the Meek Mill concert — officers had found a jacket matching the clothing description of one of the shooters and a Meek Mill concert ticket inside the jacket pocket. While he initially said he left before the shooting, he later said he got into his car and drove off after hearing gunfire. When officers asked Hampton why witnesses placed the shooter in his BMW, he said someone may have been using it as a shield, according to the warrant affidavit.Almost a month later, Hampton called police and said he wanted to meet to clear his name. This time, he told investigators he went to the concert with two friends and Tivon Edwards, 33, who is also charged with two counts of first-degree manslaughter with a firearm in connection with the Oakdale homicides. After initially claiming he went straight home after the shooting started, he said he had been involved in the altercation but only as a bystander, the warrant affidavit says.He said the other group of men was acting wild and aggressive toward his friends, and, upon hearing shots, he ran to the passenger side of the BMW and ducked down. Using his BMW as a shield, he said he leaped into the driver’s seat and took off, the warrant affidavit says.In November 2017, Hamtpon was again questioned about his involvement in the Oakdale shootings, following an investigation and his subsequent arrest for alleged illegal sale of marijuana.During this interview, he said a group of men from New Haven, which included Graves, was “acting crazy” and got into an argument with his friend after the group nearly kicked his friend’s vehicle, according to the warrant affidavit.Despite alleged attempts from Hampton and another individual to pacify Graves, Graves allegedly didn’t listen and continued to argue. Hampton said Graves claimed to have a gun and walked toward Hampton’s BMW with one drawn, the warrant affidavit says.Hampton told police he repeatedly asked what Graves was doing, but Graves didn’t respond, allegedly just continuing toward the car. Hampton said he opened the car door and shots rang out. Hampton allegedly once again asked what Graves was doing, but the 20-year-old didn’t answer. As Graves approached Hampton, he became scared, so he took a .40-caliber Glock out of the glove box and fired at Graves, Hampton said, according to the the warrant affidavit.Hampton said he retreated to the rear of the car and ducked for cover. After the shooting, he said he left the scene alone.He initially said he threw the gun somewhere after the concert, but later said he gave it to Edwards and didn’t know what happened to it after that, the warrant affidavit says. A database search revealed Hampton doesn’t have a valid pistol permit.The warrant affidavit says a male informer, who contacted investigators in early March 2017, told them Edwards allegedly said “people ran up on him” that night, so he and “Cousin K,” whom the informer knew to be Hampton, “took care of business.”The arrest warrant says Edwards’ statements and descriptions of events leading up to the scene are consistent with witness statements.jessica.lerner@hearstmediact.com; @jesslerner on TwitterFiled under:A 33-year-old man has died nearly two weeks after he was shot in amass shooting on Christmas nightin the East Chatham neighborhood, authorities said.Three men were killed and four other people were wounded in the shooting, which happened about 9:20 p.m. on Dec. 25, Chicago Police said. A group of people were gathered on the porch of a home in the 8600 block of South Maryland for a party when someone wearing a gray hooded sweatshirt walked out from an adjacent alley and opened fire before running away.Steven Freeman, of the 7600 block of South Normal, was shot in the body and taken to Stroger Hospital, where he died at 1:53 a.m. Friday, according to police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Also killed were James Gill, 18, who was shot in the head and pronounced dead at the scene; and Roy Gill III, 21, who was shot multiple times and taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he died, authorities said.A 35-year-old man suffered multiple gunshot wounds and was also taken to Christ, where he was listed in critical condition, police said. A 27-year-old man and 21-year-old woman both suffered a gunshot wound to the leg and were taken to Stroger, where their conditions were stabilized. A 39-year-old man shot in the foot later showed up at Roseland Community Hospital in good condition, police said.“We heard the shots and hit the deck,” a neighbor who asked not to be named said the morning after. “There’s people in and out of that house all the time.”Litter, including an empty bottle of Ketel One vodka and empty beer cans, strewn the lawn near police tape that cordoned off the crime scene.A police officer guarding the scene said at least five shell casings were recovered as the snow covering a patch of grass outside the home melted overnight.Area South detectives were investigating. No one was in custody.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.OZARK, AL (WSFA) - A Louisville man is facing attempted murder charges after a shooting occurred on Christmas morning in Ozark.The incident took place in the back of the Ozark Inn and Suites around 12:30 a.m. on Sunday.Four people were injured in the shooting and, so far, three of them have been released from the hospital. The fourth person is still in critical condition.Police say the shooting followed a verbal and physical fight at the hotel."There were people partying. They were going back and forth in groups and every once and a while, it would seem like a scuffle was going to break out and it would calm down and then all of a sudden, it was like a scuffle and gunfire all at the same time," said Terri York, a witness of the shooting.Roydricus McCray, 25, is accused of grabbing a gun after the altercation began and shooting into a crowd. He is now facing four counts of attempted murder."A lot of people, of course, left once the shooting started. I think they jumped in cars, were running trying to get out of the way. He had no regard for people's lives," said Marlos Walker, Ozark Chief of Police.Deep Patel, owner of the hotel, says the group involved in the incident were out of towners and they were checked in for two nights."This is a safe establishment, nothing like this has occurred here before and we're going to take preventative measures to make sure this doesn't happen again," Patel said.McCray bonded out of the Dale County Jail on Tuesday on a $400,000 bond.Copyright 2016WSFA 12 News. All rights reserved.445 Dexter AvenueSuite 7000Montgomery, AL 36104(334) 288-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MOUNT VERNON - Errol Hillary was arraigned MondayMondayon a second-degree murder charge in the Christmas morning shooting that left a nightclub co-owner, O'Neil Bandoo, dead and injured five other men.With about 20 people looking on, most of them apparently relatives and friends of the slain co-owner, Hillary, 39, appeared briefly in Mount Vernon City Court and was ordered held without bail at the Westchester County jail. He did not enter a plea. He is due back in court Friday.Spectators declined to comment as they left the courthouse.EARLIER: 1 dead in Christmas killing at Mount Vernon clubAt the club, more than two dozen candles stood outside in a memorial.A few passersby paid their respects Monday morning. One woman stopped in front of the candles and made a sign of the cross. Two men, who declined to comment, each wrote messages on candles and lit them.Kerry Ann Richardson lit a candle of her own with her 13 and 9-year-old sons. She said she didn't know Bandoo personally but said his death shook the neighborhood.At least one of the five injured people has been released from the hospital, authorities said. The four others remain in the hospital, according to a city spokesperson.The shooting took place as security officers were removing Hillary from The Mansion at 4 N. Third Ave. just before 4:30 a.m. Sunday. Angry about being thrown out of the club's late-night Christmas party, he took out a gun from his waistband and began firing, authorities said. Mansion co-owner O'Neil Bandoo was struck and died at the scene. The six victims were found in the lobby and on the street outside the club, police said.Security guards tackled Hillary but he scuffled to get away until police who were nearby arrived and subdued him, authorities said.Hillary was freed on $200,000 bond six months ago after being charged with attempted murder in the Bronx. He was accused of shooting a 38-year-old man in the shoulder on Boston Road in the Bronx on May 5. Hillary is due back in court Jan. 4 in that case.CBS17.comby:Patrick ZarconeMADISON, N.C. (CNN Newsource) – Deputies are looking for two suspects after a shooting at a Christmas party in North Carolina.Seven people were wounded at a private party in Rockingham County Saturday.Previous coverage:Pair sought after 7 shot during NC Moose Lodge Christmas partyA Mayodan mother is thankful her daughter is alive.“She could’ve been dead today on Christmas eve,” said Tammy Joins.Her 18-year-old daughter Daisy was one of the seven people shot during a Christmas party at the Moose Lodge in Madison.“I can’t believe somebody could do something like that with all those people’s lives at stake. Goes to show you there’s mean people everywhere,” Joins said.According to the Rockingham County Sheriff’s Office, more than 250 people were at the party when two masked men started shooting after 2 a.m.Daisy Joins was shot in the ankle.Previous coverage:7 shot at NC Moose Lodge during private party“People were arguing and then it calmed down and that’s when everybody was about to leave. It was calm and then randomly, people just started shooting,” she said.The Rockingham sheriff says people were trying to get away from the shooters. That’s why many of the victims were picked up at different locations. Daisy and one other victim were found at s Checkers on Highway 311.Two victims stayed at the Moose Lodge, one crossed the county line, another was found at a school parking lot and the seventh victim made it to a hospital in Reidsville.All have non-life threatening injuries.“Scary. I’m very lucky. It could’ve been a lot worse,” said Daisy Joins.Joins said she did not see the shooters.“No one did anything. It was just because they were mad so I do hope police catch them.”She said she doesn’t know who exactly threw the party but she said most of the people there were between the ages of 18 and 30.Deputies said there was alcohol available at the event.Joins’ mom wants the suspects caught.“There could be people dead today because of them going in there and being stupid and shooting. I hope they do catch them because I’m going to be there at every hearing they have,” she said.The suspects had their faces covered with ski masks during the shooting.The county sheriff said they were later seen leaving in a silver vehicle being driven by a woman.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.MOSCOW (AP) — Voters in Kyrgyzstan will cast ballots Sunday on whether to approve a new constitution that would substantially increase the president’s powers in this impoverished Central Asian nation.The referendum comes three months after Sadyr Zhaparov was elected president, following the ouster of the previous president amid protests, the third time in 15 years that a leader of Kyrgyzstan had been driven from office in a popular uprising.NEW YORK (AP) — A New York man is facing hate crime charges after police said he made threats and anti-Asian American remarks — to an undercover officer assigned to a hate crimes task force.Juvian Rodriguez, 35, was arrested Friday afternoon after the alleged confrontation near Penn Station.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY/AP) — A second lieutenant in the U.S. Army is suing two Town of Windsor police officers over a traffic stop during which the officers drew their guns, pointed them at him and used a slang term to suggest he was facing execution.Body camera footage shows 2nd Lt. Caron Nazario had his hands held in the air outside the driver’s side window as he told the armed officers, “I’m honestly afraid to get out.” One of the officers told Nazario, “Yeah, you should be!”CBS17.comby:Amy CutlerWILSON, N.C. (WNCN) — For more than three years, three families have waited for justice. Their loved ones found dead inside the Wilson County home they shared back on Christmas Eve 2016. Dereck Harris, 31, charged with four counts of murder.They came together Monday morning for the start of Harris’ murder trial only to learn the charges against the suspect would be dropped.“There’s really no words to explain it,” Jessy Taylor said.Taylor and her husband, Troy Starr were in court when prosecutors told the judge their case against Harris wasn’t strong enough to move forward.“There’s not much evidence, no concrete evidence,” Taylor said.Harris was accused of killing Taylor’s mother and brother, Tammy and Shane Pearce along with their significant others, Selby Outland and Nikki Privette. It happened on Banks Lane near Wilson.“I pretty much stopped even celebrating Christmas,” Taylor said. “My mom was an easy-going person. She could make anyone laugh,” she explained.Tammy was a fighter, she’d recently beaten cancer. Taylor still has the last text messages they exchanged.It took the Wilson County Sheriff’s Office almost eight months to arrest Harris. Investigators said Shane owed him money for drugs.“He has maintained his innocence from the very beginning,” Philip Lane, Harris’ attorney said.Lane said his client was relieved.Taylor told CBS 17 she believes they got the right guy.The case was dismissed without prejudice, meaning Harris could be charged again. Taylor said prosecutors assured her investigators would continue to work it until they find the evidence they need to move forward.Taylor said she was cautiously optimistic.More headlines from CBS17.com:Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.RALEIGH, NC -- People are packing the North Carolina State Fairgrounds looking to cure a common side effect of the pandemic with the return of the Southern Ideal Home Show."We've all been sitting home for the past year looking at our houses seeing all of the different things we'd like to fix," said Tina Robinson, manager of the Southern Ideal Home Show.DURHAM, N.C (WNCN) - An investigation is underway following an early morning shooting at Waffle House located in the 1600 block of TW Alexander Drive.Authorities say a woman was injured in the shooting. She was transported to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.DURHAM, N.C. (WNCN) -- Recently, grassroots political organization, Durham For All, sent a letter to Durham City Council.In it, was a demand for change.A suspect is in custody in an early Friday morning shooting at a nightclub that killed one woman and wounded three others, Birmingham police report.Linda Hall, 51, died after being transported to UAB Hospital, according to a press release from Birmingham Police. Three others, who had non-life threatening wounds to their legs and arms also were transported to UAB Hospital for treatment.The shooting happened about 3:30 a.m. in the 3800 block of Richard Arrington Blvd North at the GM Lounge.Officers from the South Precinct responded to the listed location on reports of four people shot, police said.The preliminary investigation by homicide detectives revealed that prior to the shooting, two males were seen circling each other in the night club as if they were going to fight. One of the males pulled out a handgun and began shooting at the other male. All four victims were struck during the shooting. It appeared all the victims were patrons at the club.The shooter fled the scene in a red Ford Mustang. The CRT and NET began actively searching for the suspect.A suspect was arrested and taken into custody four hours later without incident, police report. Official charges pending.Anyone withinformation pertaining to the case is asked to contact the Birmingham Police Department Homicide Unit at 254-1764 or Crime Stoppers at 254-7777.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Three 16-year-old boys and an 18-year-old man were shot Friday afternoon in the South Austin neighborhood on the West Side.All four were standing in the street at 4:47 p.m. in the 4900 block of West Hubbard when a dark-colored Jeep drove by and someone inside fired shots, Chicago Police said.The 18-year-old man suffered gunshot wounds to his lower right leg and left arm and was taken to West Suburban Medical Center along with two of 16-year-old boys, police said.A 16-year-old boy suffered a gunshot wound to the left calf and the second suffered a gunshot wound to his left ankle, police said. The third boy was shot in his right shin and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital.Their conditions were stabilized, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:A 19-year-old woman who was shot multiple times during a Roseland neighborhood home invasion and shooting that killed four other people last year died Monday.Shakeyah Jackson died at 6:54 p.m. Monday at Oaklawn Respiratory and Rehabilitation Center, according to the Cook County medical examiner’s office. An autopsy Tuesday found she died of complications from a gunshot wound to the head, and her death was ruled a homicide.The home invasion was a botched robbery of a drug dealerthat happened Dec. 17, 2016 in the 100 block of West 105th Street, prosecutors said earlier this year.Lionel Parks, 29, visited Elijah Jackson’s home twice that day, chatting with Jackson and smoking marijuana with him, prosecutors said.When he returned a third time that day, Parks and an unnamed friend were armed with handguns and forced their way inside the house, prosecutors said. The pair ordered the occupants to lay facedown on the floor as they ransacked the house for guns and drugs.Before leaving, Parks and the second gunman executed Elijah Jackson; his pregnant sister, Shacora Jackson; Shacora’s 19-year-old daughter, Nateyah Hines; and 46-year-old Scott Thompson.Shakeyah Jackson suffered multiple gunshot wounds and had remained in a coma, prosecutors said. She lived in the home where the shooting occurred.Thompson’s 22-year-old nephew survived by playing dead as he lay on the floor beside his uncle.Parks remains held without bond at the Cook County Jail on four counts of first-degree murder and two counts of attempted murder, according to court records. He is next scheduled to appear in court Thursday.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.CHARLOTTE, N.C. — Charlotte-Mecklenburg police are trying to figure out what led to a shooting that left four teenagers in the hospital late Saturday night in northeast Charlotte.IMAGES: 4 teens shot at Charlotte nightclubOfficers responded to the shooting call around 10:30 p.m. at the Spice Lounge on North Tryon Street, near Sugar Creek Road.Investigators told Channel 9 that when officers arrived at the parking lot of the nightclub, they found four wounded teens.Huge police presence on 4100 block N. Tryon after shooting@wsoctvpic.twitter.com/atAI6GrfxQThe victims’ ages range from 14 to 16 years old.All four were rushed to Carolinas Medical Center. One was being treated for life-threatening injuries and the other three were expected to be OK, officials said.Reporter Elsa Gillis spoke with a manager at the nearby Popeye's, Jonathon Owens, who was working when it happened."Probably like a group of 100 kids. They came swarming this way, they came to our drive-through," Owens said. "They started swarming like they were about to fight."Owens told Channel 9 that he and a co-worker went outside and asked them to leave. Moments later, they heard gunshots."There was a little girl lying right over there on the sidewalk holding her face. You know it was just like pandemonium, kids running around yelling 'This person got shot, that person got shot,'" he said.Spice Lounge is in a complex with a church, market and beauty shop. Some of the businesses told Channel 9 that this is not the first time the club has had problems, something Owens said has impacted their store."I guess they throw teen parties over there and whenever they get shut down the teens run up and down Tryon. They spill over into Popeye's and tear up our store," Owens said.Detectives told Channel 9 that they have charged a 16-year-old with possession of a firearm by a minor. Officers also charged an unnamed 15-year-old boy with carrying a concealed weapon, possession of a firearm by a minor and shooting in the city limits.Both juveniles were at the Spice Lounge during the shooting, and police said they found a gun inside the 16-year-old's vehicle.Officers told Channel 9 that the 15-year-old admitted to firing a gun into the air after the shooting occurred.some textOfficers have not said what led to the shooting but told Channel 9 that a party was being held at the club when the shots rang out in the parking lot.Detectives are still working to determine the identity of the suspect in the shooting.The owner of Spice Lounge declined to speak on camera because of the ongoing investigation, but said he has security in place at the club and his customers should feel safe.Read more top trending stories onwsoctv.com:Filed under:Four people were wounded in a shooting Friday afternoon in the North Lawndale neighborhood on the West Side.A 25-year-old man, two 18-year-old men and a 16-year-old boy were walking to the bus stop at 3:49 p.m. in the 1300 block of South Kedzie when they heard shots and felt pain, according to Chicago Police.One of the 18-year-old men was shot in the left arm and the other was shot twice in the groin and three times in the thigh, police said. The 25-year-old man was shot in the right foot and the 16-year-old was shot in the right arm. They were all taken to Mount Sinai Hospital where their conditions were stabilized.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Forty people were shot in Chicago over the bitterly cold and snowy weekend, including three attacks in less than 24 hours that each left four or more people wounded.Shootings normally decline when temperatures go down, but not this year in Chicago. At least 80 people were killed in the city in November alone. The deadliest weekend of the year so far was in late October. January started the year with at least 50 homicides.The result has been one of the deadliest years since the 1990s.  The number of homicides this year is more than 750 — about 60 percent higher than over the same period in 2015.  More than 4,230 people have been shot in Chicago this year, about 46 percent higher than this time last year.Among the attacks over the weekend wasa shooting in Fernwoodon the Far South Side where four people were killed and one person was critically wounded, according to police.Investigators believe someone in the home may have been selling drugs. A buyer likely came back to the house Saturday, broke in to rob the place and shot the five people, according to preliminary information from police.Two men and two women were killed. Another woman was hospitalized in critical condition. A 2-year-old child was in the home during the shooting. The child was uninjured but was taken to a nearby hospital for observation.On Friday afternoon on the Southwest Side, someone opened fireoutside a Brighton Park taco standand killed 17-year-old Daniel H. Torres as well as Arturo Zizumbo, a 47-year-old bystander. Two other teens were wounded, one of them critically.Twenty minutes later on the West Side, four more people were shot in Lawndale. Three teenagers and a 25-year-old man were shot in the 1300 block of South Kedzie Avenue and made it to Mount Sinai Hospital, police said.In another shooting, a man was wounded while in a car on the outbound Eisenhower Expressway early Saturday. He went to Rush University Medical Center with a gunshot wound to the knee. State police believe he was shot in the outbound lanes of the expressway between Ashland and Racine avenues.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneViolence across the Bronx and Brooklyn left a man shot dead, and seven other people wounded in four separate bloody scenes Sunday night.At about 7 p.m., a gunman shot two men, killing one, after an argument on the corner of E. 175th St. and Weeks Ave. in Mt. Hope. — the same intersection where a man and woman were killed in a double murder in July.One man, 41, was shot once in the head and died on the scene.The other, 25, is in critical condition at St. Barnabas Hospital later Sunday night, after the shooter blasted him in the jaw, right eye and back, police sources said.Cops were looking for a Hispanic man in his 30s, wearing a black jacket, who ran east on Weeks, police sources said."This block is known for violence. When you're raised in an environment of violence, you adapt to it," said a friend of one of the victims, who identified himself as Michael Garcia, 31.Garcia described his friend as a "neighborhood person" who worked at a Bronx Foot Locker store to raise money for his three children.Police have not yet released either man's name.Back on July 25, a would-be good Samaritan who separated a fight between a man and a woman on the same street corner returned to kill them both because he felt the man was "disrespecting him," police sources said.Cops arrested the alleged shooter, Luis (Crazy Lou) Chacon, 37, on Oct. 28, charging him with killing Yajahira Duvere, 37, and Beramy Garcia, 33.A month earlier, on June 11, a 32-year-old man was shot to death on E 175th St. and Monroe Ave., less than a block away.Shortly after 7:30 p.m., a 21-year-old woman was shot in the leg as she stood at a bus stop on the corner of W. Kingsbridge Rd. and University Ave. in Fordham Manor, cops said.A group of teens sped away in a silver minivan, and police believe the victim had gotten into a fight with them earlier, sources said. Medics took her to Jacobi Hospital. She's expected to survive.In Brooklyn, a fight between two groups of men inside a building on Knickerbocker Ave. near Jefferson St. ended with four men shot just before 6:20 p.m., cops said.Two of the victims -- a 65-year-old man shot in the buttocks and a 26-year-old man shot in the leg -- went to Elmhurst Hospital, cops said.Medics took a third victim, a 32-year-old man shot in the arm, to Kings County Hospital.A fourth victim, 25, showed up at Kings County Hospital, shot in the leg.Police are looking for three men who fled the scene in a gray minivan.Earlier Sunday, a 25-year-old man who tried to claim a parking spot outside the Hells Angels' East Village headquarters sparked a brawl that ended with him being shot in the stomach early Sunday, police sources said. David Martinez moved a traffic cone placed outside the Third St. clubhouse near First Ave. about 1:20 a.m., leading to an "all-out brawl," police sources said.Cops believe the shooter was a "prospect," not a full-fledged member, of the notorious biker group. Martinez, 25, was expected to survive, cops said.Five people were injured after a man kicked out of a bar in Baltimore's Brooklyn neighborhood returned and opened fire "indiscriminately," police said.At around 1 a.m., police say the man, armed with a gun, stood in the doorway of Maynard's Cafe at 3916 S. Hanover Street where he began shooting.Police said there had been a "disagreement," and the man was removed from the bar by security. He later returned and "indiscriminately shot into the bar wounding the victims," police said.Three females, ages 21, 32, and 49, and two males, 30 and 42 were injured in the shooting. They were all transported to area hospitals for treatment, police said.Police did not give any additional information about what transpired before the shooting.A manager who answered the phone at the bar Sunday said she wasn't working when the incident happened and the owner wasn't available for comment.Detectives are reviewing all surveillance video from the bar and surrounding area to identify the suspect, who police described as an African-American male with a slim build who was wearing a dark hoodie, dark skull cap and pants.RecommendedWATCHLIVE4 people shot at memorial service in Southwest FresnoCandles and stuffed animals left by neighbors rest Wednesday outside an Albuquerque after a deadly shooting. Authorities said George Daniel Wechsler, shot and killed the three children Monday evening as their mother frantically tried to protect them. Wechsle was an Albuquerque native and the brother of one of the stars of ABC’s Revenge television series. Russell Contreras/The Associated PressAngel figurines made by neighbors stand outside an Albuquerque home Wednesday, Dec. 7, 2016, where police say a gunman fatally shot three children and shot their mother before turning the gun on himself. Authorities said George Daniel Wechsler, 45, shot and killed the three children Monday evening as their mother frantically tried to protect them. Wechsle was an Albuquerque native and the brother of one of the stars of ABC's "Revenge" television series. (AP Photo/Russell Contreras)Candles and stuffed animals left by neighbors rest Wednesday outside an Albuquerque after a deadly shooting. Authorities said George Daniel Wechsler, shot and killed the three children Monday evening as their mother frantically tried to protect them. Wechsle was an Albuquerque native and the brother of one of the stars of ABC’s Revenge television series. Russell Contreras/The Associated PressAngel figurines made by neighbors stand outside an Albuquerque home Wednesday, Dec. 7, 2016, where police say a gunman fatally shot three children and shot their mother before turning the gun on himself. Authorities said George Daniel Wechsler, 45, shot and killed the three children Monday evening as their mother frantically tried to protect them. Wechsle was an Albuquerque native and the brother of one of the stars of ABC's "Revenge" television series. (AP Photo/Russell Contreras)ALBUQUERQUE — Three days after a deadly shooting rocked New Mexico’s largest city, police finally released the names Thursday of the three children who died inside their Albuquerque home as their mother fought to shield them.Investigators said 5-year-old Elijah Mascarenas, 6-year-old Olivia Mascarenas, and 9-year-old Ian Mascarenas died Monday shortly after the mother’s ex-boyfriend unloaded on the family.That former boyfriend, George Daniel Wechsler, 45, later turned the gun on himself.Authorities said Wechsler had briefly dated the 36-year-old mother, Cheryl Mascarenas, who was wounded in the shooting. Mascarenas is listed in critical but stable condition.“Evidence shows the mother fought valiantly to try to save her children and get them out of the house,” Albuquerque police spokeswoman Celina Espinoza said.Police say Cheryl Mascarenas recently broke up with Wechsler and asked him to stop calling. A few days before the shooting, police say Wechsler sought to bring the children Christmas gifts.It’s unclear how long the pair dated before they broke up.Last month, Wechsler was also transported to the hospital and underwent a mental evaluation after threatening to commit suicide, police said. It was not known if that case was connected to the mother’s demand to leave her alone.But Wechsler had a history of stalking and assault.According to court records, Wechsler pleaded no contest in 2003 to misdemeanor stalking and petty misdemeanor assault against a family member. He was also arrested in 2004 for reckless driving, but police say he had no felony record.Since the shooting Monday, Albuquerque police had refused until Thursday to release the victims’ names despite requests from national media outlets.Media outlets in Albuquerque have so far honored Albuquerque police request to withhold the names of the mother and the children.“The Albuquerque Police Department knows the family from the Stagecoach shooting and we as a community [cannot] fathom this unimaginable tragedy,” police said in a statement Wednesday.In a statement, Mascarenas and her former husband, Joshua, thanked Albuquerque police and other agencies for offering support following the shooting.“As the parents, we put our children before anything else in this world,” the pair said in a statement. “While divorced, we have always been a family, raising our children together and actively involved with the daily activities of all three kids.”The former couple then asked for privacy and asked that images of their children not be released.The Facebook pages of both parents are full of photos with her three children.Neighbors and friends have placed angel figurines and stuffed animals outside the Albuquerque home.Log InThank you for joining the conversation on Santafenewmexican.com.
Please familiarize yourself with the community guidelines. Avoid
personal attacks: Lively, vigorous conversation is welcomed and
encouraged, insults, name-calling and other personal attacks are
not. No commercial peddling: Promotions of commercial goods and
services are inappropriate to the purposes of this forum and can be
removed. Respect copyrights: Post citations to sources appropriate
to support your arguments, but refrain from posting entire
copyrighted pieces. Be yourself: Accounts suspected of using fake
identities can be removed from the forum.AdvertisementSorry, there are no recent results for popular videos.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Five people were shot Saturday afternoon at a wake in South Los Angeles, authorities reported.A fight broke out about 3:30 p.m. during the wake, which was held at a storefront near the intersection of West 91st Street and Western Avenue, said Los Angeles Police Sgt. Thomas Bojorquez.According to police, a man left the gathering, returned with a rifle and began shooting into the storefront. Some people inside the building may have returned fire, Bojorquez said.Police suspect the motive for the shooting was gang-related because numerous gang members attended the wake, which was held for a person who died of natural causes.Bojorquez said all five people were taken to local hospitals for non-life threatening injuries and all were in stable condition Saturday night. Police are investigating.ben.poston@latimes.comFollow@bpostonon Twitter.ALSOSlaying of beloved USC professor leaves colleagues and friends crestfallenUp to 40 feared dead in fire during concert at Oakland warehouseSammy Lee, diver who became first Asian American to win Olympic medal, dies at 96The perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsBen Poston is an investigative reporter specializing in data at the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsGallery: Bloomfield police investigate gunfireBLOOMFIELD-- The lounge wheresix people were shothas been temporarily shut down after inspectors found various code violations, officials said Tuesday.Bloomfield police, working with colleagues from Newark, were making progress in the "very active investigation" into the gunfire late Friday at Sports in the City Lounge on First Avenue, according to township Police Director Samuel DeMaio.The six people wounded in the gunfire -- residents of Newark, East Orange and Roselle -- were all treated for non life-threatening injuries, he said.DeMaio said investigators believe the shooting was targeted at someone attending an event at the lounge, but declined to comment in detail on a motive for the attack. Ballistics evidence showed three guns were used in the shooting, which occurred as 30 to 40 people were inside the business located near the Newark-Bloomfield line.A tipster reported someone was seen putting a gun in a vehicle at the shooting scene, according to DeMaio, who said police obtained a search warrant for the car. That search netted 12 bricks of heroin packaged for distribution and .357 handgun that was not used in the shooting.Officials also conducted an inspection at the business, where they found fire and health code violations, DeMaio added. The business was ordered closed ahead of a court hearing.Before the shooting there was no extensive history of police calls at the business, which allows patrons to bring their own alcohol, but does not serve the drinks, according to the police director.DeMaio said no one has been able to provide detectives with a description of the shooters or any suspect vehicles. Police initially reported there were five shooting victims, but later learned another person was grazed in the arm.A portion of the shooting wascaptured in a videoshared on the Facebook page of Toni Byrd, a Brooklyn-based comedian who was performing at Sports in the City.(Warning: this unedited video contains profanity)"I was headlining comedy show tonight in Bloomfield NJ. And bullets started flying..I mean they shot the spot up," Byrd said in a Facebook post. "I'm so grateful because a few bullets pass by me. I was able to get on the floor and make it in the back room."In a statement on Facebook, Sports in the City responded to "negative views" about the establishment and news coverage of the shooting."We welcomed everyone with a smile, great food, & a good time. Our hearts are very apologetic to those harmed," the statement added. "Ask those who came there for a good laugh, a bite to eat, or to watch their teams play. Everyone was treated as family once entering the business."Crime Stoppers has offered a $5,000 reward for any information about the shooting that leads to an arrest. Anyone with information can call 973-680-4090.Noah Cohen may be reached atncohen@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@noahyc.Find NJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad Choiceshttps://www.gofundme.com/ah-support-for-the-jones-family.A 24-year-old man is to appear in court Monday to face murder and other criminal charges in connection with a ruthless attack on a Lake County family who reportedly stood in the way of his effort to terrorize the estranged mother of his children.Friends, family and authorities say Ezekial “Junior” Bravo was armed with a shotgun when he forced his way into the family’s home at the tiny Elem Indian Colony near Clearlake Oaks and began shooting early Thursday morning, killing 46-year-old Theresa Brown and injuring three other family members, including Brown’s 6-year-old daughter.A family friend has started afundraising campaignto help defray medical and other costs related to the loss of Brown, a vibrant, well-loved mother of five children, ages 6 to 27.Deya Ammar, the close friend, said the family was grieving the death of Brown’s mother right before Thanksgiving. The bloodshed Thursday has added to their pain. Lake County sheriff’s Lt. Corey Paulich said Bravo refused to give authorities a statement in the wake of the incident.But it appears Bravo was looking for a woman described as his wife - it wasn’t clear Friday if they were legally married - when he arrived at her mother’s home around 2:16 a.m. Thursday, angered by the younger woman’s recent decision to end their three-year relationship and seek full custody of two young children, neither of whom was present when the shooting occurred, family members and friends said.The woman often sought refuge at her mother’s house during what family members said was an abusive relationship, so Bravo had reason to think she would be there.But Brown, her aunt, and the young woman’s mother, Stephanie Brown, had her hide under a bed and stay there after Bravo burst in. She escaped the shooting unharmed. Authorities did not provide the woman’s name.Bravo shot Theresa Brown in the face, spraying buckshot that struck her 6-year-old daughter, who reportedly used her slain mom’s cellphone to call her older brother for help, Ammar said.Stephanie Brown and her husband, Robert Brown, also suffered gunshot wounds. Robert Brown lost a large chunk of his forearm, and his wife was hurt in the shoulder, then forced outside and into Bravo’s van, though she drove away and escaped when he went back inside.When Bravo returned, he left the area in one of the victim’s cars, though he soon abandoned it outside the rancheria.He eluded authorities in the initial hours after the gunfire, during a search that included help from the Sonoma County sheriff’s helicopter crew. Someone at a local elementary school saw a public alert that included Bravo’s photo and told authorities that he was on the campus later Thursday morning.Paulich said it was possible he was trying to visit a family member who attends Pomo Elementary School, though it was not clear.Bravo was arrested without incident and was being held on ?$1 million bail.Chief Deputy District Attorney Richard Hinchcliff said Bravo would be arraigned at 3 p.m. Monday in the county courthouse at Lakeport.The youngest victim suffered a broken arm and had pellets throughout her arm. She had surgery on Thursday and was being released from the hospital on Friday, Ammar said. Both of the injured adults also were reportedly in stable condition.You can reach Staff Writer Mary Callahan at 707-521-5249 or mary.callahan@pressdemocrat.com.https://www.gofundme.com/ah-support-for-the-jones-family.UPDATED: Please read and follow our commenting policy:Warning: This video contains graphic content. The victims were shot about 6 p.m. as they were standing in front of a Stop 1 convenience store near the busy area of Duvall Avenue and Garrison Boulevard. Police believe there was just one gunman, who ran away along Edgewood Street.Baltimore police announced Monday the arrest of a man they believe shot six people — two fatally — outside a convenience store in Northwest Baltimore at the end of November.Damon Dwight Alexander was arrested by Warrant Apprehension Task Force officers Monday morning while sleeping on a couch at a relative's home, Police Commissioner Kevin Davis said at a news conference. Police said Alexander, 27, is a member of the Black Guerrilla Family gang.The arrest comes as the city is on the verge of reaching the 300-homicide mark for the second straight year, but only the second time since the 1990s. As of Monday, there had been 299 killings in Baltimore.Alexander's arrest came partly as a result of tips, which Davis heralded as another sign that police are strengthening relationships with the community after last year's unrest over the arrest and death of Freddie Gray. In recent days, Davis said, five people suspected of violent crimes have been identified through tips; two were restrained by residents so police could arrest them."The last couple of weeks, we've done really, really well, the community has done really well working with us to get tips to identify these shooters and tell us where they are," Davis said.The shooting Nov. 30 outside the Stop 1 Food Store in the 2900 block of Garrison Blvd. was caught on the store's surveillance video. The video showed a man in a dark hoodie walking up to a group of men standing outside the store and firing a handgun repeatedly. He stood over one of the fallen victims and shot the man until he ran out of ammunition.Police called the shooting a brazen execution. While the suspect couldn't be clearly identified from the video footage, detectives were able to focus on the shooter's left hand, which was curled in an unnatural way. Detectives speculated that the man might have a deformity or injury, and they asked the public for help in identifying him.After Alexander's arrest, police said that the curling his hand in that fashion was a "nervous tic," according to police spokesman T.J. Smith.Police said they believe Alexander was aiming to kill four of the six people who were shot, and that the shooting is connected to a previous incident in the area. Three shootings that took the lives of five people have occurred in a half-mile area surrounding the Stop 1 store since Nov. 15.At the time of the crime, Davis said Alexander was on probation for felony theft and for possession of a stolen, regulated firearm. Smith called the shooting "brutal" and calculated."This is a gruesome murder that we captured on film," Smith said. "As he shot at his targets, he made sure they were down before he went back to empty his gun in the person he wanted to kill."Alexander faces two counts of first-degree murder, two counts of second-degree murder, four counts of attempted first- and second-degree murder, six counts of first- and second-degree assault, and five counts of reckless endangerment. He also faces a number of firearms charges.Police say Alexander was found on the couch of a relative's home in the 2800 block of Westwood Ave. Alexander had no lawyer listed in court records, and relatives could not be reached.The four people who were wounded in the shooting have been released from the hospital, including a man who had been in critical condition, police said.The two victims killed in the shooting were identified as Davon Dozier, 23, and Troy Smothers, 29, who lived near each other on a nearby street, court records showed.Killings in Baltimore are slightly down this year compared with last year, when 344 were killed, but remain higher in than any year since the 1990s."We know we have this number 300 in our city implanted in our heads and that number of 300 is unacceptable," Davis said. "The victims in the case are not … numbers 288 and 289. Their names are Davon Dozier and Troy Smothers. They have families, they have friends, they have loved ones who are still grieving their loss."Also Monday, police identified the three most recent victims of violence in the city: Keith Ramsey, 32, who was killed Friday in the 2600 block of Greenmount Ave. in North Baltimore; Gregory Riddick, 26, who was killed Saturday in the 2600 block of Harford Road in Northeast Baltimore; and Ricardo Grimes, 37, who was killed Saturday in the 1100 block of Curtain Ave. in East Baltimore.Baltimore is enduring a spike in homicide numbers that also has affected several other major U.S. cities, including Chicago, Davis said. Getting the community to help police identify killers could help stem the tide, and Davis said he is seeing signs of progress.Police have closed 37 percent of homicide cases this year. Last year, the homicide closure rate was 30 percent."The clearance rate is a really big concern for me and our city," Davis said.Witnesses don't cooperate with police for a variety of reasons, including fear of retaliation, prior poor experiences with law enforcement and negative perceptions of police. But, Davis said, Baltimore also has problems with gangs and neighborhood crews being uncooperative because they want to take retribution."When they do it outside and they do it in a public space and when they do it in broad daylight, there's a decision they've made to do it and risk identification," Davis said. "They're willing to risk identification because they know that the chances of someone stepping up and identifying them are historically, traditionally slim. And that's something we are trying to change in the city of Baltimore."Police continue to look for two suspects in the death of Tayvon Rashard Cokley, 23, on Dec. 5 in the 100 block of N. Eutaw St. He was killed about 1 p.m. in front of several people downtown. The suspects have been identified as Derrick Charles Jackson Jr. and Vincent Jamar Barefoot, both 24.Police asked anyone with information about the shooting or the suspects to call 911 or Metro Crime Stoppers of Maryland at 1-866-7LOCKUP.jgeorge@baltsun.comtwitter.com/justingeorgeRecommendedKTLAby:Cindy Von Quednow,Jennifer GouldTwo men and two women were injured a shooting at a Wilmington party early Monday, officials said.The incident was reported about 12:40 a.m. in the 1000 block of North McDonald Avenue, according to the Los Angeles Police Department.Two women and a man were taken to a hospital by ambulance and another man later arrived at the hospital.One woman victim was undergoing surgery after the shooting and the two men and the other female were in stable condition, Sgt. James Doull told KTLA.He added that a small party was being held at a house in the area when a white sedan pulled up to the house when a male got out of the car, opened fire and drove off.It is unclear if more people were in the car at the time and the motive is also unknown.KTLA’s Alberto Mendez contributed to this story.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.WATCHVIDEOSPolice investigate the scene in San Pedro where four people were wounded in a shooting.FOX 4 Kansas City WDAF-TV | News, Weather, Sportsby:FOX 4 NewsroomKANSAS CITY, Mo. — Kansas City Police spokesperson Stacy Graves released information Sunday morning about a shootout at Gregory and Prospect, in which seven people total were shot.This is directly from Graves: Officers were called to Gregory & Prospect on the sound of shots. Upon arrival, officers observed suspects actively shooting at each other. Fearing for their safety, one officer fired shots. Due to the gunfire, three vehicles were involved in an accident. While securing the scene, officers heard numerous shots fired in their immediate area, for several minutes. Officers observed vehicles near the initial scene involved in a mobile disturbance firing shots. Due to continuous gunfire and an active scene, a City-Wide assist the officer was broadcast. Law enforcement from numerous surrounding agencies responded and assisted with the incident. The incident spans from 70th to 72nd streets, Prospect to Brooklyn.No officers were injured during the incident. At this time one suspect stated he was shot by police and was treated for minor injuries. Six (later upgraded to seven) victims responded to local hospitals with gunshot wounds. One victim is listed in critical condition, other victims have non-life threatening injuries.FOX 4 will continue coverage on this all day Sunday and next week on all platforms: FOX 4 newscasts, fox4kc.com website and app and our social pages, Facebook and Twitter. Check back for what our reporters find out.SubmitKANSAS CITY, Mo. -- A standoff with police ended just before 1:30 p.m. when the suspect surrendered to police without further incident.  The kids that were in the house with the shooting suspect were rescued by police.  After the kids were rescued the suspect remained in the house and continued to fire shots at officers.It all started when police were called to the area of 44th and Norton Saturday morning to investigate the report of a shooting.HARRISONVILLE, Mo. -- Day 6 of the Kylr Yust trial is expected to continue with testimony.On day 5, prosecutors moved into the timeline after Jessica Runions was last seen through witnesses' testimony and evidence. Jessep Carter's wife, Crystal Taylor, testified that Yust summoned her husband up to Raytown in early September 2016 and recounted the hours up until Kylr Yust was arrested.LONDON — Prince Philip will be laid to rest with all the honors due a prince of the United Kingdom and a consort to Queen Elizabeth II.But the coronavirus pandemic means it will be a more low-key farewell than has marked many royal deaths. The pandemic has required changes to the well-prepared plans for Philip’s passing, code-named Operation Forth Bridge.LOUISVILLE, KY (WAVE) - Police have closed one of those two homicide cases after gunfire killed two people and left five others wounded during the Juice Bowl on Thanksgiving Day at Shawnee Park.According to Louisville Metro police, ballistics testing showed Billy McKee, one of the men who died, was shot by the other man who died, Michael Carter.Investigators believe Carter was the first to pull a weapon, but are not releasing any additional information.PREVIOUS STORIES+Victims killed in shooting incident at Shawnee Park identified; 5 others hurt+RAW VIDEO: Facebook Live records 19 gunshots during deadly incident at park+Several people shot during Thanksgiving Day football game+IMAGES: Mass shooting at Shawnee ParkLMPD Lt. Emily McKinley said, "I'm not going to get into details again why the fight happened or what the fight about, we've heard several different versions of that. It's best that we let people come forward. We have some other interviews we need to do and we need to, you know, get those details from them."Police believe Carter's killer is still at large.Witnesses said one of the five wounded people was also shot by Carter. Officers said there was at least one other shooter and have not determined who shot the other four survivors.Copyright 2016WAVE 3 News.All rights reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.The DeSoto County Sheriff’s Department is investigating a shooting that injured four people Wednesday night.It happened at a home at 928 Cross Road in Olive Branch, Mississippi.All four victims were treated for injuries. Their identities have not being released.Deputies arrested Keatron Walls of Walls, Mississippi. he is charged with four counts of aggravated assault and one count of shooting into an occupied dwelling.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.MenuCLEWISTON, Fla. --  Hendry County Sheriff's Deputies have arrested a 20-year-old for murdering a man in Clewiston.Johan Holder was arrested and charged with Premeditated murder.Anthony Holder was found lying on the ground in the Harlem Gardens community with a gunshot wound on November 22nd.  He would late die.Anthony and Johan aren't related.Johan Holder is in the Hendry County jail without bond.DYERSBURG, TN (WMC) - A man is charged with first-degree murder in the shooting that killed a woman and injured seven others at a birthday party Thursday.The shootinghappened in Dyersburg, TN, just after 6 p.m.Shanice Amerson, 21, was throwing a outdoor birthday party for her son when a man walked up from the street and opened fire on the crowd.Amerson was killed and a 6-year-old boy was taken to Le Bonheur Children's Hospital with multiple gunshot wounds. Lakisha Rollin, 38, is in the hospital being treated for her injuries. Five others, Mazie Jacobs, 37, Diley McVay, 32, Charles Jackson, 23, Latonia Hunt, 22, and a 12-year-old boy, were treated for injuries and released.Amerson's friend Sharaven Clinton is still in disbelief that her friend is gone."I cried coming down this street," Clinton said. "I sat on the porch, looked around."She looked at all the birthday decorations on the porch--decorations that were supposed to be for a happy event that turned tragic.They're decorations that remind Clinton that a 2-year-old is now left without his mother."He don't know what's happening. He don't even know that his momma gone," Clinton said.Family members from out of state came to help console Amerson's mother and mourn the loss of the 21-year-old."I ain't going to say she's gone. She's going to always be on my side," Clinton said."Because as of right now, my nieces and nephews don't have a mother. And we're going to make sure, if possible, they are well taken care of," Jones said."Thanksgiving is right around the corner, and nobody suspected to be having this type of tragedy at this time of the month," family member Rosevelt Jones said. "I know it's going to be hard. It's going to be hard for us to do that. At this moment in time, we're not going to go out for no retaliation on nobody. We're going to stand up as a family, as a whole, and we're going to get through this."Dyersburg Police Chief Steve Isbell said law enforcement had been called to the house earlier in the afternoon."Officers did respond to the same residence earlier in the day, around 4:15 p.m., in reference to a disturbance where weapons were involved. Responding officers were advised by residents that a white vehicle with multiple occupants had just left the scene and that one of the subjects was armed with a handgun," Chief Isbell said. "Officers did locate the suspect's vehicle a short time later and were granted consent to search. No weapons were located and only one of the original suspects was present at that time. This incident does remain under investigation."One of the men believed to be in that white vehicle is Torius Russell, who is now charged with first-degree murder. Russell was arrested around 3 a.m. on Friday. Investigators believe he went back to the birthday party a few hours later and started shooting."We feel comfortable, based on the progress of last night's investigation by our detectives and multiple interviews, that the person of interest is the only individual who was involved in the actual shooting event," Isbell said. "Barring any further developments, the Dyersburg Police Department does not foresee any additional people being charged in this incident."City leaders and community members alike are devastated that this type of violence happened in their community."We are sad for what occurred in our community last night. This is not normal for our town. I give all the credit to the police department who worked through the night to develop a suspect then make an arrest at 3 a.m. We as a community must come together and pick back up and support one another during this tragic time," Dyersburg Mayor John Holden said."I just want to express also our sincere concern for the families affected. Obviously, any time we have violence that occurs in the community, it's alarming. When you have children involved, it's very disturbing," Isbell said. "It started out as a celebration for a 2-year-old child's birthday and now this child will celebrate no more birthdays with his mother and that's something that should be upsetting to us all."Chief Isbell said Dyersburg Police Department is not prepared to discuss a possible motive for the shooting."This is still an active investigation even with the arrest of Russell," he explained. "There is still a lot of work to be done on this and to try to connect the dots. At this time, we are not in position to discuss a possible motive."Russell was arraigned Friday and remains in jail on a $2.5 million bond. He is scheduled to appear in court again on November 28.Survivors speakThe 6-year-old boy who is recovering at Le Bonheur Children's Hospital thanked everyone for their prayers in a video his family posted to Facebook.The boy is doing already after he was airlifted to Regional Medical Center from Dyersburg. When he arrived, they discovered how serious his gunshot wounds were, and he was taken to Le Bonheur for emergency surgery.He is one of several children who were in the line of fire Thursday night.One parent said his child is alive because a man at that party shielded the little girl as bullets flew.Antoine Ware's two small daughters are best friends with Shanice Amerson's two children. He said his two girls were at the party when the shooter opened fire."Not even two minutes after my babies walked out of the house, I heard gunfire and I come running from my house and up to the front of their house," Ware said. "When I found my kids, got them from out the back door. Got them home safely and came back over. I found out she was hit and laying in the front.""Actually her uncle or brother or one of the two had actually saved my baby's life," Antoine Ware, family friend, said. "He jumped on the porch and throw my baby on-off the porch and landed on top of her."Ware's two small daughters were best friends with Amerson's two children.Latonia Hunt was standing behind her close friend Shanice when the man opened fire."We were over here enjoying ourselves at Kymarie's birthday party, and we were all dancing on the porch... and she was standing in front of me," Hunt said.She survived, and six others survived, but Amerson did not."They started shooting. Everybody, basically everybody on the porch got hit," Hunt said.Latonia was shot in the leg and now has to walk with crutches, but she is expected to be OK. She said the pain she feels is not physical, but overwhelmingly emotional for her lost friend."She didn't do nothing to nobody," Hunt said. "She didn't deserve it and neither did her kids deserve it neither."While he mourns the loss of a friend, he is grateful that his daughters were saved."I thank God every day. I thank God that my babies didn't get hurt."Despite the cold rain falling Friday night, Amerson's family and friends gathered to hold a vigil and remember the young mother who lost her life. The vigil was held at the home where Amerson was celebrating her child's birthday when gunshots rang out.Now, they have a message. They want gun violence to end."Put these guns down and stop the violence," Roosevelt Jones said. "Stop the violence. Please stop the violence.""This young lady has died and left behind two children, two young children," Jones said. "They don't have a mother now. So we got to stop."But, Jones also had a message for the one who pulled the trigger."To the young man who did this shooting, if you are watching this today, I have no grudges against you," Jones said. "But, what I ask you is to go to God and ask for your forgiveness."As tears flowed, Amerson's loved ones held on to each other for comfort. They also released balloons at the very site where Amerson's life came to an end.Copyright 2016 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Alyssa Medina, ProducerAlyssa Medina, ProducerSAN ANTONIO– Four people were shot at a party Sunday morning on San Antonio's Northeast Side.According to San Antonio police, two men fired shots at an apartment in the 8000 block of Midcrown Drive.Police said a party was going on inside and four people were struck by bullets.Windcrest police stopped a vehicle on Walzem Road matching a description from the scene. Police said a woman inside the vehicle was shot in the back. She was then taken to San Antonio Military Medical Center in critical condition.Police said three other victims drove themselves to Northeast Methodist Hospital in Live Oak.None of the victims haven given police a description of the shooters.Copyright 2016 by KSAT - All rights reserved.Alyssa Medina has worked at KSAT since 2016 and is the  Video on demand producer. She creates exclusive content for the KSAT-TV streaming app. Some of her most notable contributions focus on race and culture or health and wellness. She's created the segments 'Creating Black History in S.A.' and 'New Week. New You."If you need help with the Public File, call 210-351-1241.Public SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accidentPublic SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accidentAccident occurred Friday night on Fairmount Avenue in TalmadgeCaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingCaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingThe men, affiliated with the boogaloo movement, are accused of covering up their association with a man accused of murdering a federal security guardBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBook chronicles Lange’s budding career, which shaped her into an influential Depression and World War II photographerPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingSean Spear is the new president and CEO of Community HousingWorks, the San Diego nonprofit that develops, rehabilitates and operates affordable housing communities in the county and throughout California, while also offering programming, resources, and other forms of support to its residentsPoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadClassical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’Classical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’The world premiere of ‘El Mesías: Messiah for a New World’ is set to be performed in spring 2022 in San Diego and Baja CaliforniaHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversAdding one brings shade, home for creatures and psychological benefitsBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputeColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usSara Watkins’ new ‘Under the Pepper Tree’ features a Nickel Creek reunion trackEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageSDPD Capt. Brian Ahearn discloses details of the officer-involved shooting of an armed suspect in City Heights.The man killed by a San Diego police officer in City Heights Sunday night after he shot his ex-wife and mortally wounded her parents had a restraining order filed against him this year, according to court records.Juan Carlos Fernandez is accused of shooting Isabel Gonzalez, 21, and three members of her family in the courtyard of their apartment complex on Marlborough Avenue south of University Avenue.San Diego police Capt. Brian Ahearn said on Wednesday it’s unclear why Fernandez went there about 9:15 p.m. Sunday, but investigators believe he got into a fistfight with his ex-wife’s boyfriend over the pair’s relationship.After the fight, police said Fernandez went to his car and got a handgun, chased the boyfriend away and then returned to the apartment complex and opened fire.Gonzalez and her 67-year-old grandfather were wounded. Her parents, Reyna Gonzalez, 42, and Julian Gonzalez, 45, were killed. The mother died Sunday, and the father died Wednesday morning, Ahearn said.The mother was shielding her daughter when she was shot, Ahearn said. The father was trying to wrestle the gun away from Fernandez when he was wounded, a family member said.Fernandez dragged his ex-wife into the street and had her in a headlock, his gun trained on her, when police arrived.Officer Ross Bainbridge, who was accompanied by an officer in training, repeatedly told Fernandez to lay on the ground, Ahearn said.Instead, the gunman threatened to harm the woman or police, the captain said. Bainbridge then shot Fernandez once with a shotgun, killing him. Ahearn said the officer is a 12-year veteran of the department.The slain couple were excellent role models who always took care of and protected their family, said daughter Cecilia Gonzalez. “Our family is in terrible pain after losing our parents,” she said Wednesday.She said despite such devastating losses, their family does not blame the Fernandez family. AGoFundMe pagewas started to help with funeral costs.Fernandez was initially identified by the county Medical Examiner’s Office as a former boyfriend of Isabel Gonzalez, but court records show they we married on Halloween in 2014.The couple separated nine months later. A divorce was filed in December 2015, and in February Gonzalez filed for and was given a restraining order against Fernandez.In a letter to the court, she said Fernandez would randomly show up at her apartment to try to talk with her. He would tell her his friends had seen her leaving her home at specific times, making her feel as if she were being watched.“I don’t feel safe even walking out of my house,” she wrote.Fernandez disagreed with the restraining order, saying he was merely trying to talk with her to see if he could change her mind about the divorce, according to court documents.He wrote that he would never harm her or her dog. “Plus, I don’t know why I would harm anyone,” he said.The court granted a one-year restraining order in March, saying there was “evidence that domestic violence or a threat of domestic violence has been committed.” Fernandez was advised he couldn’t own, possess or buy guns, and pledged that he didn’t have any firearms or ammunition, according to court records.Breaking NewsTwitter: @LAWinkley(619) 293-1546lyndsay.winkley@sduniontribune.comSign up to get Breaking News email alertsGet alerts on severe weather, road closures and other major breaking news.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the San Diego Union-Tribune.Follow UsMore from this AuthorWatchdogA Palpable Fear: Minorities describe encounters with San Diego police, sheriff’s deputiesWatchdogA Palpable Fear: Minorities describe encounters with San Diego police, sheriff’s deputiesIn nearly 90 percent of police beats throughout San Diego, Blacks were stopped at higher rates than WhitesMore CoverageWatchdogThe Color of Authority: San Diego police, sheriff’s deputies disproportionately target minorities, data showWatchdogThe Color of Authority: San Diego police, sheriff’s deputies disproportionately target minorities, data showBlacks, Latinos, Native Americans bear brunt of racial biases in local policingHealthA food-bank worker meets South Bay’s unprecedented needsHealthA food-bank worker meets South Bay’s unprecedented needsRosy Vasquez and her team helped feed thousands who faced hunger for the first time.Public SafetyAttempted robbery ends with victim being stabbed in chestPublic SafetyAttempted robbery ends with victim being stabbed in chestThe man drove himself to the hospital for injuries not believed to be life-threateningPublic SafetyMan shot after refusing to turn over cellphonePublic SafetyMan shot after refusing to turn over cellphoneThe man’s injuries were not believed to be life-threateningPublic SafetyPacific Beach fight leaves man with stab woundsPublic SafetyPacific Beach fight leaves man with stab woundsThe man’s injuries were not believed to be life-threateningMore in this sectionPublic SafetyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleySan Diego police said the driver of a blue or black Chevrolet Blazer left the scene after badly injuring the 30-year-old man on Friars RoadPublic SafetySan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesSan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesAmong 11 proposed reforms were recommendations to eliminate existing gang injunctions, explore alternatives to arresting low-level offendersPublic SafetyPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarThe collision happened on Del Mar Heights Road and Durango Drive, west of I-5CourtsOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornRelease of Kelsey Carpenter comes after California Supreme Court ruling targeting cash bailPublic SafetyDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policeDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policePolice said a woman reported a domestic violence incident on Lodi Street near Cole Street shortly before noon. The woman said her son had punched and kicked her, possibly carrying a firearm and a BB gun into San Clemente CanyonPublic SafetyDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensaryDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensarySheriff’s officials said deputies found more than 3,000 pounds raw cannabis and marijuana-infused products at shop near Sweetwater Springs BoulevardBreakingPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatWith nearly 52 percent of the vote, Weber is expected to take the Assembly seat formerly held by her mother, Shirley WeberNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HouseNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HousePresident Joe Biden has restored the prisoner-of-war/missing-in-action flag to its former location atop the White HouseNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtPresident Joe Biden has ordered a study of adding seats to the Supreme Court, creating a commission that will spend the next 180 days examining the incendiary political issues of expanding the court and instituting term limits for its justicesMusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50MusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50Born Earl Simmons, the New York-based rapper and actor was hospitalized after having a heart attack following a drug overdoseNational EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99National EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99Buckingham Palace says Prince Philip, the irascible and tough-minded husband of Queen Elizabeth II, has diedMost read news storiesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasAfter Border Patrol apprehends the families in Texas, they are flown to San Diego and sent to Tijuana, a city they do not knowMilitaryFire-ravaged Bonhomme Richard will be decommissioned, then towed away for scrappingMilitaryFire-ravaged Bonhomme Richard will be decommissioned, then towed away for scrappingThe amphibious assault ship was declared a total loss after an inferno raged on board in July while the ship was in port in San DiegoLatestNational SportsRoglic wins Tour of Basque Country for 2nd timeNational SportsRoglic wins Tour of Basque Country for 2nd timePrimoz Roglic has won his second Tour of Basque Country titleNation-WorldKyrgyzstan votes on constitution boosting president’s powersNation-WorldKyrgyzstan votes on constitution boosting president’s powersVoters in Kyrgyzstan will be casting ballots on whether to approve a new constitution that would substantially increase the president’s powersNation-WorldReports: Myanmar forces kill 82 in single day in cityNation-WorldReports: Myanmar forces kill 82 in single day in cityReports from Myanmar say at least 82 people were killed in one day in a crackdown by Myanmar security forces on pro-democracy protestersPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceSign Up For Our NewslettersFollow Us5 others, including a 4-year-old, injured in shooting at barbecue5 others, including a 4-year-old, injured in shooting at barbecueSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.5 others, including a 4-year-old, injured in shooting at barbecueA woman killed in a drive-by shooting while at a barbecue gathering outside a south Sacramento home has been identified, officials said Sunday.Maige Lee, 27, of Sacramento, was pronounced dead at the scene, deputies said.Theshooting happened just after 7 p.m. Saturday in the 8600 block of Ardith Drive. The victims were outside the home when a compact car with multiple passengers drove up and fired several shots from the passenger side of the car. The car then sped away south on Ardith Drive, the Sacramento County Sheriff's Department said.Four men, ages 31, 32, 33 and 34, and Lee's 4-year-old son were taken to hospitals with gunshot wounds, deputies said.The 31-year-old is reported in critical condition while the other victims are listed in serious but stable condition, according to officialsLee's son was released from the hospital and is reportedly doing OK.Neighbor Keaira Wilson was supposed to stop by the barbecue but was left in shock after the shooting.“But instead, I went to bed, and when I was in my bed, all of a sudden I heard gunshots," Wilson said.Wilson’s mother didn’t want to talk on camera but said she ran to the neighbor’s home to help.“My mom was just panicking," Wilson said. "She was in fear, she just was like, 'Call the police.' She didn’t know what was going on.”No other details have been released on any suspects or motive for the shooting.Anyone with information is encouraged to contact the Sacramento County Sheriff’s Department at 916-874-5115.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.FOX 4 Kansas City WDAF-TV | News, Weather, Sportsby:FOX 4 NewsroomKANSAS CITY, Mo. — Prosecutors have charged a Raytown man in the Saturday quadruple shooting that left one woman dead, Jackson County Prosecutor Jean Peters Baker announced Tuesday.Deandre M. Jackson, 24, of Raytown, Mo. is charged with 2nd degree murder, unlawful use of a weapon, thee counts of 1st degree assault, and five counts of armed criminal action.Court records say Jackson fired into a stranded vehicle with four women inside near 21st and Cleveland on Saturday,killing 25-year-old Maryanna Penningtonand injuring the three others.An investigation revealed that the women’s car was stopped due to a broken front axle. The women had called for help.A witness told investigators Jackson opened the front passenger door and shot into the vehicle. Nearly three dozen spent shell casings were found at the scene near the vehicle.Witnesses and victims also identified Jackson as the shooter.One witness said he had been fighting with one of the victims earlier that day.Jackson County prosecutors have requested a $500,000 cash bond.SubmitKANSAS CITY, Mo. -- A standoff with police ended just before 1:30 p.m. when the suspect surrendered to police without further incident.  The kids that were in the house with the shooting suspect were rescued by police.  After the kids were rescued the suspect remained in the house and continued to fire shots at officers.It all started when police were called to the area of 44th and Norton Saturday morning to investigate the report of a shooting.HARRISONVILLE, Mo. -- Day 6 of the Kylr Yust trial is expected to continue with testimony.On day 5, prosecutors moved into the timeline after Jessica Runions was last seen through witnesses' testimony and evidence. Jessep Carter's wife, Crystal Taylor, testified that Yust summoned her husband up to Raytown in early September 2016 and recounted the hours up until Kylr Yust was arrested.LONDON — Prince Philip will be laid to rest with all the honors due a prince of the United Kingdom and a consort to Queen Elizabeth II.But the coronavirus pandemic means it will be a more low-key farewell than has marked many royal deaths. The pandemic has required changes to the well-prepared plans for Philip’s passing, code-named Operation Forth Bridge.Bridgeport – Bridgeport Police today are announcing the arrests of two juvenile suspects in connection with a shooting incident on November 12, 2016 where five people were shot at Club Sportivo, located at 2500 Park Avenue in Bridgeport.“I want to thank the men and women of the Bridgeport Police Detective Bureau for their round the clock efforts and good, thorough police work that has led to the arrests of these two individuals,” said Bridgeport Police Chief Armando “AJ” Perez. “We will continue to investigate this crime until we bring all those responsible to justice. Bringing guns to a teenage sweet 16 and crashing the party, causing a ruckus where people end up getting shot is totally unacceptable. Playing around recklessly with illegal guns puts people’s lives in danger and we have zero tolerance for it in Bridgeport. If anyone has further information about this crime, I ask that you call the Bridgeport police anonymous tips line 203-576-TIPS or 203-576-8477.”On November 12, 2016 at approximately 2239 hours, Bridgeport Police began to receive multiple calls about a large group of people fighting both inside and outside Club Sportivo, located at 2500 Park Avenue Bridgeport. Police dispatch then began receiving 911 calls of “shots fired” at this location. Approximately twenty police officers responded to the scene and located five (5) gunshot victims. These victims were transported to local hospitals, and all five survived their injuries. Several days later, a sixth gunshot victim was located, who initially did not seek medical treatment. Due to the complexity of the crime scene, all evidence processing was completed by the Bridgeport Police Department Identification Unit.This investigation began on November 12, 2016 and is still ongoing. After speaking with multiple witnesses, victims and suspects, and reviewing surveillance of the scene and evidence, detectives determined the following:On November 12, 2016, Club Sportivo was rented out to the family of a 16 year old female to host a Sweet Sixteen party. This party was by invitation only, but at approximately 2200 hours, the hosts of the party began to charge admission for an “after party”. Many people who were not invited to the Sweet Sixteen paid admission to enter the party, and some were patted down for weapons by adult males, who appeared to be acting as security. At approximately 2220 hours, a fight erupted on the dance floor, and spilled out into the vestibule. Several males were then seen displaying firearms inside the club. Several minutes later, shots were fired outside the club, resulting in six victims being shot.Based on this investigation, probable cause existed to charge two juvenile males with various assault and weapons offenses. Juvenile #1 is a 15 year old male. An arrest warrant was issued for him on January 6, 2017 charging him with Criminal Attempt at Assault first Degree, Carrying a Pistol without a Permit, Unlawful Discharge of Firearms, Reckless Endangerment in the First Degree and Breach of Peace in the Second Degree. Juvenile #1 was arrested on January 9, 2017. Juvenile #2 is a 17 year old male. An arrest warrant was issued for him on December 21, 2016 charging him with Carrying a Pistol Without a Permit, Unlawful Discharge of Firearms, Reckless Endangerment in the First Degree and Breach of Peace in the Second Degree. Juvenile #2 was arrested on this warrant on January 13, 2017.Due to the fact that this is an ongoing investigation, and that those arrested so far are juveniles, no additional information will be released at this time.You must belogged into post a comment.691 Post Rd, Fairfield(203) 256-9201WATCHVIDEOSAs many as 4 injured in SE Houston bar shootingRaw video shows the scene of a violent shooting in SE HoustonAt least 2 people were shot at a sports bar on San Antonio St in SE Houston#ABC13#hounewspic.twitter.com/f6HnI6xSQ8HOUSTON - A man has been sentenced to 30 years in prison for the murder of a prominent Houston rapper known as 'Mr. 3-2'.According to the Harris County District Attorney's Office, Vincent Depaul Stredic, 40, was convicted in the November 2016 murder of Christopher Barriere, 44. Barriere was shot in the parking lot of a gas station off Sam Houston ParkwayTestimony revealed that the two men had been friends. On the night of the shooting, Stredic and Barriere drove to the gas station with two other men, according to the DA's office. An argument broke out between Stredic and the other men and ended with Stredic retrieving a shotgun from the trunk of his car. He then shot Barriere in the side of the head.“This is the kind of senseless violence that troubles so many people within our community,” Assistant District Attorney Dave Brucker said.His nickname, Mr. 3-2, is drawn from his first name starting with the third letter of the alphabet and his last name with the second.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Alyssa Medina, ProducerAlyssa Medina, ProducerSAN ANTONIO– Four people are recovering at San Antonio hospitals after being shot outside of a Northeast Side bar early Saturday morning.San Antonio police responded to a call for a shooting in the 10000 block of Perrin Beitel. When officers arrived, they found one person shot in the head in parking lot of Snoop's Bar and Tavern.That victim was taken to San Antonio Military Medical Center in critical condition.Police later learned two other victims drove themselves to Northeast Baptist hospital, said police. Another victim drove himself to Northeast Methodist hospital.The victims are in the hospital under police watch. Police believe the shooting may have been gang-related.Copyright 2016 by KSAT - All rights reserved.Alyssa Medina has worked at KSAT since 2016 and is the  Video on demand producer. She creates exclusive content for the KSAT-TV streaming app. Some of her most notable contributions focus on race and culture or health and wellness. She's created the segments 'Creating Black History in S.A.' and 'New Week. New You."If you need help with the Public File, call 210-351-1241.Police are investigating a fatal shooting at a Lauderhill strip club early Saturday morning.Lauderhill police say one person was killed and three others injured in the shooting at Cafe 54, 3135 West Broward Blvd.It's not the first shooting at the club. Three people were shot there last March and later drove themselves to the hospital.Two others were shot in at the strip bar in December 2014, and a year before that police were called to the club when shots were fired in the parking lot, though no one was injured.Cafe 54 shooting investigation continuing. 4 victims total. 3 in hospital and the 4th has passed away. No further info to release yet.
— LauderhillPDPIO (@LPDPIO)November 5, 2016Authorities say the investigation is ongoing. No further information has been released.Trending:OAKLAND — Two reputed gang members have been charged in a gun battle Saturday morning outside a downtown Oakland club that left eight people, including themselves, wounded, according to authorities and court documents.At least two other men who also may be gang members are being sought, police said.Charged with three counts of assault with a semi-automatic firearm are  Brandon Simpson, 27, who was wounded in the leg and abdomen, and Kehinde Riley, 20, who was shot in the leg.The men are friends and reputed members of the same East Oakland gang, authorities said.Simpson remains hospitalized. Riley is being held at Santa Rita Jail.According to police and court documents, the two were among a large crowd outside a club in the 400 block of 14th Street about 12:15 a.m. Saturday when they got into a dispute with another man who authorities believe was gang related.Within moments a gun battle erupted involving Simpson, Riley and the two men being sought.Simpson and Riley and six other people, including a 17-year-old boy and four women, were wounded in the gunfire.The shooting was captured on video surveillance and that led to Simpson and Riley being identified as suspects, according to court documents. Simpson was arrested at Highland Hospital and Riley at Kaiser Hospital where they had gotten rides to for treatment of their wounds.According to court documents, Simpson has five prior felony convictions between 2005 and 2015  for grand theft, possession of cocaine for sale, vehicle theft, assault, and accessory after the fact. He received prison terms for the grand theft, cocaine and vehicle theft convictions, according to the record.Riley has a prior robbery conviction from 2013 when he was a juvenile. He was incarcerated at a juvenile facility for the conviction, the records show.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersFiled under:Two people who were killed in a domestic-related shooting that left two others critically wounded early Thursday in the South Chicago neighborhood have been identified.The four people were shot by a known suspect in the 8000 block of South Shore Drive about 12:10 a.m., according to Chicago Police.The suspect got into argument with one of the victims and it turned physical, police said. He left the home, returned with a gun and shot all four victims.A 20-year-old woman, Emoni House; and a 16-year-old boy, Elijah House, were pronounced dead at the scene, according to police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Emoni House suffered multiple gunshot wounds, and Elijah House suffered a gunshot wound to the back, according to the medical examiner’s office. Both lived on the block where the shooting happened.A 42-year-old woman was shot in the chest, and a 30-year-old woman was also shot, police said. They were taken in critical condition to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn.The shooting was domestic-related, police said.No one was in custody as of Monday morning as Area South detectives investigate.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - A 17-year-old is charged withkilling a 16-year-old girland injuring five other people in Zodiac Park on Tuesday.Marcus Malone, a student at Whitehaven High School, is charged with second-degree murder, 10 counts of attempted second-degree murder and 10 counts of possession and employing a firearm during a dangerous felony. That's all in connection to the shooting. He made his first appearance in juvenile court Friday.Malone is just one year older than the teen his is accused of killing.Malone's family had nothing to say as they left his juvenile court hearing.According to the public information officer with juvenile court, Malone will be detained and will not be released.Memphis Police Director Mike Rallings reflected on the direction Malone's life has taken."A young man at one of our most successful high schools," Rallings said. "His life is forever changed."Rallings is dismayed that the group planned to meet at the park and fight. He once again called for an end to the violence."Here again we have another family that has been impacted by losing a loved one to some type of senseless violence, and it has to stop," Rallings said.Students who know Malone said they liked him and he was an aspiring rapper. He even performed last week for an honors class.Tuesday,16-year-old Alana Tello was shot and killed in Zodiac Park. Police said six people walked up to Tello and the other victims and opened fire."Her mom can't ever get her back," Tello's friend Eric Walker said. "I know that she is in a lot of pain right now and our prayers go out for her family."Thursday would have been Tello's 17th birthday. She was a student at Horn Lake High School.Tello's friends and family said they are happy that Malone has been arrested, but they said there is still more that needs to be done. They said Malone did not act alone."I just pray that justice will be served, and I know it is more than that one boy," Walker said. "I know it was and I hope and pray that they get them. I pray that will help bring closure."Memphis Police Department has not identified the other five suspects.Tello's funeral serives services will be held on Sunday, November 6 at Colonial Hills Church in Southaven. The church is located at 7701 Highway 52. Visitation will be from 3-6 p.m. on that day. The services will immediately follow completion of visitation.Those attending are encouraged to wear tie-dyed shirts and their hair in a bun to honor the teen.Copyright 2016 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Four people are recovering from injuries following a brawl which led to shots being fired outside an apartment complex Monday morning in west Shreveport.Just after 2 a.m. on Oct. 31, Shreveport Police patrol officers responded to the 700 block of Central Street relative to a "shots fired" call.  As officers arrived at the scene, they learned that four victims, ages 19 to 24 were suffering gunshot wounds.  The injured victims, Ivory Jenkins, Tracy Brown, Briana Roberson and Jerome Jones, were taken to University Health where they were treated for what was described as non life-threatening injuries.Investigators with the Shreveport Police Department's Violent Crimes Unit were called to the scene and immediately began an inquiry into the matter.  During preliminary findings, it was determined an on-going dispute between two women, which apparently began on a popular social media site, led to the women agreeing to meet outside the apartment complex for purpose of fighting.During the course of the melee, additional persons known to both women, were on the scene and began to partake in the brawl.  At the height of the incident, a handgun was produced and multiple shots were fired.  It was unknown at the hour who was responsible for firing the shots; however, investigators are continually gathering information.Authorities are in the process of securing arrest warrants for the two women allegedly responsible for initiating the incident, along with several other persons involved in the brawl. Shamaya Pouncy, 19, was arrested and charged with battery on an officer, disturbing the peace by fighting and resisting an officer.Anyone with any information in the matter are asked to call Crime Stoppers at (318) 673-7373 or visit their website at www.lockemup.org.A man injured in October at a dice game in Prince George’s County where two teenagers were fatally shot at the scene, died Monday night, police said.[Man charged with killing 14-year-old in multiple shooting at dice game]Police on Tuesday announced the death of Gleason Wood, 27, of Northeast Washington.On Oct. 30 at around 2:45 a.m., officers responded to the 6800 block of Walker Mill Road in Capitol Heights for the report of a shooting, Prince George’s County police said in a statement. They found six shooting victims: 14-year-old Todd Webb of Capitol Heights and 18-year-old Brian Davis of Northwest Washington were dead at the scene and four others injured, the statement said.The dice game began in an apartment building, police said, but moved outdoors, and involved up to two dozen people playing or watching. Davis was killed in an initial round of shooting that began for reasons still under investigation.Webb was then allegedly killed by 22-year-old Bravon Freeman of Southeast Washington, who was charged with murder after he went inside an apartment, got a gun and shot Webb, according to charging documents.Wood was one of four people transported to the hospital after the shooting, including two 15-year-olds and a 17-year-old.Police asked anyone with information about the shooting to call 1-866-411-TIPS.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.LOWER EAST SIDE – Police are looking for a man they say shot four people during a brawl on Sunday morning.An argument escalated in front of 135 Ridge St. at around 6 a.m., resulting in participants beating each other and one man pulling out a gun and shooting at four people, police said.The suspect, identified as 42-year-old Miguel Maldonado, allegedly pulled out a gun during the mayhem and fired between five and six rounds of ammunition, striking three men, ages 25, 34 and 23, police said.A fourth man escaped unscathed despite being shot through his right pants pocket, police said. He said the suspect fired at him multiple times but only managed to hit his wallet inside his right pocket, according to authorities.The 25-year-old and 34-year-old victims were both shot in the left leg after being fired at multiple times, according to authorities, while the 23-year-old victim was hit once in the right leg and once in the abdomen.The gunshot victims, whose injuries were not life threatening, were taken to Bellevue Hospital in stable condition, police said.In addition, two men, aged 32 and 42, were kicked and punched during the brawl leading up to the shooting, which first broke out around 2:10 a.m., sustaining bloody noses and swollen lips, while one woman, 26, was punched and scratched, police said.Police were unable to speak to the cause of the argument that started the violence.Maldonado is wanted for assault in the first degree. Police at the 7th Precinct released a photo of the suspect Monday morning via Twitter.Please help us find this individual who shot 4 people @#les. If you have any info please call#crimestoppers800-577-TIPS.pic.twitter.com/nxmT27DMEDNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideNext inEast Village & Lower East SideCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.CITY OF NEWBURGH – The City of Newburgh teenager sought in the killings of two women at a Halloween party on Sunday was arrested out-of-state on Friday, bringing some good news to the victims’ families as they prepare for funerals.Nija Johnson, 17, had been sought for second-degree murder in the shootings of Tabitha Cruz, 20, and Omani Free, 18. Cruz and Free, a Newburgh Free Academy senior, were shot and killed around 12:43 a.m. Sunday at 119 Broadway. Another five people were injured in the incident.Police have released few other details, other than to say Johnson was captured around 3 p.m. Friday and is expected to be returned to the city in a few days.News of his arrest came as Cruz’s family welcomed hundreds of mourners to a visitation service at Crossroads Assembly of God church on Friday. Her funeral is set for Saturday and Free’s for Monday.“We couldn’t get any better news,” said Ray Degraffenried, Cruz’s stepfather. “It brought a little bit of happiness along with the sadness.”On Monday police had announced a $2,500 reward for information leading to Johnson’s arrest and conviction. A day earlier they had charged two men – Rainier Hamilton, 21, and Tyson Oliveira, 20 – with assisting the shooter.At the time of the shooting, Johnson had two outstanding arrest warrants for felony weapon and drug possession charges, according to Newburgh City Court records.“Of course, I’m happy that he has been caught,” said Rhonda Valentine-Free, Omani Free’s mother. “Justice needs to be served.”lsparks@th-record.comCITY OF NEWBURGH – The City of Newburgh teenager sought in the killings of two women at a Halloween party on Sunday was arrested out-of-state on Friday, bringing some good news to the victims’ families as they prepare for funerals.Nija Johnson, 17, had been sought for second-degree murder in the shootings of Tabitha Cruz, 20, and Omani Free, 18. Cruz and Free, a Newburgh Free Academy senior, were shot and killed around 12:43 a.m. Sunday at 119 Broadway. Another five people were injured in the incident.Police have released few other details, other than to say Johnson was captured around 3 p.m. Friday and is expected to be returned to the city in a few days.News of his arrest came as Cruz’s family welcomed hundreds of mourners to a visitation service at Crossroads Assembly of God church on Friday. Her funeral is set for Saturday and Free’s for Monday.“We couldn’t get any better news,” said Ray Degraffenried, Cruz’s stepfather. “It brought a little bit of happiness along with the sadness.”On Monday police had announced a $2,500 reward for information leading to Johnson’s arrest and conviction. A day earlier they had charged two men – Rainier Hamilton, 21, and Tyson Oliveira, 20 – with assisting the shooter.At the time of the shooting, Johnson had two outstanding arrest warrants for felony weapon and drug possession charges, according to Newburgh City Court records.“Of course, I’m happy that he has been caught,” said Rhonda Valentine-Free, Omani Free’s mother. “Justice needs to be served.”lsparks@th-record.com© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordonline.com  ~ 40 Mulberry St., Middletown, NY 10940~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.The suspect, 22-year-old Robert Contreras, now faces one charge of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon. He remains in the Bexar County Jail.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.San Antonio police investigate a shooting on the Northwest Side that left five people wounded Sunday morning, Oct. 30, 2016.A 22-year-old man was arrested Wednesday in connection with a mass shooting at a 2016 Halloween party on the West Side.Robert Contreras was charged with aggravated assault with a deadly weapon. He remains in the Bexar County Jail.RELATED:McManus: 'Gang-related' East Side shootout leaves two children injuredContreras, who was dressed as Freddy Krueger, and a group of several other men arrived to a party at a home in the 2900 block of Aspen Meadow about 5 a.m. on Oct. 30, 2016, according to the affidavit.The 25-year-old host of the party didn't recognize the men so he didn't let them in. Three of the men, including Contreras, allegedly pushed their way inside, initiating a shoving match.During the fight, one of the uninvited guests told the host to fight his brother "one on one." They fought but then the host saw Contreras, still dressed as Freddy Krueger, holding a shotgun, police said.Contreras allegedly fired, striking not only the host, but four other people as well. He and several other uninvited guests then fled the scene, authorities said.RELATED:SAPD: 20-year-old man shot during confrontation with suspected car burglarsParamedics transported three men to University Hospital and another man at Baptist Medical Center in downtown San Antonio. A female victim drove herself to Christus Santa Rosa Hospital but crashed on the way there, police said.There were no breaks in the case until the host reportedly identified Contreras in a photo line up. The affidavit didn't specify how police developed Contreras as a suspect.A second witness identified him as well, police said.A judge signed a warrant for Contreras's arrest on August 9 and was finally executed almost one year after the shooting.Contreras was only charged in connection to allegedly shooting the host, but he may face further charges.Text "NEWS" to 77453 for breaking news alerts from mySA.comcdowns@mysa.com |Twitter: @calebjdownsCaleb Downs is a breaking news reporter for the San Antonio Express-News. His job is to hunt down crime and chaos in San Antonio and Bexar County. He is a graduate of the University of North Texas and has previously worked for The Dallas Morning News as a breaking news reporter.WATCHVIDEOSSheriff's deputies and firefighter-paramedics responded to the Gramercy Park neighborhood of South L.A. after a shooting on Saturday, Oct. 29, 2016.(OnScene)Trending:Updates with more details from police, report of stabbingOne person was stabbed late Friday night, Oct. 28, and four others were shot early Saturday at a party at a Riverside shopping center, the Riverside police and fire departments said.Their injuries were not life threatening, police said. A 19-year-old woman was initially believed to be in critical condition. The other victims’ ages were 19, 24 and unknown, the Fire Department said in a news release.A crowd of 75-100 people had gathered in the 3500 block of Madison Street just west of the 91 Freeway, a Riverside police news release said.UPDATE:Code Enforcement investigating venue where shooting, stabbing took placeThen just before midnight, Corona police officers were at Corona Regional Medical Center when a stabbing victim was dropped off by someone who then drove off. Police detained the vehicle’s occupants and learned that the victim was stabbed at the Madison party, the release said.Riverside police then went to the Madison address about 1 a.m., the same time other officers were dispatched to a report of a loud party there, the release said. As officers approached, someone began shooting.The officers were not targeted by the shooters, police Lt. Charles Payne said.Officers found the four victims and detained the partygoers. Officers searched the business where the party was happening and found five hidden guns — three that were stolen — as well as what the release described as evidence related to the stabbing.Riverside Police Lt. Mark Rossi said one person has been arrestedon suspicion of possessing illegal narcotics. He said it was not yet known Saturday night whether that person was involved in the shooting.No one, police Officer Ryan Railsback said, could describe the shooter or stabber.Staff writer Alex Groves contributed to this report.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Amanda Batchelor, Managing EditorNatalie Morera, Executive ProducerAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorNatalie Morera, Executive ProducerMIAMI GARDENS, Fla.– Four men were shot Friday morning in Miami Gardens, police said.The shooting was reported about 1:40 a.m. in the area of Northwest 173rd Terrace and 27th Avenue.According to police, the victims' ages range from late to teens to late 30's. They were all taken to Aventura Hospital.One of the victims, posted a Facebook live video after the shooting."I just got shot," Andrew Nance told his Facebook followers. Nance said that he was shot twice.He did not appear to be injured too severely as he posted from the video at the hospital.Nance's grandmother told reporters that her grandson had been shot while talking on the front porch of his house with friends."He was just sitting on the porch and somebody walked up and started shooting at them. I don't know who they are," she said.The woman said there had never been any problems with her grandson at their home before."He had come home from work and he was just sitting on the front porch talking, that's all" she said.Local 10 News reporter Todd Tongen was at the scene and said that there were so many rounds fired that two windows were shot out and the home was riddled with bullets.Miami Gardens police said they are searching for three people who shot at the victims.All of the victims are listed in stable condition.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Please purchase a subscription to read our premium content. If you have a subscription, please log in or sign up for an account on our website to continue.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.As a home delivery subscriber, you get free unlimited digital access to premium content on HenryHerald.com, including local news, local sports, obituaries, legal notices, local features, and the e-edition.All you need is your print subscription account number and your last name.Don't know your subscription number? Email access@henryherald.com with your delivery address.Get unlimited digital access to premium content on HenryHerald.com, including local news, local sports, local features, obituaries, legal notices, and the e-edition, on your computer, tablet or phone starting at $3.99.*All subscriptions auto-renew at the same rate.Get 3 days of unlimited digital access to HenryHerald.com including stories, photos, obituaries, e-edition and more on your computer, tablet or phone for $1.99.Support Henry County journalism and subscribe now.*Subscription does not auto-renew.Rain. High around 70F. Winds SSW at 5 to 10 mph. Chance of rain 80%..Partly cloudy with late night showers or thunderstorms. Low 57F. Winds SW at 5 to 10 mph. Chance of rain 50%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:33 pmJacob Cole KoskyMatthew BakerBy Chelsea Princecprince@henryherald.comReporterJacob Cole KoskyMatthew BakerMcDONOUGH —A Henry County grand jury indicted Jacob Cole Kosky and Matthew Baker Tuesday in the October murders of four young people at a Jackson house party.Kosky, 23, was indicted on four counts of malice murder, eight counts of felony murder, four counts of aggravated assault, one count of possession of a firearm during the commission of a felony, one count of possession of a firearm by a convicted felon and one count of felony theft by taking.Baker, 19, was indicted on four counts of malice murder, four counts of felony murder, four counts of aggravated assault, and one count of possession of a firearm during the commission of a felony.The two McDonough men are accused in the shooting deaths of 18-year-old Matthew Hicks of McDonough, 29-year-old Keith Gibson of Covington, 20-year-old Sophia Bullard of Thomaston and Destiny Olinger, 20, of Jackson.The jury charged that both acted “with malice aforethought” in the quadruple murder, despite Kosky’s alleged admission to police that he was the sole shooter and Baker’s prior claim that he acted in fear for his life.Baker’s attorney argued during a December preliminary hearing that the 19-year-old did not know what Kosky had planned when he was called to the Moccasin Gap Road home on Oct. 27.Kosky and Baker had attended a bonfire at victim Destiny Olinger’s home earlier that night. At some point in the evening, Baker reportedly left the party with a crew of friends and later returned at Kosky’s request.When Baker arrived, Kosky allegedly handed him a gun and asked for backup, according to police.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Get Henry Herald headlines delivered to your email inbox daily.Kosky, who turned himself in later Oct. 27, reportedly told investigators with the Henry County Police Department that he shot everyone remaining in the house.“At one point in the interview he made the admissions, ‘I domed everybody in the house. Two to the head. Everybody I saw. I did it,’” Detective David LeCroy testified during a November preliminary hearing.Two witnesses hid and survived the shooting, including a woman identified as Kosky’s sister. The woman called police at about 2 a.m. to report the shooting.When police arrived at the home, Bullard, Hicks and Gibson were found dead. Olinger was found shot in critical condition. She was transported to Grady Memorial Hospital, where she later died of her injuries on Oct. 30.Three other people were arrested Oct. 27 in connection with the crime. Jacob Williams, 18, of McDonough, 21-year-old Kayla Head of McDonough, and Brooke Knight, 19, of Locust Grove were charged with obstruction of a police investigation. The three remain under investigation in the Henry County District Attorney’s Office.The prosecution will now prepare for trial, although District Attorney Darius Pattillo said Tuesday that it is “hard to say” when a trial date will be set. The case has not yet been assigned to a judge.If convicted of murder, Kosky and Baker could face a mandatory life sentence. Pattillo said the case will be reviewed at a later date in order to determine whether his office will seek the death penalty.Sundae took a look at the nation’s top 10 cities with the most properties at risk of flooding, using 2020 data from the First Street Foundation’s First National Flood Risk Assessment.Click for more.Jacob Cole Kosky, 22, of McDonough allegedly told friends he wanted to rob and possibly kill someone two days before he was suspected of murdering four people at a Jackson home, according to testimony heard in Henry County Magistrate Court last week.Jacob Cole Kosky, 22, of McDonough allegedly told friends he wanted to rob and possibly kill someone two days before he was suspected of murdering four people at a Jackson home, according to testimony heard in Henry County Magistrate Court last week.Matthew Baker, Jr., the second suspect facing murder charges in connection with the October shooting of four young people at a home on Moccasin Gap Road, was bound over to Superior Court Wednesday to await consideration by a grand jury.Matthew Baker, Jr., the second suspect facing murder charges in connection with the October shooting of four young people at a home on Moccasin Gap Road, was bound over to Superior Court Wednesday to await consideration by a grand jury.Jacob Cole Kosky will go before a grand jury for indictment in connection with the October murders of four young people at a home on Moccasin Gap Road in Jackson.Jacob Cole Kosky will go before a grand jury for indictment in connection with the October murders of four young people at a home on Moccasin Gap Road in Jackson.The weapon used in the Oct. 27 homicides has been recovered after a primary suspect allegedly confessed to the crime, according Newton County Sheriff’s Deputies.The weapon used in the Oct. 27 homicides has been recovered after a primary suspect allegedly confessed to the crime, according Newton County Sheriff’s Deputies.The fourth victim shot Thursday in the multiple shooting at a home on Moccasin Gap Road has died of her injuries.The fourth victim shot Thursday in the multiple shooting at a home on Moccasin Gap Road has died of her injuries.Five people have been arrested in the multiple shooting in Henry County Thursday morning that left three dead and one in critical condition.Five people have been arrested in the multiple shooting in Henry County Thursday morning that left three dead and one in critical condition.The two McDonough men appeared separately for arraignment before Judge Arch McGarity Tuesday afternoon. Both are facing the death penalty should they be convicted of murder in the Oct. 27 fatal shooting.The two McDonough men appeared separately for arraignment before Judge Arch McGarity Tuesday afternoon. Both are facing the death penalty should they be convicted of murder in the Oct. 27 fatal shooting.ReporterPublic safety reporter Chelsea Prince joined the Henry Herald and Clayton News Daily in 2016. She is a graduate of Emory University.Please log in, or sign up for a new, free account to read or post comments.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Now, more than ever, the world needs trustworthy reporting—but good journalism isn’t free.

Please support us by subscribing or making a contribution today.This is not a scientific poll — results reflect only the opinions of those voting.

#NationalPecanMonthFollow us on social media:SportsPhone: 770-957-916138 Sloan Street
McDonough, GA 3025338 Sloan Street
McDonough, GA 3025338 Sloan Street
McDonough, GA 30253Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.UPDATE @ 5:50 p.m. (Aug. 25):A Dayton man was convicted this evening of murder in the shooting death of Brandon Lanier in October 2016.Curtis McShann, 30, was convicted of all but one of the more than 20 charges against him.A jury convicted McShann of fatally shooting Lanier, 27, on Riverside Drive. Prosecutors said three others were shot during the incident when more than 50 rounds were fired.UPDATE @ 1:30 p.m. (Aug. 25):Closing arguments have concluded and a jury is now deliberating the fate of Curtis McShann, who faces 24 counts in connection to the shooting death of Brandon Lanier.EARLIER (Aug. 21)The murder trial of Curtis McShann began today in Montgomery County Common Pleas Court.McShann, 30, faces 24 counts — including four for murder — for the Oct. 25, 2016, shooting death of Brandon Lanier, 27, on Riverside Drive in Dayton.RELATED:McShann arraigned in fatal shootingJamarko Walker, 22, was sentenced in late July to 24 years to life in prison for his role in Lanier’s death.According to prosecutors and police, Lanier was killed and three others were shot and taken to a local hospital; about 50 rounds were fired during the incident.RELATED:Jamarko Walker found guiltyCourt records show McShann’s attorney could say his client has an alibi, that he was at residences on Lobata Place and Odlin Street in Dayton during the shooting.Prosecutors filed documents indicating that they planned to use conversations McShann allegedly had with a detective in which the defendant said he may plead guilty if two other people were not charged with tampering with evidence.The trial is the in the courtroom of Judge Richard Skelton.SOCIAL MEDIA:FollowMark Gokavi onTwitterorFacebookMORE:Read other stories from Mark GokaviDOWNLOAD OUR FREE MOBILE APPS FOR LATEST BREAKING NEWSSign up for our newslettersThe United States Marshals Service arrested Danny Roach, 34, in connection with the manhunt for Michael Vance and the Oklahoma County Sheriff's Office  identified two others they are looking to arrest.April Harden (who also goes by April Roach) was arrested Monday evening. She and 33-year-old Reginald Moore are accused of assisting Vance during the early hours of the manhunt.According to a probable cause affidavit, the investigation led U.S. Marshals to Roach, a convicted felon. When authorities located Roach they found him in possession of several guns including two rifles and two handguns.Roach was arrested on October 29.Oklahoma County jail records show he is being held on complaints of accessory to felony and possession of a firearm after a former conviction of a felony.The Oklahoma County sheriff's office held a news conference at 3 p.m. Monday. Sheriff John Whetsel announced they arrested Roach in connection to the manhunt. Sheriff Whetsel said after the murders in Luther, Roach provided Vance with bandages and two 30-round magazines for an AK-47. He also traded Vance's rifle with a different AK-47 that has a shorter barrel. That was the weapon Vance reportedly used in the attempted carjacking in Sayre, the shooting of Dewey County Sheriff, and the shootout with Oklahoma Highway Patrol (OHP) troopers that ended in his death.The Sheriff said Roach was aware of Vance being involved in the shootout with Wellston police officers and the homicides. Roach said Vance admitted to, "cutting the wrong side of the victim's neck," and he told Roach he had to cut the other side. He said he killed the female victim after she lied to him.Roach admitted he was looking out for Vance while Vance was at his home in Oklahoma City. He said as Vance was leaving, a police car drove by and Roach let Vance know when it was clear for him to leave.Roach is facing multiple charges, including two counts of accessory to felony murder after the fact and two counts of possession of a firearm after a felony conviction. His bond has been denied.Later Monday afternoon, the Oklahoma County Sheriff's Office also announced that two other arrest warrants were to be issued for Moore and Harden.According to court documents, Moore is accused of swapping rifles with Vance. Harden is accused of initiating the call with Moore two exchange the weapons. She is also accused of providing bandages for Vance's gunshot wounds.Roach and Moore reportedly helped Vance heal from his gunshot wound.Moore reportedly went to a hardware store and bought a pair of needle nose pliers to try and remove the bullet that may have been lodged in Vance from the Wellston officer involved shooting, according to an affidavit.The United States Marshals Service arrested Danny Roach, 34, in connection to the manhunt for Michael Vance.The United States Marshals Service arrested Danny Roach, 34, in connection to the manhunt for Michael Vance.The United States Marshals Service arrested Danny Roach, 34, in connection to the manhunt for Michael Vance.WATCHVIDEOSSeven people injured in East Oakland shootingOPD officers take cover after shots fired at them in East Oakland overnight. Story 6p abc7news.pic.twitter.com/J3IYT1FGE6SAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) — Police in San Francisco late Thursday afternoon confirmed that two people have been arrested in connection with the shooting at an Excelsior District high school earlier this week that left four students injured.Four suspects were seen fleeing the site of theSan Francisco high school shootingTuesday afternoon.Police said they responded to a report of shots fired in front of 325 La Grande Avenue Tuesday, which is the campus for both the June Jordan School for Equity and City Arts and Tech High School, at around 3:17 p.m. as both high schools were letting out for the day.Upon arrival, police found three students – two males and a female all 15 years old — had been wounded in a shooting.The three injured students had run back into the school bleeding after being shot in the parking lot.The female student was struck in the torso and was initially reported in critical condition with life-threatening injuries. A police spokeswoman said the girl’s condition has been upgraded to serious but still life-threatening on Wednesday.A fourth student showed up later at the Bayview police station with injuries from the shooting.The school was placed on lockdown to make sure there was no active shooter on site.“We did the best we could and we provided a safe space immediately,” said June Jordan Principal Jessica Huang.Three students suffered non-life threatening wounds, but the teenage girl who was shot in the torso was rushed to the hospital with critical injuries.While police confirmed the two arrests, they did not offer any additional details about the two people taken into custody or where the investigation stood in terms of finding the additional two suspects who were still at large.WKRG News 5by:Emily DevoeUPDATE:Five People were shot, Four Adults and One Juvenile.Police tell News 5 that the injuries sustained are non-life threatening.ORIGINAL STORY:MPD investigating a shooting that happened on St. Stephens Road near the Rodger Williams Housing Projects just before 7 p.m. Saturday night.Local rapper C-Nile Afori was using Facebook LIVE during a block party when multiple shots rang out and could be heard in the video as well as people screaming and running for  cover. Police were already present at the block party at the time of the shooting.This shooting comes roughly 24 hours after a homicide on the same block of St. Stephens Road ( 1800).  MPD found a man lying on the side of the road with a gunshot wound and was taken to the hospital where he later died.News 5  has contacted Mobile Police to try to get more information about the Saturday’s shooting, but have not heard back yet. We’ll update this article as more information becomes available.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.PENSACOLA, Fla. (WKRG) -- A brewery had its roof ripped off Saturday morning as strong storms moved across the area.Emerald Republic Brewing, which is right off of Barrancas Street at West Government and H Street, posted the following message to Facebook:PENSACOLA, Fla. (WKRG) -- Escambia County Fire Rescue responded Saturday afternoon to a fire at Carter Paint and Body at 3800 Hollywood Avenue.The owner says it's a total loss. It's unknown how the fire started and if it was weather-related.MILTON, Fla. (WKRG) -- A woman was taken to a hospital by ambulance early Saturday morning after strong winds knocked a tree onto her mobile home."I thought there was a tornado coming," Neighbor Hermon Williams said. "It didn't last long. Just 10 seconds and it was over."ROCKFORD — Police continue to investigate a deadly Oct. 15 shooting at the Clock Tower Resort & Conference Center that left five wounded and one dead.Marcello Brown, 23, was shot and killed at a birthday party held in two rooms of the hotel.A critically wounded 19-year-old male and a critically wounded 21-year-old male remain hospitalized and in stable condition. An 18-year-old female shot in the leg and a 20-year-old male who was shot in the leg have been treated and released from area hospitals. An 18-year-old female shot in the head was transferred from the hospital to a rehabilitation facility, according to the Rockford Police Department.Police have declined to identify the victims of the shooting because of the "sensitive nature of the investigation."No arrests have been announced.Rockford code enforcement officers, fire investigators and police conducted a four-hour inspection on Thursday of the Clock Tower Resort.Building and health and life safety code violations were discovered during the inspection. Those included a faulty fire alarm system, faulty fire suppression systems, door security, outdated and untested automated fire extinguishers over the cooking areas of the kitchen, inoperable heating and cooling equipment, and electrical and plumbing problems.Inspectors ordered the hotel to hire a third party to provide fire protection and security on a 24-hour basis until repairs are made.Anyone with information is asked to call the Rockford police detectives at 779-500-6551 or Rockford Area Crime Stoppers at 815-963-7867.Jeff Kolkey: 815-987-1374; jkolkey@rrstar.com; @jeffkolkeyROCKFORD — Police continue to investigate a deadly Oct. 15 shooting at the Clock Tower Resort & Conference Center that left five wounded and one dead.Marcello Brown, 23, was shot and killed at a birthday party held in two rooms of the hotel.A critically wounded 19-year-old male and a critically wounded 21-year-old male remain hospitalized and in stable condition. An 18-year-old female shot in the leg and a 20-year-old male who was shot in the leg have been treated and released from area hospitals. An 18-year-old female shot in the head was transferred from the hospital to a rehabilitation facility, according to the Rockford Police Department.Police have declined to identify the victims of the shooting because of the "sensitive nature of the investigation."No arrests have been announced.Rockford code enforcement officers, fire investigators and police conducted a four-hour inspection on Thursday of the Clock Tower Resort.Building and health and life safety code violations were discovered during the inspection. Those included a faulty fire alarm system, faulty fire suppression systems, door security, outdated and untested automated fire extinguishers over the cooking areas of the kitchen, inoperable heating and cooling equipment, and electrical and plumbing problems.Inspectors ordered the hotel to hire a third party to provide fire protection and security on a 24-hour basis until repairs are made.Anyone with information is asked to call the Rockford police detectives at 779-500-6551 or Rockford Area Crime Stoppers at 815-963-7867.Jeff Kolkey: 815-987-1374; jkolkey@rrstar.com; @jeffkolkey© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Rockford Register Star  ~ 99 E. State St., Rockford, IL 61104~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Filed under:A man was killed and six others wounded in a shooting in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side Friday night.At 8:18 p.m., the group was standing together outside in the 3300 block of West Maypole when someone inside a black vehicle driving east on Maypole began shooting, according to Chicago Police.Three men — ages 26, 27, 34 — took themselves to Mount Sinai hospital in good condition with gunshot wounds to the arms and legs. Jeffrey Brinson, 32, was taken with them and pronounced at dead at 8:33 p.m., according to police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.An autopsy Friday found that Brinson, of the 5100 block of West North Avenue, died of multiple gunshot wounds, the medical examiner’s office said. His death was ruled a homicide.A 31-year-old man was shot in the left arm and a 22-year-old woman was shot in the right foot, police said. Both were taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition. A 21-year-old woman suffered a graze wound to the face and was treated, but not taken to a hospital.A police source said all of the men who were shot are documented gang members.No one was in custody for the shooting as Area North detectives continued to investigate, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:Four men were shot Thursday afternoon in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side.The shooting happened about 1 p.m. in the 2700 block of West Lexington, according to Chicago Police.A 19-year-old was shot in the face, a 21-year-old was shot in the right thigh and an 18-year-old was also shot in the thigh, police said. All three were taken in serious condition to Mount Sinai Hospital.A fourth man, 31, was shot in the buttocks and taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition stabilized, police said.The shooting is thought to be gang-related, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Doctors at Lurie Children’s Hospital said Kayden Swann "continues to demonstrate positive improvements," though he is still in critical condition in the pediatric intensive care unit.Gallery: Grand Rapids deadly shooting 10.9.2016GRAND RAPIDS, MI - A rivalry between gangs may have been the motivation behind an October 2016 shooting that killed one and injured eight.On Monday, March 13, in a preliminary examination, witnesses testified against Jokari "Trouble" Lowery, who police identified as the shooter in the incident.Lowery, 20, was arrested in January and charged with open murder for the death of 21-year-old Juwan Boykin. Boykin and Lowery were attending a birthday party at a shuttered business at 1850 28thStreet SE when the shooting occurred.During his testimony, Devante Granderson said a past gang-related incident where someone urinated on the grave of an Uptown gang member may have motivated Lowery in the shooting."He said, 'When I see a Seven (gang member), he's going to get killed,'" Granderson told the court.At about 3:45 a.m. on Oct. 9, Grand Rapids Police responded to the report of a shooting at the 28th Street location. Boykin was found dead at the scene.Earlier in the night, there had been a birthday party in Muskegon. The Grand Rapids address, a closed clearance outlet, was the "after party."Witnesses testified about 60-80 people attended the party.Kyrell Ware was with Lowery the night before the shooting, along with another friend. The three stopped at Holly's Back Door Bar and Grill at 255 28thStreet SE and Lowery went inside to use the restroom, Ware testified.Inside, Ware said Lowery saw a member of the Highland Street gang. Lowery and Ware are both affiliated with the Uptown gang. The two gangs are rivals.Lowery and the man apparently did not exchange words. But Lowery told Ware that if the man had followed Lowery into the restroom, he would have shot him with the gun he had with him."He said the man was looking at him funny," Eula Logins testified.Logins talked to Lowery at the party."He said he was going to off them," she said. "He kept mentioning he had a 30-round clip."Lowery, Ware and their other friend left Holly's to go to the party in Ware's car. There was security outside patting down partygoers, so Lowery stored his gun in the car.Ware asked a girl to use her purse to carry his own gun into the party, which she did. Once inside, Ware did not get his gun back and later found out that Lowery had it. The two didn't see each other again until after the shooting, Ware testified.Ware didn't see the shooting, but said he saw Lowery again back at his car afterward."He told me, 'I think I killed someone,'" Ware testified. Ware said he never got his gun back.Another witness to the shooting, Willie Boyd, was with Boykin before he was shot. The two had known each other since childhood and were both affiliated with the Seven gang, which is allied with the Highland gang.Boyd went to the party on 28thStreet alone and met up with Boykin there.The two weren't together when Boykin got shot, but Boyd testified he was close enough to identify Lowery as the shooter. Lowery shot Boyd twice in the leg, Boyd testified.Nine people in total were shot including Boykin, who died as a result of his injuries. Eight others were injured in the shooting including four men and four women.Lowery was bound over for trial on five counts, including open murder and gang membership, which Judge David Buter said he thinks was the motivation for the crime. He also faces charges of carrying a concealed weapon, possession of a firearm by a felon and felonious possession of a firearm.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A man has died and three others were injured after a shooting Saturday outside a Sacramento nightclub, police said.The shooting happened about 2:17 a.m. near the La Nueva Tropicana Club on Arden Way, the Sacramento Police Department said.The four people were shot while standing in the parking lot of the club, police said. They were taken to various hospitals in the area with serious injuries, and one man died of his injuries.The Sacramento County Coroner's Office identified the man as Cesar Aleman Luna, 28, of Sacramento.The current conditions of the other victims have not been released.It is unclear if all the victims were club patrons, Sacramento police spokesperson Matt McPhail said. Officers believe the shooting happened after the club closed.No motive or suspect information was available at this time.This is the third fatal shooting investigation Sacramento homicide detectives are dealing with in the past 24 hours, police said.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.BROOKLYN — A man was arrested for aBay Ridge bodega shooting that injured four people, according to police.Ivan Jimenez, 29, was arrested Thursday and charged with attempted murder, assault, reckless endangerment and criminal possession of a weapon after he and two other men shot four people inside the M&S Mini Market at 7301 Third Ave. last month.Jimenez and one of the other suspects fired a black handgun into the bodega Oct. 8, striking a 28-year-old man, 44-year-old man, 46-year-old man and 33-year-old man. All four victims survived and were in stable condition after the shooting, according to theNYPD.Jimenez, who lives at 510 58th St. in Sunset Park, has one prior arrest for weapons possession on April 30, 2016, a police spokeswoman said.Police are still looking for a man in his mid-to-late 20s who was last seen wearing a white shirt, long black shorts and a black baseball cap and another man also in his 20s who was wearing blue jeans, a black hoodie and black and white sneakers.The motive for the shooting was still unclear, the spokeswoman added.A worker at the market declined to comment.Next inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstNext inBay Ridge & BensonhurstCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.MINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)— A Brooklyn Center man is facing charges Tuesday in connection with one of the two shootings in downtown Minneapolis early Monday morning.The Hennepin County Attorney’s office says Qumari Spencer, 19, is charged with one count of possession of a firearm by a prohibited person.According to the criminal complaint, Minneapolis police officers at the first precinct watching a surveillance feed noticed a large group fighting at Hennepin Avenue and 4th Street near the library. Officers said they saw the crowd duck and heard multiple gunshots as one man — later identified as Spencer — took a shooting stance.After the shooting near the library, police say Spencer ran towards the parking lot of the Gay 90s bar. There, an officer found Spencer and ordered him to the ground, but Spencer ran, according to the criminal complaint.Prosecutors say there are no charges yet in another shooting that occurred about 15 minutes early that morning just a few blocks away.If convicted, Spencer faces up to 15 years in prison and a $30,000 fine.Ben Spicer, Digital JournalistBen Spicer, Digital JournalistSAN ANTONIO– The San Antonio Police Department and Crime Stoppers want the public’s assistance in tracking down the person responsible for a fatal shooting.Carla Rogue Valeriano, 25, was shot and killed around 1:54 a.m. on Oct. 2, 2016 on South Flores Street and Pruitt Avenue.According to police, Valeriano was standing with friends at the intersection when a silver or light blue sedan opened fire and then drove off. At this time, police do not have any suspect information.Anyone with any knowledge of the shooting  is urged to call Crime Stoppers at (210) 224-STOP.Tips can also be texted to CRIMES (274637) or by visiting the Crime Stoppers website.Crime Stoppers will pay up to $5,000 for information that leads to an arrest.Copyright 2017 by KSAT - All rights reserved.Ben Spicer is a digital journalist who works the early morning shift for KSAT.If you need help with the Public File, call 210-351-1241.Please purchase a subscription to read our premium content. If you have a subscription, please log in or sign up for an account on our website to continue.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Rain likely. High near 65F. Winds SSE at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Partly cloudy skies this evening. Increasing clouds with periods of showers late. Low 46F. Winds S at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 50%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:30 pmReporterJames E.BealsKANKAKEE — Emotions flared in a Kankakee County courtroom Friday as James E. Beals, 58, was found guilty in the October 2016 murder of Ralph Ledet.Members of Beals’ family erupted in tears and ran from the courtroom after Judge Kathy Bradshaw-Elliott read the jury’s verdict. They were followed by courthouse security and then additional members of the family. As the judge was polling the jury, commotion outside the courtroom could be heard. Extra security from Kankakee Police and sheriff’s deputies were called to the courthouse to maintain order.“This was a very tough case,” First Assistant State’s Attorney Joe Kosman said. “I’m glad we got justice for Ralph.”Ledet, 46, of Pembroke Township, was shot and killed in the early morning hours of Oct. 1, 2016. Prosecutors say Beals, also of Pembroke Township, shot Ledet twice in the head with a 9-mm handgun. Ledet’s body was found lying in the driveway of an abandoned trailer on 17250E Road near the site where he, Beals and another man attempted to steal a cattle gate.After hearing a gunshot, the three men returned to their vehicle, a 1997 Ford Explorer owned by Beals’ wife. The third man, who is not beingidentified by the Daily Journal as he was a witness, testified in court this week that Beals shot Ledet in the head while they were still parked at the scene. He further testified that Beals exited the vehicle and pulled Ledet out and shot him again in the head.Prior to attempting to steal the gate, all three men were at a known drug house in Pembroke the night of Sept. 30, 2016. A drug dealer who was at the trailer also testified against Beals.As Beals awaited transport back to Jerome Combs Detention Center, he told the Daily Journal that the two men’s testimony was untrue.“They told lies to get out of trouble,” Beals said. “They destroyed my life.”Concerns of the defenseWith the guilty verdict, Beals faces a sentencing range of 45 years to life. But his attorneys — Bart Beals and Cierra Norris, both of Chicago — argue there may be grounds for a new trial.“There are some significant issues for a new trial,” said Bart Beals, who is not related to James Beals.Those issues, he said, came during closing arguments.Before the trial started, Elliott granted a defense motion prohibiting prosecutors from mentioning their theory that Beals set his Ford Explorer on fire on Oct. 3, 2016, to conceal evidence. In her closing arguments, Assistant State’s Attorney Erika Hamer made mention of that possibility.That fire was discussed Thursday during testimony from Kankakee County Sheriff Cpl. Emerson Rushing.Rushing testified that in an Oct. 5, 2016, interview with investigators, Beals said he was smoking crack in the vehicle when his lighter fell on the floorboard and ignited gas that had leaked out of a weed wacker that was in the front-passenger area.As part of their investigation of the vehicle fire, police searched Beals’ property with the consent of his wife. In that search, police say they found a case for a 9-mm pistol and a box of .38 caliber ammunition. Rushing testified Beals became a person of interest in Ledet’s death following the search.“There’s a pretty good chance we will get a new trial,” Bart Beals said.James Beals is scheduled to be back in court Feb. 13.James E.BealsReporterJeff Bonty has worked for The Daily Journal since September 1986, starting in the sports department before moving to news reporting in 2002. He's a native of Indiana and graduate of Purdue University. His email is jbonty@daily-journal.com.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.SAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) — Two Stockton residents have been arrested in connection with a shooting that killed one man and injured three other people in San Francisco’s Tenderloin neighborhood last September, police said Thursday.Darrick Devereaux, 41, and Linda Jimenez, 22, were arrested last Saturday in the area of O’Farrell and Jones streets in San Francisco inconnection with the Sept. 29 murder of 44-year-old Shunsie Ellis.Ellis was found lying on the ground in the 400 block of Ellis Street just before 1 a.m. after a report of a shooting.Ellis died at the scene while a 59-year-old man, a 49-year-old woman and a 53-year-old man suffered gunshot wounds including ones to the leg and foot, police said.No arrests were made at the scene, but investigators eventually identified Devereaux and Jimenez as suspects and arrested them after executing a search warrant.The search recovered three semi-automatic firearms and an assault rifle, as well as nearly a quarter-pound of suspected narcotics, police said.Devereaux has been charged with murder, three counts of attempted murder and three counts of assault with a semi-automatic firearm. He remains in custody with bail set at $5 million, and has a preliminary hearing scheduled for March 23, according to court and jail records.Jimenez was arrested on suspicion of being an accessory to crime and multiple narcotics offenses, according to police. More information on her case status was not available Thursday.Police are asking anyone with information on this case to contact them at (415) 575-4444 or to text a tip to TIP411 with “SFPD” at the start of the message.© Copyright 2017 by CBS San Francisco and Bay City News Service. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.myfox8.comby:FOX8 Digital DeskJaquan Deshawn GoreWINSTON-SALEM, N.C. — Police have arrested the suspected shooter in a drive-by shooting in a Winston-Salem neighborhood that injured four people.Jaquan Deshawn Gore faces numerous charges including discharging a firearm in city limits, discharging a firearm into an occupied building and assault with a deadly weapon.Gore also faces two counts each of assault with a deadly weapon inflicting serious injury and assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill.Police said officers were called to 104 Five Royales Drive at about 3:25 p.m. Monday in reference to the incident.The victims were at the home when a dark SUV drove past, according to police. A passenger in the SUV allegedly started firing a handgun multiple times at the home, injuring the victims.The victims were taken to Wake Forest Baptist Medical Center and are in stable condition with non-life-threatening injuries, according to police.Police have identified the victims as 18-year-old Myrick Malone Dodd, 23-year-old Richaad Deon Dodd, 46-year-old Earnest Dean Dodd and 25-year-old Keith Reynard Bristow Jr.SubmitJACKSONVILLE, Fla. (AP) — A Florida woman whose image went viral when she coughed on a customer at a Pier 1 store last year in the midst of the coronavirus pandemic has been sentenced to 30 days in jail.A judge in Jacksonville on Thursday also ordered Debra Hunter to pay a $500 fine, serve six months probation and participate in a mental health evaluation along with anger management, David Chapman, communications director for the state attorney's office in Jacksonville, said in an email. She was also ordered to cover the costs of the victim's COVID-19 test.RALEIGH, N.C. (WNCN) - The CDC tracks severe reactions to COVID-19 through its Vaccine Adverse Event Reporting System. So far, there are close to 1,300 reports of severe reactions from the vaccines statewide.While Wake County and UNC Health put a pause to Johnson and Johnson vaccinations after more than a dozen bad reactions, the CDC said the vaccines are still safe to use.Ray Lambert, the Army medic who survived multiple wounds on D-Day and was saluted by a president on the World War II battle's 75th anniversary, died on Friday. He was 100.Lambert died at his home in Seven Lakes, North Carolina, with his wife and daughter by his side, said neighbor and friend Dr. Darrell Simpkins. The physician, who accompanied Lambert to France in June 2019, said the veteran succumbed to an aggressive form of facial cancer and congestive heart failure.Baltimore police said eight people — including a 3-year-old girl — were struck by gunfire Saturday evening in a shooting in the 700 block of Preston St.The incident occurred about 8:30 p.m. Police said three assailants — one armed with a shotgun and the other two with handguns — fled on foot after the attack and were at large late Saturday night.At a news conference at the scene, Police Commissioner Kevin Davis and Police Department spokesman T.J. Smith said none of the injuries were considered life-threatening.Davis said officers had gathered enough information that he was "very comfortable" in saying Saturday's attack was in retaliation for a Labor Day shooting that left one person dead. Police have made an arrest in that case, he said.Police said the three gunmen approached a group of people gathered in front of a home on Preston Street and opened fire. A father and his 3-year-old daughter who were nearby were struck as well."The three shooters emerged — one from a dark alley, and two from up the street," said Davis. "They stopped short of the crowd and began firing."Other than the child, the injured included a woman in her 30s, and six men in their 20s and 30s. Police did not identify the victims, and no description was available of the gunmen.Davis said the shooters "need not to just be in jail, but underneath a jail."He and Smith said police were already getting leads from the public to aid the investigation and urged anyone with information to call 410-396-2221.Police reported that five other people had been shot over the weekend, including an 8-year-old boy who suffered non-life-threatening injuries when he was shot in the foot in the 600 block of S. Smallwood St. at 6:30 p.m.; and an adult man who walked into a hospital at 7:19 p.m. seeking treatment for a gunshot wound.Earlier, officials said a 26-year-old man was in "grave" condition after being shot at 1:08 p.m. Saturday in the first block of S. Carey St. And Friday evening about 11:30, officers were called to the 4300 block of Seminole Ave. and found one man, 27, shot in the arm and another, 18, shot in the hand.Police at the scene of the Preston Street shooting had several blocks taped off, and officers had marked areas on Preston between Greenmount and Homewood avenues were they found shell casings.Several residents were gathered outside as officers worked the scene.Charles Pullen, 45, said he was sitting on the steps of a liquor store at Greenmount and Preston, and took cover when he heard the shots."It was like they were bouncing off the walls," Pullen said. "It was like World War II going on."A woman who identified herself as Kisha but declined to give her last name was coming home Saturday evening after attending a baby shower. Wearing a pink tutu that was part of the party attire, she said she heard people in her neighborhood had been shot, and was disturbed by the violence."There's always something," she said.crentz@baltsun.comRecommendedOutside a family home Monday, Valarie Turpin showed WDBJ7 the badge her son wore as the coach of a youth football team."He was a very, very talented and very smart young fellow," Turpin said.Shawn Johnson volunteered with the R.S. Payne Dragons, a team made up of 11- and 12-year-old boys from his neighborhood.He was passionate about sports."He loved his fishing, he loved his hunting, and he loved his dogs," Turpin said, standing composed by shaken following her son's death from an apparent drive-by shooting.Johnson was walking with friends along Rodes Street on Sunday morning, after leaving the JazzE Ellington night club. Police say someone pulled up in a vehicle and fired gunshots.Four people were hit, including Johnson. He died at a nearby hospital."I can't express how I feel right now, but I know he's looking down on us and standing right here beside us," Turpin said.JazzE was hosting a benefit concert for another young man who recently died. Turpin said her son was at the club to support the fundraiser, but she doesn't know why someone would want to kill him outside the event."If there is anyone out there that has anything to help the police like pictures, cell phone videos, or just talk on the street please come forward so that we can get justice done for my son," Turpin said.One of the people shot here Sunday was taken to a hospital with what police call "critical" injuries. The other two were not seriously hurt.. No one has been arrested or charged in connection with the shooting.JazzE is hosting what it calls a "Stop the Violence" event this Thursday. The owner says she wants to get rid of myths about what happened here yesterday, and start an open conversation about violence in the city.Daniel Dahm, Digital Content ManagerDaniel Dahm, Digital Content ManagerORLANDO, Fla.– Orlando police have released pictures and videos of a vehicle involved in the fatal drive-by shooting outside of an Orlando pool hall.Police said the culprits in a gray Hyundai Sonata opened fire on a crowd of people, killing Dwayne Antoine Stuart, 37, who is not believed to not been the target of the shooting.The Sonata was reported stolen to Orlando Police Sept. 1 and was found burning on Sept. 17 just after 4 a.m. in the 100 block of N John St in Orlando, just minutes after the drive-by shooting, according to police. The culprits then got into another vehicle, possibly a Dodge Charger, and police are urging the driver to come forward.The shooting was reported around 3:35 a.m. in the 3900 block of Columbia Street.Orlando police said the shooting took place in the road near Sam's Supermarket at 3930 Columbia St. as patrons were leaving a neighboring pool hall.Two of the other six victims were released from the hospital, police said. The other four are in stable condition, according to police."Right now, we do not have a suspect description to provide," police said in an email.Residents who live nearby told News 6 that they woke up to hearing numerous gunshots."It was going through all night. Just shots. Pop, pop, pop. That's all you could hear," Kay Fedd said.Police blocked off Columbia Street for hours as it was covered in shell casings and bullet-riddled cars."It's always something happening here, but not like this. This was over the extreme," Fedd said."I just saw people running inside and running outside," said "Mr. C," who works security at the pool hall and added that Stuart was his friend."He's a real good person. He worked. He's not a bad guy. He doesn't do nothing. He's got kids," he said.As the sun came up, more family and friends gathered across the street and cried, watching as investigators took pictures and gathered evidence in an effort to figure out who pulled the trigger."Something has got to be done. It's too much, you know. There's a lot of hard-working people and they come home like me -- I come home and I'm scared to go back out," Fedd said.Watch News 6 and stay with ClickOrlando.com for more on this story.Copyright 2016 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Daniel started with WKMG-TV in 2000 and became the digital content manager in 2009. When he's not working on ClickOrlando.com, Daniel likes to head to the beach or find a sporting event nearby.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.Fox 59by:FOX59 WebINDIANAPOLIS, Ind. – A third person has died followinga weekend shooting on the northwest sideof Indianapolis, family members told FOX59.The shooting happened just after 12:30 a.m. Saturday in the 2000 block of West 76th Street. Officers responded to call about shots fired in the area.When they arrived, they found a man had been shot in the hand. They found one of the victims, Antonio Kelley, 23, unresponsive. EMS medics pronounced him dead at the scene.Around 1 a.m., IMPD received a second call about a person shot in the 7200 block of North Michigan Road. Police found a man suffering from a gunshot wound; he went to St. Vincent Hospital in serious condition. That victim died days later. The Marion County Coroner’s Office identified him as Elishama Pierre, 24.Pierre was shot in the head. His death was ruled a homicide.Around 1:30 a.m., investigators were alerted to a person down in a parking lot. Police said the man, Derrius Brandon, 23, had also been shot. He was pronounced dead.IMPD believed the shootings were related and will continue to investigate.SubmitLAWRENCE, Ind. -- The Lawrence Police Department (LPD) is investigating a shooting that left one person in critical condition.LPD said at 11:30 a.m. Friday, officers responded to a gas station on the 11000 block of Pendleton Pike on a report of a person shot.BRYAN, Texas (NewsNation Now) — A man opened fire Thursday at a Texas cabinet-making company where he worked, killing one person and wounding five others before shooting and seriously wounding a state trooper prior to his arrest, authorities said.Larry Winston Bollin, 27, of Iola, Texas, was booked into the Brazos County Detention Center in Bryan late Thursday, according to a Bryan Police Department statement. Jail records showed Bollin was charged with murder and being held on a $1 million bond. No attorney was listed for Bollin in the jail record.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department is investigating after a man was critically wounded in a shooting Thursday afternoon.The IMPD said the shooting happened in the 2400 block of North Sherman Drive just before 5 p.m. Thursday. When officers arrived, they found a man with injuries consistent with a gunshot wound. The man was transported to a local hospital in critical condition. His condition has since stabilized.KTLAby:Cindy Von Quednow,Erin Myers,Steve KuzjOne of two men who were shot to death in East Hollywood Friday night has been identified, and two other men who were critically injured are expected to survive, officials said Saturday.The shooting was reported around 8 p.m. at 555 N. Heliotrope Drive, according to the Los Angeles Police Department.Two men were killed and two others were injured.Walter Martinez Jr., 23, was identified by the Los Angeles County County Department of Medical Examiner-Coroner Saturday.The other victims are believed to be in their 20s and at least one of them lived near where the shooting occurred.The shooter apparently walked up to a crowd of people and several shots were fired, a witness told KTLA. Police hope to speak to more witnesses and the surviving victims, said Detective Ray Martinez.Police did not have a detailed description of the suspect. It is unclear if the shooting is gang-related, but the area is known for gang activity, Martinez said.Anyone with information about the shooter is asked to call the LAPD’s Rampart Division, which is handling the investigation, at 213-484-3400.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.WANE 15by:WANE Staff ReportsFORT WAYNE, Ind. (WANE) The three men killed in the early Tuesday shooting of five people at the Sports and Spirits Bar along East Wayne Street have been identified.Nicholas Lee Powers, 30; Demario Laquan Burnett, 21; and Jerry Trivon Coleman, 31 all died of gunshot wounds, the Allen County Coroner said early Wednesday. The deaths of each men were ruled homicides, a collection that pushed the county’s total to 34 in 2016.Fort Wayne Police were called were before 2:30 a.m. Tuesday to the sports bar at 1723 East Wayne Street. When officers arrived, a crowd of people was found inside and outside the bar, according to Public Information Officer John Chambers.People were cleared out of the building, which police spokesman Michael Joyner described Tuesday as “packed,” and officers and paramedics found the victims. Paramedics gave them medical attention, but the men were pronounced dead.Two other people – both juveniles – were taken privately to a hospital and in good condition.Witnesses told police they heard gunshots inside the bar and saw a person running from the scene. Investigators were working to collect more information from witnesses.Police don’t have any suspect information and no arrests have been made.Tuesday was not Fort Wayne Police’s first time at the Sports and Spirits Bar. According to department records, officers have been called to the bar 436 times in the last ten years. Twelve shootings were reported in that time, along with seven stabbings and 19 claims of shots being fired.Hours after the last call, owner Burke Baughman voluntarilyrelinquished the establishment’s liquor licenseback to the state and said they do not plan to reopen. It ended a court battle over the bar’s liquor license that dated some two years.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.FORT WAYNE, Ind. (WANE) - Save the date for April 24, the Sister Cities International Gala is happening virtually. Throughout the event there will be entertainment, a silent auction, and a greeting from Mayor Tom Henry.Gala tickets are $100 and with that you will receive a Sister Cities cookbook with authentic recipes from Japan, Germany, and more.CHICAGO (NewsNationNow) – One mom's battle with picky eaters won her millions of views and followers on social media.Meet Jessica Woo, a normal mom who went viral on TikTok for creating bento box lunches for her children. She told NewsNation's Nichole Berlie that she wanted to foster good memories for her kids by creating the boxed lunches.LOS ANGELES (AP) — Los Angeles County plans to return prime beachfront property to descendants of a Black couple who built a seaside resort for African Americans but suffered racist harassment and were stripped of it by local city leaders a century ago, a county official said Friday.“It is the county’s intention to return this property,” Janice Hahn, a member of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors, told a news conference at what was known as Bruce’s Beach in the city of Manhattan Beach.(09/15/16) - There will be more security at the apartment complex near a Mid-Michigan university where five people were shot and injured last weekend.Law enforcement agencies and the owner of the Campus Village apartments held a press conference Thursday morning to unveil changes in security at the complex.There was one Saginaw County sheriff's deputy in another part of the complex when that shooting occurred early Sunday morning. There will be one more deputy there this weekend.Saginaw County Sheriff Bill Federspiel, Michigan State Police Lieutenant Dave Simon and John Leuenberger, who owns the complex, made that announcement at the apartments Thursday morning.“What we are looking at here is something we have not dealt with before,” Federspiel said.There was a large party Saturday night that continued Sunday morning at the complex, which is across the street from Saginaw Valley State University property.Police believe a man pulled out a gun and shot five people, all who are recovering with minor injuries.Not only will there be one more deputy, Michigan State Police will devote some resources in the vicinity of the complex to keep a closer eye on large parties.Leuenberger says the complex had five security officers on site as well and will try to keep the size of the parties under control. He doesn't believe there was 1,000 people at the party, but he agrees the crowd was too large.“We are working with university and the police departments to correct what was wrong and it will be down,” he said.“It’s in all of our best interests to do whatever we can to develop effective strategies to make sure this doesn't happen again,” Simon said.SVSU President Don Bachand has met with police and the complex owners.“We have improved our methods of communicating with one another. We had difficulty communicating with the management folks shortly after the event,” he said.Bachand says the school has no jurisdiction over the complex, but the two entities are working on a memorandum - a working agreement to prevent similar problems.Bachand wants an agreement sooner, rather than later.“There is some urgency to what we are doing here,” he said.Federspiel says the search continues for the gunman.Marcus Dansby, who admitted to the grisly slayings of four people, including his unborn child, in 2016, was sentenced today to 300 years in prison.Dansby, 23, pleaded guilty but mentally ill to killing Consuela Arrington, 37, Traeven Harris, 18, Dajahiona Arrington, 18, and the near-term fetus she was carrying. The slayings happened on Sept. 11, 2016, at 3006 Holton Ave.In court this morning, a Fort Wayne police detective was heard on a recording calling the scene "a house of horrors."Sgt. Michael Bell of the Fort Wayne Police Department was among the first on the scene around 4 a.m. that day and described gruesome injuries to the victims. He described blood-stained walls and a handrail leading to the upstairs of the home.Bell, who patrols the city's southeast side, said he still has trouble driving past the home."I don't like to think about it," he said. "It definitely does affect me every time I drive down that street. I try not to think about it -- otherwise, it's so invasive and overwhelming."Witnesses for defense attorneys Michelle Kraus and Robert Gevers testified Dansby was a caring, dedicated friend and family member.A friend said Dansby cared for his brother after the brother was shot.Dansby faced a minimum sentence of 205 years and up to 320 years in prison.mleblanc@jg.netShare this articleGallery: Multiple people shot in Jersey CityJERSEY CITY-- A 21-year-old Jersey City man faces up to 15 years in prison after pleading guilty to the aggravated manslaughter of a man who wasshot in the headin 2016 and wounding three women.Kenneth L. Barnes, of Orient Avenue, pleaded guilty to the homicide of Shaheer Parson, 35, who was found by responding police officers with a head wound on Van Wagenen Avenue on Sept. 11.Parson was pronounced dead at the scene, between Pavonia and Sip avenues, about 10 minutes later at 2:10 a.m.That morning, three wounded women were located nearby. Two women, ages 32 and 24 at the time, were shot once in the upper body, while a 35-year-old woman was shot multiple times in the upper body.The women were rushed to the Jersey City Medical Center, Hudson County Prosecutor Esther Suarez said at the time.Barnes was arrested Dec. 14, 2016 and pleaded guilty Wednesday before Hudson County Superior Court Judge Mark Nelson in the Hudson County Administration Building in Jersey City. He is scheduled to be sentenced by Nelson on Oct. 19, Hudson County Prosecutor's Office spokesman Ray Worrall said.Probable cause for the charges was listed as surveillance footage from the night of the offense, witness statements, and the findings of the state Regional Medical Examiner's Office. That autopsy found that Parson died of the gunshot wound to his head and the manner of his death was homicide.At a prior hearing, Hudson County Prosecutor Najma Rana said Barnes had been arrested twice in November 2016 on numerous drug charges. Information on the outcome of the drug charges was not immediately available this morning.Worrall did not comment on a potential motive for shootings.Barnes' bail was set at $1 million cash only when he made his first court appearance on the charged the day following his arrest. He has remained in custody since his arrest.The case is being handled by Hudson County Assistant Prosecutor Jane Weiner.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorMIAMI– A convicted felon was arrested Thursday in connection with a fatal shooting outside a nightclub in Miami.According to an arrest warrant, Fridnel Jean-Phillip, 25, was inside the El Nuevo Romance Restaurant & Nightclub early on Sept. 10 when he got into an argument with someone.Police said Jean-Phillip and the other person, whose identity has not been released, left the club at Northwest 36th Street and 35th Avenue with their groups and continued their verbal argument.Surveillance video shows Jean-Phillip going to his car to grab a gun and firing it at the other group, police said.Police said the other person returned fire and Jean-Phillip fled the scene.Officers found Michael Tito Lorenzo, 24, lying on the ground with a gunshot wound to the face. He was pronounced dead at the scene.A witness told detectives that Jean-Phillip fired the shot that struck Lorenzo.Three other people were also struck by bullets and were taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital's Ryder Trauma Center.Police said a man also broke his leg after jumping a fence to get away from the shooting.Jean-Phillip was arrested Thursday on charges of first-degree murder, first-degree attempted murder and being a convicted felon in possession of a firearm.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.EAST GARFIELD PARK — Two men were killed and three were wounded, one critically, in a shooting in East Garfield Park late Monday night, police said.The group was standing on the sidewalk in the 2700 block of West Lexington Street when someone shot at them from a passing silver minivan, according to a police incident report.One man, 22, was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital after being shot in his chest and thigh, police said. Charles Smith III, 22, of Harvey, was pronounced dead at 11 p.m., according to Cook County Medical Examiner's Office records. An autopsy showed he died of multiple gunshot wounds in a homicide.One of the men was taken to Stroger Hospital with a gunshot wound in his chest, police said. Dequan Trimble, 22, of the 2700 block of West Pole, was pronounced dead at 11:19 p.m., according to Cook County Medical Examiner's Office records. An autopsy showed he died of a gunshot wound in his torso in a homicide.Police said the man was a documented gang member.A 16-year-old boy was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in critical condition with a gunshot wound in his chest, police said.A 17-year-old was also taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was in serious condition after being shot in his chest, police said.A 20-year-old man was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital and listed in serious condition with gunshot wounds in his right arm and buttocks.No one is in custody, police said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Charges have been dropped against a man accused of a shooting at a Roanoke bar that killed one person and injured 10 others back in September.Prosecutors say at this time, they did not have enough evidence to proceed with charges against Jermaine Brown.Jermaine Black, 26, died in the shooting on September 4 at Monster’s Bar and Grill on Orange Avenue.Roanoke Assistant Commonwealth’s Attorney Joshua Dietz said prosecutors are still waiting for evidence to come back from the state lab. He described the crime scene at Monster’s as complicated.Once more evidence is returned, Dietz said it’s possible that Brown or others could be charged.Brown is expected to be released from jail.Dietz said witnesses have cooperated, but there’s “certainly room for more people to come forward.”The man charged with murder in a shooting at Monster's Bar and Grill in Roanoke is scheduled to be in front of a judge.In all, ten people were hurt and one left dead from the shooting in early September. Jermaine Brown is scheduled to be in court Tuesday his preliminary hearing.Police say Brown killed 26 year-old Jermaine Black. The shooting happened at Monster's Bar and Grill on Orange Avenue back on September 4.Roanoke Police say people were running out of the building and leaving in cars, arriving at local hospitals throughout that morning. We talked with Jermaine Black's family about his death. Angela Hopson took care of him since he was three. She's still heartbroken about the young life gone too soon.Angela Hopson, Caretaker, said, “I have my moments -- but it's like, I know he's never going to come through those doors again, so it's been rough.”She doesn't feel bad at all for the person who allegedly did this.“I mean I don't know what to say because he took my son's life,” she said. “I'm very angry when it comes to him. I don't know him, didn't know him, so all I can say is I want justice.”Quanisha Pannell, Black’s cousin, said, “We as the family, we need justice. We need answers, and I want to know why.”That hearing is scheduled for 11:00 Tuesday.Roanoke City Police say the shooting is still under investigation and additional people may be charged.WILMINGTON -- Police say a man shot in Creekwood last Saturday, Sept. 3 has died.Darryl Freeman, 28, died this morning at around 10 a.m., said Wilmington Police Department spokeswoman Linda Rawley. Freeman was one of four shooting victims after a man in a white car opened fire on a group of people near the park in Creekwood just after 2:40 p.m. Three other victims, 21-year-old Wakeel Stewart, Maurice Bellamy, 25; and Tyree Johnson, 20, were treated in the hospital and released.Rawley said detectives has no leads in the case, as witnesses are not cooperating.The city's automated gunfire detection system registered 23 rounds of gunfire, according to police radio traffic for the incident.Anyone with information may call the WPD at 910-343-3609 or anonymously submit a tip via Text-A-Tip. Send “Tip708” and the information to 274637 (CRIMES).Reporter Ashley Morris can be reached at 910-343-2096 or Ashley.Morris@starnewsonline.comWILMINGTON -- Police say a man shot in Creekwood last Saturday, Sept. 3 has died.Darryl Freeman, 28, died this morning at around 10 a.m., said Wilmington Police Department spokeswoman Linda Rawley. Freeman was one of four shooting victims after a man in a white car opened fire on a group of people near the park in Creekwood just after 2:40 p.m. Three other victims, 21-year-old Wakeel Stewart, Maurice Bellamy, 25; and Tyree Johnson, 20, were treated in the hospital and released.Rawley said detectives has no leads in the case, as witnesses are not cooperating.The city's automated gunfire detection system registered 23 rounds of gunfire, according to police radio traffic for the incident.Anyone with information may call the WPD at 910-343-3609 or anonymously submit a tip via Text-A-Tip. Send “Tip708” and the information to 274637 (CRIMES).Reporter Ashley Morris can be reached at 910-343-2096 or Ashley.Morris@starnewsonline.com© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Wilmington Star News  ~ 115 N. 3rd St., Suite 400, Wilmington NC 28401~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A shooting in West Town left four men wounded early Saturday, police said.At 3:30 a.m., the men were in the 100 block of North Seeley Avenue when they were shot, police said.A 21-year-old man was hit in his right ankle, a 34-year-old man was hit in his legs, a 36-year-old man was hit in his right leg and a 39-year-old man was hit in his right leg, police said. They were taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition.Officers found a gun at the scene. The victims have been uncooperative, police said, and the circumstances of the shooting are being investigated.No one was in custody.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownNext inWicker Park & BucktownCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.ENGLEWOOD — Three separate shootings left six people wounded, including a 14-year-old boy, in Englewood Tuesday night, police said.• Most recently, at 10:10 p.m., four people were shot in the 6800 block of South Ashland Avenue, according to a police incident report.The two men and two women were standing in front of a restaurant when someone emerged from a vacant lot and shot at them, police said.A 59-year-old woman was shot in her left knee and taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, police said.A 22-year-old man was taken to Stroger Hospital after being shot in his right arm.A 24-year-old man and a 34-year-old woman were taken to Holy Cross Hospital, where they were each treated for a gunshot wound in their leg, police said.Police could not provide any of their conditions but said all four were "stable."• At 8:05 p.m., a 14-year-old boy was walking on the sidewalk in the 600 block of West 61st Place with a friend pulled out a gun and showed it to him, according to Officer Michelle Tannehill, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.The gun went off and hit the boy in his lower right leg, Tannehill said.The boy was taken to Comer Children's Hospital, where he was listed in good condition, police said.• At 7:42 p.m., an 18-year-old man was standing at the corner of 57th Street and Bishop Street when someone shot at him from a passing car, Tannehill said.The man was taken to Stroger Hospital, where he was listed in good condition after being shot in his right leg, Tannehill said.Police said the man is a documented gang member.No one is in custody, police said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.From left: Wilbert Demosthenes, Devan Leggette and Anthony Hicks.Three New Jersey men have been sentenced to more than a dozen years in state prison for their roles in awild 2016 shootout along the Atlantic City Expresswaythat left one dead and five injured.Wilbert Demosthenes, 28, received a 17-year sentence, Anthony Hicks, 27, got 16 years and Devan Leggette was handed a 13-year term, the Atlantic County Prosecutor’s Office said Thursday.The three - all Pleasantville residents - each pleaded guilty to a charge of attempted murder on July 2. The shootouttook place on Aug. 29, 2016.A front seat passenger in Hicks’ Nissan Maxima - Rosemond Octavius - was killed in the shootout.No one was charged with the murder ofOctavius because prosecutors said his group were the aggressorsin the shootout, BreakingAC.com reported.The violence was sparked by a confrontation between Yahshaun Stukes-Williams and Leggette in a bathroom at the Atlantic County courthouse earlier that day, BreakingAC.com reported.The shooting began a short time later - around 2:55 p.m.- when the occupants of a Ford Expedition and the Maxima began exchanging gunfire on the eastbound side of the Expressway near milepost 11.8.Leggette then drove a Dodge Ram pickup truck from the far right entrance ramp and pinned the Expedition between the Dodge and Maxima. Leggette and Demosthenes, a passenger in the truck, began shooting into the right side of the Expedition, hitting all four people in the vehicle.Hicks got off the Expressway at Exit 7A and eventually stopped on the Garden State Parkway when the left front wheel fell off off the Nissan. Hicks was injured and Octavious had fatal gunshot wounds to the head and neck.The Expedition pulled into a parking lot at at Wawa on Delilah Road in Egg Harbor Township. It had been struck by gunfire 21 times and was missing a rear tire.The Dodge Ram got off at Exit 5 in Pleasantville. Police located the vehicle two days later at a house on Oakland Avenue in Pleasantville. Investigators found blood in the truck from Demosthene, who took himself to a hospital in Philadelphia after the shootout to get treatment of a gunshot wound to his arm.Two adults in the Expedition - Shaun Stukes and his adult son Yahshaun Stukes-Williams - were previously convicted of weapons offenses. Shaun Stukes, who is serving a five year stint in state prison, also was convicted of eluding.The occupants of a Ford Expedition were involved in a shootout on the Atlantic City Expressway in 2016 that left one dead and four hurt.Jeff Goldman may be reached atjeff_goldman@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@JeffSGoldman.Have a tip?Tell us:nj.com/tips.Get the latest updates right in your inbox.Subscribe to NJ.com’s newsletters.Jeff Goldman may be reached atjeff_goldman@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@JeffSGoldman.Have a tip? Tell us.nj.com/tipsGet the latest updates right in your inbox.Subscribe to NJ.com’s newsletters.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesLUBBOCK, TX (KCBD) - Lubbock police are searching for gunmen in robbery that left six people injured.Residents say seven people were walking in the 2200 block of 17th Street around 10:20 p.m. Sunday when they were approached by two men."They were trying to rob them of their phones and their wallets, and they said 'No'. So, they followed them back to their house, over here, and threatened them once more," said Luke Ford. "They got one phone out of them, I believe. And as they were walking, over next to that tree, about 15 to 20 yards down, they fired off a round at 'em."Police say six of the seven victims were peppered with bird shot and suffered minor injuries. All refused treatment at the scene.The suspects were described as a Hispanic male, 20-30 years old wearing a white shirt and red shorts, and a black male, 20-30 years old wearing dark or black colored clothing.If you have any information about this crime, call Crime Line at 741-1000.Copyright 2016KCBD. All rights reserved.5600 Avenue ALubbock, TX. 79404(806) 744-1414A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Police are investigating a shooting in the Bronx that left four men injured early Sunday morning.The shooting happened around 12:35 a.m. in front of the Bronxchester Houses on East 156th Street during a large dispute, police said.A 31-year-old man with a gunshot wound on his left arm, a 24-year-old with gunshot wounds on his left wrist, back and left leg, and a 26-year-old with two gunshot wounds on his leg were all taken to Harlem Hospital Center, according to police.A 23-year-old man with a gunshot wound on his right arm was taken to St. Barnabas Hospital, police said.All injuries were not life-threatening, police said. No suspects are in custody over the shootings.A gray BMW SUV fled the scene eastbound on 156th St., though police aren’t sure if the vehicle is linked to the shootings.DADEVILLE, AL (WSFA) - Five people were shot at a party in Dadeville early Sunday morning, and two of the victims have been listed as in critical condition, according to the Dadeville Police Department.Dadeville Police Chief David Barbour says that his office began receiving calls around 12:29 a.m. in regards to a shooting that occurred at the American Legion Hall on E. Columbus Street.Barbour says five people were shot during the party, with injuries ranging from critical to non-life-threatening.One of the victims was life flighted to a Montgomery hospital in critical condition.Two other victims were transported to the East Alabama Medical Center in Opelika with one of them listed as critical and the other listed as non-life-threatening.A fourth victim was transported to the Russell Medical Center with non-life-threatening injuries.The final victim was treated and released from the Lake Martin Community Hospital.Barbour says two suspects have been developed in the case.Anyone with information regarding this shooting is asked to call the Dadeville Police Department at 256-825-6212 or investigations as 256-825-9959.Copyright 2016WSFA 12 News. All rights reserved.445 Dexter AvenueSuite 7000Montgomery, AL 36104(334) 288-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Paradise AfsharTerrell Forney, ReporterParadise AfsharTerrell Forney, ReporterMIAMI-DADE COUNTY, Fla.– Isaiah "Zay" Solomon, 15, was one of two people fatally wounded during a Saturday morning shooting that took place during a vigil for a slain teenager at Northwest 19th Avenue and Northwest 83rd Terrace.Tafari "Fari" West, 22, also died in the shooting.Among the four wounded was pastor Vernon Gillum's 20-year-old daughter, Verneisha Gillum. Police identified the other victims as Anthony Johnson, 26, Patrick Blake, 40, and Elwood Higgs, 36.Bianca West said the family members had gathered at a home to mourn another relative, Devonair "Deb" Blake, 19, who was shot 13 times in the back on Aug. 19 in Brownsville."They were shooting for about two minutes. It felt like 20," West said. "(The) only thing I was saying to myself was, 'Let me cover my head,' because if I do get shot, I just don't want to get shot in my head."Since the shooting, Solomon's mother has taken to social media to comment about her loss."I lost my baby, my rider, my first heartbeat, who had a special place because he was my first heartbeat. I love/loved him more than every breath in me," she wrote on Facebook. "I would move the world for him if he needed. I would have given my life in order for him to keep living. My spirit is empty. I have no more life in me. I don't even know how I'm going to raise my other child because I have nothing left in me and I have no clue how I'm going to go on. Please save, God won't put anything on me that I can't handle cause I would reply, you are a damn lie. I can't handle this."She ends the post with a reminder of how her son was killed."BTW he was murdered standing a wake," she wrote. "He was innocent."Police are investigating the incident. Anyone with information is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.A $13,000 reward is being offered for information leading to an arrest.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Terrell Forney joined Local 10 News in October 2005 as a general assignment reporter. He was born and raised in Cleveland, Ohio, but a desire to escape the harsh winters of the north brought him to South Florida.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.It was supposed to be a festive occasion.Roughly 40 people had gathered for a barbecue in Dorchester, some traveling from outside of Boston to celebrate a mother's 50th birthday shortly before midnight on Saturday. Her family was preparing to run a slide show on a large screen in a small yard in the courtyard of her Franklin Field apartment on Westview and Stratton streets. It was one of three barbecues in the courtyard that night.But then, residents said, 14 shots rang out and four people were injured. One, a guest in her 20s, was shot in the back. The three others were not attending that barbecue.AdvertisementOne man and two women, with injuries ranging from "not so severe" to "critical," were taken to the Boston Medical Center, the Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center, and Brigham and Women's Hospital, according to Boston Emergency Services Lieutenant Gretchen Fox. The fourth person refused treatment, Fox said. The ages of the victims were unavailable. The call concerning the shooting came in at 11:45 p.m., according to police.Although the violence was the latest in a week that included a fatal shooting on Dudley Terrace around midnight Friday and a stabbing in East Boston on Wednesday that left a man dead, Boston police spokesman Michael McCarthy said this has been "one of the safest summers on record."The fatal shooting marked the 22nd homicide in Boston, a figure that matches the number of homicides for the same period last year, 
McCarthy said."The commissioner has always said, one [shooting] is too many," McCarthy said Sunday. "Considering where other major cities are, we're experiencing some pretty low numbers."McCarthy said the number of shootings citywide is down 25 percent and violent crime is down 6 percent compared to this time last year.But the recent violence, he said, is still worrisome.Advertisement"It is concerning anytime there is a shooting," McCarthy said, "We want to find out what happened."McCarthy said the weekend shootings were not random and it is too early to say whether they were gang-related. Police said they have made no arrests.In the shooting thatleft a 36-year-old man dead and a 31-year-old woman critically injuredlate Friday on Dudley Terrace, police say they are looking for a black man in a blue hoodie who ran from Dudley Terrace.Nearly 24 hours later, residents at the Franklin Field apartments say, they were trying to enjoy the summer night when gunfire erupted.People scattered throughout the courtyard, darting into homes. Inside apartments, parents and children crashed to the floor for cover."I threw myself to the floor," said a 62-year-old resident, who was caring for several children inside her apartment at the time and declined to be named. Bullets struck the outside of her apartment, leaving holes in the red brick."I was so afraid it would go through the window," she said.A 43-year-old mother of three, who also declined to give her name, said the incident was especially traumatic for her 8-year-old son, who has autism. He stood in their apartment with his hands covering his ears as gunfire crackled throughout the complex.After it was over, the woman said, she saw four men fleeing, including one with a long gun."There's nothing we can do about it," said Mercy Hutchinson, 34, a resident and mother of a 14-year-old boy and a 9 year-old girl, of the violence. "When we are here, sometimes we are scared to come outside. . . . I'm afraid something is going to happen."AdvertisementAt the barbecue birthday celebration, the hosts apologized to their guests for the violence."This is how [my mother] will remember her 50th birthday," said a 27-year-old woman. "We were supposed to be having a good time."She said she saw the sparks coming from the guns, but could not see the shooters."It was very cowardly and disrespectful," said a 33-year-old resident who attended the birthday celebration but declined to be named for fear of her safety. "It makes me so mad."In the East Boston killing, Darius Barry, 18, was arrested Friday in connection with the death of Gage Smith, 23. He is expected to be arraigned in East Boston Court Monday."The safety and security of all Boston residents is our top priority, and we will continue to work diligently to bring peace to all parts of the city," Mayor Martin J. Walsh said in a statement Sunday. "This weekend's shootings are still under investigation and we encourage anyone with information to contact the Boston Police Department."Aimee Ortiz of the Globe staff contributed to this report. Jan Ransom can be reached atjan.ransom@globe.com. Follow her on Twitter@Jan_Ransom.Digital AccessHome DeliveryGift SubscriptionsLog InManage My AccountCustomer ServiceHelp & FAQsGlobe NewsroomAdvertiseNewslettersView the ePaperOrder Back IssuesNews in EducationSearch the ArchivesPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceTerms of PurchaseWork at Boston Globe MediaBridgeport police Chief Armando Perez was confident Monday that detectives would catch the shooters who hid behind bushes outside a house party on Sunday and fired on more than 100 people, wounding 13."Don't be surprised by the end of the week we have these two guys in custody," Perez said. "We are there."Since city officers rushed to the chaotic scene early Sunday on Plymouth Street, officials said they have been joined by federal investigators with the FBI and the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives.And it's federal charges Perez wants the shooters to face. "Hopefully we will be able to put these people away for a long time," Perez said, noting he has the support of the U.S. attorney."I want to show everyone if you are going to have the guts to do something like this, this is what's going to happen," Perez said."They had no regard for human life. Total disregard. [They] just shot into the crowd," Perez said.By Monday, the majority of the shooting victims, many of whom were shot in the legs, ha been released from hospitals. The victims were in their late teens and early 20s.The most seriously injured, a woman shot in the face, remained in critical but stable condition, city officials said."They're optimistic that she is going to pull through," city spokesman Av Harris said Monday.Among the evidence collected were 10 shell casings belonging to .40-caliber and .45-caliber firearms."It's only for the grace of god no one died," Perez said Monday. "There should've been five or six people dead that day."The probe into the case continued at a fevered pace Monday with a captain, a lieutenant and 10 detectives working on it, Perez said, not counting the federal agents.Gov. Dannel P. Malloy spoke to officials in Bridgeport on Monday and pledged the state's support. Perez plans to contact Commissioner Dora Schriro of the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection on Tuesday.But support hasn't only come from law enforcement. People in the city have also been helping the investigators tracking down the shooters. Perez said: "The community is with us."The suspects opened fire on people attending a house party Plymouth Street early Sunday."People initially thought it was fireworks. By some witness accounts, even the DJ said, 'Don't worry about it, it's fireworks,' until people started realizing they were shot," Capt. Brian Fitzgerald said at an afternoon news conference.Police have not released the names of the homeowners, who requested a permit to serve alcohol at the event and were denied, officials said.City officials said they had denied the request because police had been called to the home in the past for loud parties and domestic violence.Police believe that homeowners were charging for alcohol and said they could face charges.Police have yet to say what motivated the shooting, but were investigating whether the shooters had attended the party, according to Fitzgerald.City residents often request permits to hold house parties and serve alcohol, but police turn them down, Perez said. He noted these parties are opportunities for violence."We flatly deny them. If you want to have a party go rent a hall … and hire a police officer," Perez said. "You are not going to have a party in the back of your house."Perez has assigned a lieutenant who will work with officers to seek out unsanctioned parties."Any time we encounter these kinds of parties, we are going to shut it down," Perez said. "You just cannot allow these things."The Plymouth Street shooting comes just over a year after nine people were shot at the Trumbull Gardens Housing complex. A 37-year-old Shelton man was killed in the gunfire.Courant staff writerChristine Dempseycontributed to this story. An Associated Press report is included.RecommendedHAMDEN — When policearrested Heshimu Barkerin September 2016, they alleged he had shot four people outside a Hamden club and so he was charged with four counts of first-degree assault as well as two weapons counts.Barker recently received a sentence requiring him to serve two years in prison.Senior Assistant State’s Attorney Seth Garbarsky said no one identified the shooter and a surveillance videotape from a restaurant across the street on Dixwell Avenue showing the crime was of poor quality, further hampering the state’s case.New Haven Public Defender Beth A. Merkin, who represented Barker, challenged a parole officer’s identification of Barker being the shooter. Superior Court Judge Elpedio N. Vitale presided over a hearing on the issue and ruled the parole officer’s identification could not be admitted into evidence for a potential trial because of the videotape’s bad quality.“This meant there were no good witnesses,” Merkin said.Barker, 45, of Pond Street, New Haven, then went before Superior Court Judge Patrick J. Clifford on reduced charges. He was no longer charged with criminal possession of a firearm and two of the assault counts. He pleaded guilty to two counts of first-degree assault with discharge of a firearm and carrying a pistol without a permit.Clifford imposed a total sentence of seven years in prison, to be suspended after serving two years. He will also serve three years of probation.Because Clifford gave Barker credit for time served back to his arrest in September 2016, he should be eligible for release within a few months.According to the Hamden police warrant, the shootings occurred outside the Highwood Bar and Grill at 903 Dixwell Ave. on Aug. 20, 2016 at about 1:25 a.m.The four victims were sitting on a bench when they were hit by the gunfire.One of the victims, the most seriously injured, was shot twice below the waistline and another bullet grazed the right side of his mouth. A second victim was shot once in her left thigh. The two others received graze wounds, possibly from bullet fragments.Police recovered six shell casings on the sidewalk near the bench.The man who had been shot repeatedly told police he was sitting at the end of the bench when an unknown man approached him from behind and said: “Yo, do you remember me?”The victim said he looked up and saw a gun, then struggled with the perpetrator in an effort to wrest away the weapon. But the arrest warrant affidavit stated the gunman fired at the victim “and toward the front entrance to the Highwood, which had numerous people standing outside.”The victim told police he ran inside the club and collapsed on the floor.The restaurant’s surveillance video showed the shooter walk up to the man at the end of the bench, remove a gun from the waistline of his pants, grab the man’s shoulder and, after a struggle, fire multiple shots at him and toward the front of the club, the warrant said.“The crowd is seen running in all directions while the suspect walked away to the corner of Dixwell/Morse, while examining the firearm, which appears to be black in color,” the warrant stated.The tape showed that the gunman then walked to a small compact vehicle, got in the passenger’s seat and the vehicle took off.randall.beach@hearstmediact.comRandall Beach covers New Haven Superior Court cases and writes columns twice a week on human interest topics. He also writes the "Beachcombing" column for Connecticut magazine. He enjoys running, rock and country music and local history.Four people were shot in Waterbury early Thursday morning and one of the victims is in critical condition, according to police.Police responded to reports of a disturbance in the East Main and Cherry streets area at 12:57 a.m. and found a large group of people who appeared to be fighting in the area of 402 East Main St.Most of the people in the crowd were patrons of a nearby bar, according to a news release from police.As officers approached, several gunshots were fired and four people were struck, police said.All the victims were transported to St Mary’s Hospital. One male victim is in critical condition and three others are in stable condition, police said.The investigation is ongoing.WATCHVIDEOSFirefighters and paramedics transport a victim in a shooting in South Los Angeles on Saturday, Aug. 13, 2016.MILWAUKEE -- Milwaukee police have released the names of six of the seven homicide victims killed this weekend.The first fatal shooting happened around 6:00 p.m. Friday near Sherman and Burleigh. One man was killed at that location, according to the medical examiner.Police say the victim is a 33-year-old man, identified as Steve Earl, who was driving on Sherman when he was shot. His vehicle then collided with another vehicle that was turning onto Burleigh from Sherman. The occupants of that vehicle sustained minor injuries.The circumstances surrounding this shooting are under investigation.The second fatal shooting happened just after 1:00 a.m. Saturday near 23rd and State. Two men were killed there, according to the medical examiner.Police said this shooting involved a 21-year-old man, identified as Tyrone Richmond and a 23-year-old man, identified as Quishawne Williams.Police said this incident was robbery related.At approximately 2:30 a.m., police say a fight at All Stars near 41st and Fond du Lac spilled into the parking lot where two men, ages 34 and 36, were shot and killed.They have been identified as Earl Hubanks and Shomaray Jackson.Police say a 26-year-old woman and 30-year-old man were also injured in this shooting.The fourth fatal shooting happened near 29th and Lisbon around 10:00 p.m. on Saturday.A 23-year old Milwaukee man, identified as Worn Jones was stabbed during a dispute with another male around 10:00 p.m.Jones died at a hospital.  Milwaukee police continue to seek the suspect.Another homicide happened Sunday, August 14th around 4:30 p.m. near 28th and Lisbon -- marking six homicides over the weekend.Officials with the Milwaukee Fire Department responded to an alley near 28th and Lisbon.Police say a woman was taken to the hospital from the scene, but she passed away.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsFour men were shot outside a lounge in Queens early Saturday, police said.The shooting happened in front of Remedy's Bar Grill & Hookah Lounge on Jamaica Ave. near 105th St. in Richmond Hill just after 2:30 a.m., police said.Three men were taken to Jamaica Hospital and one was taken to Elmhurst Hospital. All of the victims are expected to survive, police said.The victims include a 27-year-old shot in the neck, a 36-year-old shot in the arm, a 21-year-old shot in the chest and leg and a 30-year-old man shot in the leg."The police held us in the lounge. I didn't know there was a shooting until I came out and saw blood on the ground," said a man who didn't give his name.Police sources said a "massive fight" prompted the shooting but could not immediately provide additional details.At least 11 shell casings were on the sidewalk near the lounge.Two men in a white Acura were later taken into custody in relation to the shooting after they crashed their car into the stairs of a home on 104th Ave. near 197th St. in St. Albans, a police source said."We heard a big boom," said a resident, who didn't give her name. "All of the sudden, police cars arrived here. They took one guy in an ambulance and one guy in custody."In an unrelated non-fatal shooting, an 18-year-old man was shot in the leg after a dispute in East Harlem, police said.The victim was shot on Second Ave. near E. 105th St. just after 3:30 a.m., cops said. He was taken to an area hospital and is expected to survive.With THOMAS TRACYGET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XTrending:JOPLIN, Mo. (AP) — The Latest on the shooting in Joplin, Missouri, that injured five people (all times local):6:30 p.m.A woman who was in a Joplin, Missouri, church van when it was fired on says the group didn”t know what was happening when the gunfire erupted.Vicki Eby told KOAM-TV (http://j.mp/2aUCnoe ) she was in the church van early Saturday with her husband Kenneth, who was driving, and two other people.She said they heard “three pops go off” but that it was so dark “we didn”t know what was happening.”She said one of the bullets hit her husband”s lung, and that he”s hospitalized in critical condition.Two other people were also wounded in a pickup truck nearby.A suspect has been taken into custody, but authorities say formal charges haven”t been filed.Police also told AP Radio that the suspect”s father called police to report the suspect was firing rounds at the family”s home.___1:35 p.m.Joplin authorities have identified five people wounded in apparently random shootings as they sat in their vehicles.Police said in a statement that Kenneth Eby; his wife, Vicki Eby; and Heidi Gustin of Joplin”s Immanuel Lutheran Church were sitting in a church van at a traffic light when they were shot Saturday.They were headed to St. Louis for a meeting about the church”s Comfort Dog ministry. Two dogs were also wounded.The Joplin Globe reports (http://j.mp/2beO4t1 ) Kenneth Eby is in critical but stable condition. Vicki Eby sustained minor injuries. Gustin has injuries considered serious but not life-threatening.Two other victims shot separately in their pickup, are identified as Donal Pugh, who”s in serious but stable condition, and Debbie Pugh, who sustained minor injuries.A 26-year-old suspect is in custody.___12 p.m.Joplin police say a man has been arrested after five people were injured in two apparently random roadway shootings.The Joplin Globe reports (http://j.mp/2aU2yez) that police have arrested a 26-year-old man suspected in the early Saturday shootings.Police said there”s no apparent motive for the shooting.Officers were called to a duplex early Saturday and found no victims.Police tried to stop a vehicle, the driver of which fired shots at a church van that was stopped at a traffic light. Three adults in the van were injured, and two are hospitalized with injuries that are not life-threatening.The suspect is also accused of shooting at a pickup truck and injuring two adults. The driver is hospitalized, the passenger was released.Police say the suspect is being held pending formal charges___Information from: The Joplin (Mo.) Globe, http://www.joplinglobe.comSign up for email newslettersRoxy Tyler, Web producerFrank Powers, Assignment managerRoxy Tyler, Web producerFrank Powers, Assignment managerJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– After a one-week trial, it took a Duval County jury about 75 minutes Saturday to find Bryan Goggins guilty of second-degree murder, three counts of attempted second-degree murder and possession of a firearm by a convicted felon.Goggins, 27, was convicted in the 2016shooting death of 14-year-old Tamia Sanders(pictured left) and the wounding of three adults. The Jacksonville Sheriff's Office said it happened after a small party in Brentwood.According to her family, Sanders was walking out of her home, where a group of people was gathered outside. She died of a gunshot wound and three other people were also hit by gunfire.Goggins represented himself at the trialand cross-examined witnesses who took the stand, including people he is accused of shooting. He even cross-examined his own mother, Lawanda Mack, who was present at the time of the shooting.A sentencing hearing was set for Dec. 9.Copyright 2019 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.Mahaj Brown is alert and talking with visitors to his room at St. Christopher's Hospital for Children as the 10 gunshot wounds he sustained last week continue to heal, his aunt tells NBC10.The 6-year-oldwas riding in his godfather's car near Ashmead Street in Philadelphia's Germantown section last Thursday nightwhen a spray of bullets peppered the vehicle. He was hit 10 times, his family said, with at least one bullet entering his chest.As he was being rushed to the hospital, Brown told family "I can't believe I'm shot."Breaking news and the stories that matter to your neighborhood.At a cease fire vigil Wednesday, Brown's aunt said the boy has been taken off a breathing machine and is doing much better. Brown's mother, Laprea Brown, also said he won't be released from the hospital for another three to four weeks. She also said the boy is in good spirits despite his injuries."I want to see him back to the Haji that we know," she said. "The fun-loving, outgoing kid that he is."Brown was one of four people hit by gunfire, which investigators believe stemmed from a turf war between two groups of men. None of the injured were intended targets, police said.Some 40 rounds were fired down the block around 11 p.m. that night from an assault-style rifle and two handguns, police said.So far, no one has been arrested for the shooting. The vigil focusing on stopping gun violence is the second held in the neighborhood after the shooting. Neighbors, Brown's family and police are frustrated by a lack of tips about the shootout.Detectives said the shooters fled in a newer model Mercury Mountaineer SUV that is painted two colors and has running lights. A $10,000 reward for information leading to an arrest and conviction.Anyone with information can contact the Philadelphia Police tipline at 215.686.TIPS.Four people were shot in Evanston on Tuesday night, including a Skokie resident who drove his car and then collapsed in front of Buffalo Joe's restaurant in downtown Evanston following the incident, according to police. None of the victims' injuries were considered life-threatening, police said.Several people were gathered around Foster Street and Jackson Avenue just after 10 p.m., when the gunshots rang out, police said.The unknown suspect shot at them numerous times from a field north of that location and fled on foot, said Evanston police Cmdr. Joseph Dugan, department spokesperson, who was still gathering information.The victims are a 24-year-old Evanston resident who was shot in the head, a 19-year-old Evanston resident who was shot in the ankle, a 17-year-old Evanston resident who was shot two times in the arm and a 32-year-old Skokie resident who was shot in the hand, Dugan said.The victims were all taken to Evanston Hospital.Police are not releasing a suspect description at this time.The Skokie resident drove into downtown Evanston, pulling in front of Buffalo Joe's restaurant on the 800 block of Clark Street."He got out of the car, bleeding, stumbling," said J.D. Walker, who was outside the restaurant at the time. "He was talking on his phone. He came up to us and said he was shot."Detectives are continuing their investigation into the incident, Dugan said.A nearby resident described the scene Wednesday as it unfolded the night before."I was at home in my living room when I counted about 15 or 16 bangs – repeated bangs. They were very evenly placed," said Mike, a resident who lives about a block away from where the shootings took place, and who asked that his last name not be used for fear of retribution. "There are people lighting off fireworks in this neighborhood. You hear things at night and I've heard gunshots before. The relatively slow pace told me they were not firecrackers. It was too even.""It's disturbing because I live here with my kids," said Mike, who said he has four children ages 7 and younger. "I know there are lots of kids in the neighborhood around me. Over time I hear something like that, I wonder whose kid could have gotten hurt just now. I feel very helpless in terms of how to stop this from happening."Mike said he's cautious about when and where he lets his children play outside, and that last night's incident marked the third or fourth time he's heard gunshots in the neighborhood in recent years."It's not the first time it's happened in that general vicinity and it is frightening," he said. "I love my neighbors. I know it's not the locals doing this. I have a strong suspicion based on what I've read about these things that it's very likely outside elements that come through to cause trouble."Mike said he'd like to see more police surveillance cameras in the area, particularly around nearby Foster Park."I certainly don't believe in a police state, but I also feel like a proper set of eyes on the area could prevent things like this," he said.Anyone with information is asked to call the Evanston Police Department at 847-866-5000 or by using Text-A-Tip at CRIMES (274637) and entering EPDTIP in the message line with the tip information, he said.Bob Seidenberg is a Pioneer Press reporter. Lee V. Gaines is a freelancer.bseidenberg@pioneerlocal.comTwitter @evanstonscribeCONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneHeather LeighHeather LeighJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– A mother of two shot several times while standing outside her Eureka Gardens apartment over one month ago continues to recover in a Jacksonville hospital.Jessica Nelson, 20, was one of seven people injured six weeks ago when, according to the Jacksonville Sheriff’s Office, three people opened fire in the parking lot of the housing development.Jessica, who was shot in the stomach, has a 2-month-old daughter and an 19-month-old girl.After everyone else was released from the hospital, Jessica remained in the intensive care unit at UF Health Hospital, fighting for her life.Her mother, Brenda Nelson, told News4Jax Friday that her daughter has come a long way. Just a few weeks ago, Brenda said she didn't even know if her daughter would survive.Now, Jessica is sitting upright and is able to visit with her fiance and her two young girls."She's doing real good, better than we expected. They took the trach (tube) out, her liver is doing really good, her kidney not so good. She still has to have dialysis three times a week but at least she's not on it 24 hours a day now. She's sitting up. She's coherent. She holds a whole conversation with you now," Brenda said.The family is preparing for what happens when Jessica is released from the hospital, and the reality is daunting.They are still trying to move back into their family home, which suffered fire damage several years ago, but there is a lot of work left to be done. Brenda said she fears that her daughter won't have a safe place to go where she will be able to continue her recovery."We're having to put up a bathroom, a kitchen, replace some flooring in the living room, replace all the drywall and wiring just to make it where it's livable," Brenda said. "The bedrooms are bigger, so there'll be enough room for equipment if need be, the hospital bed if need to be, what needs to happen."So far, Brenda has been able to raise more than $9,000 on aGoFundMe pageto help cover medical expenses.But hospital bills, on top of fixing up their home, has caused financial worries for the family. Brenda said she wants to help alleviate that burden of stress on her daughter and her family."She deserves a place to come home to and she does and those girls. Any help we can get is definitely appreciated," Brenda said.Jessica's daughters have been living with family members, but the family would like to be reunited once Jessica is finally released from her long hospital stay.Anyone wishing to help the Nelsons with supplies and hospital expenses can do so by visiting theGoFundMe page.Copyright 2016 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.There may be an issue with the delivery of your newspaper. 
				This alert will expire atNaN.Click here for more info.Recover passwordRegisterSuccess! —Manage subscriptionsShare.......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... ..........ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. — The Supreme Court upheld the sentences of two brothers in a 2016 drug-related shooting that left two dead and two injured in Southeast Albuquerque.The Supreme Court on Thursday rejected all arguments made by Edwin Ortiz-Parra, 29, and Eder Ortiz-Parra, 27, in their appeals.Among those arguments was that the brothers should’ve been tried separately from their cousin and co-defendant, Rafael Gonzalez-Parra.In 2018 the brothers were sentenced to two life terms, plus an additional 54 years, in prison after being found guilty of two counts each of murder, attempted murder and conspiracy charges.In August 2016 the brothers, along with their cousin Gonzalez-Parra and friend Carlos Almazan-Avila stormed a house in Southeast Albuquerque over a drug debt, killing Daniel Chumacero and Juan Carlos Saenz-Ponce and injuring two others.ADVERTISEMENTSkipCopyright © 2021 Albuquerque Journal | Albuquerque, N.M. | www.abqjournal.com$14/moSubscribeOther OffersAlready a subscriber? Sign InWATCHVIDEOSPolice responded to the area of 59th and Figueroa streets in South L.A. after a shooting that left one woman dead and three others wounded on Sunday, Aug. 7, 2016.(KABC)Trending:A man who fired shots from a vehicle into a crowd — killing one man and wounding two others while fleeing a confrontation at an Adams County trailer park — was convicted Monday of second-degree murder.Brandon Karr,25, also was convicted of nine counts of attempted first-degree murder in connection with the Aug. 16 shooting at the Berkley Village Mobile Home Park at 5400 Sheridan Blvd.A second man involved in the altercation, Rojelio Heredia, 25, fired at Karr’s vehicle and killed Karr’s cousin, Dustin Karr, 23. Heredia has pleaded guilty to second-degree murder, heat of passion.An Adams County District Court jury deliberated about six hours before convicting Karr of one count of second-degree murder heat of passion, nine counts of attempted first-degree murder and two counts of second-degree assault, according to a 17th Judicial District release.“When you empty a gun into a crowd of people less than 10 feet away, you know your conduct is going to kill people,” Chief Deputy District Attorney Patrick Costigan told the jury during closing arguments Friday. “He shot seven times into a crowd of people. He didn’t care where the bullets were going.”Karr and his companions drove to the mobile home park to provoke a fight with occupants of one of the trailers. Heredia, who lived in the trailer next door and was hosting a party, fired two warning shots into the air after the group began attacking a woman, according to a news release from the district attorney’s office.Karr and his companions returned to their vehicle. As they drove away, Karr began firing at the crowd.Edgar Loera Munoz, 30, was killed. Sergio Ontiveros-Heredia, 26, and Perla Nevarez, 24, were wounded.Heredia will be sentenced June 26. Sentencing for Karr is set for 8:30 a.m. July 7 in Adams County District Court.Sign up for Newsletters and AlertsFiled under:Four men were seriously wounded in a shooting Sunday morning in the West Garfield Park neighborhood.Three of the men were standing outside with a group of people about 3:30 a.m. in the 100 block of South Springfield when someone fired shots from a moving vehicle, according to Chicago Police.A 23-year-old man was shot in the right thigh, and a 25-year-old man was shot in the lower back and right thigh, police said. Both were taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition.A 37-year-old man suffered gunshot wounds to the torso and both legs, police said. He was taken to Stroger Hospital by a friend in serious condition.The fourth victim, 26, was shot in the face while sitting in a parked car, police said. He was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in serious condition.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Adonte M. Bouie, sheriff's photoNearly two years after a quadruple shooting that left a young woman dead, Oakland County sheriff's detectives believe they have solved the cold case.Deputies arrested the suspected shooter, Adonte M. Bouie, 22, of Pontiac, who's accused of opening fire on four people at an abandoned house on Thorpe in Pontiac about 11 p.m. on Aug. 5, 2016.Aniya R. Edwards, 19, who was visiting from Tennessee but had previously lived in Pontiac, died of her injuries. Three other victims survived.Bouie, who had no prior criminal history, is now facing possible life in prison. He is charged with first-degree murder, conspiracy to commit first-degree murder, three counts of attempted murder and five firearms-related crimes.Deputies previously arrested Bouie's suspected accomplice, Ashton K. Greenhouse, who pleaded guilty to charges of second-murder, three counts of attempted murder and firearms felonies. He is scheduled to be sentenced Sept. 11, 2018.Oakland County sheriff's officials haven't released a motive for the shooting."I am extremely proud of our Detectives who were dedicated and relentless to find justice for Aniya and her family," Oakland County Sheriff Michael J. Bouchard said. "It is my hope that her loved ones can find peace in that her killers will be locked up and off the street."Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Four men were injured in a North Memphis shooting early Thursday morning.Police rushed to the scene at Ayers Street and Griffith Avenue around 12:30 a.m. where they found bullet holes in the back window of a car.It's unclear if the victims were sitting in the car or standing nearby, but all four men were shot or grazed by bullets.Police said none of the victims knew who shot them.According to officers, two of the victims refused to be treated at the scene. Two others were taken to Regional Medical Center in non-critical condition. The men, all between the ages of 18 and 23, are all expected to be OK.Police have no suspect information at this time.Anyone with information is asked to call Memphis Police Department at (901)545-COPS.Copyright 2016 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Amanda Batchelor, Managing EditorAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorWEST PARK, Fla.– Multiple people were injured early Tuesday when someone opened fire inside an efficiency in West Park, authorities said.The shooting was reported just after midnight in the 5700 block of West Hallandale Beach Boulevard.Broward sheriff's deputies said a man wearing a hooded long-sleeve sweatshirt, jean shorts and a bandanna covering his face approached the back of the home and fired multiple shots into it.He then ran eastbound. Deputies said it's possible that another person was involved in the shooting.Several shell casings were found outside the home, deputies said.Four people were inside the rear efficiency at the time.Three of the victims were taken to Memorial Regional Hospital. One victim was not hospitalized.The victims' conditions have not been released.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call Broward Crime Stoppers at 954-493-TIPS.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Amanda Batchelor, Managing EditorAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorMIAMI-DADE COUNTY, Fla.– A man was arrested Wednesday in the fatal shooting of a South Florida woman and two of her children, police said.Miami-Dade police had been searching for Antwon Fair since early Sunday when shots were fired at the woman's home near Southwest 203rd Terrace and Southwest 115th Avenue.Fair was found Wednesday in Savannah, Georgia.Takeeya "KeKe" Fulton, a 39-year-old mother of six, and her daughter, Nuckeria "Keria" Harris, 19, were shot inside the home after Fulton got into an argument with Fair, relatives told Local 10 News.Sources said Harris was trying to defend her mother when she was killed.Fulton's son, Corey "CJ" Johnson, 17, was sleeping in his bedroom when he was shot. He later died at Kendall Regional Medical Center.Fulton's 12-year-old son was also shot and taken to Kendall Regional Medical Center. He is listed in stable condition, but relatives told Local 10 News reporter Andrew Perez that he goes in and out of consciousness.A relative was granted custody of Fulton's surviving children this week."I mean, I don't understand how anyone can do this to their kids' mother, your step-kids or your own kids," the children's uncle said.Court records show that Fair has been on probation for more than year for a weapons charge. He's previously been arrested on charges of assault, battery and drug possession.Fair is the father of three of Fulton's children.Miami-Dade police said he was taken into custody with the assistance of other law enforcement agencies. Fair is expected to be extradited to Miami-Dade County to face murder charges.AGoFundMe accounthas been created to help the surviving family members.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.KXAN Austinby:Calily BienAUSTIN (KXAN) — The man who police say opened fire on a crowded East Sixth Street killing a woman and injuring four others in the summer of 2016 is facing a jury in his murder trial.Endicott McCray, 26, is charged with one count of murder in the death of Teqnika Marie Moultrie and four counts of aggravated assault for the other victims’ injuries. The trial, which started Tuesday morning, is being held in Judge Cliff Brown’s court.According to court records,McCray got into a fight with his brother-in-law during the early morning hours of July 31, 2016. A friend of McCray’s wife says a group of them were out when she saw McCray’s wife’s brother “shove” McCray. In response, witnesses say McCray pulled out a handgun that he had in his waistband and pointed the gun at his brother-in-law. Police say he fired one shot into the ground, then raised the firearm, turned it sideways and fired “up to four more gunshots.”McCray was arrested a few days later in Atlanta, Ga.The jury heard testimony from multiple police officers and detectives who investigated the scene. One of the officers described the scene as chaotic. “We generally do things in order, like a, b, and c. That day everything was just backwards,” said one of the officers on the stand.Timothy Volking says he invited Moultrie to Austin last summer to see the town because she was thinking of moving to Texas from California. Volking says the group did everything signature to Texas, they tubed the Comal River, ate barbeque and then went to Sixth Street for drinks. When they were ready to head home, they stopped by Voodoo Doughnut. “I remember waiting in a very long line,” he said.Security camera video played by the state shows the group walking out of Voodoo Doughnut and then walking down the sidewalk. Moultrie, 33, can be seen walking between her wife and Volking when she looks to her left and immediately falls to the ground. Moultrie’s wife and Volking run ahead before quickly turning around to see Moultrie on the ground. The two then kneel beside her and try to help.Keith Pinkard with the Travis County Medical Examiner’s Office said Moultrie died from a gunshot wound to the head and neck.The jury wrapped up its first day of the trial just before 4 p.m.; they will start again Wednesday morning with more witness testimony at 9 a.m.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.PFLUGERVILLE, Texas (KXAN) — Job seekers were matched up with summer roles at Typhoon Texas at an in-person job fair hosted by the water park on Saturday.Some people who attended the job fair were offered work on the spot – with the Pflugerville water park looking to fill openings for lifeguards, and in food and beverage, front gate and in-park events.AUSTIN (KXAN) — Seven people have been injured in a crash involving four vehicles in north Austin on Saturday morning.Emergency crews responded to the scene at the intersection of North Lamar Boulevard and West Parmer Lane at 11 a.m.SAN MARCOS, Texas (KXAN) — An incident on I-35 in San Marcos early Saturday morning resulted in a man's shooting death during an incident involving San Marcos police.Around 12:19 a.m. on Saturday morning, San Marcos Police Department officers responded to I-35 near the southbound mile marker 204 for Seguin, where a man was reported to be walking through traffic. Police say they also witnessed this.ST. LOUIS• Five people were injured — four of them critically — after a gunman in a passing car opened fire on a neighborhood party in St. Louis, police say.They were shot about 10:40 p.m. Saturday in the 5000 block of Kensington Avenue, a few blocks southwest of Fountain Park.Police said Monday they had no suspects in the case.The victims were attending a neighborhood gathering when a black vehicle with several occupants drove by and someone opened fire on the crowd. The car sped east on Kensington.Four people were in critical but stable condition after the shooting:• A man, 22, was shot in the chest.• A man, 32, was shot in the thigh.• A man, 33, was shot in the arm.• A woman, 31, was shot in the thigh.A fifth victim, a 35-year-old man, suffered a graze wound to his abdomen.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Only two witnesses took the stand Friday in the trial of the man charged in connection with a shooting at Patrick's Bar in Elmira last year.Zecary Banks, 28, is on trial for attempted murder and other felonies, in connection with the July 28, 2016 shooting that injured five people.The trial didn't reconvene until Friday afternoon because of a scheduling conflict, and that time was pushed back even further because the defense attorney's car broke down on his way to Elmira.Once the trial finally resumed, two state police forensic scientists took the stand Friday to talk about their analysis of crime scene evidence.Firearms examiner Maria Rauche told the court that she couldn't conclusively say bullets recovered from the scene and from victims were fired from a a.38-caliber revolver found nearby, according to our broadcast media partner,WENY-TV.Rauche added that she couldn't rule out that the bullets came from that gun either, WENY reported.Another state police forensic scientist testified that she analyzed swabs taken from the recovered revolver but didn't find any DNA.She said she wasn't surprised there was no DNA given the condition of the gun, which was found on a rooftop near Patrick's Bar.Witness IDs Zecary Banks as Elmira bar shooterBar patrons Kevyn Walker, Cody Whitmer, Jesus Rivera, Anthony Mack, and Nicholas Ewanyk were injured in the shooting.Chemung County District Attorney Weeden Wetmore contends that Mack was Banks' intended victim.Banks is charged with one count of second-degree attempted murder, one charge of first-degree criminal use of a firearm, three counts of first-degree assault, two counts of second-degree criminal possession of a weapon and two counts of second-degree assault, all felonies, in connection with the shooting.The trial will resume at 10 a.m. Monday in Chemung County Court.Follow@SGJeffMurrayon Twitter.BALTIMORE (AP) —Police say a 17-year-old boy and three women were injured in a shooting in north Baltimore.Police say in a statement that officers were called to Whitridge Avenue for a report of a shooting before 2 a.m. Thursday. When officers arrived, they found a 17-year-old boy suffering from a gunshot wound to the hand. About a block away on Greenmount Avenue, officers found three women, aged 25, 32 and 51, with gunshot wounds.Police spokesman Detective Donny Moses says investigators believe the shooting took place on Greenmount Avenue and the teen ran home. He says police don’t have any reason to think the shooting is related to any other incident.Police say the 51-year-old woman is in critical condition at a hospital and the three others are in stable condition.Copyright 2016 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Fort Myers Police Chief Derrick Diggs announced Wednesday that five people were arrested in connection to the 2016 Club Blu shooting that killed two and left at least 14 injured.The five each face two second-degree murder charges and a conspiracy charge. Each faces life in prison, Diggs said.Early Wednesday, the Fort Myers Police Department, FBI and the Florida Regional U.S. Marshal’s Task Force, served arrest warrants and in a span of 15 minutes, took into custody Demetrious O’Neal, Derrick Leon Church, Tajze Akir Battle, Kierra Kashayla Russ, and Don Dontrill Loggins, according to a State Attorney's Office news release.Diggs also encouraged people to come forward with any tips and listed physical addresses in the city, including Residence Drive, Sumter Avenue and Club Blu on Evans Avenue, where detectives recovered weapons believed to be used in the shooting.More:Here's what we know about arrests in 2016 Club Blu shootingState Attorney Amira Fox of the 20th Judicial Circuit reminded the community that Club Blu was a teen dance club operating on a balmy Sunday evening in July.Stefan Strawder, a standout basketball player at Lehigh Senior High School, and Sean Archilles, 14, who was an eighth-grader at Royal Palm Exceptional School, were killed."With the combined effort between law enforcement and the public, all the subjects will be held accountable and the families will have justice," Diggs said.Fox said the conspiracy charges stem from the planning of the ambush from July 1 through July 25."The victims and their families should be first in our thoughts. I hope the arrests bring some sense of peace to those directly impacted by this heinous crime which took the lives of two young victims and left 14 injured," Fox said. "The mass shooting that occurred impacted the lives of so many innocent people. This case is far from over and as we enter into the prosecution stage, our work is far from done."Assistant State Attorneys Dan Feinberg, Anthony Kunasek, and Sara Miller are part of that team and will prosecute the case, along with Fort Myers Police Detective Wolfgang Daniel, Fort Myers Police Department Attorney Bob Lee, FBI Special Agent James Roncinske, and State Attorney’s Office Homicide Investigator Steve Scalici.If anyone has information on the weapons, locations, or events of that night, please provide tips to the State Attorney’s Office Cold Case Homicide Unit Tip Line: 1-833-987-2611 as well as Crime Stoppers:1-800-780-TIPS.A $20,000 reward is still being offered for information leading to an arrest and or conviction, Diggs said.Law enforcement requests tips, offers reward in renewed effort to solve 2016 Club Blu shootingClub Blu shooting: Two mothers grieve while the state attorney reviews police investigationOrganizers of teen events mull changes after shootingTeen tragedy: Fort Myers club shooting leaves a city in painTwo years after Club Blu shooting in Fort Myers, case in state attorney's handsFamily mourns 14-year-old boy killed in Fort Myers club shootingClub Blu: Lee County's 5th mass shooting in 10 monthsPhotos:Candlelight vigil held in honor of Club Blu victimsPhotos:2 dead and 16 injured in shooting at Club Blu in Fort MyersMenuHAMILTON, Ohio -- The last of four men charged in a fatal bar shooting last summer pleaded guilty Tuesday.Cornell McKennelly II entered guilty pleas to involuntary manslaughter with a gun specification and having weapons under disability Tuesday morning in Butler County Common Pleas Court,the Journal-News reports.McKennelly, 38, of Hamilton, originally was charged with murder and having weapons under disability, for shooting and killing Kalif Goens onJuly 24 at Doubles Bar.His trial was scheduled to begin Jan. 31.Sentencing for McKennelly is scheduled for Feb. 27. He faces a maximum of 17 years in prison.Three others involved in the gun violence that also injured seven others have already entered guilty pleas.The Journal-News is a media partner of WCPO.WCBD News 2by:Shawn CabbagestalkNORTH CHARLESTON, S.C. (WCBD) – The Dorchester County Sheriff’s Office is investigating following a shooting at Club Brandy on Saturday, July 23.Authorities say the incident happened in the parking lot of the Ashley Phosphate club following a fight inside.We’re told of the four people shot, two of them had serious injuries. All of the victims are expected to survive.If you have any information, contact your local law enforcement division or Crime Stoppers at 843-554-1111.Keep checkingcounton2.comfor real-time updates on this story. To get breaking news alerts, download the free News 2 App foriPhoneorAndroid. You can also sign up foremail alerts.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.MYRTLE BEACH, SC (WBTW) - A man who was shot at Donny's Saloon in Myrtle Beach has died from his injures, according to the coroner, and four people have been charged with obstructing justice.Jas’sier Wilson, 26, of Surfside Beach, died on April 2 at Grand Strand Regional Medical Center of injuries related to the shooting. He was shot on March 25 at the saloon on 3rd Ave. S. at about 10:55 p.m., according to police.MOUNT PLEASANT, S.C. (WCBD) – Make no mistake about it – Major General James E. Livingston is a hero who continues to inspire and lead.He was awarded the nation's highest military decoration, the Medal of Honor, for heroic actions in 1968 during the Vietnam War.NEW YORK (AP) — A New York man is facing hate crime charges after police said he made threats and anti-Asian American remarks — to an undercover officer assigned to a hate crimes task force.Juvian Rodriguez, 35, was arrested Friday afternoon after the alleged confrontation near Penn Station.UPDATE:Seven months in, shootings are down in Cincinnati so farORIGINAL REPORT:Since 10 p.m. Friday night, 11 people have been shot in the city of Cincinnati. Three of those victims died, police confirmed."The Cincinnati Police Department is doing everything possible to investigate and address these violent acts," Lt. Steve Saunders said Saturday. "But we need the cooperation of the community to identify whoever is involved. We need people to come forward and call Crime Stoppers. It's difficult for us to investigate these serious incidents without information."As of July 16, police reported that the total number of shooting victims in 2016 was down 13 percent from last year and homicides were down 17 percent, according to the Strategic and Tactical Analytic Review for Solutions report published by CPD."I would look at what has occurred this weekend as a momentary uptick in shootings. I think a great deal of it is attributable to the heat,” City Manager Harry Black said “It’s not scientific. It’s not quantifiable, but I believe there’s a direct correlation between the weather and crime.”Black explained that increased social activity and more people outdoors could lead to more conflicts. He has been in conversations with police officials through the weekend.“The victims, as of right now, as well as the perpetrators don’t appear to have been on any of our watch lists," Black said. "A couple of the victims may have had some minimal previous contact with law enforcement, but nothing that would rise to a level of concern.”Sanders: 'Astonishment and shock' at Cincinnati shooting spikeSince last summer, when shooting numbers were high for months, the city has begun several initiatives to combat the problem.“We have beefed up our CIRV activities. We have beefed up the resources that are in our Human Relations Commission. We’ve expanded staffing resources. We have reactivated the Partnering Center.  Our outreach workers are out and engaged and active in terms of engaging community groups as well as families,” Black said.The Cincinnati Police Department also began the P.I.V.O.T. program, which allows investigators go beyond neighborhoods when identifying high crime areas prone to gun violence. The new data collection and analysis allows block-by-block analysis and even allows officers to examine specific areas with apartment buildings.Despite these efforts, Black said the violence this weekend may fall outside of ongoing gang and drug trafficking activity, which can be tracked and investigated.“A lot of this is boiling down to personal conflict,” Black said.  “How do you anticipate personal beefs and personal conflict? I don’t think you can do that.”Black explained that while the violence this weekend is tragic, he doesn't believe it will continue."Safer streets is one of our top priorities and we are investing in it,” Black said. “The key is…we are trying to spend more money, but we’re trying to spend it in a very strategic and smart way.”Pastor Ennis Tait has responded to every homicide in Cincinnati this year through Project Nehemiah Ceasefire and Cincinnati Works with vigils, anti-violence marches, youth mentorship and other programs. Tait was on the scene of Saturday's shooting in Avondale."This rash of shootings in the past 24 hours has been more than we've seen in a long time," Tait said. "One of the things that I know that's missing in our city right now is hope."He explained that he believes preventing violence in the streets starts with families."If you see an increase in broken relationships at home, you're going to see broken relationships in other places," Tait said. "The spirit of brokenness eats away at a person's conscience and when that happens their respect for life begins to dissipate."Tait said he plans to continue with vigils and take other action in response to Saturday's homicides."There have to be people inside our families who are willing to use their influence," he said.Shootings presented in chronological order:North Fairmount: 2 injuredAt least two men were shot late Friday night in the area of Beekman and Cummins streets. Police report they believe the two incidents were not connected.Lt. Tim Brown said one victim was located in North Fairmount, and a second victim was found at Mercy West Hospital at approximately 10:30 p.m.Police received reports of a third person shot, but could not locate a third victim, Brown said.A silver car with damage to a rear corner and a tire was taped off and investigated in the 2700 block of Beekman Street. The road was closed for more than an hour.Brown said no suspect information is available and that the victims were not cooperating with investigators.Millvale: 2 killed, 2 injuredAbout a mile north of the shooting in North Fairmount, three men and one woman were shot early Saturday in Millvale in an incident that left two people dead, according to Cincinnati police.Bobbie Odneal III, 23, was found dead on the sidewalk in the 3400 block of Beekman Street, police reported. Rickey McGowan, 25, was found wounded inside a building and died from his wounds at the University of Cincinnati Medical Center.The other two victims were treated at UCMC and are expected to survive.The intersection of Millvale and Beekman was closed for several hours and later reopened, but homicide detectives confirmed the investigation is ongoing.West End: 1 killedA man was killed in the courtyard of the Stanley Rowe Community apartments Saturday on Lockhurst Lane near Liberty Street, police said.She-ar Dornal, 18, was fatally shot just before 3 p.m. and was pronounced dead at the scene, according to press release from the homicide unit.A woman rushed up to the police tape and screamed, "That's my brother" as police held her back from the crime scene. Another man was tackled by police after running past the tape to the body.Police said a suspect fled toward a nearby basketball court, but no arrests have been reported in connection with the homicide.Avondale: 1 injuredA man was shot in the 800 block of Lexington Avenue at approximately 3 p.m. Saturday, police said.Saunders said the man was in surgery at 5 p.m. and is expected to survive his injuries.No suspect information has been released regarding the incident. The identity of the victim has also not been released.Over-the-Rhine: 1 injuredA 36-year-old man was shot in Over-the-Rhine near the corner of McMicken Avenue and Vine Street just after 4 p.m. Saturday, police reported.The victim was struck once in the torso, and was taken to UCMC for treatment, officials said. He is expected to survive his injuries.Investigators are searching for a 19-year-old man in connection with the shooting. A purple, hooded sweatshirt police believe belongs to the suspect was recovered near the scene.Clifton Heights: 2 injuredTwo women were shot in the 300 block of Warner Street at around 1 a.m. Sunday, police said.The women were taken to the hospital and are expected to survive their injuries. Saunders said the women were in their late teens to early 20s but he was not sure if they were UC students.Police do not have any information on the incident or suspects.Anyone with any information on these shootings is asked to call the Criminal Investigation Section at 513-353-3542, Crime Stoppers at 513-352-3040 or text CINTIP plus your message to CRIMES (274637). Callers may remain anonymous and may receive compensation for their information.Cincinnati and Northern Kentucky Breaking NewsTwo teenage girls and two men were shot and wounded outside a Brooklyn housing development Saturday night, and police were looking for a man as the single shooter.The victims had all gathered outside the Cypress Hill Houses on Fountain Ave. near Blake Ave. when an argument led to gunshots just after 9 p.m., cops said.Two men, ages 20 and 21, and a girl, 16, were shot in the leg, while a 15-year-old girl was blasted in the back and arm, cops said.All four were taken to Brookdale Hospital, and were expected to survive their injuries, police said.Please purchase a subscription to read our premium content. If you have a subscription, please log in or sign up for an account on our website to continue.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Rain likely. High near 65F. Winds SSE at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Partly cloudy skies this evening. Increasing clouds with periods of showers late. Low 46F. Winds S at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 50%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:30 pmThe three shootings in Kankakee that injured eight during the weekend has brought the number of nonfatal shootings in the city this year to 24.The latest shooting occurred at about 3:30 a.m. Sunday in the 1100 block of North Chicago Place. Two men were shot.According to a police report, a caller told dispatchers they heard 10 to 20 shots.Several cars were seen fleeing when officers arrived. There were many people in the street and sidewalk but "no one was willing to talk," according to the report.A 23-year-old man from Indianapolis was treated at Riverside Medical Center for a gunshot wound to his left thigh. He told police he was visiting and unsure of the address he was at when shot.The other victim, 30-year-old Angelo D. Lewis, of North Aurora, was arrested upon his release from Presence St. Mary's Hospital after treatment for a wound to his right leg. He was charged with two counts of possession of a controlled substance. The drugs were discovered when they fell out the pocket of his pants. A judge set his bond at $25,000 on Monday.One shell casing and a bullet fragment were found in the street.On Saturday, one man was reportedly shot and another pistol whipped during an home invasion in the 900 block of East Mulberry Street.Five people suffered nonlife-threatening wounds after two men opened fire on a group of people in the 300 block of North Wildwood Avenue at about 10 p.m. Friday.According to a report, police were called to North Wildwood and East Locust Street for a report of a gunshot victim.A 22-year-old man was shot in the right leg. He told police he was shot in the 300 block of North Wildwood Avenue. He proved unhelpful to investigators.Two men, ages 26 and 22, were found shot near a home on 300 North Wildwood. A fourth victim, an 18-year-old man, was found in the alley.Police learned later of a fifth victim, an 19-year-old man, who was taken by others to St. Mary's.Several shell casings and bullet fragments were found at the scene and at North Wildwood and East Locust.Police said potential witnesses were not cooperating.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Filed under:Five people were shot Thursday night on the same Austin neighborhood block where at least six more people have been wounded in gunfire since last weekend.About 9:30 p.m., the group was on a sidewalk in the first block of South Leamington when someone in a passing gray car opened fire, according to Chicago Police.A 23-year-old man shot in the ankle was taken to Stroger Hospital along with a 23-year-old woman who was shot in the left foot. A 24-year-old man shot in both ankles and the forearm was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, as was a 22-year-old man with graze wounds to both knees. The fifth victim, a 20-year-old woman, took herself to Loretto Hospital with a graze to the right arm.Police said four of the five victims have documented gang ties. All their conditions were stabilized.It was the fourth shooting on the block since early Saturday, when a man was shot whiledrivingshortly before a separatetriple-shooting. Two more people were shot in anotherattackearly Sunday.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.YourCentralValley.comby:Kathryn HerrPolice were called at 9:15 Wednesday night about a victim of a shooting. Police say the victims all knew each other and all had been at one apartment.The victims are 20 to 35 to 40 years old. They are being treated for their wounds.Police do not have a motive for the shooting.Anyone with information is asked to Fresno Police at 621-7000 or Crime Stoppers at 498-STOP. You can remain anonymous.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.FRESNO, Calif. (KSEE)- It was announced Friday morning Officer Rick Fitzgerald will no longer be a part of the Fresno Police Department. The news comes after the department launched an internal investigation nearly a month ago into allegations Fitzgerald had ties to the proud boys.The day he was fired, Fitzgerald broke his silence, defending his past that cost him his job.MOSCOW (AP) — Voters in Kyrgyzstan will cast ballots Sunday on whether to approve a new constitution that would substantially increase the president’s powers in this impoverished Central Asian nation.The referendum comes three months after Sadyr Zhaparov was elected president, following the ouster of the previous president amid protests, the third time in 15 years that a leader of Kyrgyzstan had been driven from office in a popular uprising.NEW YORK (AP) — A New York man is facing hate crime charges after police said he made threats and anti-Asian American remarks — to an undercover officer assigned to a hate crimes task force.Juvian Rodriguez, 35, was arrested Friday afternoon after the alleged confrontation near Penn Station.Do you have a problem that you need help solving? Contact CBS47 and let us beOn Your Side.Phone: 559-761-0383Email:OnYourSide@cbsfresno.comWEST MEMPHIS, AR (WMC) - Four people were shot in a drive-by in West Memphis.Three of those victims were taken to the hospital with minor injuries. The fourth victim is in critical condition.The shooting happened at the corner of 13th Street and Tyler Avenue.Police Chief Donald Oakes said the four were standing outside a home when someone drove by and shot at them. Oakes said the victims then started shooting back.Police believe there may be other victims that were grazed in the shooting.Copyright 2016 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A father of three who stopped at a Walgreen's store in northeast Houston for a snack was fatally shot early Sunday morning, a bystander struck by gunfire intended for a group of teenagers, police said.The victim, 49-year-old Edward Long, had stopped at the store at Tidwell and Homestead with his girlfriend. He was shot at about 1 a.m. as he walked into the store.Long "had nothing to do with this incident, other than being here at the wrong time." said Robert Klementich, a Houston police detective.Klementich said there were "strong indications" the drive-by shooting was gang-related. Long was simply caught in the crossfire. He was pronounced dead at the scene.The teenagers were also struck but sustained non-life-threatening injuries. Two of the teens, both 18, were taken by ambulance to Ben Taub Hospital. The third, a 15-year-old, was transported by private vehicle to Lyndon B. Johnson Hospital.Long's girlfriend, Melinda Moreno, and others posted tributes to Long, who lived in north Houston and had attended Kashmere High School, according to his Facebook profile."RIP I love you so much I am so full of pain [right] now," Moreno wrote on Facebook. "Only God knows why."Moreno's mother, Joann Moreno, wrote on Facebook that her daughter and her boyfriend went to the store that night "not knowing that this was going to be the last trip to Walgreens together.""He was a son and a father and a brother and uncle and a friend to many," she added.Police are asking for the public's help in identifying and locating the person responsible for the shooting.A candlelight vigil for Long will be held Monday at 7:30 p.m. at Rosewood Park.Lauren Caruba has reported on health and medicine at the Express-News since September 2018. She has been a staff writer since late 2016, previously covering education and the fight for transgender rights.During the coronavirus pandemic, Lauren has led the paper's medical coverage, detailing how the crisis is impacting the health care system and San Antonio community. She has embedded in COVID-19 units and emergency rooms across the city, observing and interviewing health care workers on the front lines of the pandemic. Her coverage has also delved into the virus' impact on patients and their families, including how the lack of hospital visitation has complicated end-of-life decisions.Prior to joining the Express-News, she was an investigative fellow for the Houston Chronicle, where she focused on criminal justice and the environment. Lauren grew up in the Chicago suburbs and graduated from Northwestern University's Medill School of Journalism in 2015.cleveland police car.jpgFive people were shot outside the Agora Theatre early Saturday, police said.(File photo)CLEVELAND, Ohio -- Five people were shot outside theAgora Theatre and Ballroomearly Saturday, police said.Investigators suspect multiple gunmen were involved in the shooting that happened around 2 a.m. in the 5000 block of Euclid Avenue, according to a Cleveland police news release.One victim was taken to MetroHeatlh, two were taken to Cleveland Clinic and two others were taken to University Hospitals. Information about their conditions was not available Saturday morning.It's unclear if the victims knew the shooter or if it was a random shooting. All victims and witnesses were uncooperative, police said.The event was not believed to be related to the Republican National Convention, Cleveland police spokeswoman Sgt. Jennifer Ciaccia said.Damn Near Naked club promotions was hosting a party at Agora on Friday night, according to posts on Twitter.Investigators found casings from three different caliber guns on the scene, Ciaccia said.There was no mention of a possible motive.The shooting remains under investigation.If you wish to discuss or comment on this story, please visit ourcrime and courts comments section.Like Chanda Neely on Facebook.Follow me on Twitter:Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesKTLAby:Erin Myers,Tracy BloomAn investigation was underway in San Bernardino after multiple teens were injured in a shooting outside a house party. (Credit: Newspro News)Four teenagers were injured after being shot at a house party in San Bernardino late Saturday night, police said.Officers were called to a large party in the 1200 block of West 25th Street after neighbors reported hearing gunshots fired shortly before midnight, according to a news release from the San Bernardino Police Department.They arrived at the home and located witnesses who told them a shooting had occurred outside in the back yard, the release stated.None of the gunshot victims were at the scene when officers arrived; investigators later learned that four teens who said they had been shot at the party had transported themselves to two local hospitals, according to police.The victims were an 18-year-old man, and three females, ages 19, 17 and 15, the release said. A fifth victim who went to the hospital was found to have been injured while she ran away from the scene.Their conditions were not immediately known, but all were expected to survive.The gunman, described by police as a Hispanic man in his 20s, fled the scene before officers arrived, according to the release.A motive for the shooting is not known.Anyone with information about the incident is urged to call police at 909-384-5742.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.CLARKSVILLE —  Six people were shot early Saturday morning outside a College Street nightclub and Clarksville Police are looking for a vehicle caught on surveillance footage and the person connected to it.Police were called to the 1300 block of College Street after shots were fired at 1:58 a.m., according to a CPD news release.Police were gathering evidence in the area outside a nightclub called El Punto Saturday morning. Sallee Drive, which leads to the club's parking lot, was blocked off by crime scene tape until about 8 a.m.Six people suffered gunshot wounds and were taken to Tennova Healthcare.Clarksville Police Department Spokeswoman Natalie Hall said some of the victims were then taken to Vanderbilt University Medical Center In Nashville but she did not know how many and could not provide information on their conditions.She did not say what may have led to the shooting."It appears that this was not a random shooting and does not pose a threat to the general public," she wrote in Saturday afternoon news release.The initial news release said there were five victims.Police released grainy photos taken from a surveillance camera that shows a car that police believe is connected to the shooter.One person police had sought earlier Saturday as a possible witness has been identified and is no longer sought by police.Anyone with information is asked to call Detective Eric Ewing at 931-648-0656, ext. 5447, or Detective Daniel Wimmer at extension 5527, or call or text Crimestoppers TIPS Hotline at 931-645-TIPS (8477) – Text to 274637 (CRIMES).Reach Reporter Stephanie Ingersoll at singersoll@theleafchronicle.com or on Twitter @StephLeafCROSBY, Texas– Deputies are searching for a gunman after three people were killed and another person injured Thursday night in a driveby shooting inside a neighborhood in Crosby, according to the Harris County Sheriff's Office.Deputies said a 911 call came in around 7:45 p.m. regarding a shooting in progress at a home in the 12000 block of Locust Street in east Harris County.Officers said all three victims are men. One man was pronounced dead at the scene while two others died at area hospitals.Investigators said the shooter left the scene in a gray-colored Nissan.Homicide investigators are still searching for a motive.Copyright 2016 by KPRC Click2Houston - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (713) 778-4745.Trending:OAKLAND — Police in Oakland are investigating a shooting Thursday night that sent four people to the hospital.Officers with the Oakland Police Department responded at 10:08 p.m. to a shooting in the 1600 block of 7th Street and learned four people had been shot.The victims, identified as three men and one woman, were transported to the hospital.No other information on the incident was immediately available.Copyright © 2016 by Bay City News, Inc. — Republication, Rebroadcast or any other Reuse without the express written consent of Bay City News, Inc. is prohibited.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersAkron police 4A 22-year-old Stow man was shot to death late Thursday while attending a vigil in Akron, police said.(File photo)AKRON, Ohio - Theman shot to deathlate Thursday has been identified by the Summit County Medical Examiner.Eric Gaiter, 22, of Stow, was shot about 10:40 p.m. Thursday on the 900 block of Moeller Avenue in Akron's Lane-Wooster neighborhood. He was pronounced dead at the scene.Three other people were injured in the shooting. A 20-year-old man was shot in the chest several times, and two women - ages 28 and 30 - were shot in their legs, according to an Akron police news release. Their conditions are unknown.Those injured in the shooting were attending a 10:30 p.m. vigil for Ronnie Travis, who was shot to death in Akron in July 2014, the news release says. About 100 people - including small children - were at the vigil.No shooting suspects have been identified, and no arrests have been made.Anyone with information about the shooting, including cell phone video of the vigil, is asked to contact Akron police's Detective Bureau at 330-375-2490.If you'd like to comment on this post, please visit the cleveland.comcrime and courts comments section.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesPolice at the scene of a shooting Wednesday night, July 13, 2016, in the 3000 block of Miami Street where two people were killed, another hospitalized, and an officer responding to the scene was grazed in the leg. Photo by Jeremy Kohler,jkohler@post-dispatch.comUPDATEDat 6:45 p.m. Thursday with details from charges against suspect.A St. Louis man has been charged in the murders of his ex-girlfriend — a St. Louis elementary school principal — and one of her friends.Maurice Hoskins, of St. Louis, pleaded guilty to murder and other crimes in the shooting of Jacara Sproaps, and her friend, Maurice Partlow. He also shot and injured Sproaps' 18-year-old son and fired a shot that grazed a responding police officer, according to authorities.Maurice Hoskins, 40, was charged with two counts of murder, five counts of armed criminal action, two counts of assault on a law enforcement officer and assault. Police say Hoskins fatally shot Jacara Sproaps and a friend, Maurice Partlow, then shot and critically injured Sproaps' 18-year-old son.He also fired at responding officers, police say. A bullet ricocheted and grazed one of the officers, who was treated at the scene.Hoskins was ordered held on $2 million bail. He lives in the 4000 block of Hartford Street.Jacara Sproaps in an undated family photo.Sproaps, 38, wasthe principal of Dunbar Elementary School, at 1415 North Garrison Avenue. She started as a teachers assistant for St. Louis Public Schools in 2002. She held several positions before becoming a principal in 2013. She worked hard to make children at the school feel safe, one teacher said.School district officials were notifying staff at Dunbar by phone on Thursday and will have grief counselors available for students and staff when school resumes next month.Sproaps' death is another tragedy for the St. Louis Public Schools aftera pregnant teacher was found murderedin her Central West End home in March.Before Wednesday night's shooting, police said Sproaps and a friend, Maurice Partlow, 40, were talking near her home in the 3000 block of Miami Street about 10:45 p.m. Family members were nearby. Partlow lived a short distance away, in the the 3100 block of Miami, police said. Though police initially described Partlow as Sproaps' current boyfriend, family members said they were friends who had dated in the past.Hoskins, who police said had been harassing Sproaps and her family since she broke off a relationship with him, showed up at her home, according to court documents.Hoskins approached Sproaps and Partlow, who were standing in the street talking, and began yelling, according to court documents. He then pulled a gun from his pocket.The three struggled over the gun, and Hoskins shot Partlow twice in the head, according to court documents. Sproaps and her son ran, and Hoskins chased them, firing his gun at them as they fled from him.Sproaps collapsed in a nearby alley, police say. She had been shot in the back of the head. Her son was shot in the back, but made it inside his home.Police officers heard gunfire and headed to the area with lights and siren on, police said. As they turned onto Miami, Hoskins fired at the patrol car, authorities said. One shot struck the police car, St. Louis Police Chief Sam Dotson said. Another shot ricocheted and grazed an officer in the left shin.The officer who was struck returned fire, but did not hit Hoskins.The gunman fled, but was identified by others in the neighborhood by name, Dotson said. The chief said officers knew him by his criminal record. They found him a few blocks away and took him into custody about 10 minutes after the shootings. The gun was not recovered.Sproaps and Partlow were both pronounced dead at the scene. Sproaps' son was taken to a hospital, where he was in critical but stable condition.Homicide detectives were investigating the crime. Dotson said the department's force investigation unit would not handle the case because the suspect was not struck by the officer's fire. Dotson said the officer who was injured had been with the department for more than four years.The suspect has a long history with police. Court documents show Hoskins was in and out of prison since 1994, with multiple drug and weapons convictions. He is currently on probation for drug charges he pleaded guilty to in 2013.Dotson said his order that police officers work in pairs, which he put in place after last week's fatal shooting of five police officers in Dallas, will continue indefinitely."When you have individuals that have guns, that are known to law enforcement, that are willing to use their guns in boyfriend-girlfriend disputes, and when police are called, and police respond, to turn that weapon on police officers and fire shots at them — I think we have to take every precaution to keep our police officers safe."St. Louis Public Schools released a statement Thursday praising Sproaps' contribution to the school system."Ms. Sproaps was a talented and dedicated principal and a true champion for children. She was taken from us much too soon. She will be missed by her students and co-workers in the District, but she will never be forgotten."A teacherat Mann Elementarywas found shot to death in her apartment in the 4200 block of West Pine Boulevard on March 24.Jocelyn PetersJocelyn Peters, 30, was seven months pregnant.A childhood friend of her boyfriend wascharged with murder in her death last month. The man charged, Phillip J. Cutler, of Muskogee, Okla, had use of the boyfriend’s car and keys to Peters’ apartment while the boyfriend was out of town, about the time of her death, prosecutors said.Court records say the boyfriend was the father of Peter’s unborn child and say he was an employee of the St. Louis Public Schools but do not identify him by name. Peters’ relatives have said her boyfriend was Cornelius Green, the principal at Carr Lane Visual and Performing Arts Middle School. He has not been charged.Jeremy Kohler of the Post-Dispatch contributed to this report.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Ashley Jost is the higher education reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Elisa Crouch is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Police at the scene of a shooting Wednesday night, July 13, 2016, in the 3000 block of Miami Street where two people were killed, another hospitalized, and an officer responding to the scene was grazed in the leg. Photo by Jeremy Kohler,jkohler@post-dispatch.comJacara Sproaps in an undated family photo.Maurice Hoskins, of St. Louis, pleaded guilty to murder and other crimes in the shooting of Jacara Sproaps, and her friend, Maurice Partlow. He also shot and injured Sproaps' 18-year-old son and fired a shot that grazed a responding police officer, according to authorities.Jocelyn PetersGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A gunman opened fire minutes into a vigil Monday evening for a homicide victim in West Baltimore, wounding five people.Four women and one man were shot, police said, before the gunman ran away. The crowd scattered into the North Avenue traffic; it was about 6:30 p.m. The five victims, shot in their legs and feet, one woman grazed in her stomach, were all expected to survive."I thought it was balloons bursting," said Keith Bailey, a florist across the street. "When I looked up, I saw people running. It was hard to see.""Imagine a crowd of 20 to 30 people and gunshots rang out — pandemonium," police spokesman Donny Moses said.The vigil was for Doreen Scofield's 24-year-old son, who was killed Sunday."We only wanted to celebrate my son, and they're shooting at us," said Scofield, whose family escaped without injury. "What else is it you want? What else do you want? You got my son ... and you're still shooting at us because we have a candlelight vigil? When will it end?"Her son, Jermaine, was shot to death in the 1800 block of W. North Ave. about 1:15 a.m. Sunday. He had two children."I'm tired. I'm tired," his mother said after the vigil. "It's innocent people being shot. Enough is enough."Police have not announced any suspects in Scofield's killing. After the shooting Sunday, his mother said she has forgiven the killer, and asked her family not to retaliate.Police wrapped yellow crime tape around the block Monday evening, around the scattered candles and the balloons.A 27-year-old woman was shot in her ankle, a 48-year-old woman was grazed in her stomach, a 31-year-old man was shot in his foot, a 24-year-old woman was shot in her shin, and a 20-year-old woman was shot in her thigh, police said."There's no rhyme or reason," Moses said. "It can't be explained."Across the street, Bailey the florist watched the detectives. Too many times this summer, he said, he's been hired to arrange carnations, roses and tiger lilies, another casket spread for another grieving mother."Every week, I do a funeral for some baby that's been shot," he said. "I'm in the funeral home 24 hours a day."A total of 344 people were killed in Baltimore last year, 301 of them by gunfire. This year has seen more than 130 shooting deaths to the city — enough to make a florist pack up, Bailey said."I haven't slept good," the 62-year-old said. "I'm so tired of this."In September, he plans to retire and leave his stretch of West North Avenue, his block for three decades."I'm going to go to the ocean and sit by the water, to try and see some new sights."He watched the detectives, watched the yellow crime tape, the abandoned red and silver balloons, and tealight candles strewn on the sidewalk.tprudente@baltsun.comRecommendedMiacha Tillman, 19.JACKSON, MI - A Jackson man involved in several recent shootings and reports of shots fired in Jackson has been charged and arraigned.Miacha Tillman, 19, was arraigned Wednesday afternoon, Aug. 3, by Jackson County Magistrate Fred Bishop, charged with one count of felony possession of a firearm, one count of felony possession of ammunition and one count of felony firearms.Tillman was found hiding in the attic of a home in the 600 block of McBride Street that had been shot at Monday afternoon, Aug. 1 and arrested for illegal possession of a handgun and ammunition, said Jackson Police Deputy Chief Elmer Hitt.The McBride Street shooting is believed to be directly related to the earlier shooting at Greenwood Avenue and First Street that same day, Hitt said.No injuries were reported in both shootings, Hitt said.Tillman was also one of four victims who were injured in a drive-by shooting in the 500 block of Summit Avenue on July 11.The following day, July 12, in what is believed to be a retaliatory attack for the Summit Avenue drive-by, Demarcus Smith was shot in the leg while pumping gas at a gas station on Francis Street, police said.Tillman was out on bond at the time of June 11 shooting, charged with carrying a concealed weapon and obstruction of justice, according to court records.His original bond was revoked Wednesday morning by Jackson County Circuit Court Judge Susan Beebe after being informed of the new charges.Given Tillman's prior charges, Jackson County Assistant Prosecuting Attorney Kelsey McKinnie was granted a requested bond set at $500,000, cash or surety.He is due to appear in court for a pretrial hearing in Beebe's courtroom on Aug. 23 for his previous concealed weapon and obstruction of justice charges.Tillman is scheduled for a probable cause conference at 9:30 a.m., Aug. 12 and preliminary examination at 9:30 a.m., Aug. 17 in Jackson County District Court Judge Michael Klaeren's courtroom for his new charges.Tillman stated he will be hiring his own attorney. He is currently lodged in the Jackson County Jail.To read all of the stories related to the Summit Avenue drive-by shooting,click here.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesBerrien County Trial Court, MichiganEnd of WatchMonday, July 11, 2016Security Supervisor Joe Zangaro and Court Officer Ron Kienzle were shot and killed inside the Berrien County Courthouse by an inmate who was attempting to escape at approximately 2:25 pm.The inmate was being returned to a holding cell following a court appearance when he attacked a sheriff's deputy in the corridor behind the courtroom. Officer Kienzle heard the struggle and ran into the corridor. As soon as he opened the door to the corridor the prisoner shot him with the deputy's service weapon.The man escaped into a public hallway where he shot a civilian and exchanged shots with two other court officers, killing Supervisor Zangaro, before being killed by return gunfire.The inmate was in court for two counts of criminal sexual conduct, kidnapping, assault with a dangerous weapon, and domestic assault.Security Supervisor Zangaro had served as the Berrien County Trial Court's director of security for 10 years after having retired from the Michigan State Police after 25 years.escape, sex offenderBerrien County Trial Court, MIEOW: July 11, 2016Rest easyMark MottolaJuly 11, 2020Want even more control of your Reflection?Create a free ODMP account nowfor these benefits:Create an accountfor more options, or use this form to leave a Reflection now.Newton Grove Police Department, NCEOW: April 3, 2021Bibb County Sheriff's Office, GAEOW: April 6, 2021Clinton Township Police Department, MIEOW: March 22, 2021Texas Department of Criminal Justice - Correctional Institutions Division, TXEOW: March 31, 2021Hometown Police Department, ILEOW: April 3, 2021United States Capitol Police, USEOW: April 2, 2021Broward County Sheriff's Office, FLEOW: March 27, 2021Northampton County Sheriff's Office, NCEOW: March 18, 2021Hamilton County Sheriff's Office, OHEOW: February 12, 2021Thank you for your submission!Photo/Video will be published upon admin review and approval.Copyright © 1996-2021, The Officer Down Memorial Page, IncD.C. police officers wounded a robbery suspect Tuesday during a shootout with the man, who was in an SUV in Southeast Washington, authorities said.Police said they did not know at the time that the man had carjacked the vehicle and that several other people inside were victims. Before the carjacking, police said, the man had robbed four other people at gunpoint and fired at them as they fled.The incident unfolded about 12:10 a.m. near Sixth Street and Alabama Avenue in Congress Heights. No victims, officers or bystanders were injured, police said.Police had initially said that no one was hit by gunfire, but in a later statement, authorities said the alleged gunman, Luvell Alverson, 22, of Suitland, Md., had been shot in the leg.Alverson, who was arrested after a standoff, was charged with armed robbery, kidnapping and assault on a police officer.He is expected to make an initial appearance in D.C. Superior Court on Wednesday.ShotSpotter, a system that detects the sound of gunfire, alerted officers to the situation.As officers approached the vehicle, a suspect inside opened fire, D.C. Police Chief Cathy L. Lanier said.The chief said the SUV backed up and that officers took cover. “Additional shots were fired from the SUV, and [officers] returned fire,” she said.Police initially took everyone in the SUV into custody but later concluded that one man was responsible.“He will be charged and presented in court tomorrow,” Lanier said. “The remainder of the people appear to be victims.”Police said they did not believe that the shooting was connected in any way to the recent shooting deaths by police in Minnesota and Louisiana. “We don’t have information or believe that it was a targeted attack or a planned attack on police,” said Dustin Sternbeck, the chief D.C. police spokesman.Tensions are high after the two fatal shootings of black men by white police officers, followed by the fatal shootings of five white police officers in Dallas in apparent retaliation. D.C. officers, along with those in many other departments, are currently patrolling streets in pairs.[D.C. police pair up after sniper attack in Dallas leaves five officers dead]In a separate, earlier shooting in Southeast, police said that about 11:15 p.m. Monday, a man and three juvenile women, all in their teens, were shot and wounded in the 5100 block of Call Place SE, near Benning Terrace. It is about five miles from the site of the police shootout, and authorities said they do not believe that the two incidents were related.Police also were called to Call Place because of ShotSpotter. A police report says that when officers arrived, they found the four victims. One was shot in the upper back and thigh, another in the left leg, a third in the right hand and the fourth in the buttocks, according to the report.The only lookout was for a black vehicle. No arrests have been made.police lights nightMultiple people were injured early Thursday morning (July 7) during a shooting at a Baton Rouge apartment complex, according to a report from WAFB. The shooting was reported at 3 a.m. (File image via ThinkStock)(Alex_Schmidt)Multiple people were injured early Thursday morning (July 7) during a shooting at a Baton Rouge apartment complex, according to a report fromWAFB. The shooting was reported at 3 a.m.Witnesses told WAFB as many as four people were shot at Hawthorne Heights Apartments on Lobdell Avenue. Authorities said there was a shooting, but did not say how many people were shot.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?Dallas Police Department, TexasEnd of WatchFriday, July 8, 2016Senior Corporal Lorne Ahrens, Police Officer Michael Krol, Sergeant Michael Smith, and Police Officer Patrick Zamarripa of the Dallas Police Department, and Police Officer Brent Thompson of the Dallas Area Rapid Transit Police Department, were shot and killed by an active shooter during a protest in downtown Dallas.As the protesters walked down Main Street, between South Lamar Street and South Market Street, a sniper opened fire on police officers who were providing security for the event. The man shot a total of 12 officers, killing five and wounding seven.The subject was cornered in an adjacent college building and barricaded himself inside for several hours while he spoke to negotiators, during which time he stated he specifically targeted white police officers. He was killed when the Dallas Police Department's Bomb Squad moved an explosive device to the man's location using a robot and detonated it.Corporal Ahrens had served with the Dallas Police Department for 14 years and had previously served with the Los Angeles County, California, Sheriff's Office for 11 years. He is survived by his wife and two children. His wife also serves with the Dallas Police Department.ambush, sniperDallas Area Rapid Transit Police Department, TXEOW: July 7, 2016Dallas Police Department, TXEOW: July 7, 2016Dallas Police Department, TXEOW: July 7, 2016Dallas Police Department, TXEOW: July 7, 2016Rest in heavenly peaceMark MottolaJuly 8, 2020Want even more control of your Reflection?Create a free ODMP account nowfor these benefits:Create an accountfor more options, or use this form to leave a Reflection now.Newton Grove Police Department, NCEOW: April 3, 2021Bibb County Sheriff's Office, GAEOW: April 6, 2021Clinton Township Police Department, MIEOW: March 22, 2021Texas Department of Criminal Justice - Correctional Institutions Division, TXEOW: March 31, 2021Hometown Police Department, ILEOW: April 3, 2021United States Capitol Police, USEOW: April 2, 2021Broward County Sheriff's Office, FLEOW: March 27, 2021Northampton County Sheriff's Office, NCEOW: March 18, 2021Hamilton County Sheriff's Office, OHEOW: February 12, 2021Thank you for your submission!Photo/Video will be published upon admin review and approval.Copyright © 1996-2021, The Officer Down Memorial Page, IncThe Tennessee Bureau of Investigation says a Sullivan County Grand Jury has returned indictments against the man accused of killing one person and injuring several others while firing shots at several vehicles on Volunteer Parkway in Bristol last week.Investigators found that Lakeem Keon Scott, 37, was armed with at least two weapons, including a semi-automatic-style rifle and a pistol, and a large amount of ammunition when he started firing through the window of the Days Inn on that highway early Thursday morning. One of the shots hit the hotel clerk. Agents say Scott then began firing at several vehicles driving along Volunteer Parkway. When Bristol Police officers arrived on the scene, investigators say he fired at three of them, injuring one. Officers returned fire, striking Scott as well.Newspaper carrier Jennifer Rooney, 44, was on her way way to pick up papers for her morning delivery when she was struck by one of the bullets. Rooney died from her injuries.Tuesday morning, the Sullivan County Grand Jury indicted Scott on one count of first degree murder, seven counts of attempted first degree murder, and seven counts of employing a firearm in the commission of a dangerous felony. When he is released from Bristol Regional Medical Center, Scott will be booked into the Sullivan County Jail on a $500,000 bond.The indictment names several other victims, including: David Whitman Davis, 45; Kathy Fleenor, 66; Harold Fleenor, 73; Deborah Watts, 53; Officer Matthew Cousins, 46; Officer Jonathan Forbes, 28; and Officer Ronald Cowan, 25.TBI investigators say Scott cited anger over recent police killings of black men. Scott is black; all of the victims are white.The TBI investigation continues along with support from the FBI; the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; the Sullivan County Sheriff's Office; Bristol Police Department; and Kingsport Police Department.At least four people were injured in a shooting near South Los Angeles early Tuesday morning, police said.The shooting was reported just before 1 a.m. near 56th Street and Naomi Avenue, according to the Los Angeles Police Department.The four victims were transported to a hospital, one with serious injuries and the other three were in stable condition, police said.Top news of the dayThe shooting was under investigation.WATCHVIDEOS7 shot at barbecue in BrooklynJerome MooreUupdate: KJS/JKS 4-5-19JFC/VHS 7-5-16Inc. #086132616Home•311 Help & Info•Contact Us•FAQs•Privacy Policy•CitizensNetThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.WEST ENGLEWOOD — TheFourth of July shooting of two childrenprompted a neighborhood meeting on a street corner Tuesday night, with some speakers urging the community to turn in the criminals."When our grandsons and nephews do the shooting, we run into the house and lock the door. It's time to stand up and say 'This will not be accepted,' " said Devry Graham, president of Graham Funeral Directors and Cremation Services.The gathering of about 100 people, at 56th Street and Hermitage  Avenue, included 15th Ward Ald. Raymond Lopez and Englewood District Cmdr. Larry Watson.Graham told the group that the community needs to have a better relationship with police."The police have families just like the rest of us, and we can't blame the police for everything," Graham said.Lopez echoed Graham, saying "In every community we've seen bullets hit community members. We know who these offenders are, but we as a community need to step it up and say that we will work with the police to get these situation rectified."One attendee, Demetrius Nash, said the meeting was a good start, but change won't come until systemic issues that plague neighborhoods like West Englewood are seriously addressed by elected officials."It's about resources. It's disrespectful to make decisions about young people we don't even engage," Nash said. "You have to engage the young people in order understand your constituents. If you don't go out of your way to engage the youth, you are doing a disservice as a leader."Meanwhile, a5-year-old girlwho was wounded in the Monday night shooting while playing with fireworks in front of her house has returned home from the hospital and is being cared for by her mother."There was no need for this," said Natasha Williams, the mother of Taniyah Williams.The child was with friends toward the end of the Fourth of July weekend, around 11 p.m., just steps from her home in the 5500 block of South Hermitage Avenuewhen two shooters appeared from a nearby gangway and opened fire, police said.A cousin of Taniyah, 7-year-old Corey Bondurant Jr., also was shot and hospitalized.A 30-year-old woman was shot in her left leg, and a 19-year-old man also was shot in his left leg. Police said they think the shooting was gang-related. No one has been arrested."I had just gone back inside when my son ran back in and said someone was shooting outside," the girl's mother said. "My son saw my baby limping, and he picked her up and brought her on the porch."Williams said Taniyah is home from the hospital."It's sad. She doesn't have crutches, so I have to carry her around to the bathroom and such," Williams said, adding that neighborhood "is usually quiet around here."Corey Bondurant, father of Corey Jr., released a statement Tuesday, saying  “Corey is out of surgery and is in stable condition."The shooting was seven blocks west of aMarch 23 shootingof four people in front ofComputer Preschool Academy, in which a stray bullet left a hole in one of the preschool's windows.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.A man and a woman were fatally shot and six others, including a 2-year-old child and three others younger than 18, were wounded in a common area of a trailer park in the Laveen area as they gathered for a Fourth of July celebration, authorities said.The shots were fired from a semiautomatic weapon by someone walking by at about 10:30 p.m. Monday, Maricopa County Sheriff Joe Arpaio said at a news conference Tuesday morning.The shooter remains at large, Arpaio said.Maricopa County Sheriff's Office deputies identified the shooting victims as Armando Cardona, 45, and Naome Innis, 35. The 2-year-old was shot in the arm and transported to a hospital in stable condition, according to Sheriff's Office and fire officials. The other three juveniles suffered non-life-threatening injuries, Arpaio said.MCSO deputies and Phoenix firefighters were called to the 4000 block of West Southern Avenue at about 10:30 p.m., according to the Phoenix Fire Department.The Southern Meadows mobile-home park common area is just off Southern Avenue. Sheriff's investigators were interviewing potential witnesses, some of whom were unclear whether they had heard gunshots or fireworks, Arpaio said.No information was available about a possible motive, Arpaio said."We need some help to solve this vicious incident," Arpaio said.He asked that anyone with information to call the Sheriff's Office at 602-876-1011.The shooting occurred outside Phoenix city limits, but Arpaio said his investigators were in contact with Phoenix police to see if there were any connections between this shooting and others in the area.Rudy Navarrette, 60, said one of the boys shot would come over to his residence and mow his lawn."It brings tears to my eyes," Navarrette said. "(The boy) upkeeps my yard, he comes here three times a week."He said it was heartbreaking to see his neighbors shot and killed. Cardona and Innis had been socializing at his place a couple of nights before the shooting."They were just there at the wrong time," he said.Vanessa Vargas, 29, said the shooting made her cautious about her community."I hate having my kids come outside now," Vargas said. "I don't like them playing out here ... It's horrible."A Monroe man was charged second-degree murder and possession of a firearm of a convicted felon following a Sunday morning shooting at the Monroe Civic Center that left two dead and three wounded.On Monday, Monroe Police Chief Quentin Holmes announced that Jaterrious "Dra" Godfrey, 24, of 1005 Girod St., Monroe, was arrested following an investigation. Holmes said an arrest warrant was obtained for Godfrey on a count of second-degree murder and a count of possession of a firearm by a convicted felon after witnesses identified him as one of the shooters in the Sunday morning event.UPDATE: Monroe man faces charges in Sterlington officer's deathGodfrey was arrested around 1 a.m. Monday and booked into Ouachita Correctional Center with a bond of $650,000.Holmes previously said officers were dispatched to the Civic Center parking lot shortly after 1:30 a.m. Sunday regarding a fight that had broken out as patrons were leaving a private event attended by as many as 2,000 people.An initial investigation suggested that two groups with a previously existing conflict stated fighting in the parking lot after the event. As officers were responding, gunshots were fired, and five people were hit.Two victims died, and three were hospitalized with non-life-threatening injuries. The names of the deceased are being withheld pending notification of next-of-kin.2 dead, 3 injured in Civic Center shootingThe party was a BYOB event, according to reports, but Holmes said further investigation, including autopsy reports, would be required to determine if the victims had consumed alcohol before the shooting.Holmes said an update on this case will be provided Tuesday.Follow Bonnie Bolden on Twitter@Bonnie_Bolden_and on Facebook athttp://on.fb.me/1RtsEEP.We’ve detected that JavaScript is disabled in this browser. Please enable JavaScript or switch to a supported browser to continue using twitter.com. You can see a list of supported browsers in our Help Center.Help CenterTerms of ServicePrivacy PolicyCookie PolicyImprintAds info© 2021 Twitter, Inc.Filed under:Chanda Foreman spent the day before her death going to work, hanging out with her cousin and preparing to go out at night.She went into her job at Comcast early, where her co-workers had decorated her desk and held a party in honor of her 37th birthday on Thursday, her family said.Foreman was among five people shot when a gold Buick with four people inside pulled up and two gunmen opened fire from the back seat about 9:45 p.m. in the 9500 block of South Loomis, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Foreman, who lived in the 4300 block of West Ford City Drive, was pronounced dead at 10:25 p.m. on the way to Holy Cross Hospital, authorities said.Two men were taken in critical condition to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn after the shooting, which police called gang-related. One, 33, was shot in the neck and the other, 25, suffered gunshot wounds to the arm, side and back. A 45-year-old woman shot in the arm was taken to Little Company of Mary Hospital in Evergreen Park, along with a 54-year-old woman with wounds to the leg and foot, police said. They were in fair-to-serious condition, according to the Chicago Fire Department.Foreman’s family members gathered outside Holy Cross early Friday morning as they learned the news of her death. Some cried and others were dazed and said they couldn’t believe what they were being told.Foreman was inside her car with another woman when two groups of people opened fire on each other from either end of the block and they both were shot, her mother, Cathy Geralds said. The three others were shot on the front porch of Foreman’s aunt’s home, Geralds said.Geralds heard about the shooting from her cousin, whose wife was among the victims, Geralds said. When she arrived at the crime scene, she was told she didn’t want to see her daughter in the condition she was in.“And I knew she was gone,” Geralds said. “She was gone.”Geralds remembered her daughter as a responsible woman who had worked at her job for 10 years. Foreman’s 6-year-old daughter will likely live with her now. Geralds said her daughter had been shot in a previous incident near 79th Street and King Drive.“I didn’t get to talk to her today,” Geralds said. “I sent her a text and wished her a happy birthday.”One of her cousins, who asked not to be named, said she was with Foreman earlier in the day.“She was a great person,” she said. “We were just saying earlier, we were afraid of these streets.”Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Trending:WILLOWBROOK – A man was shot to death and three others were wounded in unincorporated Willowbrook, police said today.The shooting occurred at 10:11 p.m. Tuesday in the 13800 block of South Avalon Boulevard, west of the Harbor (110) Freeway, said Los Angeles County sheriff’s Deputy Lisa Jansen. The man was pronounced dead at the scene and the three wounded men were taken to a nearby hospital, she said.Sheriff’s homicide detectives were investigating the incident, Jansen said.Anyone with information on the shooting is urged to contact homicide detectives at (323) 890-5500 or anonymously via Crime Stoppers at (800) 222- TIPS.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.At least 18 people, including a 4-year-old boy, were shot between Tuesday afternoon and early Wednesday in attacks in Chicago, police said.In the attack that wounded the 4-year-old, police responded to a report of someone shot in the 6400 block of South King Drive about 9:10 p.m., in the Parkway Gardens neighborhood, said Officer Thomas Sweeney, a police spokesman.The boy was walking with his mother, brother and a family friend when they heard fireworks followed by gunshots, said Officer Ron Gaines, a Chicago police spokesman. The boy was hit in the face and he was taken to Comer Children's Hospital in serious condition, police said.A 28-year-old woman was in her bed in her home when a bullet went through a window and through a wall, before striking her in the head. She was taken to Stroger Hospital, where she was listed in good condition, Gaines said.Police said the shooters were in a dark-colored four-door vehicle and they were shooting at a group of people who gathered in a building's courtyard.Neither the boy nor the woman was the intended target, police said.One of the boy's relatives, who stood outside Comer Children's Hospital late Tuesday, said the boy was shot in the jaw, but, he added, "he is going to pull through."At the shooting scene, dozens of police circled the residential housing complex as neighbors quietly gathered outside their apartment buildings, watching officers. People strolled through the crime scene carrying their groceries, seemingly alarmed by the commotion."They (expletive) shot a baby," one neighbor cried out after several minutes of silence. He craned his neck back and squeezed his eyes shut. "A baby, man. A baby."Early Wednesday, the Rev. Corey Brooks announced a $10,000 reward that his nonprofit organization is willing to give to anyone who provides information leading to the arrest and conviction of the shooter.In a separate attack, at least four people were shot about 9:20 p.m. Tuesday in the 1600 block of South Christiana Avenue in the Lawndale neighborhood, according to police.A 25-year-old man was shot in the right arm and chest, and another 25-year-old man was hit in the left arm, said Officer Veejay Zala, a police spokesman.A 22-year-old man was struck in the back, and a 24-year-old man was hit in the right foot.The conditions of all four men were stabilized at Mount Sinai Hospital.The shooting occurred after the victims exchanged words with an unknown group of people in a vacant lot, Zala said.According to Chicago Fire Department media officials, as many as six people were shot in the incident.Four people managed to get to an area hospital themselves, and two people were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where their conditions stabilized, according to fire officials.In other shootings:About 2:05 a.m., a man in his 20s was in a grave condition after getting shot in the 6300 block of South Talman Avenue in the Marquette Park neighborhood, Gaines said. The man was shot three times in the back and once in the head. He was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where he was listed in “grave” condition, Gaines said.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneCHARLOTTE, NC (WBTV) - An arrest has been made in a west Charlotte bar shooting that left five people injured Sunday morning.Treon Monteas Livingston, 33, is charged in a shooting that happened at Reba's Bar and Grill on Camp Greene Street just before 2 a.m. Sunday.Detectives say Livingston fired a gun from the parking lot into the bar, striking five people. One of the victims had serious injuries, but they are all expected to survive.Police believe the shooting stemmed form a previous altercation."It's sad that someone got hurt over some foolishness that I don't know about, that shouldn't have been around our business at all," said Carolyn Black, the owner of Reba's.When police arrived to the scene, they found three of the victims there, before transporting them to CMC-Main. The other two victims had already brought themselves there.Livinston is charged with five counts of attempted murder, five counts of a assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill inflicting serious injury, shooting into an occupied dwelling and possession of a firearm by felon.Detectives identified Livingston as the suspect during the investigation. He remains in custody at the Mecklenburg County Sheriff's Office.CMPD says the case is ongoing. Anyone with additional information is asked to call detectives at 704-432-TIPS or Crime Stoppers at 704-336-1600.PREVIOUS:Reba's Bar and Grill neighbor: 'If I could tackle him, those five people wouldn't have been hurt"Copyright 2016 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MenuNorfolk, Va. -Norfolk Police have arrested and charged four people in connection with a quadruple shooting that happened in the Berkley neighborhood.Police were dispatched to the 700 block of Craig Street around 10:00 p.m. Saturday.When they arrived, they found three adults and a 17-year-old suffering from apparent gunshot wounds.All victims were taken to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.Officers were in the area at the same time the shooting took place and saw a car speeding away from the scene. Police tried to pull the car over but the driver did not stop. The suspect vehicle hit two cars before coming to a stop.The driver of the car and three passengers got out of the car and ran away. Officers eventually caught up to the suspects and they were taken into custody in the 1600 block of East Indian River Road.All people in the car have been charged with multiple felony offenses.Michael Thomas, 20; Keshawn Brown, 18; and two 16-year-olds have been charged with four counts of malicious wounding, one count of shooting into an occupied dwelling, one count of felony eluding and four counts of use of a firearm in commission of a felony.Brown is charged with felony hit and run in addition to the four other charges.While in Norfolk City Jail, Brown spoke to News 3 exclusively. He claims he didn't know the three others were going to shoot the group and says he only drove away from police because he was scared."I’m driving around and they see a crowd of people and boys started shooting," said Brown. "The police were right there and started coming. I got scared and I kept driving."Report a typoThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.MORGAN PARK — Five people were hurt between two shootings in Morgan Park Saturday, police said.First, around 11:45 a.m. Saturday, two women and two men were standing in front of a house in the 1400 block of West 114th Street when someone emerged from a nearby gangway and shot at them before fleeing in an older-model car, according to Officer Kevin Quaid, a Chicago Police spokesman.Two women, 19 and 20, were brought to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where they were both listed in serious condition Sunday morning, police said. The 19-year-old was shot in her right leg and her back, and the 20-year-old was shot in her back.The 19-year-old was pregnant,according to theTribune.Two men, 20 and 23, were brought to Stroger Hospital, police said. The 23-year-old was "stable" with a gunshot wound in his buttocks, and the 20-year-old was in fair condition with a gunshot wound in his left leg.Around 11:45 p.m. Saturday night, an 18-year-old man was standing on the front porch of a home in the 9000 block of South Bishop Street when he heard gunshots and felt pain in his left leg, police said.The man was brought to Advocate Christ Medical Center in serious condition, police said.No one is in custody, police said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkNext inBeverly, Mt. Greenwood & Morgan ParkCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.FOX 4 Kansas City WDAF-TV | News, Weather, Sportsby:Andrew Lynch,Molly BalkenbushKANSAS CITY, Kan. — Police are investigating a Friday night shooting spree that left four people injured, two of them seriously hurt. Police had originally said that seven people were shot, but amended that number shortly before midnight to four.FOX 4’s Molly Balkenbush reports that two victims were found at the scene near North 3rd and Walker. KCK police say dispatchers received calls from a hospital where they said more victims walked themselves in.Officers say the shooting happened at some kind of gathering outside of an apartment just after 10 p.m., but didn’t elaborate on the circumstances.No details were immediately released about the person or people who fired shots. Anyone who has information that will assist investigating officers is urged to call the TIPS Hotline at (816) 474-TIPS.SubmitKANSAS CITY, Mo. -- A standoff with police ended just before 1:30 p.m. when the suspect surrendered to police without further incident.  The kids that were in the house with the shooting suspect were rescued by police.  After the kids were rescued the suspect remained in the house and continued to fire shots at officers.It all started when police were called to the area of 44th and Norton Saturday morning to investigate the report of a shooting.HARRISONVILLE, Mo. -- Day 6 of the Kylr Yust trial is expected to continue with testimony.On day 5, prosecutors moved into the timeline after Jessica Runions was last seen through witnesses' testimony and evidence. Jessep Carter's wife, Crystal Taylor, testified that Yust summoned her husband up to Raytown in early September 2016 and recounted the hours up until Kylr Yust was arrested.LONDON — Prince Philip will be laid to rest with all the honors due a prince of the United Kingdom and a consort to Queen Elizabeth II.But the coronavirus pandemic means it will be a more low-key farewell than has marked many royal deaths. The pandemic has required changes to the well-prepared plans for Philip’s passing, code-named Operation Forth Bridge.Hartford, Connecticut, police are investigating a shooting that injured multiple people in the city’s North End Friday.Police say the Major Crimes Division and Shooting Task Force are investigating the incident, which occurred near the intersection of Brook Street and Mather Street. The injuries are not considered life threatening.More information on the victims was not immediately available.DEKALB COUNTY, Ga. — DeKalb County police say one person died and at least three others were hurt in a shooting near Stone Mountain.Officers were called to an apartment on Lancashire Drive near Central Drive at about 3 p.m. Wednesday."I heard like 50 shots. It was going back-to-back like 'pow, pow, pow, pow, pow," said witness Ambreia Gray.By 8:15 p.m. Wednesday Channel 2’s Nicole Carr and her photographer got a close look at what was left from the early afternoon gunfire.“Almost sounds like a war zone,” community activist Amos King told Carr.One bullet hole was so big you could see right into the house. All of bullets were scattered across a front door of a Hidden Meadows townhome.DeKalb police say it's the result of a drug deal shootout between two groups.“Unfortunately it was outside. It could have gotten a little worse than it was. We're glad it didn't,” said Maj. Antonio Catlin.One man ran across the street, dropping dead. The victim was identified as 18-year-old Antoine Alexander.Three others who were injured in the shooting are expected to face charges.Police: 1 weapon found on deadly Dekalb Co drug deal shootout scene. 3 confirmed scenes. May be 6+ involved@wsbtv5pic.twitter.com/NuQpWPmFbEKaren Powell told Carr that someone connected to the scene rushed to her home to call his brother, believed to be in the middle of that shootout."When he was dialing the phone it wouldn't ring. He was saying please answer, please answer the phone and they wouldn't pick up," Powell said.“This is very unfortunate today that many people shot in our neighborhood,” King said.King said enough is enough.Drug transaction leads to shooting. Several wounded one dead on Thornewood Ln. Several suspects in custody. Investigation ongoing.#DKPD“You know what's going on in your community. You've got to say something about it,” King said.King said he's organizing a town hall type meeting with police and neighbors at Victory Church next week.Meanwhile, DeKalb police say those injured suspects are at Grady Memorial Hospital and one other hospital. It's unclear what specific charges they'll face.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A shooting in Garfield Park left four people wounded Wednesday, police said.About 1 p.m., the four people were in the 3100 block of West Warren Boulevard when a light-colored sedan drove by and someone in the car shot at the victims, said Officer Michelle Tannehill, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.A 41-year-old man was shot in his leg and torso and a 47-year-old man was shot in his right arm. They were at Stroger Hospital, where their conditions were not released but they were listed as "stable," Tannehill said.A 20-year-old man was hit in his right foot and a 41-year-old man was hit in his left foot. They were at Mount Sinai Hospital, where their conditions were not released but they were listed as "stable," Tannehill said.No one was in custody in the shooting.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.WILLINGBORO – Three adults and a child suffered injuries after gunshots rang out early Tuesday morning at a large house party in Willingboro.Police said none of the victims were at the scene, on the unit block of Mosshill Lane, when officers arrived at 12:07 a.m. However, they did find spent shell casings on the roadway.A short time later, all four victims arrived at Lourdes Medical Center in Willingboro with injuries that weren’t life-threatening.Police described the victims as a 19-year-old woman who was shot in the foot and later transferred to Cooper University Hospital in Camden; a 22-year-old man shot in the leg; a 20-year-old woman whose leg was grazed; and a 12-year-old child who suffered a graze wound to the arm.Willingboro police investigating the shooting ask anyone with information to contact them at (609) 877-3001 or call the Citizen Tip Hotline at (609) 877-6958.LOUISVILLE, KY (WAVE) - An arrest has been made in a quadruple shooting that left two of the victims dead Tuesday night near Churchill Downs.A Louisville Metro Police Department spokesman said Eric Lee Anthony, 23, was arrested Wednesday night in the 5800 block of Russett Place. He is charged with two counts of murder, two counts of assault, three counts of wanton endangerment, and possession of a handgun by a convicted felon.MUGSHOTS: June 2016 RoundupThe shootings happened inside an apartment in the 2800 block of Rodman Street near the intersection of M Street about 10 p.m. on Tuesday.PREVIOUS STORIES+2 dead, 2 injured in south Louisville shooting+2 men shot, killed near Churchill Downs identifiedTwo of the victims, Monte Compton, 24, and Donte Jefferson, 29, were pronounced dead at the scene. The other two victims, a man and a woman, were taken to University of Louisville Hospital for treatment. They are expected to survive.Copyright 2016WAVE 3 News. All rights reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Four people were hurt in a shooting overnight in Roanoke.The shooting happened around 3:20 a.m. Sunday morning at Ms. Choc's restaurant, which is on Melrose Avenue.Police say around 150 people were inside the restaurant at the time of the shooting.Two of the victims were taken to the hospital by personal vehicles and the two others were taken by ambulance.No arrests have been made.Call police if you have any information.This is the second shooting near Ms. Choc's restaurant in the past month. A 16-year-old girl was shot in the hip outside of the restaurant on June 5.Roanoke Police are investigating an incident that happened on Melrose Avenue overnight.Our photographer on the scene says there was a heavy police presence Miss Choc's restaurant in the 2400 block.Right now police are not releasing any details about the incident or if anyone was hurt.We'll bring you more information as we get it.WAYCROSS, GA (WALB) - Waycross Police officers responded to shots being fired at Garlington Heights Apartment complex about 10:36 p.m. Saturday.Upon arrival, officials found four people had been shot.Two of the victims, 21-year-old Cameron Wilkins and 32-year-old Felicia Williams, were pronounced deceased by the coroner.The two remaining victims were sent to the hospital for treatment of their wounds. One victim has been released from the hospital while the other remains being treated.Police have no information on possible suspects at this time.Anyone with information on the shooting is asked to call the Waycross Police Department at 912-287-2921 or their 24-hour tip line at 912-287-2924.Copyright 2016WALB.  All rights reserved.P.O. Box 3130Albany, GA 31706(229) 446-1010A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Trending:OAKLAND — A 16-year-old Antioch girl gunned down while attending a vigil in downtown Oakland has been identified as Reggina Jefferies, police said Wednesday.Reggina, a Deer Valley High School student, was with a group about 5:41 p.m. Tuesday, on the 1300 block of Franklin Street, when a gunman opened fire. She was hospitalized in grave condition and later died; three other teens, two boys and a girl, suffered gunshot wounds and were treated and released from a hospital, according to police.Police did not release any information on a motive for the shooting. Shell casings were discovered at the scene and a vehicle was seeing fleeing eastbound on 13th Street afterward. No suspects have been arrested.The group was attending a vigil in the area of 14th Street and Broadway for two 15-year-old Oakland boys who drowned in Stanislaus County over Memorial Day weekend.Josiah Pratt-Rose and his best friend, Jamari Wilson, died May 28 after jumping into the Woodward Reservoir, apparently without life jackets, according to the Stanislaus County Sheriff’s Department.Oakland police initially said there were as many as six people wounded by gunfire Tuesday, but later changed that figure to four after further medical evaluation determined some of the injuries were not caused by the shooting itself.Pastor Kevin Hope, who officiated the funeral services for the two boys at Acts Full Gospel Church in East Oakland Tuesday, said he was shocked by the events that happened at the vigil afterward.“She performed a praise dance during the funeral service, she did a fantastic job. It’s just an unfortunate tragedy,” Hope said.Several hundred people attended a vigil for Reggina Wednesday evening, sharing stories about the teenager.“Let’s stop the killing and start the healing,” people in the crowd shouted after one fiery testimony from one woman who lamented having to attend funerals as well as graduations.As Oakland police officers stood off to one side by the Golden Lotus, where wooden panels replaced the glass shot out by bullets Tuesday, people stood and listened, showing equal measures of sadness and resolve.Sharon Rafferty, mother of Kris Rafferty, who was on the Fruitvale BART platform when Oscar Grant was later shot and killed by a BART officer, talked about the lingering pain of losing her son to gun violence.“It doesn’t just hurt, and these thugs or cowards on the street, they don’t realize the damage that they do,” she said. “Yes, you have killed your enemies, but you have also killed the mothers, the fathers, the children. … It’s not right.”Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $25,000 in reward for information leading to the arrest of the shooter. Anyone with information can call police at 510-238-3821 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersWilmington police have released more details about Tuesday night's shooting that injured several teens.Four children were struck by gunfire just before 9:15 in the area of South Van Buren and Elm streets, said Sgt. Andrea Janvier, a spokeswoman with the Wilmington Police Department.A fifth person, a 37-year-old man, was initially believed to be grazed by a bullet.  However, when evaluated by paramedics, no injuries were found and the man refused medical treatment, Janvier said.One teenager, a 15-year-old boy, is in critical condition at Christiana Hospital. He was shot in his stomach, hand and left leg, Janvier said.Paramedics also took a 16-year-old boy to Christiana Hospital.  He's in stable condition after getting shot in the legs and right arm, Janvier said.Two other victims were taken to the Nemours Alfred I. DuPont Hospital for treatment. A 13-year-old girl is in stable condition with a gunshot wound to her thigh, and a 12-year-old boy is in stable condition after being struck in the hip and feet, Janvier said.Two other shootings have occurred in the Hedgeville neighborhood within the past week.A24-year-old man was shotin the shoulder Monday, and ateen boy was shotin the abdomen last Friday, according to police. Both were described as stable.Police closed several blocks of the neighborhood as they investigated the shootings.At least nine evidence cones could be seen in front of a corner house at South Van Buren and Elm streets.Renee Wise said she was on South Harrison Street heading to her daughter's house when she ran into a number of police throughout the neighborhood."I didn't know any of this was out here," Wise said. "I looked and I said, 'What is going on?'"Wise, who heard the victims were juveniles, was devastated."It is absolutely heartbreaking and it is sad, and now it is spilling over out here with these babies out here," she said.Wilmington firefighters applied a soapy liquid up the block in front of a boarded building at South Harrison and Elm streets.The investigation is in the preliminary stages and ongoing. Anyone with information relative to this investigation is asked to call Detective Lindsay Hageman at (302) 576-3630 or Detective A. Reddick at (302) 576-3649.STORY:15-year-old girl shotfollowingparty near FeltonSTORY:Two injured in Bear-area shooting Sunday, police saySTORY:Man falls asleep, fatally crashes into 84-year-old woman, police saySTANFORD - A Kentucky man was charged with felony firearm possession Saturday after police say he possessed a gun he was not permitted to carry in New York.State police from the Poughkeepsie barracks charged Eugene W. Wolfe Jr., 43, of Crestwood, Kentucky with criminal possession of a firearm, a class E felony.Wolfe was operating a Dodge pickup truck towing a “loaded car trailer” as he entered the Taconic State Parkway at Bulls Head Road, according to police, and was stopped “in accordance with parkway rules and regulations.”During the interview with police, Wolfe told the officer there was a “Ruger LCP handgun” inside the vehicle. Although Wolfe is licensed to carry handguns in the state of Kentucky, he did not possess a permit to carry a handgun in the state of New York, police said.Wolfe was transported to the Poughkeepsie barracks where he was processed and released after posting $750 station bail. He is scheduled to appear in the Town of Stanford Court June 22.Abbott Brant: abrant@poughkeepsiejournal.com; 845-437-4809; Twitter: @AbbottBrantPoJoFiled under:Five men were shot late Monday in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side.The group was standing outside about 11:35 p.m. in the 3200 block of West Congress when shots rang out, according to Chicago Police.A 32-year-old man suffered multiple gunshot wounds and was taken in critical condition to Mount Sinai Hospital, police said. Another man, 28, was shot in the mouth and also taken to Sinai in good condition.A 33-year-old man was shot in the left foot: a 32-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the buttocks; and a 34-year-old man was shot in the left arm, police said. They were all taken to Stroger Hospital, where each man was listed in good condition.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Erica Rakow, ReporterErica Rakow, ReporterORLANDO, Fla.– Miguel Leiva didn't listen when gunman Omar Mateen told patrons huddled in a bathroom at Pulse Orlando nightclub to come out or else they'd die."Fifteen or 20 of us, maybe even 30 of us, stayed in the stall," the Miami man, who was in visiting his girlfriend in Orlando, said.They stayed there for about four hours."We just stayed quiet, and everybody's phone kept ringing," Leiva said. "The only way we knew to, like, let our families know, you know, we're OK, we're OK, was just to record it and let them hear that we're trying to be quiet and send the video."Leiva sent videos to his worried girlfriend, who got word of the shooting."She's asking me, 'Are all those people dead next to you?'" Leiva said. "There was one cup in the bathroom and we rinsed the cup, trying to give everybody a little bit of water."Leiva suffered two gunshot wounds in the Orlando nightclub massacre and got out of the bathroom when an officer dragged him out and the SWAT team moved in."We were just waving our hands so they can see that we're alive, but we were still trying to be quiet," Leiva said. "So, finally, they start pulling people out, and it was so bad, like, we had to step over bodies."Leiva said he can't stop thinking about the people who didn't make it out alive."Half of those people were in the bathroom with me," he said.AGoFundMe accounthas been established to help pay for Leiva's medical expenses.Copyright 2016 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.CHARLOTTE, NC (WBTV) - Two suspects, who are now dead, are accused in the 2016 killing of 20-year-old Adrian Potts in the University City area.Ferguson Laurent, 24 and Anthony Eugene Gill, 23, are accused in Potts death the night of June 11, 2016, at the 901 Place Apartments. Charlotte-Mecklenburg police made the announcement Friday.Police say Laurent was killed in Salisbury on Nov. 3, 2016, in an officer-involved shooting, and Gill was killed in Salisbury on July 29, 2017.The Salisbury Police Department released a statement Friday about the new information about Laurent.The shooting that killed Potts happened after a large crowd gathered inside one of the apartments. An altercation led to the shooting.Information and evidence developed during the investigation recently led to detectives confirming to Laurent and Gill as the suspects in the case, police say.Police say no one else is being sought in the case.Anyone with additional information is asked to call homicide detectives at 704-432-TIPS or Crime Stoppers at 704-334-1600.Copyright 2018 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.STOCKTON — One person was killed, at least three others were wounded and countless lives were endangered when gunfire erupted Saturday night at Oak Park in central Stockton.The shooting occurred about 8:15 p.m. on the north side of the park just west of Alvarado Avenue. Witnesses said 60 to 80 shots were fired when two groups of people exchanged gunfire.When the shooting stopped, one man lay dead between two vehicles parked next to the Oak Park Ice Arena. A friend of the victim’s family said he was a 30-year-old Cambodian man who was attending one of several parties that were being held at the park.A second male victim was taken away by ambulance. There was no immediate word on his condition.There were unconfirmed reports that a number of other gunshot victims were located in a sport utility vehicle that was stopped by police as it fled the scene.Witnesses said the shooting started with two short bursts of gunfire followed by a rapid and sustained exchange of gunfire. Some of the shooters continued to fire as they fled south through the park on foot.Randy Sadberry, 60, said he saw one of the gunmen fire eight to 12 rounds into a white vehicle from a distance of three to four feet. One of the groups then fled toward the bathrooms at the center of the park.“There were several parties out here, like baby’s birthday parties,” Sadberry said. “It was extremely dangerous. Everybody was getting down on the ground. This is insane.”David Aceves and about 30 other friends and family members were holding a party on the north side of the park to celebrate his nephew’s baptism.“It sounded like nonstop shooting for at least three minutes,” he said, estimating that there were more than 100 people in the park at the time. “I’m on that side of the park and I’m hearing shots ricochet off the walls. I could hear bullets zooming by.”As darkness set in, police were finding shell casings throughout the park. At one point, two officers drew their weapons and entered the bathrooms in search of suspects.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”— Contact reporter Jason Anderson at (209) 546-8279 or janderson@recordnet.com. Follow him at recordnet.com/crimeblog and on Twitter @Stockton911.STOCKTON — One person was killed, at least three others were wounded and countless lives were endangered when gunfire erupted Saturday night at Oak Park in central Stockton.The shooting occurred about 8:15 p.m. on the north side of the park just west of Alvarado Avenue. Witnesses said 60 to 80 shots were fired when two groups of people exchanged gunfire.When the shooting stopped, one man lay dead between two vehicles parked next to the Oak Park Ice Arena. A friend of the victim’s family said he was a 30-year-old Cambodian man who was attending one of several parties that were being held at the park.A second male victim was taken away by ambulance. There was no immediate word on his condition.There were unconfirmed reports that a number of other gunshot victims were located in a sport utility vehicle that was stopped by police as it fled the scene.Witnesses said the shooting started with two short bursts of gunfire followed by a rapid and sustained exchange of gunfire. Some of the shooters continued to fire as they fled south through the park on foot.Randy Sadberry, 60, said he saw one of the gunmen fire eight to 12 rounds into a white vehicle from a distance of three to four feet. One of the groups then fled toward the bathrooms at the center of the park.“There were several parties out here, like baby’s birthday parties,” Sadberry said. “It was extremely dangerous. Everybody was getting down on the ground. This is insane.”David Aceves and about 30 other friends and family members were holding a party on the north side of the park to celebrate his nephew’s baptism.“It sounded like nonstop shooting for at least three minutes,” he said, estimating that there were more than 100 people in the park at the time. “I’m on that side of the park and I’m hearing shots ricochet off the walls. I could hear bullets zooming by.”As darkness set in, police were finding shell casings throughout the park. At one point, two officers drew their weapons and entered the bathrooms in search of suspects.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”— Contact reporter Jason Anderson at (209) 546-8279 or janderson@recordnet.com. Follow him at recordnet.com/crimeblog and on Twitter @Stockton911.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordnet.com  ~ 530 East Market Street, Stockton, CA 95202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.WATCHVIDEOS3 killed, 2 injured in Panorama City murder-suicidemypanhandle.comThree people are arrested following a shooting in Okaloosa County.Mikeal Lamar Hohnson-Carter, 15, or Shalimar was arrested in DeKalb County, Georgia on June 9th. Details on his capture have not been released yet.Sean Lee Coy, 21, of Fort Walton Beach and Maleak Bradshaw, 17, were arrested by the OCSO on June 22nd.The three were wanted for attempted homicide in connection with a shooting that injured four people at a townhome complex on Landview Drive June 9th.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.PANAMA CITY, Fla. (WMBB) — As of 1:30 p.m. on Saturday, Gulf Power reported 7,989 customers are without power in Bay County.According to Gulf Power's website, they are aware of the power outages and are assigning specialists to the issues as soon as possible.PANAMA CITY BEACH, Fla. (WMBB) — Severe weather caused major damage in Bay County Saturday morning.A waterspout came on shore in Panama City Beach causing damage there. The roof of a Grease Pro in Lynn Haven collapsed. A home was damaged in Wewahitchka, trees are down in Clarksville and wind reports suggest that winds reached more than 70 miles per hour in some places. Trees and power lines were also down on Williams Road in Walton County.PANAMA CITY, Fla. (WMBB) -- A student at Deane Bozeman School was given the ultimate surprise on Friday: a car she had been desperately saving for.17-year-old Alyssa Morris is a junior at Deane Bozeman and has overcome multiple struggles in her life.A second suspect has been arrested in a daylight shooting last year at a busy District intersection that left four people wounded and prompted a public outcry.The shooting occurred about 4:30 p.m. June 8 at New York Avenue and North Capitol Street NW. It was in front of Big Ben Liquors on a corner that is passed daily by thousands of commuters.A police official described the corner last year as an open-air drug market.Of the four people hit, police said three were bystanders.Police said Sunday that Alan Maybin, 33, of Northwest Washington, was arrested on a warrant Friday by members of the Capital Area Regional Task Force. He was charged with assault with intent to kill, police said.Another suspect was arrested a week after the shooting, police said. They said he also was charged with assault with intent to kill, but police said he was suspected of helping the gunman, not of firing shots.Police have said the man whom the gunman was aiming at was struck several times. A week after the shooting, he remained in a hospital.The three bystanders suffered what were described as minor wounds to their arms and legs. They were released from hospitals within a few days of the shooting.City officials focused attention on the incident. Among those expressing concern were residents of the nearby Truxton Circle neighborhood. It is a place of rising property values, but one where both dilapidated and renovated structures exist.Both then-D.C. Police Chief Cathy L. Lanier and Mayor Muriel E. Bowser (D) announced the first arrest.Lanier called the shooting brazen, and Bowser asked the public to help find “the person we believe is responsible for actually firing the gun.”In an arrest warrant for the first suspect, police said private surveillance cameras showed a man parking in an alley near the corner where the shooting occurred.The surveillance footage showed another man getting out of the car and taking a gun from his waistband.After the shooting, police said, the man was shown returning to the car, which left the area swiftly.It was not clear how the police identified and found the man suspected of firing.Peter Hermann contributed to this report.Peter Hermann contributed to this report.Keeta Peete took the witness stand Friday in Suffolk Superior Court and faced the gang member who was convicted the day before of fatally shooting Peete’s 17-year-old brother outside the teen’s Dorchester high school.“You probably don’t remember me,” Peete told the defendant, Jaden Waiters, 21, before Waiters was sentenced to life in prison for the June 2016 slaying of Peete’s younger sibling, Raekwon Brown. “I used to buy you and ’Kwon ice cream out of the same ice cream truck.  . . . I still hold nothing against you.”Peete spoke during an emotional sentencing hearing for Waiters and two codefendants, Jonathan Aguasvivas, 25, and Benzy Bain, 26.AdvertisementOn Thursday, jurorsconvictedWaiters of first-degree murder and found Aguasvivas guilty of second-degree murder in Brown’s slaying. Bain was acquitted of murder but convicted of several lesser weapons charges. Waiters and Aguasvivas were also convicted on the weapons counts.Judge Jeffrey Locke on Friday sentenced Waiters to life in prison without the possibility of parole, the mandatory penalty for first-degree murder. He sentenced Aguasvivas to a life term with parole eligibility after 20 years. Bain received a 15-to-20-year prison sentence.Peete repeatedly said he held “nothing against” the defendants, whom prosecutors described as members of the H-Block gang targeting a rival when Waiters fired nine shots into a crowd of teens outside the Jeremiah E. Burke High School on the afternoon of June 8, 2016. Brown wasn’t the rival in question but was merely standing among students who had just exited the school after a fire alarm went off, prosecutors said.“I understand the way the streets move and the consequences,” Peete told the defendants. “Personally, I hold nothing against you.”Reading from a poem he wrote for his slain brother, Peete recalled Brown as a “high-spirited person” and “gentle teddy bear” who loved Arizona drinks, video games, chicken tenders, and “writing raps and creating music videos.”Advertisement“His smile is embedded in my mind,” Peete said, remembering Brown’s “positive, energetic, relaxing vibe.” When people ask where Brown’s final resting place is, Peete added, “Heaven is the only response that we should give.  . . . May my brother rest in peace.”Locke said from the bench that Peete’s words were “very powerful” after he concluded his statement.Prosecutors read a statement from Brown’s parents, Wanda and Damien Graddy.“This has been one big pill to swallow, and sometimes we don’t know how we will make it,” the grieving parents wrote. “We miss him so much.”They said their son enjoyed a variety of activities including fishing, basketball, cooking, and shopping. The Graddys also thanked law enforcement, Locke, and the jury for delivering “justice for our son.  . . . We love you, Raekwon.”Of the three defendants, only Bain chose to address the court before Locke handed down the sentences. Bain, a married father of two who previously served a 3 ½-year term for his second illegal gun possession offense, faced Brown’s family and said, “I’m sincerely sorry for your loss, and I mean that from the bottom of my heart.”As Bain spoke, a male relative of Brown’s walked out in disgust, with a court officer shielding him from the defense table.“I’m not a bad person,” Bain continued, insisting he has a “good heart. . . . I hope that you can see that in me.” He said he was praying “for Mrs. Brown’s forgiveness” and concluded his remarks by telling the family, “I hope Raekwon can finally rest in peace.”AdvertisementAt trial, prosecutors said the defendants were traveling in a van driven by Aguasvivas on the day of the murder when they spotted a teen who they thought was affiliated with a rival gang outside the school.Waiters got out of the van and fired nine shots into the crowd, killing Brown and wounding two other teenagers, an attack committed at the behest of his older accomplices, prosecutors said.Though Aguasvivas currently has a chance at being released in two decades, that could change if he’s convicted in a second murder case that remains pending.He’s charged with first-degree murder in the February 2016 homicide of 22-year-old Marquis Waithe in Roxbury. He also faces separate gun charges related to the discovery of firearms at his home during the Brown investigation.When the defendants were led out of the courtroom Friday, one of Aguasvivas’s relatives said “We love you, Jonathan,” and a family member of Waiters shouted, “We love you, Jaden. God bless you. Stay strong. Keep your faith.”During the hearing, James Greenberg, a lawyer for Bain, told Locke the defendants “now have also lost their lives.”The judge corrected him.“They have lost their liberty,” Locke said. “There’s a big distinction between [that and] the loss of Raekwon Brown.”Travis Andersen can be reached attravis.andersen@globe.com.Digital AccessHome DeliveryGift SubscriptionsLog InManage My AccountCustomer ServiceHelp & FAQsGlobe NewsroomAdvertiseNewslettersView the ePaperOrder Back IssuesNews in EducationSearch the ArchivesPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceTerms of PurchaseWork at Boston Globe MediaMINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)— Authorities are looking for suspects after as many as four people were shot Sunday night in north Minneapolis.The Minneapolis Police Department was called at about 9:20 p.m. to the area 8th Ave. N. and Humboldt Avenue N. on a report of a fight. While responding to the call, the incident had elevated to a report of shots fired.When officers arrived, one woman had been shot and was injured. She was taken by ambulance to a hospital with non-life threatening injuries.Authorities say three other adults had also been shot and were self-transported to hospitals, all with non-life threatening injuries. Police say no arrests have been made in connection with the incident, which is under investigation.Four people were wounded during a wild shootout in Brooklyn Sunday afternoon — just hours after another man was struck by a stray bullet around the corner, police said.The four victims were shot when gunfire broke out on Mermaid Ave. and W. 15th St. in Coney Island at about 2:20 p.m., authorities said.Witnesses said it appeared the suspects pulled up in a car, got out and opened fire."It was mayhem," said the 25-year-old man who watched the incident from his third-floor apartment window."They were young guys, in their 20s. One of the guys was running from Mermaid to Neptune (Ave.) yelling, 'I got hit! I got hit!' He lifted his shirt and was bleeding from the stomach," said the witness, who declined to give his name for fear of future reprisals.That witness' mother said the crack of gunshots began after a vehicle pulled up to the corner."There was a car, then suddenly shots out of nowhere," said the 60-year-old woman who also declined to give her name."My brain is in shock," she said.She added that a group of children had been playing in the area just minutes before the attack.Batik Mahmood, 26, was delivering pizza when he saw about six men feuding on the corner outside S&M Mini Market. When the shooting began, Mahmood said half the group sought cover behind a Grey Nissan SUV and traded volleys."They were just shooting at each other... Two group of guys, shooting at each other," Mahmood said."Some of the guys were behind the car. Others went into the deli. Others ran toward Neptune. It was crazy," he said. "Never seen nothing like it."Emergency responders rushed two people to Lutheran Medical Center while the other two victims walked into Coney Island Hospital, police said. All four — two 21-year-olds, a 26- and 31-year-old — were listed in stable condition.Police later discovered a silver and black handgun dumped under an Infiniti parked nearby on W. 16th St.Two men were taken into custody for questioning at the scene, according to NYPD Deputy Inspector William Taylor. There had been no arrests, Taylor added.Earlier Sunday, a 38-year-old innocent bystander was shot in his back just down the street on Neptune Ave. and W. 16th St. around 4:35 a.m., police said.The 60-year-old witness said she heard the crack of that gunshot as well."I heard another shooting at around 4:30 a.m. I can't believe we had two shootings in the same day," she said.Investigators said a dispute between a man and woman sparked the morning incident.Sandra De Jesus, 65, who lives nearby, said she was woken up when the innocent man began banging on her door for help."The guy knocked on my door, the guy that was shot. He knocked on my door here and I figured, 'Who the hell is knocking at my door at this time?'" she said."I didn't open the door. Hell no. I looked out into the shade and he was gone."About 10 hours later, she was shaken again when the second round of gunshots erupted."I said, get out of here. Run. I ran into the living room. We just closed all the windows."The recovered handgun was left just few feet from her home.It was not clear what spurred the latest gun violence or if the two incidents were connected.Just after midnight, in one of the last shootings of the Memorial Day weekend, two people pulled out guns and started firing in East Garfield Park.The first call to police early Tuesday was for one person shot on Homan Avenue. Then a second victim. Then a third. Then someone walked into a hospital a few minutes later.In all, 27 of the 69 people hit by gunfire over the weekend were shot in or near the Harrison District, one of the city's most violent and one of the most heavily patrolled by police.So many people were shot there that Deputy Superintendent John Escalante promised Sunday to beef up patrols.  Nine more people were shot there by early Tuesday.The rest of the weekend shootings were scattered across Chicago.  They happened as far north as West Rogers Park and northwest as Jefferson Park and as far south as the West Pullman neighborhood.  The violence centered on the West Side, though. Seven of the shooting incidents on the West Side had more than one victim.While the number of shootings was up from last year, the number of deaths was down. Last year, 12 people were killed and 44 wounded over the holiday weekend. This weekend, 13 more people were shot, but six fewer people were killed.There were no shooting deaths for more than 48 hours starting late Saturday afternoon through late Monday.The breakdown from the weekend is: Three people killed and 12 people wounded Friday afternoon through early Saturday; one person killed and 24 people wounded Saturday evening through early Sunday; 13 people wounded Sunday afternoon through early Monday; and 16 people shot Monday into early Tuesday, two of them fatally.The holiday weekend was police Superintendent Eddie Johnson's first since Mayor Rahm Emanuel picked the veteran cop to lead the embattled department in late March. The department sought volunteers to work overtime over the weekend, although police spokesman Anthony Guglielmi did not release figures on how many officers worked.  Instead of hiring more cops during a city budget crunch, Emanuel instead has relied heavily on overtime to try to tamp down violence.The weekend shooting scenes played out from a gas station in Dunning on the Northwest Side to a narrow tree-lined street in the South Side's West Pullman neighborhood. Residents and passersby at times grabbed towels and ice packs to aid the wounded. Others tried to figure out if the victims were friends or loved ones.Left mourning were family members, including those of Veronica Lopez. The 15-year-old was the youngest of the homicide victims, shot as she rode with two older men police identified as known gang members along Lake Shore Drive near Fullerton Avenue about 1:30 a.m. Saturday. One of the men also was hit but survived.That afternoon, her mother, Diana Mercado, wept outside her family's home above a storefront in the Belmont Craigan neighborhood. She said she had begun planning to move with Veronica to Florida in a year because of the city's violence."Now they took my baby," she said.Later that day, in the Lawndale neighborhood, the mother of another teen, Shequita Evans, walked up to a scene of a woman who was shot in the neck while driving down Lexington Avenue near Pulaski Road. Evans lamented that she had to get through "one more summer" until her 17-year-old could graduate high school and attend college outside the city.At another scene in the Back of the Yards, a woman had to explain to a small boy how the loud pops they had heard weren't fireworks from the White Sox game. The boy smoothed the cape of a Superman doll as he asked officers if they had gotten the bad guys.In addition to Veronica, the homicides included:• Mark Lindsey, 25, shot while sitting in a parked car in front of his mother's house in the 3700 block of West 75th Place in the Ashburn neighborhood around 11:20 p.m. Friday.• Garvin Whitmore, 27, shot in the head about 5:20 p.m. Saturday in the South Side's Fuller Park neighborhood. He was sitting in a car with his fiancee, Ashley Harrison, 26, who picked up a gun and fired warning shots in the air. She was charged with a felony.• Damien Cionzynski, 25, was shot by one of two men with whom he was arguing inside a BP gas station at Narragansett and Montrose avenues around 5:15 a.m. Saturday. Police have issued arrest warrants for two men.• James Taylor, 44, was shot in the 5100 block of South Calumet Avenue.  Taylor, of the 6500 block of South Ellis Avenue, was pronounced dead at 11:20 p.m. Monday at the scene, according to the Cook County medical examiner's office. He died from multiple gunshot wounds, the office determined following an autopsy Tuesday. Police were called to the scene and found Taylor unresponsive on the street, near a vehicle, said Officer Thomas Sweeney, a police spokesman.• Johan Jean, 39, was shot in the 6400 block of North Rockwell Street. Jean, of the 100 block of Ashland Avenue in Evanston, was pronounced dead at 11:44 p.m. at St. Francis Hospital, according to the medical examiner's office. He died from a gunshot wound to the neck, the office determined following an autopsy Tuesday. Jean was discovered unresponsive in a gangway, and police said he may have died in a domestic incident.The tally doesn't count a woman run over on Lake Shore Drive early Sunday. Her boyfriend, who also was hit in traffic, told police they were fleeing a group of armed robbers, and detectives have located evidence of a group of men in the area.By Tuesday morning, the tally of those shot in Chicago this year was around 1,500, according to data compiled by the Tribune, with at least 250 killed. By this time last year, 957 had been shot, with 164 killed.So far, shootings are up more than 50 percent this year, although the pace of increased violence had slowed from earlier this year, when Chicago was on track to see shooting victims nearly double.Chicago police have said the violence has been fueled by gang conflicts and a proliferation of guns, mixed with weak gun law enforcement. The department has blamed most of the violence on a core group of about 1,300 people whom they have used data analytics to pinpoint. The department has called them "strategic subjects."It can be tougher to pinpoint exactly when that violence can explode, with spikes that can spring up on any warm weekend. Over Mother's Day weekend, more than 50 people were shot, eight fatally, in the most violent weekend in Chicago since September.The 60 homicides this month have outpaced those in each of the previous three years in Chicago, according to Tribune data. By May 30, 2015, there had been 45 homicides, with 41 by the same date in 2014 and 47 in 2013.Following are the other shootings from the last 15 hours of the holiday weekend:• A 30-year-old man was injured about 1:45 a.m. Tuesday in the 10200 block of South LaSalle Street in the Fernwood neighborhood. He was taken in in stable condition to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, police said. He had been shot in the shoulder.• A 17-year-old girl and 21-year-old man standing in the 2600 block of East 73rd Street were shot about 12:50 a.m. Paramedics brought the girl to Northwestern Memorial Hospital with a back wound, and the man walked in for treatment. The girl's condition was stabilized, and the man is in good condition.• Four people were shot when two people opened fire on a group in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side. It happened about 12:20 a.m. in the 3300 block of West Huron Street, a block east of Homan Avenue. A 53-year-old was taken to Norwegian American Hospital with a foot wound, and police believe he was not the intended target. An 18-year-old woman, a 19-year-old woman and a 30-year-old man were treated at Mount Sinai Hospital for leg wounds. The 30-year-old has a history of drug-related arrests and is a documented gang member, police said.• A 24-year-old man was shot in the right arm and left leg about 9:30 p.m. Monday in the Grand Crossing neighborhood, police said. The attack happened in the 1500 block of East 73rd Street. The man was wounded in a drive-by and taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition was stabilized.• A 17-year-old boy was shot in the 3600 block of West 30th Street in the Little Village neighborhood about 5:25 p.m., police said. The boy was shot in the hand by a known male attacker who fired from across the street, police said. The boy was taken to St. Anthony Hospital in good condition.• Someone shot a 16-year-old boy in the 8700 block of South Escanaba Avenue in the South Chicago neighborhood. He was wounded about 4:55 p.m. and taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where his condition was stabilized. He was outside when someone emerged from a gangway and shot him in the leg.• About 3:55 p.m., a 15-year-old boy was shot in the city's Englewood neighborhood on the South Side. That shooting happened in the 6700 block of South Sangamon Street, said Officer Kevin Quaid, a police spokesman. The boy was outside when he heard shots and felt pain, according to preliminary information. He was taken with a gunshot wound to the back to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where his condition was stabilized, Quaid said.• Someone shot two men about 10:45 a.m. in the 3800 block of West Gladys Avenue, said Officer Bari Lemmon, a police spokeswoman. According to preliminary reports, someone in a black Nissan fired at two men, ages 28 and 21. The older man suffered a wound to his lower back and was taken in serious condition to Stroger Hospital. The younger man was shot in the left elbow and was taken to Mount Sinai, where his condition was stabilized, Lemmon said.• Someone shot a 17-year-old boy about 10:35 a.m. in the 4800 block of West Monroe Street. Reports indicated the boy was outside when a black SUV drove by and someone fired shots, striking him twice in the hip, Lemmon said. The boy was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was listed in fair condition.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribunePolice on Tuesday identified a man arrested Monday night when he returned with a gun to the scene of a five-person shooting at a Memorial Day cookout in North Baltimore.Taiquan Moss, 20, was one of five victims of the Monday afternoon shooting in Wilson Park. He was spotted on the block of the shooting by police around 7:45 p.m. with a gun. Police were in the area to gain information on the shooting when they picked up Moss, and charged him with various handgun violations.The shooting occurred in front of a two-story rowhouse on the 500 block of 43rd St. where a car approached the house and opened fire, police said. Five people, including Moss, were shot, and police have yet to announce a suspect or suspects for the shooting.Moss and a 25-year-old were both shot in the arm, a 59-year-old man was shot in the buttocks and his 60-year-old wife was shot in the face, police said. None of the injuries appeared to be life-threatening, according to police.The street of the shooting borders two neighborhoods, Wilson Park and Pen Lucy. It was the first shooting this year in Wilson Park. There have been three in Pen Lucy, according to police data through May 21. One of the shootings was a homicide.Moss, of the 800 block of Cator Avenue in Pen Lucy, was carrying a loaded .38 caliber revolver in his waistband, according to a police report. He will face a court commissioner for the gun charges, police said.adunn@baltsun.comtwitter.com/AndrewE_DunnRecommendedTwo men were convicted of multiple charges this week in connection with a shooting that injured four people last year in downtown Las Vegas.Two men were convicted of multiple charges this week in connection with a shootingthat injured four people last year in downtown Las Vegas.Steven Demond Burks, 21, was found guilty Thursday of five counts of attempted murder, four counts of battery with a deadly weapon, one count of assault with a deadly weapon and six counts of discharging a firearm from a vehicle.Pierre Terrell Devlin, 33, was found guilty of four counts of battery with a deadly weapon, one count of assault with a deadly weapon and six counts of discharging a firearm from a vehicle.Officers found four people — two men and two women — suffering from gunshot wounds on the morning of May 29 in the 200 block of Third Street, police said. Prosecutors said one man was shot at but was not hit by a bullet. All of the victims survived.Police said at the time that as the group walked past Devlin and Burks, the two groups exchanged words. Devlin fired a shot near the crowd, which was captured on surveillance video. Later, Devlin and Burks entered a white Lexus sedan with dark tint and a sunroof parked nearby with a handgun.Burks then fired at the victims, striking them, police said.After a weeklong trial, jurors deliberated for more than three days on the 16 counts each against Burks and Devlin. The jury could not reach a decision on five counts of attempted murder for Devlin, and prosecutors said they had not decided whether he would be retried on those charges.Liz Mercer said she and fellow prosecutor Tierra Jones were “pleased and grateful for the jurors’ thorough deliberations.”Defense attorney Bret Whipple, who represents Devlin, said he was “happy that the jurors would take so long to deliberate and see the evidence from both sides.”Ben Nadig, who represents Burks, said the jury took the “appropriate time to consider the outcome.”Both men are scheduled to be sentenced next month.Contact David Ferrara at dferrara@reviewjournal.com or 702-380-1039. Follow@randompokeron Twitter.Nevada’s attorney general and lieutenant governor want to end the death penalty, but Clark County’s district attorney is pushing for the state’s first execution since 2006.O.J. Simpson and a Las Vegas hotel-casino have settled a lawsuit alleging that unnamed employees defamed Simpson by telling a celebrity news site he had been banned from the property.A California attorney wants an appeals court to reconsider her request to throw out a Steve Wynn defamation lawsuit.An appellate court has sided with Steve Wynn in his defamation lawsuit against attorney Lisa Bloom and her law firm in a legal battle over a press release about allegations against the former casino mogul.Oral arguments are expected Wednesday in front of the Supreme Court, where lawyers representing Stavros Anthony and Ross Miller will appear before the justices.The latest Nevada lawsuit fits a pattern of sexual harassment allegations that have surfaced in recent years against the well-known sports entertainment company.A federal grand jury in Las Vegas has charged a health care staffing company and a former manager with engaging in a conspiracy to fix school nurses’ wages.Clark County prosecutors plan to seek a warrant of execution for death row inmate Zane Floyd as Nevada legislators weigh the future of capital punishment in the state.Chandra Bridges, 26, has been indicted on a charge of lying to a firearms dealer in what authorities said was a “straw purchase” of a handgun.Timeline of major developments in the Food and Drug Administration’s investigation of Las Vegas-based Real Water.Copyright ©2019Las Vegas Review-Journal, Inc.|Privacy Policy|Terms of ServicePowered byWordPress.com VIPsublog@penny_ray on TwitterFile photo - Police investigate a shooting in Trenton (Gregg Slaboda - Trentonian)TRENTON >> City police are investigating two shootings that happened within an hour of each other Sunday morning and left a total of eight people suffering from gunshot wounds.The first shooting happened around 12:30 a.m. in the 600 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. When police arrived on-scene, they learned that six victims had been taken to the hospital in personal vehicles.Witnesses told police they were attending a cookout in the area when they suddenly heard multiple gunshots. A 29-year-old male was shot in his right leg; another 29-year-old male was shot in the right leg and buttocks; a 26-year-old male suffered gunshot wounds to his right and left thighs; a 40-year-old male was shot in the right leg; a 28-year-old male suffered a gunshot wound to his right hand; and a 28-year-old man was shot in his abdomen and left leg.The male who was shot in the abdomen underwent emergency surgery, and all victims are expected to survive, according to police.The second shooting happened in the 200 block of Spring Street around 1:11 a.m. Sunday. When police arrived at the scene, they found a 23-year-old female victim suffering from a gunshot wound to her right leg. A 31-year-old male victim who suffered a gunshot wound to the middle toe on his left foot was taken to the hospital by private vehicle.The victims told police they were on Spring Street when a vehicle drove by and someone inside of it fired several shots. Both victims are expected to survive their injuries.Anyone with information about the shootings is asked to call police at 609-989-4155, or contact the Trenton Police confidential tip line at (609) 989-3663. Individuals may also call the Trenton Crime Stoppers tip line at (609) 278-8477. Those wishing to text a tip can send a message labeled TCSTIPS to Trenton Crime Stoppers at 274637.@penny_ray on TwitterPenny Ray is an award-winning journalist with more than 17 years experience in print, digital and broadcast media. Prior to working in New Jersey, he served as editor of Homicide Watch D.C.Three men were arrested in connection with a shooting early Sunday at a Downtown parking garage that hospitalized four people, police said.Around 3 a.m. police working in the area around South Meridian and Georgia streets heard gunshots coming from a parking garage in the 300 block of South Meridian Street.Police found two people in the garage that had been shot: Shaquille Ford, 22, and Demetrius Ford, 21. Two more people were found shot in a nearly alley, identified by police as Marc Spivey, 29, and Breon Sims, 23.All four people were taken to the hospital, police said. Their conditions were not immediately available.Police stopped a vehicle believed to be used by the shooting suspects and took six people into custody. Police said they recovered guns and ammunition from the truck. Three were identified as suspects and face preliminary charges of attempted murder: Delon Owens, 21; Dametrous Brooks, 23; and Rico Brown, 25, all of Indianapolis.The other three people who were inside the vehicle were released, police said.Call IndyStar reporter Justin L. Mack at (317) 444-6138. Follow him on Twitter:@justinlmack.HOUSTON — Houston Police released new details about Sunday's mass shooting in west Houstonduring a press conference Tuesday.According to investigators, the suspect, Army veteran Dionisio Garza III, fired 212 rounds during the rampage that left two dead and six wounded in a neighborhood off Memorial Drive.Police say that Garza came to Texas from California and arrived on Saturday to see some friends. They believe that the shooting location was random.Friends said Garza served in the Army in Afghanistan and had suffered PTSD.Police said they believe Garza broke in to Memorial Drive Tire & Auto and stayed there the day before the shooting. Police said he intentionally turned off his phone and "went off the grid" at 4 p.m. Saturday.Houston shooter was Army vet, police sayPolice said Garza came out of the tire shop and confronted customer Eugene Linsomb and shot him. Linscomb died at the scene. The suspect then retrieved an AR-15 and shot at passing cars and police vehicles. He struck a line to a gas station, which then caught fire, police said."We believe his military training and his location, he felt safe there," said Lt. John McGalin. "Had access to three corners. Didn't have to worry about anyone coming up behind him. There just seems to be no rhyme or reason to why he picked that location."John Wilson, who was initially believed to be a second shooter, was a resident in the area and came out to offer assistance. He was outgunned by the suspect and was shot in the leg. He is expected to survive.Eight people were shot, including the gunman. An HPD sniper fired four rounds, including the shot that killed Garza."At the scene, we found some random writings on the walls (Garza) wrote on paper, nothing of consequence, doesn't appear to be terrorism, just appears to be someone who was in mental health crisis at this time," said McGalin.Garza's stepmother, Cathy Garza, spoke to KHOU-TV by phone. She said the family is devastated by what happened."They're taught to be tough and to not be weak," said Garza. "From the outside, it seemed like he was doing OK, but I think on the inside, he was just slowly crumbling, and it got to the point where he just wasn't making sense. He was kind. He had friends. He got along well with others. He was a great kid. Our hearts just go out to the families. We feel for them. It's not, it just wasn't him that day. He was not that person."HPD Interim Chief Martha Montalvo thanked residents who opened their doors to strangers fleeing the shooting and said that the death toll could have been higher. Residents saw the shooter from their homes and alerted police.HPD urged the public to remain vigilant for former military members that may need help when they return home.Follow KHOU on Twitter: @KHOUFive people were shot at a home in Newark, and two of them have life-threatening injuries, according to police.Shots rang out at the Isabella Avenue home at 7:30 p.m. on Monday.Five people were hit by bullets, police said. Three of them were found inside the home and two of them walked into University Hospital, which is about two miles to the east of the home.Two of the people shot were in critical condition Monday night. The other three people have non-life-threatening injuries.Police said that detectives found four guns and a large amount of marijuana inside the house.An investigation was still underway well after sunset on Monday, with numerous police seen up and down Isabella Avenue.No arrests have been reported.Four people were shot in Hollygrove at Apple and Monroe streets on Sunday night (May 22),New Orleans policesaid about 10 p.m.Around 9:49 p.m., a white vehicle drove up to that intersection and opened fire on several victims who were outside of a lounge at the location, NOPD spokesman Juan Barnes said. Four people -- a 48-year-old woman and three men ages 26, 33 and unknown -- were struck by the gunfire. One man received multiple gun shot wounds, and Barnes said two other men were each shot once. The NOPD said one woman was shot in the leg.Evelynn Cain said she was inside the bar, the E&C VIP Lounge, when somebody drove by and fired what sounded like 20 shots. Her boyfriend was among those injured and rushed to the hospital, she said."A random person rolled up and started shooting," she said, "Who they were shooting for, I don't know."As of about 10:30 p.m., people were gathered waiting to retrieve their cars that were blocked in within the crime scene.Residents living next door to the bar said they multiple shots as well. A female resident who asked not to be identified saw three of the victims after the shooting. She said the female victim was lying against a storm drain across the street from the bar after the shooting.She also said one of the male victims was slumped against the bar's wall beneath a sign labeled "Home of the New Orleans Men Buckjumpers." The third victim was found in the grass across from the bar, she said."Everyone was having a good time," Cain said, as she watched police at the scene.Check back withNOLA.com| The Times-Picayune for more details.This story was updated Monday morning to include victim ages.Anyone with information about this shooting is asked to call Crimestoppers at 504.822.1111 or toll-free at 877.903.7867.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?STOCKTON – One person was killed and three others were wounded in a shooting during the overnight hours in central Stockton.Police were dispatched on a report of a person shot at 1:50 a.m. near East Poplar and North Sutter streets. They arrived to find a male victim lying on the sidewalk with at least one gunshot wound, officers said.Attempts to revive the victim were unsuccessful, authorities said. The San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office has not released his name. His death represents the 18th homicide Stockton police have investigated in 2016, up from nine at this time a year ago.A short time later, two men and a juvenile male arrived at a local hospital with gunshot wounds, police said. All three were listed in stable condition.Homicide detectives were called to the scene to take over the investigation. Police have not divulged a motive for the shooting and have not released any suspect information.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Come back to recordnet.com and read Sunday’s Record for more on this story.STOCKTON – One person was killed and three others were wounded in a shooting during the overnight hours in central Stockton.Police were dispatched on a report of a person shot at 1:50 a.m. near East Poplar and North Sutter streets. They arrived to find a male victim lying on the sidewalk with at least one gunshot wound, officers said.Attempts to revive the victim were unsuccessful, authorities said. The San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office has not released his name. His death represents the 18th homicide Stockton police have investigated in 2016, up from nine at this time a year ago.A short time later, two men and a juvenile male arrived at a local hospital with gunshot wounds, police said. All three were listed in stable condition.Homicide detectives were called to the scene to take over the investigation. Police have not divulged a motive for the shooting and have not released any suspect information.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Come back to recordnet.com and read Sunday’s Record for more on this story.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordnet.com  ~ 530 East Market Street, Stockton, CA 95202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.WKRN News 2by:Sarah DensonNASHVILLE, Tenn. (WKRN) – Metro police said a womanshot last Sunday nightin a drive-by shooting may have been specifically targeted in an act of retaliation.Dameisha Clark, 20, is wanted on charges of criminal homicide in the May 14 shooting death of 21-year-old Johnny Broadnax.Broadnax was found lying in the grass near an SUV that had crashed into the Hickory Manor Apartments on Hamilton Church Road in Antioch.He was transported to Vanderbilt University Medical Center where he died.MORE:Man dies after shooting, car crash in AntiochPolice say their investigation found Clark contacted Broadnax to arrange a drug deal and was behind the wheel of a stolen Dodge Charger from which shots were fired that night.Clark is thought to have been in the Charger with at least one other person, according to officials.A little over a week later,Clark was one of four injured in a drive-by shootingnear the Nashville Speedway in South Nashville-and now police believe she was targeted.Metro-Nashville police said she was in the front passenger seat of a Nissan Sentra when two people inside a small black sedan with custom wheels opened fire.Clark and the driver, Kayla Blakely, received non-critical wounds. Both were treated at the hospital and release.MORE:4 injured in drive-by shooting South NashvilleThe two rear seat passengers, Michael Myers Jr., 25, and Michael Shaw, 32, were more seriously hurt. Myers was released from the hospital last Monday. Shaw was released Thursday.Blakely, Myers and Shaw are not suspected of being involved in the Broadnax homicide.Anyone seeing Dameisha Clark or knowing her whereabouts is asked to contact Crime Stoppers at615-742-7463.Callers to Crime Stoppers can remain anonymous and qualify for a cash reward.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY/AP) — A second lieutenant in the U.S. Army is suing two Town of Windsor police officers over a traffic stop during which the officers drew their guns, pointed them at him and used a slang term to suggest he was facing execution.Body camera footage shows 2nd Lt. Caron Nazario had his hands held in the air outside the driver’s side window as he told the armed officers, “I’m honestly afraid to get out.” One of the officers told Nazario, “Yeah, you should be!”NASHVILLE, Tenn. (WKRN) - Hundreds of juveniles are being charged for stealing cars and having guns in Metro Nashville every year, despite a downward trend of youth committing serious crimes over the past several years.According to the Davidson County Juvenile Court, theft of vehicle charges remain concerning.There were 268 in 2018, the same number in 2019, and 244 in 2020. Handgun possession charges among juveniles in Nashville remained above 200 for the years 2018, 2019, and 2020.Mt. Juliet, Tenn. (WKRN) - A horrifying crime in Mt. Juliet has led police to link one man to crimes in 3 other states, now police tell News 2, the same man is linked to other disturbing cases in a total of 6 different states."Where is he tonight? Where is he tomorrow? Where is he this weekend? He could be committing a crime and abusing women like he's been," said Captain Tyler Chandler, with the Mt. Juliet Police.Four people were wounded late Wednesday night in a shooting near the intersection of 34th Street and North Keystone Avenue, police said.Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department officers were called to the intersection of 34th Street and North Keystone Avenue about 10:30 p.m. on a report of a person shot. At the scene, police found a man with a gunshot wound to the belly.Officers were then told there were two more victims, who had been shot in the leg, in the 3400 block of Hillside Avenue. All three victims were taken to Eskenazi Hospital and, as of early Thursday morning, listed in stable condition, police said.A fourth victim showed up at IU Methodist Hospital shortly after the shooting with a gunshot wound to the hand.One of the victims was found near a memorial for Jokoby Scott, who wasfatally shot Sunday afternoon. A suspect in that shooting was arrested after a high-speed chase.Call IndyStar reporter Michael Anthony Adams at (317) 444-6123. Follow him on Twitter:@michaeladams317.EVANSVILLE, IN (WFIE) - Four people were sent to the hospital with gunshot wounds early Sunday morning.At 2:39 a.m. this morning, multiple gunshots were reported at Mann's Bar in the 400 block of North Garvin Street.According to the police report, while officers were in rout to the location, reports of fighting and shots being fired into the crowd, were coming in.During the securing of the scene outside the bar, numerous empty shell casings were discovered according to police. It was around the same time that people began showing up at Deaconess Hospital with gunshot wounds, according to the report.Two of the people that were shot were taken into surgery immediately. The other two were receiving treatment in the ER.Police say the events leading up to, and the cause of the shooting have yet to be determined.There are no known suspects currently. The investigation is still on going at this time.Detectives are asking for witnesses and anyone with knowledge of this crime to please the Evansville Police Department at (812) 436-7979.14 News will continue to keep you updated with new information as it becomes available.Follow us online at14NEWS.comandon Twitter. Text NEWSAPP to 51414 orclick hereto download our 14 News mobile app to get the latest headlines from around the Tri-State.Copyright 2016WFIE. All rights reserved.1115 Mt. Auburn RoadEvansville, IN 47720(812) 426-1414A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Sedrick Norris was convicted of killing his longtime girlfriend and wounding four of his eight children in 2016 (JCSO)A Birmingham man was ordered to spend the rest of his life in prison after being convicted of killing his girlfriend and shooting several of his children.Sedrick Letzie Norris, 39, was convicted after atrial inAugust on two counts of capital murder--the charges made capital because the victim had a protection order against Norris and because the crime was committed during the course of a burglary--and four counts of attempted murder for a 2016 shooting that killed Coral Anita Wilson and injured four of Wilson and Norris’ young children.Jefferson County Circuit Judge Laura Petro sentenced Norris last week to a term of life in prison, without the possibility of parole. Court records show Norris was not eligible for the death penalty under theAtkinsU.S. Supreme Court ruling that states execution is not an option for people with intellectual disabilities.Birmingham police responded to the 1400 block of 21st Street North on the evening ofMay 11, 2016after receiving several calls about gunshots in the area. Wilson was found dead on her living room floor, and thefour wounded childrenwere found outside and at a neighbor’s apartment.The couplehad eight children together--three others at the house weren’t hurt, and one wasn’t home.Deputy District Attorney Neal Zarzour saidduring the trialthat on the night of the shooting, Norris grabbed an AK-47 he kept in the closet at Wilson’s house and shot her in the neck while she held their infant son. He also shot and injured four of his children--5, 8, 11 and 12. The four children not wounded are ages 13, 9, 6 and 8 months. Norris’ attorney Michael Blalock said Norris “snapped” when he shot Wilson and the children because he saw Wilson in bed with another woman.After the verdict, Blalock said he disagreed. "I disagree with the verdict but I understand the jury returning that based on the facts presented to them," Blalock said. "I'm disappointed they couldn't hear about [Norris'] diminished capacity.... They had no information on his intellectual state."While jurors knew Norris was ineligible for the death penalty, they weren't informed of theAtkinsrule. Under Alabama law, a defendant can't put on a diminished capacity defense where he or she claims they lacked the required intent because of a mental impairment, such as a learning disability. This is different than an insanity defense.Zarzour said he and DDA Joe Roberts, who also prosecuted the case, appreciated the jury’s work. “They had to deal with some disturbing, emotional evidence in order to reach their decision. Even for those of us who handle violent cases on daily basis, crimes involving young children are uniquely challenging. We are pleased that Mr. Norris has been held accountable for his actions and that Coral Wilson and her children received the justice they deserve.”Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Four people were killed and at least 16 others wounded in shootings across Chicago on Wednesday.Two women and a man were killed in a domestic-related shooting Wednesday night in the South Side Englewood neighborhood.Fifty-year-old Jerome T. Wright; and two 26-year-old women, Makeesha Starks and Kiara Kinard, were in a home in the 1500 block of West 71st Street at 11:20 p.m. when a man they knew approached and started shooting, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Wright, of the 1500 block of West 74th Street; and Starks, who lived on the block where the shooting happened, were both shot in the head and pronounced dead at the scene, authorities said.Kinard, of the 7700 block of South Seeley, was shot in the back and was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where she died at 2:37 a.m., authorities said.A suspect in the triple homicide remained barricaded in a home in the Fernwood neighborhood at 104th and Union as of Thursday afternoon. Police initially responded to the home about 4:15 a.m.Wednesday’s first shooting left a former Cook County correctional officer dead shortly after midnight in the Greater Grand Crossing neighborhood on the South Side.Ira Cotton, 56, was standing on a front porch in the 7400 block of South Ingleside about 12:10 a.m. when someone walked up to him and demanded his car keys before shooting him in the left leg, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County sheriff’s office.Cotton, who worked as a correctional officer from 1983-2004, was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he was later pronounced dead, authorities said.“Officer Cotton gave 20 years of his life to serving his community and making Cook County a safer place,” the sheriff’s office said in a statement. “Sheriff Dart joins his friends, family and former Cook County Jail colleagues in mourning his tragic death.”The latest nonfatal shooting happened in the West Pullman neighborhood on the Far South Side.A 25-year-old man was driving near 129th and Lowe at 10:35 p.m. when someone exited an alley and shot at him, according to police. He was shot in the leg and was taken to MetroSouth Medical Center in Blue Island, where his condition was stabilized.About two hours earlier, a 15-year-old boy was shot in the leg in the West Side Austin neighborhood. The boy was shot in the 1300 block of North Parkside during a drive-by attack, police said. He was taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition.Twenty minutes earlier, five people were wounded in a Park Manor neighborhood shooting.The five—a woman and four men—were outside in the first block of East 71st Street shortly after 8 p.m. when several people walked up and opened fire, police said.A 27-year-old man was shot in the left thigh and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, along with a 20-year-old man shot in the arm and back, according to police and fire officials. A 32-year-old woman shot in the head and a 20-year-old man shot in the chest were taken to Stroger Hospital.All four were in serious-to-critical condition, fire officials said.Police said a fifth victim, a 26-year-old man, took himself to St. Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center, where his condition had stabilized.Earlier in the evening, a 17-year-old boy was shot in the leg in the Chicago Lawn neighborhood on the Southwest Side. It happened about 6:40 p.m. in the 2500 block of West 63rd Street, and his condition was stabilized at Christ Medical Center. He wasn’t cooperative with investigators, police said.Another Southwest Side shooting minutes earlier left a 24-year-old man wounded. He took himself to Mount Sinai Hospital after being shot in the side of the head about 6:30 p.m. in the 5700 block of South Kedzie, police said. His condition stabilized.Wednesday afternoon, a man in his 20s was shot in the Humboldt Park neighborhood on the West Side. He suffered a leg wound about 2:15 p.m. in the 700 block of North Trumbull and was treated at the scene, police said. He was listed in good condition.About the same time, two people were shot on the Near West Side. A 27-year-old woman shot in the arm and hip was taken to Stroger Hospital, along with a 44-year-old man who suffered a hip wound. Their conditions were stabilized after the shooting in the 2100 block of West Jackson, which police said likely was gang-related.A pregnant woman was among three people wounded in another Chicago Lawn shooting about 12:45 p.m. in the 6900 block of South Western. A 15-year-old boy shot in the right arm and the pregnant 21-year-old shot in the foot were taken to Christ Medical Center, fire officials said. A 26-year-old man shot in the right ankle was taken to Holy Cross Hospital. Their conditions stabilized, police said.The day’s first nonfatal shooting happened about 12:40 a.m. in another Humboldt Park attack. A 32-year-old man shot in the abdomen and foot in the 900 block of North Drake took himself to Presence Saints Mary and Elizabeth Medical Center. The documented gang member later was transferred to Stroger Hospital, where his condition was stabilized, police said. He wasn’t cooperative.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Died May 8, 20168600 North Lamar BoulevardRigoberto Jose Castillo was at a taco truck in the 8600 block of North Lamar Boulevard in North Austin when a group of people including his suspected killer Osiel Benitez Benitez cut in line in front of Castillo. Castillo confronted the group, which led to a fistfight, Austin police said. Benitez went to a car, grabbed a handgun and opened fire at Castillo. The gunshots hit Castillo and others, including three women, Austin police said. Castillo died at the scene.Benitez fled the scene of the shooting in a car while a witness followed taking down the car's license plate. At one point, Benitez exited the car and confronted the man and may have even attempted to shoot him, according to an arrest affidavit. The witness said the gun may have jammed, and Benitez was later arrested the home of the car's registered owner, police said.Do you have a photo of this victim to share?Please let us know.Tyler Geoffrey HunkinApril 22, 2016Juan Jose Casimiro-PaxtorMay 14, 2016© Gannett Co., Inc.. All Rights Reserved •Send us feedbackA bloody Mother's Day weekend in Detroit left seven people dead and 14 others injured in 17 shootings across the city, according to Police Chief James Craig, who said it was the second-most-violent weekend of the year."Again, when you talk about the recent spate of violence, especially involving children starting on Easter, that drives a lot of fear and we recognize that," Craig said Monday at a news conference. "That's why the initiative, Taking Back Our Neighborhoods, one neighborhood at a time does have value. ...I'll say it and it may infuriate some, but the city's become desensitized to violence over the years. ... I just know it was almost an acceptance if you will, 'Well Detroit's going to be violent.' I'm suggesting that that's not the way life should be. We're moving in the right direction."Craig said the shootings took place from Friday through Sunday, including one shooting that left one person dead and four others wounded Friday night on the city’s east side and the fatal shooting of a man Sunday night in southwest Detroit. Of all the shootings this weekend, only two people are in custody so far, but Craig said investigators are continuing to work on the cases."One of the things we are doing, it's very clear we are fighting our own progress," Craig said. "I won't claim success as you've heard me say. Our overall crime is declining, but we are fighting our own progress. When you look at this past weekend, I've said time and time and time again, one homicide is one too many. We have 21 victims. ...Two weekends ago, we were sitting on a total number of 24 victims, so the last three to four weeks haven't been good."I-94 open after shooting investigation closes freewayAccording to police, three of the shootings this weekend happened within just an hour of each other.The first shooting happened at 7 p.m. Friday in a neighborhood near Packard and Savage streets. Police said two 21-year-old men were in the area when a dark-colored Dodge Stratus pulled up with at least three people inside. Two people got out and started firing shots, fatally shooting one of the 21-year-old men. The other man was not injured.Forty minutes later, another shooting happened in a neighborhood in the 2000 block of Meadow. A man was standing near the street when a vehicle pulled up, a person got out of the vehicle and tried to rob him. The men exchanged gunfire and then a third man showed up and started firing shots as well. He was shot, along with the man who drove up in the vehicle. The robbery victim was not injured. Police said on Friday, one person is in custody in that incident.Twenty minutes later, at about 8 p.m., five men in their mid-20s were gunned down while standing in front of a car wash on the 12300 block of Gratiot. One man died, one is in stable condition and two were in temporary serious condition. Police did not release the condition of the fifth man.The fourth shooting happened at 2:15 a.m. Saturday on Schoolcraft near Grandville. Two males, including one wearing a white mask, approached a  51-year-old male on foot and shot him. It's unclear whether it was a robbery, but the victim called police. His condition was not immediately released.Almost two hours later, at about 4 a.m., a 45-year-old male was found dead with a gunshot wound in the street near the 7000 block of Minock.Then Sunday, a9-year-old boy found a handgun in a neighbor’s yard and accidentally shot himselfwhile showing the gun to his mother. Williams said the shooting happened Sunday afternoon on the city’s west side. The boy was taken to a hospital.As of May 9, there have been 96 homicides in the city, Craig said, which is the same number at this time last year."But when you look at homicides year to date and you compare it to 2013, we're sitting on a 14 percent reduction," Craig said.Despite the bloody weekend, Craig said he believes the city is moving in the right direction. Touting several recent initiatives, he said his department is continuing to make strides.Project Green Light, which is an initiative that allows Detroit police to monitor some gas stations across the city through high-definition cameras, already has begun to pay off, Craig said. Security footage taken from one of the gas station's involved in the project led to an arrest and charges against a woman who was ID'd ina high-profile shootingin March at a Mobil gas station on the city's west side.Craig said a partnership with the community and its stakeholders continues to be key in fighting crime."I don't like to use the word snitch when we talk about the people in our neighborhoods," Craig said. "I use the word cooperation and that does happen. When we talk about no snitching, no snitching is only recognized in the criminal culture. What we're seeing a lot of times in these shooting incidents, it could be criminal on criminal, they're not talking and we do know that people know what happens. ... So shame on you if you know something and you're not saying anything because you're part of the problem."Contact Katrease Stafford: kstafford@freepress.comReporter Tresa Baldas contributed to this report.Montgomery police on Tuesday announced that they have launched an investigation into a shooting death that occurred Friday on Clay Street.According to a release from the Montgomery Police Department, Reginald Williams, 35, of Montgomery, was the victim.“On Friday, May 6, at about 9:12 p.m., MPD and Fire Medics responded to a shooting in the 1300 block of Clay Street,” the release stated. “There, they located four adult gunshot victims who were transported to a local hospital for further treatment. Three of the victims sustained non-life-threatening injuries; the fourth victim, Williams, sustained serious injury and was pronounced dead on Monday, May 10.”No arrests have been made and no other information is available at this time, officials said.Police ask individuals with knowledge of this shooting to call Crime Stoppers at 215-STOP, Secret Witness at 262-400, or the Montgomery Police Department at 652-2831.The Montgomery Advertiser Crime and Arrest Mugshots SectionAn early morning shooting in the Cherokee Park area of Shreveport left two men dead, eight others injured and residents of the neighborhood in a state of fear and confusion asdetails emerge on what happened.Shreveport Police officers responded to the 300 block of North Thomas Drive just after 1 a.m. Thursday after receiving reports of a shooting at a local tire shop. Officers arriving on the scene discovered multiple victims suffering from gunshot wounds, who were later  taken to area hospitals by ambulance and private vehicles and treated for injuries ranging from serious to non-life-threatening, SPD spokesman Cpl. Marcus Hines said..Authorities have identified the two men killed in the shooting as Elton Wayne Madison and Leatrick Benjamin, both 37. Other victims included Henry Sherman, 44, and Randy Brown, 36, both listed in serious condition as of Thursday afternoon. Treated for non-life-threatening injuries and released from area hospitals were Tyrone Coley, 37, Joey Caldwell, 29, Robert Baulkman, 30, and Richard Baker, 29. Two more men, Kenneth Jones, 29, and Jeremy Madison, 28, only suffered minor cuts and scrapes.Preliminary investigation suggests a group of men were engaged in a card game after hours inside the tire shop when a group of three to four individuals entered with their faces covered. According to Hines, the suspects entering the business were armed with what appeared to be semi-automatic rifles and began firing on the individuals inside.LaGwen Hill, 63, has lived in the 500 block of Seneca Trail — around the corner from the scene of the ambush-style shooting — for more than thirty years. She had just gone to bed when she heard multiple shots from what she believed to be an automatic weapon nearby."It just kept going on," said Hill. "I thought it was fireworks at first."Hill said she has spent more time at home since retiring two years ago and has really seen her neighborhood change. When she first moved to the area, Hill said people took greater pride in the area but she has seen a recent increase in suspicious activity and a decrease in the feeling of safety.Hill also was concerned about late night activity she has seen in and around the location of Thursday morning's shooting."I think it's a hangout," she said. "Any time you get a bunch of young folks hanging out, there's no order to that. I've heard shots before, but never that close."Shontel Grant, 41, a resident in the 400 block of Seneca Trail, said she has noticed increased, late-night activity at the tire business and has wondered what people were up to at what she considers odd hours for operation."I have no idea what they're doing in there," said Grant, who has lived in the neighborhood for three years.Grant said she woke up to a flurry of police cars early Thursday morning and checked the news to see what was happening. Although she normally allows her children to walk to Shreveport Super Store — a business located across the street from the scene of the shooting — Grant isn't sure she will continue allowing them to do so."It scares me — especially when you don't know what happened and who it involved," she said.April Burley, 31, said she has never felt unsafe, but she does have a 14-year-old daughter that she is very protective of due to what she perceives to bean increase in area crime recently."You never know what can happen," Burley said. "It's getting crazier and crazier."Al Russell operates Al's Auto Care, another business located across from the scene of Thursday morning's shooting. Russell said he has always worked on cars overnight at other locations he has operated but nearby activity — many people congregating at the business where the shooting occurred — caused him to change his normal routine."I can move past it," said Russell. "But there's always concerns. That's why I go home early."Russell said he typically heads home around 8 or 9 p.m. every night due to concerns about the activities he has seen around the business where the shootings occurred.As of Thursday afternoon, no suspects had been charged in the shooting, but detectives were pursuing leads and continuing to gather information and evidence.Authorities urge anyone with any information to contact Crime Stoppers at (318) 673-7373 or to visit their website atwww.lockemup.org.Annual crime rates for District 2 (Cherokee Park is in District 2)Total violent crime for 2015: 109Total property crime for 2015: 61Total crime for 2015: 439January - March 2016 crime rates for District 2Homicide: 0Rape: 3Robbery (Business and Person): 6Aggravated battery: 3Aggravated assault: 3Burglary (residence and business): 30Shoplifting: 9Theft (business, residence, auto and general): 49Total crime for January - March 2016: 103(Source: www.shreveportla.gov)One person has died while three others remain hospitalized following ashooting Thursday night in Allapattah.Miami Police say the shooting happened around 9 p.m. Thursday  at a housing development in the 2100 block of Northwest 19th Terrace. All of the victims are in their late teens and early 20s.All four were taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital. One of the victims, a male, has died. He was shot in the chest, police say.The conditions of the other victims aren't known.Investigators remained at the scene of the shooting well into the overnight hours collecting evidence. A large number of shell casings were left behind, at least 90 evidence markers were placed down.Nearby cars had their windows blown out from the barrage of bullets.Police say the motive for the shooting is unclear, but that it may have been in retaliation for another shooting.Surveillance cameras in the area did catch the shooting on camera. So far, there have been no suspects or arrests.Anyone with information is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at (305) 471-TIPS.MURFREESBORO — One of the victims in Sunday's shooting at Aspen Heights Apartments was hit when he heard the commotion and stepped outside his apartmentSaqer Saeed Alzahrani, 26, heard the fight break out at the nearby party at about 1 a.m. and went to see what was going on, according to police reports provided to The Daily News Journal. Alzahrani was one of five people injured after a fight broke out at the party and people began shooting.“He had been shot in the lower left arm and left side,” reported Murfreesboro Officer Jessica Hawkins, who was dispatched to the scene at 12:52 a.m.Hawkins applied pressure to the victim’s wounds until Murfreesboro Fire and Rescue took over emergency care.“He was transported to St. Thomas Rutherford, where he was stabilized and then taken to Vanderbilt," Hawkins said.Another victim was identified by police as Antavius Burns, 24.A third victim may have left in a white Dodge Charger, according to Officer Randall Gaines.Gaines made contact with that vehicle and the victim, identified as Dynasty Freeman, 20, on East Main Street near Ragland Drive.“Ms. Freeman was transported to the ER,” Gaines said.All three of those injured are Middle Tennessee State University students, according to MTSU spokesman Jimmy Hart.A fourth victim was Tedarrian Deshawn Tipton, according to Murfreesboro police spokesman Sgt. Kyle Evans, and the fifth victim was Arthur Bess II.Other than Alzahrani, all of the victims were treated at Saint Thomas Rutherford and have since been released, according to  Nick Paranjape, manager of Media Relations & Brand Journalism for Saint Thomas Health Nashville.On Sunday morning, Trina Taylor, a neighbor on Old Castle Drive in Aspen Heights, said the house with the party had been crowded, and many of the people she saw running from it seemed to be college students.“It’s the end of the semester, a lot of them were through with finals,” she said.No arrests have been made and Murfreesboro police are continuing to investigate the shootings. Anyone with information should call Crime Stoppers at 615-893-STOP (7867).Chaos erupted as 5 injured in shooting at partyPolice investigate the scene of a drive-by shooting along the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA bullet pierced the front windshield of an automobile parked in the driveway of home along the 400 block of Dade Avenue where a drive-by shooting left three injured in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. Police say more than 30 rounds were fired from two weapons. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a drive-by shooting along the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.com"This family has been through too much," said Latoyia Olowookere, who was grazed by a bullet during the drive-by shooting at the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. "The shooting went on for seven or eight minutes," said Olowookere , who was attending a repass at the home. "I started pulling kids down the ground when I heard the shot," she said. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comFERGUSON •Police say they are looking for suspects in an apparent drive-by shooting Friday that injured three children and a woman at the home of relatives of young shooting victim Jamyla Bolden.Police said three people were wounded but LaToyia Olowookere, 36, said she was also one of those hit along with two 9-year-old girls and a 4-year-old boy. She said all of the wounds were from being grazed by bullets.Police said the shooting happened outside a home in the 400 block of Dade Avenue that belongs to the family of Jamyla, who at 9 years oldwas shot and killed while doing homework last August.Olowookere, a family friend who lives nearby, said several people were gathered at the home because of the death of a great-aunt of Jamyla’s. She said she was among about 15 to 20 people in the yard when the gunfire began. Of those, about 10 were children.“That’s how I got my injury,” she said. “I got up and started grabbing kids and pulling them down.”She was grazed in the upper chest but declined to be taken to a hospital for treatment.She said a 9-year-old girl was grazed in the head, another 9-year-old girl in the wrist and a 4-year-old boy in the abdomen.She said the children were cousins of Jamyla. Jamyla’s brother was among the children who were in the yard but he was not hit, Olowookere said. He had been home in August 2015 when Jamyla was killed and his mother was wounded by gunfire at another residence in Ferguson.The shooting on Friday happened around 5 p.m., according to Ferguson’s acting police chief, Al Eickhoff.Two vehicles were driving down Dade and at least one person inside fired multiple shots, Eickhoff said.“You have a senseless drive-by shooting,” Eickhoff said. “Senseless.”Police say they do not know who the target was.Michele Atkins, 33, said she was waiting in a car for her boyfriend nearby when she heard several shots. She said there was a lot of screaming and crying when the shooting happened.Olowookere said she did not see where the gunfire came from, but she said a neighbor told her that someone had fired as a pickup and a sedan passed the home in opposite directions.“Everybody’s OK, by the grace of God,” she said afterward. “What do you tell these kids in a situation like this?”"This family has been through too much," said Latoyia Olowookere, who was grazed by a bullet during the drive-by shooting at the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. "The shooting went on for seven or eight minutes," said Olowookere , who was attending a repass at the home. "I started pulling kids down the ground when I heard the shot," she said. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comShake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Valerie Schremp Hahn is a features writer for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Police investigate the scene of a drive-by shooting along the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.com"This family has been through too much," said Latoyia Olowookere, who was grazed by a bullet during the drive-by shooting at the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. "The shooting went on for seven or eight minutes," said Olowookere , who was attending a repass at the home. "I started pulling kids down the ground when I heard the shot," she said. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA bullet pierced the front windshield of an automobile parked in the driveway of home along the 400 block of Dade Avenue where a drive-by shooting left three injured in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. Police say more than 30 rounds were fired from two weapons. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a drive-by shooting along the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.com"This family has been through too much," said Latoyia Olowookere, who was grazed by a bullet during the drive-by shooting at the 400 block of Dade Avenue in Ferguson on Friday, April 29, 2016. "The shooting went on for seven or eight minutes," said Olowookere , who was attending a repass at the home. "I started pulling kids down the ground when I heard the shot," she said. The shooting happened outside a home that belongs to the family of Jamyla Bolden, who at 9 years old was shot and killed while doing homework in August of last year. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Trending:OAKLAND — A shooting in West Oakland Friday night that left six people injured,  five with gunshot wounds, was possibly gang related, police said Saturday.All of those injured are expected to recover.The shooting happened about 9:15 p.m. Friday near a liquor store in the 3200 block of San Pablo Avenue.Police said a group of people were on the sidewalk  when more than one suspect  walked up  and began shooting at them.More than three dozen shots were fired, police said.Five people in the group were shot in different parts of their bodies.Four of them were men, one 24, two 27 and one 30.  A 24-year-old woman was also shot. They are all from Oakland.A stray bullet went through the windshield of a 24-year-old Oakland woman driving northbound on San Pablo  sending glass shards into her eyes., police said.Three of the injured were taken by ambulance to a hospital.  The other three got their own rides to a hospital.Two of the gunshot victims were eventually treated and released, police said.Investigators said  based on where the shooting happened and other information they have, they have not ruled out that the attack was gang related but declined to elaborate.Police were continuing to investigate the shooting on Saturday.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering  up to $25,000 in reward money for information  leading to the arrest of the shooters.  Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3426 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.OAKLAND — A shooting in West Oakland Friday night that left six people injured,  five with gunshot wounds, was possibly gang related, police said Saturday.All of those injured are expected to recover.The shooting happened about 9:15 p.m. Friday near a liquor store in the 3200 block of San Pablo Avenue.Police said a group of people were on the sidewalk  when more than one suspect  walked up  and began shooting at them.More than three dozen shots were fired, police said.Five people in the group were shot in different parts of their bodies.Four of them were men, one 24, two 27 and one 30.  A 24-year-old woman was also shot. They are all from Oakland.A stray bullet went through the windshield of a 24-year-old Oakland woman driving northbound on San Pablo  sending glass shards into her eyes., police said.Three of the injured were taken by ambulance to a hospital.  The other three got their own rides to a hospital.Two of the gunshot victims were eventually treated and released, police said.Investigators said  based on where the shooting happened and other information they have, they have not ruled out that the attack was gang related but declined to elaborate.Police were continuing to investigate the shooting on Saturday.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering  up to $25,000 in reward money for information  leading to the arrest of the shooters.  Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3426 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersA quintuple shooting Tuesday morning left four people wounded and one woman dead in Prince George’s County.The incident happened about 1:30 a.m. in the 6500 block of Hil-Mar Drive in Forestville when a group of people standing outside were shot by someone who was inside a car, police said.The car sped off, and when officers arrived, they found Joanne Woods, 49, suffering from gunshot wounds, police said.Woods, a District Heights resident, was pronounced dead at the scene, police said. Four men were also shot during the attack, according to police. Two of the men — one of whom was taken to a hospital in critical condition — were treated and released, and two others remained hospitalized in stable condition as of Tuesday afternoon.Police had initially reported that four people were wounded or killed in the shooting, but later added a fifth victim.Detectives do not think the shooting was random and are searching for a suspect, police said.A reward of up to $25,000 is available for information leading to an arrest and indictment in the case. Police are asking anyone with tips to call 1-866-411-TIPS (8477).Lynh Bui contributed to this report.Lynh Bui contributed to this report.Jerock Walker recalls the mob of chaos as the gunshots sliced through the noise of a busy afternoon at downtown Nashville's Music City Central."I was shocked that they would just come and do that, with three hundred people right there, they’d just start shooting anywhere and everywhere," said the 16-year-old, who was at the bus station when shots rang out on Monday afternoon.Walker returned the next day to rally against violence at the site where the shooting left four teenagers injured, including one critically. The teen was listed in stable condition Tuesday morning.Along with Walker, the city tried to make sense Tuesday of one of the bloodiest days in Nashville in some time — particularly for teens and young adults.Eight people were injured in two separate quadruple shootings in just a 14-hour period. Police believe four people also were shot at aGoodlettsville home during an unrelated argument over a rap song.Nashville Music City Central shooting injures 4 teens, 1 criticallyIn the bus station shooting, police identified Demarcus Kavel Amos, 16, as the suspect and are seeking him on one count of attempted murder and three counts of aggravated assault. Police have yet to find the teen at his home and school and are seeking help in locating him.In the wake of the violence, officials tried to calm the fears of those who use the downtown transit to get to work, school or elsewhere across Music City. Extra police were stationed there Tuesday to aid in that effort.Metro Transit Authority CEO Steve Bland said the shooting was an unfortunate and rare incident.More than 15,000 people pass through the building every day, which is like selling out Bridgestone Arena, Bland said. The shooting is the most serious event in the building's eight-year history."This is one of the safest places in Nashville," he said.Bland said that at least eight police officers or security patrols are on site at any given time. The station has 44 cameras. And police and security were within 75 feet of the shooting and responded within 10 seconds, he said.But the scene of people scrambling for cover as the shots rang out has left its mark.Walker, a student at Johnson Alternative Learning Center, said students were running in every direction when the gunfire struck the four teenagers. The wounded included the intended target of the shooting — 18-year-old Javious Chatman, Metro Police spokesman Don Aaron said.Chatman suffered a gunshot wound to the torso and was taken by ambulance to Vanderbilt University Medical Center, where he was first in critical condition but stable by Tuesday, police said.Two 16-year-olds, Nathaniel Webb and Jonathan Stoner, and 17-year-old Jalen Jeffries suffered minor injuries. They also were taken to Vanderbilt's hospital, where they were treated and released, according to police.A 911 call made to dispatch on Monday also helped paint the scene where hundreds of students were traveling home from school."We're laying on the ground, ma'am, send the police. Oh my God," a frantic woman tells a dispatcher. "There's been a shooting down here at MTA, a guy just got shot."About 4,500 students pass through the station on a school day, said Joe Bass, Metro Schools spokesman.Music City Central shooting 911 call: 'We're laying on the ground, send the police'Metro Nashville Public Schools magnet students have been able to ride the buses for free or at a reduced cost for years, Bass said. And all high school students were allowed to ride the bus for free in 2014 under former Mayor Karl Dean's administration.Bass called the bus station safe, but said the district plans to work with city leaders in addressing any safety concerns. The school district helps pay for security at the station."Our goal is to do what it takes to keep our kids safe, and that includes school-related places, bus stops, athletic events and graduation events,” he said.Walker hoped his actions and that of those gathered at the peace rally held by the Oasis Center helped to say the space was safe for all.Although he said feels uneasy about riding the bus after Monday, the city’s reaction meant a lot to him."They are letting us know we are safe in this community," Walker said. "And that this property is ours. We don't have to worry about coming out here and getting shot."Reach Jason Gonzales at 615-259-8047 and on Twitter @ByJasonGonzales. Reach Natalie Neysa Alund at 615-259-8072 and on Twitter @nataliealund.Police searching for suspectPolice are asking for help finding Demarcus Kavel Amos, and anyone seeing him or knowing his whereabouts is asked to immediately contact the Emergency Communications Center at 615-862-8600 or Crime Stoppers at 615-742-7463.Callers to Crime Stoppers can remain anonymous and qualify for a cash reward. Electronic tips also can be sent to police by texting the word “CASH” along with the message to 274637 (CRIMES), or online at www.nashvillecrimestoppers.com.Goodlettsville shootingIn a different incident Monday, cousins Christopher Christian II, 22, and Ryan Bowden, 20, told police they were shot about 2 a.m. after fighting with three men about recording a rap song in a studio they run out of a garage at a home in the 500 block of Cunniff Parkway.The cousins were taken to Vanderbilt Medical Center with minor injuries. Police say Christian and Bowden have each been convicted of aggravated robbery and burglary in Cheatham County.Shortly after responding to Cunniff Parkway, Antonio Doval, 23, and Brandon Richardson, 24, arrived at Skyline Medical Center with gunshot wounds. Richardson had been shot in the hip, and Doval was struck in the arm. Police say both have been convicted of robberies.During interviews, neither man could tell detectives where the shooting had occurred or who shot them, according to police.8NewsHALIFAX, Va. (AP) – Authorities have charged a man they say shot at a Veterans of Foreign Wars hall in Halifax, injuring four people, and was then shot by a sheriff’s deputy.Virginia State Police announced Monday that 19-year-old Malik Cobbs of Danville is charged with shooting into an occupied building in Halifax. Cobbs, who was flown to Duke University Hospital in North Carolina with a non-life-threatening injury, is awaiting extradition.Police say a deputy he saw a man leaving the VFW hall firing, shooting the man when he didn’t drop the weapon as commanded.Geller says four people were injured in the initial shooting, not five as first reported. Only one was still hospitalized Monday.(Copyright 2016 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.)Find 8News onTwitter,Facebook, andInstagram; send your news tips toiReport8@wric.com.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NORFOLK, Va. (AP) — A federal grand jury has indicted four people for their roles in a scheme to use the identities of 35 Virginia prison inmates to secure more than $300,000 in pandemic-related unemployment benefits, federal authorities said Friday.Two women worked with two inmates at correctional institutions to collect information of other inmates to apply for the unemployment benefits, according to a news release from the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of Virginia. The two men who were serving time were accused of providing information for inmates where they were incarcerated, according to the news release.RICHMOND, Va. (WRIC) -- Here’s the latest coronavirus update from the Virginia Department of Health for Saturday, April 10:Virginia is getting 77,847 doses into arms each day on average, an increase of nearly 20,000 from this time last month. According to the state’s health department, 98.4% of the doses Virginia has received have been administered.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY/AP) — A second lieutenant in the U.S. Army is suing two Town of Windsor police officers over a traffic stop during which the officers drew their guns, pointed them at him and used a slang term to suggest he was facing execution.Body camera footage shows 2nd Lt. Caron Nazario had his hands held in the air outside the driver’s side window as he told the armed officers, “I’m honestly afraid to get out.” One of the officers told Nazario, “Yeah, you should be!”Filed under:Two men were killed and three other people wounded in a shooting Sunday night in the West Englewood neighborhood on the South Side.The group was sitting on a front porch in the 2000 block of West 68th Place about 11:10 p.m. when someone got out of a vehicle in a nearby vacant lot and opened fire, according to Chicago Police.A 27-year-old man, identified as Devin Hamb, was shot in the chest and taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he was pronounced dead at 11:55 p.m., according to the Cook County medical examiner’s office. He lived in the 500 block of East 72nd Street.Davon Barrett, 38, was shot in the neck and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was pronounced dead at 12:33 a.m. Monday, according to the medical examiner’s office. Barrett lived on the same block where the shooting happened.A 27-year-old man shot in the back was taken Christ Medical Center and 17-year-old boy shot in the left leg was taken to St. Bernard Hospital. Their conditions were both stabilized, police said.A 23-year-old woman was shot in the left leg and taken to Stroger Hospital, where her condition was also stabilized, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Tarabien Latrent Cobb (Auburn police)Auburn police made an arrest in the early Saturday morning shooting that killed three outside a nightclub.Tarabien Latrent Cobb, 33 of Auburn was arrested Saturday afternoon and charged with capital murder, according to Auburn police. He is being held in the Lee County Detention Facility without bond.Police say Cobb killed three men -- identified as Roderick L. Nelms, 32, Jadarrion L. Spinks, 25, and Recco R. Cobb, 43, all from Auburn -- during an exchange of gunfire outside Dr. D's Lounge located in the 1200 block of Lee Road 83.Officers responded to the report of shots fired at the nightclub at around 2 a.m. When they arrived at the scene, shots were still being fired.After taking control of the scene, officers found three men that had been shot and killed.Another man was transported to East Alabama Medical Center for the treatment of a non-life threatening gunshot wound.Auburn investigators learned the shooting stemmed from an altercation that occurred inside the club.Cobb was taken into custody at an Auburn residence with the assistance of the U.S. Marshals Fugitive Task Force.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesA 30-year-old man attending a Bronx house party was fatally shot early Saturday — one of a half dozen people hit by gunfire during a bloody stretch of six hours, officials said.Rahmel Johnson's horrified family raced to Bronx Lebanon Hospital after he was blasted in the chest outside a home on Clay Ave. in Morrisania.His inconsolable cousin Tamika Johnson, 31, who attended the house party, fought with police and had to be removed from the hospital after she and another relative tried to push through a line of cops blocking the emergency room entrance.She was charged with disorderly conduct, criminal mischief and disorderly conduct after she kicked out the rear window of the police van she was placed into, cops said."She was with him," Johnson's shell-shocked mother Sandra Johnson, 49, told the Daily News Saturday. "She was very upset.""I don't understand why they would target my son," Johnson's heartbroken mom told the Daily News. "Why would they do that? I can't believe they killed my son."The second relative, a 28-year-old woman, also received a summons for disorderly conduct, officials said.MAN, 32, ARRESTED FOR 2015 FORT GREENE SHOOTING THAT LEFT THREE DEAD: 'I DON'T GIVE A F---, I'M HERE AND THEY'RE NOT'Relatives believe their beloved self-employed T-shirt hawker was "set up" to be killed.He was standing near a DJ booth inside the house near E. 169th St. about 6:45 a.m. when he was called outside and fatally shot, relatives were told."Some of his friends and family went outside," his uncle Donald Johnson said. "They heard three shots and ran inside. He died on the operating table."The gunman remained on the loose Saturday. A motive was not immediately disclosed by detectives.The music at the celebration was so loud that very few heard the gunshots, witnesses said."I just heard music playing and people socializing," neighbor Tyree Riggins said.But the music was quickly drowned out by blood-curdling shrieks."People started screaming and running out of the building every which way. It was like roaches when you cut the light on," said Riggins, 30. "I heard a woman screaming, 'They killed my brother! They killed my brother!' ""It went from a fun super happy cool vibe to chaos," he said.The slaying was one of three shootings in the city between 1 a.m. and 7 a.m. Saturday, cops said.Four men between ages 19 and 34 were wounded as gunshots rang out on W. 141st St. near Edgecombe Ave. in Hamilton Heights just after 1 a.m., cops said.Three of the men were hit in the legs when witnesses said a lone gunman walked up and opened fire into the group. The fourth victim was hit in the arm.Two hours later, a 29-year-old man shot in the gut stumbled into New York-Presbyterian Columbia University Medical Center looking for help. He said he had been shot on W. 173rd St. and Amsterdam Ave., officials said.No arrests have been made.As of April 17, there have been 230 shootings citywide this year, down from 260 during the same period last year, an 11.5% drop.Murders are also down citywide — by 18%, officials said.ttracy@nydailynews.comPartially submerged in water in the bathtub of a burning motel room, 28-year-old Orlando Joe Collins killed himself by putting a gun in his mouth and pulling the trigger, an autopsy concludes.The bullet went from right to left, bisecting the jugular vein and fracturing multiple teeth and the jawbone before exiting through the left side of Collins’ neck, says the autopsy report by Shawnee County District Coroner Dr. Charles Glenn.Fire charred the skin on Collins’ face, hands, torso and lower extremities, likely after or near the time he died, the report said.Shawnee County District Court Clerk Angela Callahan’s office released the report Monday in response to a request from The Topeka Capital-Journal. Glenn had asked Callahan late last month to change the document from a suppressed record to a public record, saying a criminal investigation involving the death had been closed.Toxicological tests found marijuana but no other drugs or alcohol in the system of the 5-foot-7, 184-pound Collins, according to the autopsy report.“The decedent was involved in a firefight with law enforcement while he was within a burning motel room,” Glenn wrote. “He died from a perforating, intraoral gunshot wound. The characteristics of the gunshot wound are consistent with a self-inflicted injury.”Collins, whose home address was listed on the autopsy report as 808 S.W. Lindenwood Ave., was involved in a standoff with federal agents on the evening of April 23, 2016, as he was staying in Room 28 at a motel at 3732 S.W. Topeka Blvd.Collins shot and wounded two U.S. marshals and an FBI agent when they tried to take him into custody. That was the largest number of officers wounded at one time in the city’s history.A fire was ignited by Collins from inside his room during the gunfight and spread throughout the motel, authorities said. The fire destroyed 20 motel rooms and did an estimated $350,000 in damage.Collins was declared dead the next day after being found in the bathtub in his motel room, according to the autopsy report.“The patterns of thermal injuries seen at autopsy are consisent with the body position that the decedent was found within the bathtub and likely represent a partial submersion in water,” the report said. “Given the characteristic of the gunshot wound, the thermal injuries are most likely postmortem or perimorten. Consistently, he had a minimal amount of soot deposit within his airways and only 16% of his hemoglobin was saturated with carbon monoxide.”Glenn initially ordered the coroner’s report declared a confidential criminal investigation record last year to ensure its contents wouldn’t jeopardize a federal criminal investigation into the actions of Quentin Kirk Lawton, 37.Authorities said Lawton, who had visited Collins, lied to them before the standoff when he denied having any knowledge of Collins’ whereabouts.Lawton pleaded guilty last month in federal court to one count of making a false statement.Contact reporter Tim Hrenchir at (785) 295-1184 or @timhrenchir on Twitter.Partially submerged in water in the bathtub of a burning motel room, 28-year-old Orlando Joe Collins killed himself by putting a gun in his mouth and pulling the trigger, an autopsy concludes.The bullet went from right to left, bisecting the jugular vein and fracturing multiple teeth and the jawbone before exiting through the left side of Collins’ neck, says the autopsy report by Shawnee County District Coroner Dr. Charles Glenn.Fire charred the skin on Collins’ face, hands, torso and lower extremities, likely after or near the time he died, the report said.Shawnee County District Court Clerk Angela Callahan’s office released the report Monday in response to a request from The Topeka Capital-Journal. Glenn had asked Callahan late last month to change the document from a suppressed record to a public record, saying a criminal investigation involving the death had been closed.Toxicological tests found marijuana but no other drugs or alcohol in the system of the 5-foot-7, 184-pound Collins, according to the autopsy report.“The decedent was involved in a firefight with law enforcement while he was within a burning motel room,” Glenn wrote. “He died from a perforating, intraoral gunshot wound. The characteristics of the gunshot wound are consistent with a self-inflicted injury.”Collins, whose home address was listed on the autopsy report as 808 S.W. Lindenwood Ave., was involved in a standoff with federal agents on the evening of April 23, 2016, as he was staying in Room 28 at a motel at 3732 S.W. Topeka Blvd.Collins shot and wounded two U.S. marshals and an FBI agent when they tried to take him into custody. That was the largest number of officers wounded at one time in the city’s history.A fire was ignited by Collins from inside his room during the gunfight and spread throughout the motel, authorities said. The fire destroyed 20 motel rooms and did an estimated $350,000 in damage.Collins was declared dead the next day after being found in the bathtub in his motel room, according to the autopsy report.“The patterns of thermal injuries seen at autopsy are consisent with the body position that the decedent was found within the bathtub and likely represent a partial submersion in water,” the report said. “Given the characteristic of the gunshot wound, the thermal injuries are most likely postmortem or perimorten. Consistently, he had a minimal amount of soot deposit within his airways and only 16% of his hemoglobin was saturated with carbon monoxide.”Glenn initially ordered the coroner’s report declared a confidential criminal investigation record last year to ensure its contents wouldn’t jeopardize a federal criminal investigation into the actions of Quentin Kirk Lawton, 37.Authorities said Lawton, who had visited Collins, lied to them before the standoff when he denied having any knowledge of Collins’ whereabouts.Lawton pleaded guilty last month in federal court to one count of making a false statement.Contact reporter Tim Hrenchir at (785) 295-1184 or @timhrenchir on Twitter.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Topeka Capital-Journal  ~ 100 S.E. 9th St., Suite 200, Topeka KS 66612-1213~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKMenuWAVERLY, Ohio -- It wasn't about drugs, Attorney General Mike DeWine announced Tuesday.It wasn't a cartel execution, although it had certainly been made to look that way.After a "thousand-piece puzzle" of an investigation spanning two years, 10 states and hundreds of interviews, investigators discovered the overnight murders of eight Rhoden family members -- the youngest just 16 -- likely came down to a custody battle over a toddler.The culprits, DeWine said, were the child's father and members of his extended family. According to their indictments, four of them plotted meticulously to kill the Rhodens on April 22, 2016, and conceal the evidence after. Two more face charges of aiding in the cover-up."We always felt from the beginning that the perpetrators were very familiar with the victims and their homes," DeWine said. "The Wagners certainly were."Authorities arrested George "Billy" Wagner III, 47; Angela Wagner, 48; George Wagner IV, 27 and Edward "Jake" Wagner, 26 Tuesday and charged them each with eight counts of aggravated murder with death penalty specifications, as well as other crimes, for the deaths of the eight Rhodens in an event deemed thePike County massacre."They were brutally and viciously executed," according to DeWine, who described the act as "ruthless, heartless, cold-blooded murder."Rita Newcomb, 65, Angela Wagner's mother; and 76-year-old Fredericka Wagner, Billy Wagner's mother, face charges of obstructing justice and perjury. Newcomb also stands charged with forgery.Top row: George "Billy" Wagner III, George Wagner IV, Edward "Jake" WagnerBottom row: Angela Wagner, Rita Newcomb and Fredericka WagnerA Pike County grand jury indicted the Wagners on the charges Monday. DeWine, Pike County Sheriff Charles Reader and Pike County Prosecutor Robert Junk announced the arrests Tuesday.For Reader, who had been sheriff for less than a year on the morning the bodies were discovered, they represent the end of one painful journey and the beginning of another that could last even longer."It’s going to be much, much sweeter when the prosecution is done," he said.Jake Wagner and Hanna Rhoden, who was 19 when she was killed,had a child together.He also faces charges of unlawful sexual conduct with a minor for allegedly having sexual contact with Hanna when she was 15 and he was 20."There certainly was obsession with custody, obsession with control of the children," DeWine said.Evidence shows that Billy, Angela, George and Jake Wagner developed an elaborate plan to kill the Rhodens, according to DeWine. He said they studied the victims' habits and routines and knew the layouts of their homes.The Wagners bought ammunition, a magazine clip, brass catchers and a bug detector to prepare for the crimes, according to the indictments. They also studied "counter-surveillance devices" on the properties, including pets, and tampered with phones; cameras; and parts of a home security system.In addition to the murder charges, members of the family are facing charges of conspiracy, engaging in a pattern of corrupt activity, tampering with evidence, unlawful possession of a dangerous ordinance, forgery, unauthorized use of property, interception of wire, oral or electronic communications, obstructing justice and aggravated burglary.DeWine said all four are also facing charges of forgery for allegedly forging child custody documents.The victims were foundshot to death at four homeson the morning of April 22, 2016. Officials have said they believe the shootings took place hours earlier.RELATED:Pike County massacre suspect was in custody dispute with victimAuthorities had long suspected there were multiple attackers who were familiar with the victims' homes and the surrounding area, about 70 miles south of Columbus.The victims are:All of the Pike County massacre victims were shot in the head at point-blank range, and seven of the eight were shot multiple times, according to preliminary autopsy reports viewed by the WCPO I-Team in September.One of the suspects was arrested in Lexington. A Lexington Police Department spokesperson said Lexington officers, with the Ohio Bureau of Criminal of Investigation, assisted in the arrest of George "Billy" Wagner III. WCPO news partner LEX18 recorded video of Billy Wagner's arrest:Despitewidespread reportsthat the Rhoden family had been involved in farming and trafficking marijuana, DeWine said he did not believe the drug trade had fomented the murders."There was an undercurrent of drugs," he said,. "There’s no evidence of the speculation that this was necessarily drug-related in the sense of the motive."Reader became visibly upset when asked about the subject."We were working an eight-person homicide, not a marijuana program, and I believe today as I did then that they deserve more respect because they are true victims of a heinous crime that’s never been seen before," he said. As for the marijuana: "I would think that, after two years, we could get over that."RELATED:Trailers where Rhoden family members were killed moved for a second timePike County Murder IndictmentsbyWCPO Web Teamon ScribdGallery: Randy Blackmon interviewRandy Blackmon sat on his son Daniel's front porch outside Guntersville with tears in his eyes Wednesday afternoon as he waited for the state to release his body.Daniel Eric Blackmon, 38, was being autopsied after he waskilled in a shootout with policeTuesday after shooting into random cars and wounding four people in Marshall and Blount counties."He's just going around shooting,'' Blount County sheriff's Operations Officer Tim Kent told AL.com Tuesday. "There's no rhyme or reason."There was a reason, Randy Blackmon said. "The bipolar (had) come to the top" a few months earlier, he said referring to bipolar syndrome in his son's personality.He had been with Daniel the night before the shootings, Blackmon said. "He calls me and says, 'Hey, Dad, there's demons here. Can you come help me?' I said, 'Sure.'"Both men lived on Blackmon Road, a gravel road 7 miles south of Guntersville, Ala. They worked together in the family trucking business hauling gravel, sand and whatever else building contractors needed across North Alabama."We looked around, shining lights, and we couldn't find anything," Blackmon said of Monday night outside his son's house. "He said, 'Dad, do you want me to show you the portal of Hell?'""Yeah," Blackmon said. "Whatever you want to do."The two men drove to Gadsden, where Daniel said the portal was, and back while Daniel talked about the "good demons" and "bad demons" he'd been seeing. He'd go days without sleep sometimes, and sometimes he'd fall asleep from exhaustion.When they got home, Daniel turned all the lights on and opened the front door to feel safe. Randy Blackmon went to his own home down the lane. "I came by (Tuesday) morning and the door was open," Blackmon said. "I went on to work."Blackmon's friends started calling his cell phone later in the day, but they wouldn't tell him what had happened. Then the Marshall County Sheriff's Office called and did tell him, he said.Blackmon said he tried to help his son every way he knew. The sheriff's office knew Daniel, too, he said, because he said they'd picked him up for a hearing when his father tried to have him hospitalized earlier in April. Instead, the ultimate decision was a 150-day program of outpatient therapy and medication."He wasn't going to do that," Blackmon said of the meds. Later, Blackmon would say, "They let us down. I was trying to get him some long-term care."Blackmon said his son seemed OK until a few weeks ago, but admitted the younger man had mood swings for several years. He was never violent, Blackmon said, but you didn't know what he would say, how he would react.Blackmon's choice was, "Do I say something or not?" Something that might set him off?It was a long way, Blackmon said, from the mathematically gifted boy offered an engineering scholarship to the University of Alabama in Huntsville. Daniel Blackmon put college off for a year to earn some money driving trucks with his father. Then he told UAH "to give the scholarship to someone else," his father said. "He had found what he wanted to do."Now Daniel Blackmon is dead, and police are saying he was also "a person of interest" in an April 10 fire that destroyed the nearby Cedar Grove Church of Christ. "I'd say he didn't do it," Blackmon said Wednesday. "If you ask anybody who knows him, they'd say no."Blackmon said he's sorry for what his son did, and he's glad no one was killed. "I'm sure all he saw was a demon in there," he said of the cars Daniel Blackmon fired at on the Alabama roads on Tuesday.(Updated at 7:32 p.m. to clarify the location of Blackmon's home)Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.GAGE PARK — Four teenagers were shot, one fatally, while sitting in a parked van on the Southwest Side late Tuesday night, police and witnesses said.The teens were sitting in the 2700 block of West 53rd Street when someone pulled up alongside them in a red minivan and fired multiple shots at them, according to Officer Jose Estrada, a Chicago Police spokesman.Ruben Orozco, who lives on the block, said he was jolted awake by six gunshots in rapid succession, followed by the screeching of tires. He came outside and saw a teen lying still in the street alongside three others, who were "screaming and crying."Police said an 18-year-old man was shot in his upper chest and pronounced dead on the scene.The Cook County Medical Examiner's Office identified him as Jason Napoles, of the 2500 block of South Christiana Avenue.Another 18-year-old was brought to Mount Sinai Hospital after being shot in his back, Estrada said. Police could not provide his condition but said he was "stable."Two other men, 18 and 19, were taken Stroger Hospital, where they were both "stable," Estrada said. The 18-year-old was shot in his back and the 19-year-old was shot in both arms and grazed in his head.Police said all four teens were "self-admitted" gang members, and Orozco said he'd seen all four of them walking around the area calling out gang slogans and flashing signs.After a quiet couple of years, Orozco said, the block has started to see a resurgence in crime. He installed a camera outside his home, advertising it with a sign saying "Smile, you're on camera," but he said it's done little to deter troublemakers."It's kind of a cycle, where some people will move in and cause all kinds of problems," said Orozco, who's lived on the block for 10 years. "Then they'll get chased out, it'll be calm for a while, and then someone else will move right in and take their place.""It gets me really upset," Orozco added. The quiet residential neighborhood had already been on edge; in February, neighbors were devastated whenan entire family was slain in their homeabout four blocks away from the shooting.In the face of such trauma, Orozo said, many neighbors feel that Ald. Ed Burke (14th), the powerful chairman of the City Council Finance Committee, has been missing in action."We're all very upset with him right now," he said. "He's downtown making all that money, and a lot of us really feel like he isn't tending to his ward."Orozco tried four times to secure a meeting with the alderman, he said, and was turned down every time.Down the block, another woman shared Orozco's frustration."He's such a big name, everybody knows Ed Burke," said the woman, who declined to say her name for fear of retribution. "But what's he done for us? Nothing. He doesn't care about us."Seeing the shooting unfold in real time right outside her home, she said, lit a fire under her advocacy for a larger police presence and a camera at the intersection of 53rd Street and Washtenaw Avenue."I'm really scared now, because my husband works nights," she said. "Something really needs to be done here, because it's getting worse. We fear for our lives over here."No one is in custody, Estrada said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnNext inMidway, Chicago Lawn & AshburnCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.AUBURN GRESHAM — Damond Dawson and his friends wanted to grill in Foster Park on Sunday, but Dawson's cousin and former legal guardian, Tiffany Matthews, convinced the young men to revise their plans.Matthews told Dawson and his friends that it was too dangerous to be at the Auburn Gresham park, especially at night."I said, 'You can't be over there' and he knew that," Matthews said. "I told them they could barbeque here and they did."But Dawson, 23, did eventually go to Foster Park, 1440 W. 84th St. He was there with friends in the early hours of Tuesday morning shooting a rap video when at 2:19 a.m. someone came up and fired shots at the group, police said.Dawson was shot in the back of the head and died at the scene, police said. Four others were shot as well, according to police."Why they went over there, I'll never know," Matthews said of her cousin and his friends. "Out of all people we never thought it would never happen to him."Dawson, of the 1000 block of West 103rd Place, was at the park shooting a music video with a friend who reportedly goes by the rap alias Foreignlyfe.The rapper told reporters he heard "my homie say, 'Somebody's pulling up.'"We turned around and looked back. Quick as we looked back they started shooting," he said.The incident may have been captured on video. Matthews said police told another one of Dawson's relatives that they had the video and were using it in their investigation.Matthews said she didn't know the man filming the video but did say she knew many of the other people at the scene. She said it is her belief that the attackers were aiming for the rapper, since it was known that his video was being filmed at the park."I think he was involved," Matthews said of the rapper outside her Washington Heights home. "[Dawson] was at the wrong place at the wrong time."Dawson had plans to enroll at Olive Harvey to obtain his GED, Matthews said. When she last saw her cousin on Sunday, he was happy and talked about the job prospects he had lined up, Matthews said."He was a fine young man," Matthews said as she cried. "He had ups and downs, but that gang banging? He had nothing to do with that."Matthews said she lost an older cousin to gun violence about 20 years ago. But she said the family knew of his lifestyle and weren't particularly surprised by the news.This time, the family has been blindsided by Dawson's shooting death as Matthews struggled to describe her grief."That was totally different," she said. "This is unexplainable."Dawson was the only one from the shooting to die from his wounds, according to police.A 19-year-old woman was shot in her groin and was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in serious condition, Pacheco said.Three others were listed as "stable" at Advocate Christ Medical Center after the shooting: A 20-year-old man was shot in his leg and shoulder, a 25-year-old man had his left leg grazed by a bullet, and an 18-year-old man's back was grazed by a bullet, Pacheco said.The mass shooting has Auburn Gresham residents worried. Three squad cars remained at Foster Park into Tuesday afternoon.Lisa Lipscomb brought her two nieces and their two friends to the playground at Foster Park ON Tuesday afternoon. She said she heard about the shooting from her nieces' dad, who asked them to stay away from the park.But the girls were pleading with her to get out and run around, she said."It's worrying," she said. "Even though it's daylight and it's quiet, I know anything can happen. You start to look at every car."For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.WATCHVIDEOSFather shot to death in Long Beach; 3 injuredA Philadelphia man is charged with murder after shooting three people to death and seriously injuring a fourth before barricading himself inside his Kensington home this weekend.James Elijah Dickson, 46, is charged with three counts of murder, one count of attempted murder and related offenses forthe shooting that happened early Sunday morning at his home along the 600 block of E. Westmoreland Street, police said.Dickson called 911 to confess to the killings just before 4 a.m. Sunday and told the police dispatcher he was armed with a shotgun and wouldn't come out until "the sun comes up," police said.Breaking news and the stories that matter to your neighborhood.The Philadelphia Police SWAT unit was dispatched and eventually coaxed him out of his home around 5 a.m.Searching the home, police found the bodies of a woman and two men laying across the living room, dining room and kitchen, detectives said. All three were shot in the head.A fourth person, shot in the arm, was able to flee the house, police said. He was taken to Temple University Hospital in critical condition.The identities of two of those killed, the woman and one man, have yet to be released. Police identified the third deceased victim as 46-year-old Edwin Laboy.A motive for the shooting was not immediately known.A 27-year-old man is dead and four others, including a teenage girl struck while inside her home, were shot after an altercation resulted in gunfire on Detroit’s east side, police said Sunday.Police have a 23-year-old man in custody in the Saturday evening shooting and are looking for another man and the dark gray GMC Yukon the men are believed to have used, Detroit Police Officer Dan Donakowski said Sunday.The shooting took place just before 6 p.m. Saturday on the 9500 block of Oakland.Police say the two suspects got in an argument with a group of people, then pulled out guns and started shooting.The 27-year-old male was killed, while four others were hit none fatally, Donakowski said. Those victims are a 16-year-old girl, a 20-year-old man, a 48-year-old man, and a 26-year-old woman.The girl was not involved in the incident, Donakowski said. She was inside her home and was hit by a stray bullet.jdickson@detroitnews.comLocal staffLocal staffORLANDO, Fla.– Orlando police arrested on Friday two men in the April drive-by shooting deaths in Parramore.Lavon Shinn and Christopher Miller, both 24 years old, were charged in the deaths of Gino Nicolas and Tanya Skeen.The shooting was reported on Conley Street April 16 and was sparked by a fight at a nightclub. Police said Skeen, a 46-year-old mother of three, was putting away groceries inside her apartment when a bullet flew threw her window and hit her.Nicolas, 24, worked as the coordinator of the City of Orlando's My Brother's Keeper program, helping to reach at-risk youth and connect them to opportunity and successful futures.The Orlando Police Department said at a news conference Friday that they hope the arrests bring justice to the families."This case stood out because two truly innocent people were killed," said OPD Chief John Mina.Shinn and Miller face charges of first degree murder with a firearm, attempted first degree murder with a firearm, aggravated battery with a firearm, shooting from a vehicle, shooting into an occupied dwelling and criminal mischief.Copyright 2016 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.WATCHVIDEOSFour men were taken to the hospital after being shot near 84th Street and Towne Avenue in South Los Angeles on Sunday, April 10, 2016.Anniston police say four people were shot Saturday night during a motorcycle club event.According to a news release from Sgt. Shaun Firestone, the shooting happened about 9:15 p.m. during the Easy Riders Motorcycle Club's annual roll call, which took place at West 15th Street and Crawford Avenue.Shots rang out following an argument between people attending, as there was a "large crowd," Firestone said.Four people were struck, but none of the injuries were life threatening, police said. Bullets also struck a car and a nearby house."These cases are currently under investigation. Investigators are actively pursuing leads at this time," Firestone said.Police are asking anyone with information to contact investigators at (256) 240-4000.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesThere may be an issue with the delivery of your newspaper. 
				This alert will expire atNaN.Click here for more info.Recover passwordRegisterSuccess! —Manage subscriptionsShare.......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... ..........Blood and personal items remain in the front year of a house on the 2600 block of Mesa Drive SE after four people were shot and critically wounded early Saturday morning. (Marla Brose/Journal)When officers arrived at the house in the 2600 block of Mesa SE, they found one man who had been shot in the neck and several people, including three men who live at the house, still inside. One of the residents, Triston Whitmire, 19, was arrested Saturday and charged with four counts of aggravated battery with a deadly weapon. He was booked into the county jail on a $60,000 bond.Triston Whitmire, 19. (MDC)According to a criminal complaint filed in Metropolitan Court, Whitmire said he and his two roommates were having a party at their home when a couple of people he knew from the neighborhood showed up uninvited and began allowing others into the house. He told police he saw that one was armed so he tried to shut down the party.But, Whitmire said, he also put his own gun in his pocket.ADVERTISEMENTSkipWhitmire said he locked several people outside, but the would-be partygoers started kicking the door to get back inside and broke a window.He stayed in the house but began firing at them, according to the complaint.“As soon as the glass was shattered, Triston removed his firearm and fired through the recently broken glass,” the officer wrote in the complaint. “Triston fired at least four rounds outside.”Whitmire didn’t know anyone had been hit until officers told him, according to the complaint.Officers were dispatched to the house, which police say has a history of loud parties and gunfire, around 2:20 a.m. to find a man who had been shot lying in the front yard. The 23-year-old had been shot in the neck and was taken to the hospital in critical condition, the complaint says.A short time later, three more men showed up at the University of New Mexico Hospital. An 18-year-old had several gunshot wounds to his abdomen, leg and pelvic area, a 21-year-old had been shot in the left leg, and a 22-year-old had been shot in the right leg, according to the complaint.The scene outside the home midmorning Saturday showed signs of the abandoned party and bloodshed.The front door of the home was open and what appeared to be a shirt and a shoulder bag were left covered in blood in the yard. Five pickup trucks were parked in the front yard, and several other cars lined the streets.Three trails of blood could be seen leading away from the house in various directions, and the yard and nearby streets were littered with empty beer bottles, cans and liquor bottles.Lisa Gray, who lives nearby, said she awoke between 1 and 2 a.m. to hear her neighbors throwing a party.Gray said she heard the gunshots and looked outside to see two or three men walking down the street toward the party house. She said she could see the muzzle flashes as one of them began firing off several rounds. She called 911.“This guy was walking down the middle of the street; he pulls out a gun and shot into the crowd of people,” Gray said. “I just closed the door and got down.”Officer Simon Drobik, a spokesman for the Albuquerque Police Department, said he didn’t know if police are looking for other suspects or if they believe Whitmire is the only one who injured people.Digital Editor Robert Browman contributed to this report.Copyright © 2021 Albuquerque Journal | Albuquerque, N.M. | www.abqjournal.com$14/moSubscribeOther OffersAlready a subscriber? Sign InThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — Five people were shot and wounded while getting off a party bus in South Shore early Thursday, police said.At 2:09 a.m., the group was getting off a party bus in the 2200 block of East 70th Place when someone on the street opened fire, said Officer Ana Pacheco, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.The driver told reporters outside of Jackson Park Hospital that there were about 30 people on the bus celebrating a man's birthday.The driver said he was outside the bus helping passengers off and then heard at least 30 shots."As soon as the shots [were] fired, I went back into the bus. I turned around and a young lady was under the bus. She said she was shot," he said."While they was still shooting, I picked her up and put her on the bus and drove off" to Jackson Park Hospital, the driver said.He did not see who was shooting, said the driver, who declined to identify himself.Among the wounded are:• A 29-year-old man was shot in the right leg and taken to Northwestern Hospital.• A 22-year-old man was shot in the right hand and taken to Jackson Park Hospital.• A 22-year-old woman was shot in the right foot and taken to Jackson Park Hospital.• A 30-year-old man was shot in the right arm.• A 22-year-old man was shot in the chest and left leg and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital.The victims' conditions were not released, but they were all listed as stable, Pacheco said.No one was in custody.Next inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideNext inSouth Chicago & East SideCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Filed under:Four men were injured in a drive-by shooting Thursday afternoon in the Englewood neighborhood on the South Side.They were all shot at 4:09 p.m. in the 6800 block of South Throop when someone in a passing vehicle opened fire, according to Chicago Police.A 43-year-old man was shot in the abdomen and was taken in serious condition to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, police said.Two 30-year-old men suffered gunshot wounds to the foot and were taken to St. Bernard Hospital, where they were both listed in good condition, police said.Another 30-year-old man was shot in the hand and leg, and took himself in fair condition to Holy Cross Hospital, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — Four people were wounded in a West Side shooting on Friday, officials said.At 12:55 p.m., four people were shot in the 4500 block of West West End Avenue, said Officer Janel Sedevic, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.A Chicago Fire Department spokesman said multiple ambulances responded to the shooting and took four people to the hospital. Two of the victims were in serious-to-critical condition, and two were in good condition, the spokesman said.They were taken to Mount Sinai and Stroger hospitals.Next inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.MenuAn argument inside an apartment which escalated into a shooting left four people injured in southeast Denver late Friday night.The shooting happened at the Lowry Park Apartments off East Alameda Avenue and South Fairmount Drive, near the Fairmount Cemetery at around 11:30 p.m.Two people were shot, but their injuries are non-life threatening. Two others may have been possibly grazed by bullets, according to Denver police. Some of the victims were found by police outside in a courtyard.Neighbors could hear the commotion."I thought the initial shots I heard were on TV," said neighbor Stephen Boucher. "There's just confusion when you hear that ... you don't really know where it's coming from or what's happening ... then you start hearing people yelling and all the cop cars."It's unclear at this time if the shooting involved more than one suspect. Denver7 asked for a suspect description, but law enforcement was not able to provide one.This investigation is ongoing.---------Sign up for Denver7 email alertsto stay informed about breaking news and daily headlines.Or, keep up-to-date on the latest news and weather with the Denver7 apps foriPhone/iPads,AndroidandKindle.Or, keep up-to-date by following Denver7 onFacebook,InstagramandTwitter.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.AUSTIN — Four boys between ages 12 and 16 were wounded in a shooting on the West Side Monday night, police said.Around 8:50 p.m., the boys were walking in the 5700 block of West Washington Boulevard when a man walked up and shot at them, according to Officer Jose Estrada, a Chicago Police spokesman.Two of the boys, 14 and 15, were taken to Stroger Hospital, Estrada said. The 14-year-old was shot in his abdomen and the 15-year-old was shot in his right leg.The other two boys, 12 and 16, were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital with gunshot wounds in their abdomens, Estrada said.Police could not provide their conditions but said they were "stable."No one is in custody, Estrada said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.PLANTATION — A Spring Break party in a house packed with 400 people ended in gunfire that killed one man and wounded four others.Plantation police on Sunday afternoon said Serge Pierre Dumas, 28, was found dead inside the five-bedroom, two-story house in the 12000 block of Northwest Fourth Court.Four other people, three women and one man, were taken to Broward Health Medical Center in Fort Lauderdale with gunshot wounds, according to a news release issued by Plantation police Sunday afternoon.Up to three officers were near the front of the house responding to neighbors' complaints about noise and parking when the shots were fired at 11:37 p.m. Saturday, police said.The unidentified shooter escaped."The shooting was inside the house, and as soon as gunshots went off, people came pouring out of the house," said Detective Philip Toman. "It was chaotic."Toman said officers on the scene tried to get control of the situation, but some of the party guests were able to flee from the home at the end of a dead-end street in a semi-rural neighborhood.Dozens of others were ordered to line up, and according to guest Jalen Chapman, 17, ordered to put their hands in the air and marched east down the street toward Northwest 118th Avenue.Near that corner, police patted down some of those guests and asked for identification. Many were then taken to the Plantation Seventh-day Adventist Church less than a block away."We didn't know who the shooter was," said Toman, "and the officers were doing their best to pat people down, see that their hands were visible."Plantation police, assisted by officers from the Sunrise Police Department, questioned hundreds of people but collected little information, Toman said. "We still don't know who the shooter was," he said Sunday afternoon. "We are looking for better witnesses. They are not giving us any information."Davon Carter, 25, said he went to the party with Dumas. They were standing inside the house and had decided to go outside for air, he said. Carter said he was walking a few steps behind Dumas when "five or six shots" were fired.When he found Dumas, he was on the floor. "I watched my best friend die," said Carter. He said there had been no fights or signs of trouble at the party. "He was a random person," said Carter."He was the greatest up-and-coming artist that the world will never see," said Aisha Balkich, 23, the mother of Dumas' 15-month-old son Darian. She said Dumas performed hip-hop under the name Illy-Illz.One of the guests held at the church for hours after the shooting was Jalen Chapman, 17, a junior at Flanagan High School. He said he and his girlfriend were standing in the house's back yard when he heard gunshots."It was just crazy," Chapman said. "Everybody was trying to get out at the same time."Chapman and his girlfriend did make it out, but when he realized he had forgotten his cell phone, he returned to a scene that had grown even more chaotic, he said.After being questioned, he and many others were told they could leave but they could not take their cars, which were parked along Northwest Fourth Court and 118th Avenue.After several hours, some were permitted to leave in their vehicles, but others, including Chapman, called friends for rides and returned later Sunday to retrieve their cars.Chapman, along with another guest, Joshua Lewin, 18, said they found out about the party from postings on a social media. The affair was advertised as a Spring Break celebration, with a $5 cover charge for men, Lewin said.Students from several area high schools and colleges, as well as a few older people, packed the premises, including the house and a pool area in the back, guests said.Lewin, a student at Broward College, said he was in the crowded living room when he heard gunfire. Frightened, he and a friend ran upstairs and hid, he said.About 10 minutes later Lewis said he ran out the back door and into the yard, where he was told by police to get in line with his hands up.At the church, Lewis said he was asked questions such as, "Did you see the gunman?" and "Why do you believe this happened?" Lewin said he had no answers.Several guests said they didn't know who lived in the house.Toman said detectives interviewed a resident of the house, also its former owner. The house is now owned by Boss Group Ministries, according to Toman. Attempts to contact the company were unsuccessful Sunday."We'll be digging into that," said Toman, "but right now the focus is on catching the shooter."Toman said he suspects that some party guests may have seen the shooting, or have knowledge of what happened. "They are not very cooperative," he said. "Not one person can tell us who shot that gun. But as far as far I am concerned, someone in that room knows who shooter is and they need to come forward."Added Toman: "In my 27 years of police work, I have never seen a case like this."The wounded included Shamar Byfield, 21, of Pembroke Pines; Ashley Adamson, 16, of Miramar; and Sophia Hernandez, 18, of Hollywood, police said. Their conditions were not available Sunday night.Tahmya Phillips, 17, of Miramar, was hit in the legs and hip, according to her father, Army Command Sgt. Maj. Jeremy Burton.Burton, stationed at Fort Meade in Maryland, says he caught a red-eye flight to South Florida early Sunday after receiving a phone call just after midnight that his daughter, a senior at Somerset Academy High School in Pembroke Pines, had been shot."My reaction? Shock," Burton said.He accompanied another daughter, Makayla Phillips, 19, to the scene Sunday afternoon to pick up their car before returning to Tahmya's side in the hospital."The safety of my children is all I worry about," said Burton. "She is stable, she will recover. I just have to put all my faith in God."Police ask anyone with information to call Detective Toman at 954-797-2118 or Crime Stoppers at 954-493-8477.mwclary@tribune.comWETUMPKA – Two days after a drive-by shooting left two dead and two in critical condition, residents here are still coming to grips with what happened.Rico Thomas was walking Monday morning along Outhlacoochee Street near the South Shelby Street intersection where the shooting occurred."Man, it's bad," said Thomas, who lives in the neighborhood with relatives. "You don't expect bullets to be flying like that."Marcus Edwards is in custody in connection to the shootings and warrants were being drawn up Monday morning, said C.J. Robinson, chief assistant district attorney.Killed in the shootings were Daryl Hunt and Deosha Jackson, said Wetumpka Police Chief Danny Billingsley.Roderick Jones and Jacoreian Jennings were critically injured, the chief said.Frances Carter had lunch with friends Monday at Hog Rock BBQ. The shootings were the subject of conversation at her table."I don't know what this world is coming to," she said, shaking her head. "Shooting in a neighborhood like that. I'd like to know what was going through his mind."More information about the incident may come out this afternoon. Edwards is set to appear before Elmore County District Judge Glenn Goggans at 1:30 p.m.  It will be Edwards' first court appearance. Prosecutors are expected to discuss bond and Edwards will have the charges against him explained.The shootings took place at 3:30 p.m. Saturday.That matches with what a witness at the scene says happened.“It was a drive-by shooting,” said Minister Bruce Jackson on Saturday in a video interview with theMontgomery Advertiser. The shooting took place near his home at the intersection of Shelby and Outhlacoochee streets.“I didn’t know who the people was in the car because I was so quick going down myself to keep from getting shot,” said Jackson, as he was cleaning up at the scene.Photographer Mickey Welsh contributed to this reportATLANTA — Atlanta police are investigating a shootout at a nightclub that left five people injured.Police said the five victims were presumably innocent bystanders in a shooting outside Club Crucial.According to police, two groups were involved in an altercation inside the club located on Donald Lee Hollowell Drive in northwest Atlanta just after 12 a.m.Police said both groups were asked to leave, and then went outside to opposite sides of the parking lot.Shortly after, gunshots rang out, leaving four men and a woman shot. Police said the five victims are not believed to have been involved in the actual shooting.%%A second crime scene was located at the intersection of Peyton Ave Bellview Avenue. Police said a total of 64 casings with multiple calibers were recovered from both scenes. Five victims sustained gunshot wounds and were transported to Grady hospital with non-life-threatening injuries.“(I heard) like three to four different voices arguing. Then I heard two different female voices. Then it got quiet for a few seconds. Then is sounded like World War III,” Roman Kelly said.Kelly was parking cars in a lot next door to the club and said from the size of the bullet holes left in a car, and the sound, he thinks one of the guns may have been an automatic assault-style rifle.All of the victims were taken to Grady Memorial Hospital and are reportedly stable.The club has no known surveillance equipment and there are currently no cameras in the immediate area, police said.Four people survived a shooting at Brooks Park in Fort Myers on Sunday.Someone called 911 about 5:30 p.m. to report the shooting at the park just south of Page Field, according to a Lee County Sheriff's Office report."Upon arrival, multiple victims with injuries were located withing the park," the report said.Paramedics took the four people to a hospital.The sheriff's office has not announced any arrest connected to the shooting.Video surfaces of Cape cop throwing woman to the groundNorth Fort Myers woman's false report backfiresMan arrested at RSW trying to bring drugs on board planeOAKLAND (CBS/AP) — Gunmen fired shots into a moving party bus in West Oakland early Saturday, wounding four and leaving authorities stumped because passengers refused to cooperate with the investigation.The chartered executive limo bus was leaving San Francisco and had exited the Bay Bridge around 2:25 a.m. and was on the eastbound Interstate Highway 80 transition to southbound Interstate 880 when two gunmen in a red SUV drove alongside and opened fire, said California Highway Patrol Officer Daniel Hill.A fourth passenger sustained was hurt critically but was stable and is expected to survive. Three others had minor injuries.Interstate 880 was closed for roughly five hours as officers investigated.Passengers adamantly refused to give witness statements or provide descriptions of the shooters, authorities said.“In fact, they didn’t cooperate so much that one of our officers got assaulted and kicked by one of the victims,” Hill said.A female victim hit by a ricochet also got into an altercation with emergency medical personnel and forced her way out of an ambulance. She fled and her whereabouts are unknown.Investigators say the bus was occupied by couples but Hill could not provide an estimate of how many people were on the bus. He declined to release names and ages of the wounded.“I will say we don’t believe this is a random incident,” he said.The incident is the eighth freeway shooting in the East Bay since November. Officers have blamed the shootings on an escalating gang war in the Richmond area where six of the shootings have taken place.Freeways are appealing because there are fewer surveillance cameras and easy getaways.Hill said the CHP does not believe Saturday’s shootout is specifically related to the other freeway shootings.© Copyright 2016 The Associated Press. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributedDETROIT, MI - The Wayne County Medical Examiner's Office has identified two people killed ina drive-by shooting Friday afternoon on Detroit's west side.John Smith, 64, died of a gunshot wound to the chest. Jamil Goodwin, 43, died of multiple wounds, county spokesman Lloyd Jackson wrote in an email Saturday, March 12. Both deaths have been deemed homicides.Smith and Goodwin were outside a house about 3:30 p.m. Friday in the 2600 block of Hazelwood Street, near Linwood Street, when shots were fired from a Dodge Journey SUV, Detroit Police Officer Jennifer Moreno earlier reported.Two other men, ages 63 and 43, suffered non-fatal injuries, police said. Smith was pronounced dead at the scene. Goodwin later died of his wounds.Three men were inside the passing vehicle, traveling residential streets in broad daylight. No immediate arrests had been made.Anyone with information was encouraged to call the homicide unit at 313-596-2260 or 1-800-SPEAKUP.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFile photo of a Trenton Police Cruiser.TRENTON >> City police are seeking suspects in a shooting that left five injured Friday morning.Two men, and three women were reportedly shot around 2:21 a.m. in the first block of Oliver Avenue outside of an apartment building.Trenton Police Lt. Stephen Varn said that before the shooting started there had been a verbal altercation among a group of females. Shortly thereafter, a dark colored vehicle came into the area and two men stepped out of the car, Varn said. One of the men was armed with a handgun, it was unclear what the other man’s role was exactly. It was at that point when people began to flee the area before numerous shots were fired.A 22-year-old female suffered a graze wound; a 44-year-old male suffered a gunshot wound to the chest; a 44-year-old female was shot in the leg; a 41-year-old male was struck in the back, and a 24-year-old female was struck in the shoulder. The victims were taken to Capital Health Regional Medical Center for treatment.Varn said that all of the victims are expected to survive their injuries. The Shooting Response Team is continuing the investigation.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- The sign for a pedestrian cross walk reflects in a pool of cleaning solution along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive in Lafayette after four people were shot on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- The 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive is seen four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- Remnants of crime scene tape remain tied to a fence along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- A pedestrian cross walk is seen along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive in Lafayette after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- Remnants of crime scene tape remain tied to a fence along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- The sign for a pedestrian cross walk reflects in a pool of cleaning solution along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive in Lafayette after four people were shot on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- The 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive is seen four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- Remnants of crime scene tape remain tied to a fence along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- A pedestrian cross walk is seen along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive in Lafayette after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Advocate staff photo by BRAD BOWIE -- Remnants of crime scene tape remain tied to a fence along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive after four people were shot nearby on Monday afternoon.Four men were shot and injured Monday afternoon in Lafayette, according to the Lafayette Police Department.Three of the victims were transported to an area hospital with non-life threatening injuries and the fourth man refused medical attention, said Cpl. Paul Mouton, Lafayette Police Department spokesman.Responding officers determined several people inside a silver Ford F-150 pickup began shooting toward the victims as they walked along the 800 block of Martin Luther King Jr. Drive, Mouton said. The shooting happened about 1:20 p.m.Anyone with information about the crime or the shooters’ identities is asked to contact the Lafayette Police Department or the anonymous Crime Stoppers tip line at (337) 232-TIPS.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?FOX40by:CNN Wire(CNN) — An interstate manhunt ended early Wednesday near New Florence, Missouri, when police arrested a suspect wanted in five killings.Pablo Antonio Serrano-Vitorino, 36, was charged with four counts of first-degree murder after a shooting early Tuesday in Kansas City, Kansas. Police also sought Serrano-Vitorino in the death of a fifth man in a separate shooting across the state border in Missouri.“Anytime you have an individual that’s possibly responsible for five homicides, that’s a very serious incident,” said Sgt. Scott White of the Missouri State Highway Patrol on Wednesday morning. “We’re glad that we’re able to take him into custody.”After the two shootings, police sought Serrano-Vitorino for hours, releasing his photo to the public and deploying helicopters and about 100 officers in the search. Authorities described him as “armed and dangerous” and possibly carrying an AK-47.Around 1 a.m. Wednesday, the Missouri State Highway Patrol received a call from a man who said the suspect pulled a gun on him.When officers arrived on the scene, they found Serrano-Vitorino lying facedown in a ditch, White said. He surrendered without incident.“He was exhausted,” Sgt. James Hedrick from the highway patrol told The Kansas City Star.A rifle was taken from him, White said.Police had sought Serrano-Vitorino after the first shooting in Kansas in which three men died at the scene and a fourth one at a hospital. The victims’ identities are being withheld pending notification to their families.It’s unclear what prompted the shootings. Serrano-Vitorino lived next door to the home where the killings took place, CNN affiliate KCTV-TV reported.Later Tuesday morning, Missouri police responded to a call about a shooting and found the body of Randy J. Nordman, 49, at his rural Montgomery County home. The officers found Serrano-Vitorino’s truck at the residence, said Lt. Paul Reinsch of the highway patrol.There was no indication vehicles or anything else was stolen from the home or nearby properties, he said.Serrano-Vitorino has had previous run-ins with other agencies.He was deported to Mexico in 2004. It’s unclear when he returned to the United States, according to U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement.By September 15, ICE became aware Serrano-Vitorino had returned to the country illegally after he was fingerprinted at the Overland Park Municipal Court in Kansas.But ICE mistakenly issued a detainer for him to the wrong sheriff’s office. As a result of the error, Serrano-Vitorino was not taken into custody then.SubmitTrademark and Copyright 2021Cable News Network, Inc., a Time Warner Company. All rights reserved.As governors loosen long-lasting coronavirus restrictions, state lawmakers across the U.S. are taking actions to significantly limit the power they could wield in future emergencies.The legislative measures are aimed not simply at undoing mask mandates and capacity limits that have been common during the pandemic. Many proposals seek to fundamentally shift power away from governors and toward lawmakers the next time there is a virus outbreak, terrorist attack or natural disaster.(NEXSTAR) – Americans are proving remarkably reliable in how they are spending their federal stimulus payments.The New York Federal Reserve released a study this week that showed Americans are using most of the money for paying down debt and for savings, with a smaller portion going to actual spending.Ray Lambert, the Army medic who survived multiple wounds on D-Day and was saluted by a president on the World War II battle's 75th anniversary, died on Friday. He was 100.Lambert died at his home in Seven Lakes, North Carolina, with his wife and daughter by his side, said neighbor and friend Dr. Darrell Simpkins. The physician, who accompanied Lambert to France in June 2019, said the veteran succumbed to an aggressive form of facial cancer and congestive heart failure.A 16-year-old boy arrested on a murder charge in connection with a weekend shooting that killed a man and left six other people injured by gunfire in the Boston suburbs, faced a judge Tuesday.The suspect, identified as Emanuel Marrero in court, was ordered to be held without bail in the Chelsea shooting that killed killed 19-year-old Pablo Villeda.Marrero, who's from Lynn, faces a slew of charges including murder and armed assault with intent to murder. He's being charged as an adult.Police say the shooting happened early Sunday during a party in a vacant apartment. Seven other people were taken to the hospital with injuries not considered life-threatening. One of them had injuries unrelated to the gunfire.The surviving shooting victims are three females, ages 15, 17 and 18, and three males, ages 15, 18 and 22.The latest news from around the stateMarrero's next court date is April 8. He's being represented by Jonathan Sharpiro.KTLAby:Tracy BloomAuthorities responded to a multi-victim shooting in Compton on March 6, 2016. (Credit: OnScene TV)One man was killed and ten others were wounded in a shooting that took place at party in a Compton warehouse early Sunday morning, according to the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department.The deadly incident occurred in the 900 block of West Victoria Street just before 1:45 a.m., sheriff’s officials said in a news release.Sgt. Connor of the department’s Compton Station confirmed the shooting was a gang-related incident. He said the involved parties were shooting at each other, and it was not known whether any bystanders were hit by the gunfire.One man was rushed to an area hospital where he was later pronounced dead, the release stated. His identity has not yet been released.Ten other people were injured and transported for treatment, including eight who had sustained gunshot wounds. Their conditions were not immediately known, according to authorities.It was unclear what led up to the shooting. The Sheriff’s Department has not stated whether anyone was taken into custody, or where any shooters were outstanding.Homicide detectives were at the scene investigating the circumstances surrounding the incident. No further details were immediately available.Anyone with information was urged to call the department’s Homicide Bureau at 323-890-5500.Those who would prefer to remain anonymous have been asked to call Crime Stoppers by dialing 800-222-8477, texting the letters TIPLA plus a tip to 274637, or by going to the website http://lacrimestoppers.org.KTLA’s Geoff Peters contributed to this story.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.A 19-year-old man was convicted Wednesday of a gang-related shooting that killed a 7-year-old boy and injured his two younger siblings last year as they sat in a parked car outside a Near East Side convenience store.A Franklin County jury found Marctarius Grace guilty of one count of aggravated murder, three counts of attempted murder, three counts of felonious assault and one count of participating in a criminal gang, as well as multiple gun and gang specifications.He could be sent to prison for life with no chance of parole when he is sentenced by Common Pleas Judge Michael J. Holbrook on Sept. 11.De'Ontae Fisher was less than a month shy of his 8th birthday when one of the shots fired into the car struck him in the head on March 4, 2016, outside the Express Market, 900 E. Fifth Ave. Another bullet grazed the leg of his 5-year-old brother, and a piece of flying glass penetrated the arm of his 4-year-old sister. A fourth passenger, 19-year-old Rayquan Holloway, was shot in the buttocks."We're just glad justice was served for De'Ontae" and the other victims, Tammie Maxwell, the children's maternal grandmother, said after the verdicts were announced. "We're going to make sure the surviving children have the best life possible and that they don't forget their brother."She wiped away tears while remembering De'Ontae as a handsome boy who loved Spiderman and was "a wonderful artist." His brother and sister are in counseling, she said, and are "doing as well as can be expected. They're doing wonderful in school, honor roll students ... They just miss their brother."Grace, who did not testify during the trial, didn't react to the verdicts, but smirked as he watched the judge poll each juror to confirm the unanimous decision.All of the victims were in a car driven to the store by the children's mother, Judith Huntley. She and another adult passenger were inside the store when at least 11 shots were fired at the car.Although Grace's apparent target was Holloway, a legal doctrine known as transferred intent meant his intent to kill extended to anyone else who was struck. Thus, he was convicted of aggravated murder in De'Ontae's death and attempted murder and felonious assault for each of the wounded.Assistant Prosecutors Elizabeth Geraghty and Jason Manning presented evidence to establish that Grace got out of a white Nissan Murano that had been circling the store and fired into Huntley's Chevrolet Impala as part of a dispute with a rival gang. Testimony indicated that Grace was a member of the Trevitt & Atcheson Crips and was after two adults who were members of the Milo-Grogan Bloods.Two prosecution witnesses identified Grace as the shooter. One was an eyewitness who knew Grace by his nickname, "Pan." The other was a fellow gang member who said he heard Grace boasting about the shooting and how he "tore up" the Impala.Prosecutors also presented recordings of jail phone calls in which Grace both denied and seemingly admitted to the crime, saying it was in retaliation for the fatal shooting of a friend's sister."This was an ambush," Geraghty told jurors Tuesday in her closing argument.Defense attorney Karen Phipps argued that no physical evidence linked Grace to the crime and that the two witnesses who identified him weren't to be believed. The eyewitness didn't have a good view of the shooter, she said, and the fellow gang member admitted that he hoped his testimony would help him get a more lenient sentence in a federal case pending against him.Grace's name was one of two that were given to police at the scene, but "once (investigators) narrowed in on Grace, that's all they cared about," Phipps said. "This wasn't a complete investigation."Testimony indicated that the other person named was cleared after a Facebook post showed that he was in Portsmouth at the time of the shooting.The jury deliberated for several hours Tuesday afternoon before going home for the evening. One of the jurors had to leave on a trip at that point and was replaced with an alternate on Wednesday morning. The panel reached a verdict about 90 minutes after starting deliberations over with the new member.jfutty@dispatch.com@johnfuttyA 19-year-old man was convicted Wednesday of a gang-related shooting that killed a 7-year-old boy and injured his two younger siblings last year as they sat in a parked car outside a Near East Side convenience store.A Franklin County jury found Marctarius Grace guilty of one count of aggravated murder, three counts of attempted murder, three counts of felonious assault and one count of participating in a criminal gang, as well as multiple gun and gang specifications.He could be sent to prison for life with no chance of parole when he is sentenced by Common Pleas Judge Michael J. Holbrook on Sept. 11.De'Ontae Fisher was less than a month shy of his 8th birthday when one of the shots fired into the car struck him in the head on March 4, 2016, outside the Express Market, 900 E. Fifth Ave. Another bullet grazed the leg of his 5-year-old brother, and a piece of flying glass penetrated the arm of his 4-year-old sister. A fourth passenger, 19-year-old Rayquan Holloway, was shot in the buttocks."We're just glad justice was served for De'Ontae" and the other victims, Tammie Maxwell, the children's maternal grandmother, said after the verdicts were announced. "We're going to make sure the surviving children have the best life possible and that they don't forget their brother."She wiped away tears while remembering De'Ontae as a handsome boy who loved Spiderman and was "a wonderful artist." His brother and sister are in counseling, she said, and are "doing as well as can be expected. They're doing wonderful in school, honor roll students ... They just miss their brother."Grace, who did not testify during the trial, didn't react to the verdicts, but smirked as he watched the judge poll each juror to confirm the unanimous decision.All of the victims were in a car driven to the store by the children's mother, Judith Huntley. She and another adult passenger were inside the store when at least 11 shots were fired at the car.Although Grace's apparent target was Holloway, a legal doctrine known as transferred intent meant his intent to kill extended to anyone else who was struck. Thus, he was convicted of aggravated murder in De'Ontae's death and attempted murder and felonious assault for each of the wounded.Assistant Prosecutors Elizabeth Geraghty and Jason Manning presented evidence to establish that Grace got out of a white Nissan Murano that had been circling the store and fired into Huntley's Chevrolet Impala as part of a dispute with a rival gang. Testimony indicated that Grace was a member of the Trevitt & Atcheson Crips and was after two adults who were members of the Milo-Grogan Bloods.Two prosecution witnesses identified Grace as the shooter. One was an eyewitness who knew Grace by his nickname, "Pan." The other was a fellow gang member who said he heard Grace boasting about the shooting and how he "tore up" the Impala.Prosecutors also presented recordings of jail phone calls in which Grace both denied and seemingly admitted to the crime, saying it was in retaliation for the fatal shooting of a friend's sister."This was an ambush," Geraghty told jurors Tuesday in her closing argument.Defense attorney Karen Phipps argued that no physical evidence linked Grace to the crime and that the two witnesses who identified him weren't to be believed. The eyewitness didn't have a good view of the shooter, she said, and the fellow gang member admitted that he hoped his testimony would help him get a more lenient sentence in a federal case pending against him.Grace's name was one of two that were given to police at the scene, but "once (investigators) narrowed in on Grace, that's all they cared about," Phipps said. "This wasn't a complete investigation."Testimony indicated that the other person named was cleared after a Facebook post showed that he was in Portsmouth at the time of the shooting.The jury deliberated for several hours Tuesday afternoon before going home for the evening. One of the jurors had to leave on a trip at that point and was replaced with an alternate on Wednesday morning. The panel reached a verdict about 90 minutes after starting deliberations over with the new member.jfutty@dispatch.com@johnfutty© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Columbus Dispatch  ~ 62 E. Broad St. Columbus OH 43215~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Detroit police have released video and pictures of a man they say opened fire Sunday night outside a west side nightclub, striking five people.The video released Wednesday shows the suspect, whom investigators have described as a patron, firing shots into the crowd then fleeing from the scene in a white or gray Chevrolet Astro minivan.Police have said an argument between the patron and a 37-year-old female employee of the Penthouse Lounge, on the 8800 block of Livernois near Joy Road, started inside the club then spilled out onto the street. The man then pulled out a gun and started shooting about 11:30 p.m.The woman was grazed by a bullet and refused medical treatment on the scene. Four men who were hit — one 29 years old, another 52, two others 37 — were transported to a local hospital. None suffered life-threatening injuries, police said Wednesday.It was unclear if the men shot were club patrons or employees.Meanwhile, police are continuing to seek the suspect. He is described as African-American, 25-28 years old, 6 feet tall, weighing around 240 pounds, with a medium complexion, short Afro and scraggly beard. The man was last seen wearing all black.Detroit police are asking anyone with information on the shooting to call (313) 596-5240. Those preferring anonymity can call in a tip to Crime Stoppers of Michigan at 1-800-SPEAK-UP or use the DPD Connect app.Staff Writer Mark Hicks contributed.Suspect Ronald Hamilton.PRINCE WILLIAM COUNTY POLICEBy IAN SHAPIRA | The Washington Post | Published: September 26, 2018Staff Sgt. Ronald "Ronnie" Hamilton, a Pentagon IT specialist who shot and killed his wife and a newly sworn-in police officer, was found guilty Wednesday by a Prince William County jury of capital murder, making him eligible for the death penalty.Jurors will next decide whether Hamilton, 34, should be sentenced to life in prison or become the fourth person on Virginia's death row.Hamilton's crimes came during a 2016 domestic dispute with his wife at their Woodbridge home. The slain Prince William police officer, Ashley Guindon, 29, was among the officers who responded to a 911 call at the house.During the two-week trial, prosecutors depicted Hamilton as an adulterer and jealous husband who grew increasingly irate at his wife Crystal Hamilton, 29, a recovery care coordinator for wounded Marines. On Feb. 27, 2016, the couple started fighting after Crystal Hamilton said she was going out with girlfriends to a male entertainment club. Their then 11-year-old son Tyriq had just arrived home from a sleepover and began watching his parents argue.As the quarrel grew more intense, Hamilton threw his wife against a wall of her bedroom—their marriage had disintegrated so much that they had been sleeping in separate quarters. Crystal Hamilton called 911. Then, Tyriq heard three gunshots and his mom's screams go silent.As the boy fled the house, police arrived. Hamilton emerged at the doorway and fatally shot Guindon, a former Marine reservist who was deployed on her first weekend shift. Hamilton also shot and wounded two other cops, Jesse Hempen and David McKeown, both in their 30s. Guindon was shot in the back, Hempen in the leg, and McKeown in the chest, leg and groin. Prosecutors said it was lucky the other two officers survived. Eventually, Hamilton came out of his house peacefully and officers took him into custody.During opening statements, Ed Ungvarsky, one of Hamilton's attorneys said his client did not mean to kill any police officers and that he wasn't even aiming his weapon when he shot at them. As soon as he was arrested, Ungvarsky said, Hamilton started bawling and asking about whether the officers survived.Hamilton, who did not testify, has always acknowledged he was the shooter. Shortly after he was arrested, he told authorities that he'd deployed to Iraq twice and suffered post-traumatic stress disorder.During closing arguments, Ungvarsky, his attorney, asked jurors to convict Hamilton on any charge that's not capital murder to avoid the death penalty, according to the Associated Press. He said Hamilton did not kill Guindon or his wife with pre-meditation.Hamilton grew up in South Carolina and his father, also named Ronald Hamilton, was second-in-command for many years in the Charleston, South Carolina, police force before his retirement in 2001.article continues belowKSN-TVby:Kevin WhiteHESSTON, Kansas – Law enforcement officers responded to the scene of a workplace shooting at Excel Industries in Hesston Thursday afternoon with reports of multiple fatalities and people wounded.  The incident began about 4:40 p.m.Harvey County Sheriff T. Walton confirmed at a 9 p.m. news conference that four people were dead, including the shooter identified Friday as Cedric Ford, and 14 others were wounded. Ford was an Excel employee.VIDEO |Harvey County Sheriff 9 p.m. press conferenceOfficials say area hospitals received 12 victims. Six victims were transported to Via Christi Hospital.  Two victims are in critical condition and four victims are stable. Four victims were transported to Wesley Hospital. Officials say three are critical and one is in surgery.  Newton Medical Center received four patients.  All are in stable condition.PHOTOS |Shooting at Excel Industries in HesstonSheriff T. Walton said the shooting started in Newton at 12th and Meridian.  Two people were shot while driving their vehicles. One person was hurt.  The other person wasn’t.  Walton says the shooter continued north on Highway 81 where he shot another person in the leg after stealing a vehicle.“There was a report of a stolen vehicle. That vehicle was the person that got shot. The shooter went on into Excel Industries. Once he got to Excel Industries, he shot a person in the parking lot, and he entered into the building itself,” said Sheriff T. Walton. “Inside the building he shot a total of 15 people. Four were killed including himself, the shooter.”Walton said about 150 people were likely in the plant at the time of the shooting, and that the law enforcement officer who killed the suspect “saved multiple, multiple lives.” He said the gunman had an assault weapon and a pistol.The officer who killed the man is “a hero as far as I’m concerned,” Walton said.The incident lasted approximately 26 minutes from start to finish. Walton said the FBI and the Kansas Bureau of Investigation had been called in to assist.“We have a team of KBI coming in. I have the FBI coming in. We’ve got all the local law enforcement here, and this will take some time to work through this,” said Walton.After the incident, Walton said officers had identified a house where the suspect lived.  He said when officers attempted to enter the residence to conduct a search they were turned away.After a delay in securing a warrant to search the residence, officers discovered after 10 p.m. the residence the person who had turned them away apparently had left.  Officers then entered the residence to conduct their search.Officials are now working to identify all victims and notify their families.“We want to get the people who are so concerned that their loved ones have been shot or hurt. We want to get everybody identified, and we’re working on that. We’ll get that information out as soon as we can. I understand how hard it is for everybody else,” added Walton. “This is just a horrible incident. … There’s going to be a lot of sad people before this is all over.”Hesston is a community of about 3,700 residents about 35 miles north of Wichita. Excel Industries was founded in Hesston in 1960. The company manufactures Hustler and Big Dog mowing equipment and was awarded the Governor’s Exporter of the Year award in 2013 from the Kansas Department of Commerce.RELATED LINK |Eyewitness accounts of shooting at Excel IndustriesWe was, we were out back unloading pallets we heard a pop, pop and we thought it was metal falling on the ground.  Then the doors opened, people started screaming, coming out. Saying go to the front, go to the front, and then everyone turned around saying no he’s out front and everyone started going to the back right over here. Then me my boss and the other employee we work with was just standing back there. We really just didn’t know what was going on, and then everyone said there were gun shots and a shooter. We just kept hearing pop, pop, pop, and then this gentleman, I guess his name is Adam got shot.. I walked over and tried to help him as much as I could. He got shot twice in the chest, once in the arm, once in the leg. And I was just trying to help out the best I can. I mean I don’t even work for Excel/ I work for a different gentleman. We come up to Excel to pick up pallets and what not. I just wanted to help out the best I could and do what I could for him.”-Dylan, EyewitnessWhen I made it to the back parking lot, got to my truck and I was just panicking, crying, shaking, trying to get out of there because I didn’t know if he was going to come after me, or if there was more than one or what. I didn’t know. I didn’t know anything.”-Donna, EyewitnessI’ve seen a bunch of people running. They were yelling fire and we just took off running. Everybody was coming outside. There were gunshots, and this one guy got shot in the leg and he was walking. One of the Apexes got shot four times. Four other people I know got shot. It’s horrible. I had no idea what to do. We were hopping fences. Everybody was running, screaming. People were crying. We just didn’t know what to do. They started off by saying fire. We heard the gunshots and it wasn’t a fire.”-Jordan, EyewitnessPHOTO GALLERYMAP OF MULTIPLE CRIME SCENESCopyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.OVERLAND PARK, Kan. (AP) — A Johnson County judge has dismissed a lawsuit filed by a county commissioner over a school district's face mask mandate. Commissioner Charlotte O'Hara sued the Blue Valley school district after she was told she couldn't attend a hearing last week because she wouldn't wear a mask. O'Hara says she has a medical exemption from wearing masks. Blue Valley officials filed a motion Friday to have the lawsuit dismissed. They argued O'Hara did not have standing to sue the district. Johnson County District Judge Robert Wonnell agreed and dismissed the lawsuit. The district said Thursday it plans to continue requiring masks until the end of the school year.AUGUSTA, Ga. (AP) — About two dozen protesters turned out near Augusta National on Saturday, objecting to Georgia's new voting law during the third round of the Masters.The group held signs that said “Let Us Vote” and “Protect Georgia Voting Rights,” drawing both jeers and cheers from motorists on busy Washington Road.Severe weather caused major damage in Bay County Saturday morning. Here are some pictures and videos of the damage from around the area.Have pictures of the storm damage? Send them to us at news@wmbb.com.ByAssociated PressandJessica Chia For Dailymail.comPublished:20:36 EDT, 23 February 2016|Updated:17:57 EDT, 24 February 201658ViewcommentsGunman: Alex Buckner, 26, shot four of his family members before setting their Phoenix, Arizona home on fire before being killed by policeThis is the 26-year-old man who shot four of his family members and set their Phoenix, Arizona house on fire before he was killed by the police.Gunman Alex Arthur Buckner, pictured in an unrelated mugshot from Owasso police department in Oklahoma, then shot at authorities when they arrived at the blazing house and ran inside with breathing gear and fire hoses.Father Vic Buckner, 50, mother Kimberly Buckner, 49, died at the scene.The couple's two daughters, 18-year-old Kaitlin Buckner, and six-year-old Emma, were both rescued but later died in the hospital from gunshot wounds, police said.A tactical team stormed in after the gunfire died down and fatally shot Alex Arthur, police said.Kaitlin Buckner called 911 shortly before 5am, pleading for help and saying that her brother had shot her, Crump said, according toKTVK.The first officers on scene ran into the burning house because they felt they had to act quickly.'You have people that need you to come and rescue them, and you now have not only a fire, but somebody who's also firing a gun in there,' the police sergeant said.Officers searched for the rest of the victims, but they had to leave because the fire reignited in the attic, sending flames through a ceiling.Family members told investigators that Alex Buckner, who lived in the home, had been in rehab for drug abuse, but the shooting was out of character for him.Scroll down for videoOfficers searched for the rest of the victims, but they had to leave because the fire reignited in the attic, sending flames through a ceilingHappy family: Kaitlin Buckner (front), 18, poses for a selfie alongside his six-year-old sister Emma, just behind her, her mother Kimberly and her dad Vic. Police believe Alex Buckner used their father's gunQuick-thinking: Kaitlin Buckner, 18, pictured, called 911 shortly before 5am on Tuesday, saying her brother had shot her; the first officers on the scene ran into the house because they felt they had to act quicklyGunman Alex Arthur Buckner shot at at authorities, who arrived at the blazing house and ran inside with breathing gear and fire hoses (pictured Kimberly and Kaitlin Buckner)Police believe Alex used a gun belonging to his father, who ran a car lubrication business out of their home. Vic Buckner, 50, (pictured) died at the scene with Kimberly Buckner, 49,  along with their three childrenPolice believe Alex used a gun belonging to his father, who ran a car lubrication business out of their home.Authorities found the other victims after the fire was extinguished. They all suffered gunshot wounds, but a medical examiner will determine their causes of death, authorities said.Investigators will continue gathering evidence at the house, Crump said.The police have no record of ever having been called to the house before.Next-door neighbor James Graham said the family had lived in the home for about two years, and previously lived in Oklahoma. He said he chatted with them occasionally but they never mentioned any problems.Sammie Evans, who lives across the street, said Emma Buckner was learning how to write and would show Evans notes she had written. They would chat a bit before the girl went back to her house.'I used to call her Miss America. She was so sweet,' Evans said.Alex Arthur Buckner, 26, shot four of his family members before he set their Phoenix, Arizona, house on fireA tactical team stormed the house 45 minutes later after the gunfire died down, and fatally shot the gunmanFamily members told investigators that Alex Buckner, who lived in the home, had received treatment in Oklahoma for drug abuse, but the shooting was out of character for himRelatives toldABC15that Alex Buckner had a history of mental health problems, believing that he may have been diagnosed with schizophrenia.Police in Owasso, Oklahoma, where the family had ties, toldNewson6that Buckner had been arrested for public intoxication and shoplifting in the city.'How does a family talk about a grandson who had mental problems, yet not be angry for the grief that he caused?', asked Diana Buckner, Alex's grandmother.Phoenix Mayor Greg Stanton was at the scene after crews tamped down the fire and praised the police and firefighters for their courage.He said: 'This is what heroes look like. Their professionalism and their heroism under the worst possible conditions has truly blown me away.'The chaos woke up residents in surrounding houses, forcing some to evacuate just before dawn.Yolanda Strayhand, who lives behind the burned home, said her elderly mother woke her up after hearing gunfire.Strayhand went outside and said her front yard looked like a movie scene, with lights and noise from several fire engines, SWAT officers and a helicopter.She said: 'We were approached by a lady firefighter who said: "There's a live shooter."'She got a glimpse of the back of the home engulfed in flames.'Every room on the top floor was lit, and they were pointing guns toward the basement,' she said.An officer came by and told her to leave. Strayhand gathered clothes, medications and her mother's walker, and they both evacuated the scene.Three officers were treated for smoke inhalation.Sammie Evans, who lives across the street, said Emma Buckner was learning how to write and would show Evans notes she had written. Pictured, a police officer at the scenePhoenix Mayor Greg Stanton (pictured, center) called it an 'unspeakable violence' but praised police (right) and firefighters for their courage. He said: 'This is what heroes look like'A neighbor said her front yard looked like a movie scene, with lights and noise from several fire engines, SWAT officers and a helicopter (pictured, officers investigating the scene)Published by Associated Newspapers LtdPart of the Daily Mail, The Mail on Sunday & Metro Media Group© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Daytona Beach News-Journal Online  ~ 901 6th Street, Daytona Beach, FL 32117~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Tony Bailey, 21, Jerrod Corley, 24, and Leroy Coleman, 20, are accused of killing Emma Wallace, 37, in a drive by shooting on I-270 in Hazelwood. Credit: Hazelwood PDJohn Howard Stith, 20, is facing first-degree murder charges in connection to deadly shooting along I-270Tony Bailey, 21, Jerrod Corley, 24, and Leroy Coleman, 20, are accused of killing Emma Wallace, 37, in a drive by shooting on I-270 in Hazelwood. Credit: Hazelwood PDJohn Howard Stith, 20, is facing first-degree murder charges in connection to deadly shooting along I-270HAZELWOOD, Mo. (KMOV.com) – A fourth man is facing charges in connection to adeadly shooting that took place along Interstate 270 in HazelwoodSunday, February 21.John Howard Stith, 20, joins Tony Bailey, 21, Jerrod Corley, 24, and Leroy Coleman, 20, who were arrested and charged Friday, five days after Emma Wallace, 37, was shot and killed near North Lindbergh Boulevard. They face charges of first-degree murder, unlawful use of a weapon and multiple counts of assault and armed criminal action.Wallace was inside a vehicle with three other people when the drive-by shooting happened around 2 a.m. Sunday. She had just been with friends at Jay's Classic Bar and on north Lindbergh before the shooting.Police believe the shooting stemmed from a long running personal dispute."A confrontation, a disagreement. Something that was spurred from an event that happened between two people within the last year," said Hazelwood Police Chief Greg Hall.Two other victims, a man and woman, were listed in serious condition, and another man was released from the hospital after the shooting.Authorities believe Colemancarjacked a woman and three childrenon the Schnucks parking lot in Central West End only a few days before the shooting.Two of the suspects are cooperating with officers, police said.Copyright 2016 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reservedJEFFERSON COUNTY, AL (WBRC) - A man is charged with murder and the attempted murder of another man following ashooting over drugs near Bessemer.The shooting happened on Feb. 20 in the 200 block ofElm StreetSouthwest.Mario Desmond, 28, is charged with the shooting death of 37-year-old William Lewis.Jefferson County Sheriff's investigators say several men were in a vacant lot drinking and smoking marijuana when an argument happened because of of the men would not return the marijuana to the owner.Four men ranging in age from 28-45 were hit by bullets.Desmond pulled a gun on Lewis, then Lewis pulled his own gun and the two started shooting at each other, according to sheriff's deputies.Lewis was hit and died at the hospital. Desmond was also hit, but only sustained a minor injury.Desmond is in the Jefferson County Jail. His bond is set at $135,000.Copyright 2016WBRC.All rights reserved.1720 Valley View DriveBirmingham, AL 35209(205) 322-6666A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.ORLANDO, Fla. — Four people were shot Saturday night as a Parramore grocery store was robbed, the Orlando Police Department said.Roy Stephens, 34, shot four people shortly before 9 p.m. as he robbed Tip Top Groceries on South Parramore Avenue and West Anderson Street, said Orlando police Sgt. Wanda Ford.“Witnesses were able to provide a description of the suspect's vehicle,” Ford said. “And the suspect was located and placed under arrest in the area of Long Street and South Lee Avenue.”One person was critically wounded, and the three others are in stable condition.None of the victims were publicly identified.“One of our K-9 dogs was injured during the apprehension, but he is doing OK,” Ford said. “Great teamwork by the all the officers to get this bad guy off the street.”A 13-year-old girl said she watched Stephens walk into the store.“He came in the store quietly,” she said. “Then he went behind the counter, and he had the gun in his hand.”The girl said she then saw Stephens fire the gun.“I was just nervous. I was panicking. I didn't know what to do,” she said "I [froze] at first, but then I ran out [of] the store so he wouldn't see me."Stephens was brought to Florida Hospital South for possible drug intoxication and for observation, Ford said.He was booked into the Orange County Jail, where he was charged with robbery, possession of a firearm by a convicted felon and four counts of attempted murder.VALLEJO (CBS SF) — One person was killed and three others were injured in a shooting on Porter Street in Vallejo Friday afternoon, a police lieutenant said.The shooting happened around 3:50 p.m. in a residential area at Porter and McLane streets. One of the injured who went to a hospital is a nine-year-old child. The adult victim was dead at the scene.The child had a head wound that police believe was caused by a bullet. One of the adults injured was wounded in the hand. Police said the injured were expected to survive.The victims were found in a black Monte Carlo in a driveway at 509 Porter Street and the suspects drove by and fled in a maroon sedan, according to Lt. Kevin Bartlett.Vallejo shooting Feb. 19  (CBS)TM and © Copyright 2016 CBS Radio Inc. and its relevant subsidiaries. CBS RADIO and EYE Logo TM and Copyright 2016 CBS Broadcasting Inc. Used under license. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. Bay City News contributed to this reportPASS CHRISTIAN, MS (WLOX) - Police have confirmed that arrest warrants have been issued for multiple individuals involved in a deadly parade shooting in Pass Christian on Feb. 7.According to Pass Christian Police Chief Timothy Hendricks, direct arrest warrants were issued and the following people are in custody:Although the suspects have been taken into custody, the investigation is ongoing. Hendricks notes that there is a possibility that additional individuals may be named and charged. Anyone with information is asked to contact PCPD at 228-452-3301 or atinvestigations@ci.pass-christian.ms.us.Copyright 2016WLOX. All rights reserved.208 DeBuys RoadBiloxi, MS 39531(228) 896-1313A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.The night at Glitz Ultra Lounge ended with two people dead and another eight injured, half of them described by police as innocent bystanders who had nothing to do with the alleged gang fight in front of them.But it started with an attempt at a peace offering, according to court proceedings Tuesday.The Feb. 7 shooting at Glitz, a now-defunct club on Universal Boulevard, left two dead: Joseph Villalobos, 22, and Jonathan Avila Rojas, 33. In a bond hearings for two of the four suspects Tuesday, police for the first time publicly described what led to their deaths.The people involved were allegedly members of two rival gangs with ties to Puerto Rico: Los Lobos, of which Villalobos was allegedly a member; and Los Alqaedas, which police said counted Avila Rojas as a prominent member.The two groups had been feuding because of rumors that a member of one had ratted out a member of the other in exchange for a lighter sentence in a federal case. That night, both groups were at Glitz: Los Lobos on an upstairs balcony and Los Alqaedas downstairs, Orlando police Detective Teresa Sprague said in court Tuesday.Christian Castro-Cotto, who was upstairs with Los Lobos, saw members of Los Alqaedas and started raising his arms at them, as if to challenge them, Sprague said.Avila Rojas, who was standing by the bar, saw Castro-Cotto and decided he did not want things to get violent that night. He grabbed Joseph Villalobos' brother and asked him to get the leader of Los Lobos down so they could talk and smooth things over.The leader came down with nine other people. Luis Gadiel Cruz-Nazario, 21, and Carlos Perez De Armas, 22, who were both armed, stood on either side of Avila Rojas, Sprague said. Police do not believe Avila Rojas was armed, possibly because he had a federal criminal record, and think the other two may have been assigned to protect him.Castro-Cotto approached Cruz-Nazario with a drink in his hand, Sprague said."Que paso?" Castro-Cotto said — "what's happening?"Cruz-Nazario responded: What do you mean, what's happening?Instead of responding, Castro-Cotto took his glass and smashed it into Cruz-Nazario's face, video evidence shows. Cruz-Nazario later told police he thought he had been shot because of the force.Cruz-Nazario allegedly pulled out his gun and started to fire, in retaliation. Perez De Armas saw him and fired his gun as well, police said.Members of Los Lobos fired back. By the end, two people were killed, four alleged gang members were injured, and four innocent bystanders, three women and one man, were hurt as well.Orlando police arrested four people in June on second-degree murder charges: Castro-Cotto, Cruz-Nazario, Perez De Armas and Jose Angel Hernandez.Castro-Cotto and Perez De Armas, who were being held on no bond in Orange County Jail, had bond hearings Tuesday.Castro-Cotto's attorney argued that he did not have or fire a gun during the incident and should be entitled to a bond. Circuit Judge Alicia Latimore granted him a $65,000 bond, but withheld her decision on whether to allow Perez De Armas' release until she could review more evidence.The other two suspects in the shooting were already been released from jail.Cruz-Nazario was released on his own recognizance in August because of a procedural issue — he was arrested twice on different charges stemming from the same Glitz incident, court records show. Less than a month later, he was shot killed in a Belle Isle. Officials with the Orange County Sheriff's Office, the investigating agency, have not said whether his killing was related to the Glitz shooting.Jose Angel Hernandez was released on a $20,000 bond Aug. 22. He is still awaiting trial.glotan@orlandosentinel.comor 407-420-5774RecommendedThe DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.ENGLEWOOD — Four teens were wounded in an Englewood shooting on Sunday, police said.At 5:53 p.m., the teens were on a porch in the 6500 block of South Green Street when they were shot, said Officer Ana Pacheco, a Chicago Police spokeswoman.An 18-year-old shot in his leg and taken to Stroger Hospital where he was listed in "stable" condition, Pacheco said.A 17-year-old who was shot in her lege and taken to Stroger Hospital where she is listed in "stable" condition, Pacheco said.Two 15-year-olds were also wounded in the shooting. The first, who was shot in his leg, was taken to St. Bernard Hospital where he is listed in "stable" condition. The second, was shot in his chest and in both legs and was taken to Comer Children's Hospital where he is listed in "stable" condition.One of the victims is in documented gang member, police said.No one is in custody, Pacheco said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.LOS ANGELES (CBSLA.com)— Homicide detectives Sunday investigated the circumstances surrounding a shooting that claimed the life of an adult man and wounded three other people.According to the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department, deputies were sent shortly before 9 p.m. Saturday to the 12800 block of Cook Street for report of an assault with a deadly weapon.Upon their arrival, authorities discovered an unknown suspect shot at three adult men and one female juvenile.“The first victim, a male Hispanic adult, was found laying on the sidewalk with multiple gunshot wounds to the torso,” said Deputy Juanita Navarro-Suarez. “He was pronounced dead at the scene.”The coroner’s office has not yet released the man’s identity.The three other victims were transported to a hospital with non-life threatening conditions. An update on their conditions was not immediately available.At this time, no suspect description has been provided.The investigation is ongoing as the motive for the shooting remains unclear.Anyone with information regarding this incident has been urged to contact the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department’s Homicide Bureau at (323) 890-5500.APOPKA, Fla. — Apopka police are investigating after four people checked themselves in to the hospital with gunshot wounds Saturday morning.Officers responded to the area of 10th Street near Central Street in South Apopka just after 1 a.m. for reports of shots fired.There was nothing at the scene when they arrived, but officers later got calls about the shooting victims who had gotten themselves to Florida Hospital in Apopka.The victims were all transported to Orlando Regional Medical Center to be treated and are expected to survive their injuries.Police have not released any information about the identities of the victims or possible suspects.TAMPA, Fla. (AP) — A second victim has died as a result of a shooting at a Tampa strip club.Tampa police announced in a news release Tuesday that 20-year-old Christopher Houston died late Monday from injuries suffered in the shooting at Club Rayne.Marvin Douglass Lancaster III died at the scene, and six others were being treated at local hospitals Saturday, with injuries ranging from minor to very serious.Crime Stoppers of Tampa Bay is offering a reward of up to $3,000 for information leading to the identification and arrest of a suspect.No arrests have been made.An unrelated shooting at a Club in Orlando on Sunday killed two and injured 10.Four people were shot and wounded Wednesday night, including two juveniles, during a incident on a residential block of Anacostia in Southeast Washington, D.C. police said.Authorities found the victims at the intersection of 16th and Butler streets SE after police responded for a shooting just before 9 p.m., said Officer Hugh Carew, a spokesman. All the victims were taken to hospitals with wounds that were believed to be non-life threatening, police said.Officials said the victims were two men and two juveniles; one was a male and the other a female. According to preliminary reports, the victims were wounded in their extremities.Police released no details immediately about what might have led to the gunfire.MenuPolice have identified three young adults who were killed aftershots were fired at a house partywhere five others were wounded, and a group of suspects are still at large.Glendale police said a shooting at a home near 67th and Missouri avenues occurred around 3:30 a.m. on January 30. Sean Marquez, 19, of Glendale, Jose Aguirre-Martinez, 19, of Scottsdale, and a 16-year-old from Phoenix were killed when they were shot at. The name of the 16-year-old is not being released because he is underage.Upon arrival, police found a large party filled with teenagers and young adults. They suspect as many as 80 to 100 teens attended the party. According to the investigation, a group of five Hispanic men were involved in a verbal altercation inside the home with party goers, and they were asked to leave. As the group of men left the house, they continued arguing in the front yard. One of the men, who was described as being in his late teens to early 20s, entered an older, white 4-door sedan. The group of men entered the vehicle, drove down the street, turned around, and as they drove past the home at a high rate of speed opened fire, striking several individuals who were both outside and inside the home.At the scene, police located two other individuals who were wounded by gunfire, a 15-year-old girl and a 19-year-old man who were both released from the hospital as of Sunday.Since the shooting, police learned three other individuals who were at the party also sustained gunshot injuries, bringing the total up to eight individuals who were struck by gunfire. Two 17-year-old boys and a 16-year-old boy were shot as the suspect vehicle fled the scene. All three left the scene prior to police arriving; their injuries were non-life threatening and they did seek out medical attention on their own.Police don't know how many shooters were involved in the incident, however they do believe there was more than one. Officials have not been able to locate any suspects or the vehicle that was used during the shooting.Anyone with information is encouraged to contact the Glendale Police Department at (623) 930-3000 or Silent Witness at (480) WITNESS.Report a typoCHESAPEAKE — Police have identified the fifth person believed to have been shot and killed by a 26-year-old Chesapeake man as the gunman's paternal grandmother.The woman was positively identified as Doris Dooley, 74, of the 1400 block of George Washington Hwy, police said in a news release Friday.No further information has been released.Previously, Jan. 28, 2:30 p.m.Police believe a 26-year-old Chesapeake man killed five members of his family and then shot and killed himself.The gunman was identified as Cameron Dooley, of the 1400 block of N. George Washington Highway in Chesapeake. Dooley is the son of retired Chesapeake Police Officer Steven "Todd" Dooley, who was one of five killed Wednesday night or Thursday morning, police spokeswoman Kelly O'Sullivan said in a news release.Steven "Todd" Dooley, 50; Lori Dooley, 54; Landon Dooley, 22; and Brooke Dooley, 17; of the 2300 block of Wildwood Road were identified as victims of the deadly shooting. A fifth victim, an adult female, has not yet been positively identified, O'Sullivan said.All six people suffered gunshot wounds, she said.Landon Dooley was found dead by police at his residence shortly after 3:30 Wednesday. While investigating the death, police were led to a residence in the 1400 block of N. George Washington Highway about 7 p.m., O'Sullivan said.There, police found his brother, Cameron Dooley, who was armed inside the residence. Officers negotiated with him for several hours before they were able to enter the home, O'Sullivan said. They found the others dead inside the home just after 2 a.m. Thursday, she said.No additional information about the incident has been released.Previously: Jan. 28, 11 a.m.Chesapeake police said six people have died following a murder-suicide Wednesday.About 3:35 p.m., officers were dispatched to the 2300 block of Wildwood Road in order to check on the welfare of an individual, said Master Police Officer Kelly O'Sullivan.Upon arrival, police found one person dead inside.Further investigation led officers to a home near the intersection of George Washington Highway and Wintergreen Drive, where they encountered an armed person barricaded inside, O'Sullivan's said.After negotiating for several hours, officers entered the home and found the person dead along with four others.Everyone who died appeared to be related and killed by the person police negotiated with, police said.Police have not released additional information at this time.James Taafulisia, 17, and Jerome Taafulisia, 16, accused of the deadly shooting in The Jungle, will face murder charges in adult court. Their 13-year-old brother will be prosecuted in juvenile court. The boys had tumultuous childhoods with drug-dealing parents, court records say.The three teenage brothers charged with murder and assault in connection with last week’s deadly shootings in The Jungle have had tumultuous childhoods marked by family upheaval and drug-dealing parents, according to court records.The King County Superior Court records indicate the family moved to the Seattle area from California in 2002 when the two older boys were preschoolers and the youngest still a baby. But their father has a criminal history here that dates to the mid-1990s, the records show.The brothers are all wards of the state and each was wanted on a “run warrant” for leaving various placements by the state Department of Health and Social Services (DSHS) when they were arrested Monday, King County Prosecuting Attorney Dan Satterberg said during a Thursday news conference.All three boys were each charged Thursday with two counts of first-degree felony murder and three counts of first-degree assault, Satterberg announced. Each charge also carries a firearms enhancement.The older boys, James Taafulisia, 17, and Jerome Taafulisia, 16, will be prosecuted in adult, or superior, court “due to the seriousness of the crimes,” Satterberg said.The teens both face potential prison sentences of 90 to 113 years if convicted as charged, but because they are under 18, a state law passed two years ago would require that their sentences be reviewed after they serve 20 years, Satterberg said.The third brother, 13, will be prosecuted in juvenile court on the same charges, Satterberg said. Though his older brothers are the suspected shooters, Satterberg said the younger boy was a “full participant” in the alleged crimes. If convicted, prosecutors will seek to have him held in juvenile confinement until he is 21, he said.The Seattle Times generally does not identify juvenile suspects unless they are charged as adults.The Taafulisia brothers are accused of opening fire on a group of people at the homeless encampment south of downtown Seattle on Jan. 26 to settle a $500 drug debt owed to their mother, Seattle police allege.Witnesses identified the Taafulisia brothers to police, who then employed informants to record conversations in which they acknowledged the shooting, police say. The brothers also sold a .45-caliber handgun, one of two weapons used in the shootings, to an informant, police say.Satterberg said the investigation will determine whether the boys’ mother could face criminal liability in The Jungle shootings. She’s regarded as a “crucial witness,” he said.“The investigation into her role in this is continuing,” he said. “There’s a lot of work that still needs to be done.”When Satterberg was asked Thursday about the drug-debt motive, he said that investigators “don’t have solid evidence for that theory.”The mother’s parental rights were terminated, but Satterberg did not know when that happened. A DSHS spokeswoman said the agency is unable to release details about the boys’ cases because of federal privacy laws.The boys’ father is a reputed gang member and methamphetamine dealer who is now serving a 4 ¼-year prison term for a variety of crimes committed between 2011 and 2014, according to court records and the state Department of Corrections.As of 2013, he owed his sons’ mother — as well as the mother of his two older daughters — a combined $75,000 in unpaid child support, the records say.The boys’ mother, who completed drug court in 2008 after her arrest four years earlier for selling crack cocaine in Occidental Park, accused her children’s father of being violent and threatening to kill her in a protection-order petition filed in 2003, court records say.The couple also have a 12-year-old daughter together who has lived with an aunt and uncle for the past few years, the records say.According to charging documents, the boys’ mother was pulled over in a traffic stop at the same time her sons were being arrested by a SWAT team on Monday at a homeless camp.She told detectives that on the day of The Jungle shooting — her 37th birthday — her older boys told her they were planning to do a “lick,” street slang for a robbery, on a drug dealer known as “Phats,” the charges say. But she didn’t think they were serious and told them not to do it, according to the charges.“She also admitted that she and her sons had lived in The Jungle for a short time before moving out of there in the last year,” say the charges.Satterberg said the boys were familiar with The Jungle and were able to move freely around the homeless encampment.He said he didn’t know where they were living at the time of the shootings since they moved between various motels and homeless-camp sites.Killed in The Jungle wereJeannine L. Zapata, 45, and James Quoc Tran, 33, who had reportedly gone to The Jungle to visit friends. Three others — a man and two women — survived and remain hospitalized. Tran was shot twice with the .45, while Zapata — who also went by the last name Brooks — was found dead in a tent, shot once with the. 45 and once with the .22, Satterberg said.One witness said the shooters were apparently afterdrugs and cashand had targeted a homeless man known as “Phats.”The three surviving victims were interviewed by detectives at Harborview Medical Center. Two couldn’t identify a gunman from a police-photo montage but one man picked James Taafulisia as the suspect who “pulled the trigger” and shot him, the charges say.Police allege James Taafulisia was armed with a .45-caliber handgun and Jerome Taafulisia carried a .22-caliber handgun when they went to the camp just after 7 p.m. Jan. 26, charging papers say. The 13-year-old brother also told the informants he was at The Jungle during the shootings.Police say the Taafulisia brothers took about $100 worth of black-tar heroin and $200 or $300 in cash.During the news conference, Seattle Assistant Police Chief Robert Merner said investigators also are looking into the brothers’ possible connection to a string of violent crimes in the Sodo neighborhood.Satterberg said the .45-caliber handgun used in the shootings had been stolen in a 1976 burglary in Seattle. When the boys were arrested, police recovered marked “buy money” used by the informant to purchase the gun from the 13-year-old, he said.The second weapon, a .22-caliber handgun, was found in the brothers’ tent after their arrest Monday at an encampment near Fourth Avenue South and Royal Brougham Way, Satterberg said. The weapon’s serial number is illegible, making it difficult to trace, he said.The shootings have added a sharp edge to the city’s dialogue over how to confront homelessness, recently highlighted by Mayor Ed Murray’s declaration of a state of emergency.“It’s time to envision a Seattle without The Jungle,” Satterberg said during Thursday’s news conference.Satterberg said conditions in The Jungle are “highly unsanitary” and dangerous.“It’s worse than Third World conditions,” where crimes are “vastly unreported.”Trending:Hector Fernando CarvajalRiverside County Sheriff's Department released this surveillance video screen shot of what officials called a "person of interest" in the Jan. 25 shootings at a downtown Perris restaurant that left one man dead and four others wounded.A candle sitting outside the fenced patio at Nayarit Restaurant in downtown Perris was the only hint Jan. 27  that a deadly shooting had occurred there two days earlier.Updates with not-guilty pleaA fugitive murder suspect accused of opening fire at a Perris restaurant in January was arrested last weekend as he tried to re-enter the United States, authorities said.Hector Fernando Carvajal, 48, of Riverside, pleaded not guilty Thursday, Sept. 8, to one charge of murder and four of attempted murder for theJan. 25 shooting at Nayarit Mexican restaurantin downtown Perris. He also faces five enhancements, which could lengthen his prison sentence if he’s convicted, that he used a firearm to cause great bodily injury.Court documents identify the dead man as Pedro Murillo-Martinez and the other victims as Juan Becerra, 25, who was shot once in the abdomen; Jose Contreras, 35, shot twice in the abdomen; Ramon Duran, 58, shot once in the face; and Fabian Flores, 18, shot once in his right foot.Carvajal was arrested Saturday by the U.S. Customs and Border Protection agency at an undisclosed location and transferred to Riverside County, where he was booked into jail Monday, Sept. 5. He remains at the Southwest Detention Center, with bail set at $5 million.His arraignment was originally scheduled for Wednesday, but it was delayed because he wasn’t medically cleared to appear in court. The nature of his medical issue was not available.Sheriff’s deputies were called to the Nayarit restaurant at 140 S. D St. about 1 a.m. Jan. 25 and found five males who had been shot.Days later, investigators released a screen grab of a manthey described as a person of interest.What they didn’t say, but is disclosed in court records, is that the homicide was caught on the restaurant’s surveillance cameras. The restaurant’s owner recognized the shooter as someone he knew only as “Fernando,” as did witnesses to the shooting.The shooter frequented the restaurant multiple times a week, according to an arrest warrant issued Feb. 8 and also not previously disclosed by authorities.The witnesses did not hear any argument before the shooting, and did not recognize the victims as regular customers.Investigators located a family member, who said she had not seen Carvajal since a few days after the shooting, and denied knowing about the incident, according to court records.They also tracked down a friend of Carvajal and seized a jacket that belonged to him and was identical to one worn by the shooter in the restaurant video.If investigators have determined what Carvajal’s motive may have been, they didn’t say in court documents.The Sheriff’s Department did not release details about the shooting until almost 36 hours after it happened; a spokesman said detectives were concerned about jeopardizing the investigation if information were released.The victims’ names were not publicly disclosed until the arrest warrant was issued Feb. 8.PREVIOUS COVERAGE:1 killed, 4 others injured in shooting at Perris restaurantNeighbors shocked by Perris restaurant shootingPerson of interest sought in Perris restaurant slayingGet the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.View more photos »Jan. 25, 2021Stephawn Jouner, a 29-year-oldBlackmale, died Friday, Jan. 8, after beingshotnear 7501 S. Main St. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Stephawn Jouner? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.March 16, 2021Eduardo Mendoza, a 31-year-oldLatinomale, died Friday, Dec. 25, after beingshotnear 7918 San Pedro St. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Eduardo Mendoza? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Jan. 5, 2021Evan Richard Sims, a 58-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Dec. 8, after beingshotnear 343 W. Gage Ave. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Evan Richard Sims? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 16, 2020Tremaine Devonte Hijazi, a 37-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Nov. 24, after beingshotnear 321 W. 74th St. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Tremaine Devonte Hijazi? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Dec. 16, 2020Ernesto Rios, a 19-year-oldLatinomale, died Saturday, Nov. 21, after beingshotnear 342 W. 75th St. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Ernesto Rios? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Oct. 30, 2020Michael Bradley, a 27-year-oldBlackmale, died Tuesday, Oct. 6, after beingshotnear East 80th & San Pedro streets inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Michael Bradley? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.Aug. 29, 2020Phi Huu Nguyen, a 56-year-oldAsianmale, died Wednesday, July 29, after beingstabbednear 822 E. 76th Place inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Phi Huu Nguyen? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.July 10, 2020Sean Deandra Smith, a 53-year-oldBlackmale, died Saturday, July 4, after beingshotnear the 600 block of East 81st Street inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Sean Deandra Smith? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.July 20, 2020Josue Zepeda, a 32-year-oldLatinomale, died Sunday, June 21, after beingshotnear 206 E. 76th Place inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Josue Zepeda? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.July 20, 2020Jorge Gonzalez, a 19-year-oldLatinomale, died Thursday, June 18, after beingshotnear 8321 S. San Pedro St. inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Jorge Gonzalez? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.May 1, 2020Eugene James Morris, a 55-year-oldblackmale, died Sunday, April 12, after beingshotnear 7217 S. Broadway inFlorence, according to Los Angeles County Medical Examiner-Coroner's records.Do you have information to share about the life of Eugene James Morris? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisform.MenuGloucester County, Va. - Officials have now identified the victim who was gunned down in a car. Officials say 18-year-old Joshua Steven Morrison was killed. A 15-year-old girl and two 20-year-old men were also shot."He's always trying to stay positive and keep everyone happy. It was a very outgoing kid," said Dean Roberts.  Roberts said he can’t believe what’s happened to his longtime friend who he has known since elementary school.“I didn't want to believe it's true,” said Roberts.The 18-year-old is from Yorktown, according to the Sheriff's Office.18-year-old Dijon Whitter is locked up in the Gloucester County Jail accused of murder.We’ve reached out to Whitter at the jail, but jail officials said he was not interested in speaking with us.Deputies were called to the Gill Lane and Ditchley Drive early Sunday morning for reports of gunshots.  There was a party down the street, and four people were shot – three survived and friends say Joshua was killed.They said he was friends with Dijon and the two spent a lot of time together.Friends we spoke with were stunned by the news.They have set up a memorial on Gill Lane, the spot where the shooting happened."It's devastating. I woke up to that phone call," said Roberts, "It tore me up."A father said he is glad his 15-year-old daughter is alive after being shot in the back of the head in Gloucester County.John Ward said a bullet struck the back of her head and it is unclear if she will suffer from any permanent damage.“I hope they prosecute him to the fullest extent," said John Ward. "She has double vision. The doctor said if it had been a little bit closer, she would not be here.”A Captain at the Sheriff’s Office stated they got calls into the 911 dispatch center about a chaotic scene and reports of gunshot victims near Ditchley Drive and Gill Lane just after midnight on Sunday.Officials say one person was found dead in a car and three other victims got a ride down the road to Nuttall’s Country Store, which is located a little over a mile down the street. Law enforcement met with the victims at the store.There was a big party happening down the road.One woman, who did not want to be identified, said she did not know the people involved in the shooting."We were having a party for my birthday, but they were not affiliated with us in any way,” she said.Police also received a 911 call from a nearby neighbor who says a teenage girl came pounding their door, saying the alleged gunman was chasing her. She apparently ran through a wooded area and was not injured.It is unclear what led to the gunfire.Whitter is charged with a first-degree murder, malicious shooting and use of a firearm in the commission of a felony. He is currently being held without bond at the Gloucester County Jail."I don't know how she knows the guy or if she knew him," said Ward.Sheriff’s officials say there are likely more charges to come. They have not released the names of the victims.John says his daughter was released from the hospital Sunday.Two victims were airlifted to other hospitals--one was taken to Riverside-Walter Reed Hospital in Gloucester. The fourth victim was found dead at the scene of the initial call in an abandoned vehicle.The remaining victims are listed in stable condition.Gloucester Investigators, Virginia State Police and BCI Agents are collectively working the crime scene.Report a typoThe man who died in theBrowntown shootingon Monday night was Ira Brown, 20, of Wilmington, city police announced late on Wednesday.He was one of five people shot in the incident, which police have suggested was a robbery-gone-wrong on Brown Street near Stroud Street. He is the only one who died.Brown had several gunshot wounds to his legs, according to initial information given by police. He showed up to the Wilmington Hospital emergency room in a personal vehicle before being taken to Christiana Hospital, where he died.Two other people who were shot that night also showed up to the emergency room in personal vehicles – a 49-year-old man and a 21-year-old man went to St. Francis Hospital, according to police. The older man had gunshot wounds to his left hand and abdomen – he was in serious, but stable, condition. The younger man had been shot in the shoulder, leg, and abdomen – he was in critical condition. Both men were transferred to Christiana hospital, according to police.The only people who were in the house when police arrived were a 28-year-old man with a gunshot wound in his leg and a 51-year-old woman with a gunshot wound to her abdomen. They were taken to Christiana Hospital in an ambulance, according to police.The investigation is still ongoing, and police ask anyone with information to call Detective Randy Nowell at (302) 576-3632.Contact Saranac Hale Spencer at (302) 324-2909,sspencer@delawareonline.comor on Twitter @SSpencerTNJ.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.NORTH LAWNDALE — A 29-year-old man died and four other men were hurt after a shooting in North Lawndale Friday night, police said.The shooting occurred around 8:45 p.m. in the 1500 block of South Kedzie Avenue, according to Officer Jose Estrada, a Chicago Police spokesman. The surviving victims of the shooting told investigators they were standing on the block when they "heard shots and felt pain," Estrada said.The 29-year-old brought himself to Mount Sinai Hospital with a gunshot wound in his upper chest, Estrada said. He was later pronounced dead.Cook County medical examiners identified the man as Raymon Blount, of the 300 block of North Pine Avenue.Two 28-year-old men went to Mount Sinai Hospital, where their conditions "stabilized" after they were treated for gunshot wounds in their right thighs, Estrada said.A 21-year-old man brought himself to Saint Anthony Hospital, where his condition was "stable" after he was shot in his left ankle, Estrada said.A fifth man, 26, refused medical attention after suffering a graze wound in his right thigh, Estrada said.Police said the men were not cooperating with authorities, and that at least four of them have "documented gang ties."No one is in custody, Estrada said.For more neighborhood news, listen to DNAinfo Radio here:Next inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleNext inGarfield Park & North LawndaleCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - A 17-year-old has been indicted on first-degree murder charges and five counts of attempted first-degree murder, according to Shelby County District Attorney General Amy Weirich.Weirich said Rodricus Adams, 17, is being held without bond for thedeath of 17-year-old Antoine Bell.Bell was a student at Raleigh-Egypt High School. He was shot and killed January 7 at Kerwood Avenue and Winwood Drive in Raleighwhen Adams and another masked suspect shot him.Weirich said the suspects approached a car that had stopped to help another driver. According to police, the two suspects were wearing Halloween masks when they pulled up and opened fire on the group.Bell was killed and at least two others were injured in the shooting.Copyright 2016 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WFLAby:Sunde FarquharMIAMI, Fla. (WFLA) — The manhunt for the remaining suspect in a violent Polk County triple murder ended on Thursday with the arrest of Tavares Antwan Mack, 26, in Miami.U.S. Marshalls arrested Mack at a residence at 2225 NW 119th St. in Miami the Polk County Sheriff’s Office said on Friday.Mack is one of four suspects in a Jan. 6 triple homicide.Polk County Sheriff Grady Judd said the victims were found ‘slaughtered’ in the home.Two women and a man were found dead inside a home on East Magnolia Drive in Lakeland. A fourth victim was found alive, but has been shot in the face.18-year-old Felix Campos was the sole survivor of the attack.  The murder victims were identified as 24-year-old David Washington, 31-year-old Eneida Branch, and 23-year-old Angelica Guadalupe Castro.Mack is charged with three counts of First Degree Murder, Attempted First Degree Murder, Armed Robbery, Armed Burglary, and Tampering with Physical Evidence in a Capital Proceeding.  He was booked into the Miami-Dade County Jail and will be extradited to Polk County.Three other Miami men are suspected in the murders. Andrew Joseph age 35, Jonathan Alcegaire age 26, and Jamaal Smith age 25, have already been arrested.THE STORIES OTHERS ARE CLICKING ON:Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ST. PETERSBURG, Fla. (WFLA) -- A 30-year-old man was hospitalized in critical condition after being shot Saturday afternoon.The incident happened shortly after 1 p.m. near Freemont Terrance South and 32nd Street.POLK COUNTY, Fla. (WFLA) -- A man was arrested in Lakeland Friday after police said he admitted to beating a 2-year-old child to death for misbehaving.The Lakeland Police Dept. responded to an apartment at Woodlake Drive just after midnight Friday morning following reports of an unresponsive child. The 2-year-old boy, who had multiple injuries on his body, was transported to Lakeland Regional Health where he was pronounced deceased a short time later.A cluster of severe storms swept across Southern states early Saturday, leveling buildings in the Florida Panhandle.Officials in Panama City, Florida, said a home and a convenience store were leveled in a possible tornado caused by Saturday's storm. No injuries were immediately reported.FOX31 Denverby:Web Staff,The Associated PressHIGHLANDS RANCH, Colo. — A gunman shot and killed a deputy, and wounded three other deputies, a police officer and two civilians at an apartment complex in an ambush-type of attack early Sunday morning, the Douglas County Sheriff’s Office said.About 5:15 a.m., deputies responded for the second time in two hours to the Copper Canyon Apartments complex at 3404 E. County Line Road in Highlands Ranch, between Colorado and University boulevards.A man had left the apartment before deputies arrived, but returned, and gave a key and permission to enter the unit, the sheriff’s office said.About 5:55 a.m., four deputies were hit by rifle rounds from the suspect’s bedroom, the sheriff’s office said.Three of the deputies managed to get to safety, but a fourth, 29-year-old Zackari Parrish, was not able to get out of the line of fire.Because of the large amount of gunfire and injuries they suffered, the other deputies weren’t able to rescue Parrish.Parrish was shot multiple times and according to the attending doctor, wouldn’t have been able to survive his injuries because of where he was shot..@SheriffSpurlocknames29-year-old Zackari Parrish, deputy and former CRPD officer killed in#CopperCanyonOIS. Our hearts our heavy today as we mourn the loss of one of our brothers. Thank you all for your support.https://t.co/kJKCYaZ7Uqpic.twitter.com/RmdB9CI5Tg— DC Sheriff (@dcsheriff)December 31, 2017“I do know that all of them were shot very, very quickly. They all went down almost within seconds of each other, so it was more of an ambush-type of attack on our officers,” Douglas County Sheriff Tony Spurlock said.“He knew we were coming and we obviously let him know that we were there.”RELATED:Douglas County Sheriff fallen officer fundA SWAT team was called out and entered the apartment about 7:30 a.m. Shots were exchanged, resulting in the death of the suspect, identified as37-year-old Matthew Riehl.SWAT officer Tom O’Donnell of the Castle Rock Police Department was shot and injured by the suspect.Riehl fired more than 100 rounds in the attack, the sheriff’s office said.Deputies Michael Doyle, 28, Taylor Davis, 30, and Jeffrey Pelle, 32, were injured. They and O’Donnell are are in stable condition.The two civilian injuries were not life-threatening, the sheriff’s office said. Pelle is the son of Boulder County Sheriff Joe Pelle.Sheriff Pelle (Boulder SO), Deputy Pelle (Douglas SO), and family, earlier this afternoon.#CopperCanyonOISpic.twitter.com/24ltoj6YpP— BoulderCountySheriff (@BldrCOSheriff)December 31, 2017Authorities had left the apartment about 3:45 a.m. to address a noise complaint but returned about 5:15 a.m. in response to reports of another disturbance.Spurlock said the disturbance was initially reported to be domestic but turned out to be noise-related.“The suspect was just making a ton of noise and annoying everyone around him,” Spurlock said.Parrish, the slain officer, was a married father of two young children. He had been with the department for about seven months. Spurlock called him a “good kid” who was eager to work.“His wife told me today that he loved this job more than he had loved any job he ever had,” Spurlock said.Parrish previously worked for nearly 2 1/2 years with the Castle Rock Police Department.“Our thoughts and prayers are with the Douglas County Sheriff’s Office and the family and friends of Deputy Parrish,” Gov. John Hickenlooper said in a statement. “We can only imagine the depth of grief they are experiencing.“We also hope for a speedy recovery for the Douglas County deputies and the Castle Rock police officer injured in the incident, as well as the residents who also were affected.“The call to protect and serve too often leads to this ultimate sacrifice. We are grateful for the service of Deputy Parrish, his fellow deputies, and that of the Castle Rock police officer. We pray for their and their families’ strength and resolve in the days and months ahead.”Hickenlooper ordered flags be lowered in honor of Parrish.The sheriff’s office issued a code red for any citizens in the affected area. They were instructed to shelter in place, avoid windows and stay away from exterior walls. It has since been lifted.SubmitTHORNTON, Colo. (KDVR) -- Police in Thornton have issued an arrest warrant for a suspect after an officer-involved shooting on Friday.The suspect, 36-year-old Raymond Michael James Quintana, is considered armed and dangerous and is carrying a handgun. He is described as having multiple tattoos as seen in the photos below.BOULDER COUNTY, Colo. (KDVR) – Two drivers died in a head-on crash on Highway 287 in Boulder County early Saturday morning.US 287 was closed for several hours as Colorado State Patrol and Boulder County Sheriff’s deputies investigated what happened.DENVER (KDVR) – Illegal drag racing continues to be a dangerous menace in the Denver Metro area, resulting in a death downtown Denver on April 3.Jessica Allen was killed while driving on 18th Street and Lawrence Street.Filed under:Four men were wounded, one critically, in a shooting at a bar early Sunday in the West Rogers Park neighborhood on the North Side.The men were inside of a bar about 1:35 a.m. in the 2300 block of West Howard when another male opened fire, according to Chicago Police.A 24-year-old man suffered multiple gunshot wounds to his body and was taken in critical condition to St. Francis Hospital in Evanston, police said.A 38-year-old man was also shot multiple times in his body, while a 54-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to his right hip, police said. They were also taken to St. Francis, where their conditions stabilized.A 42-year-old man suffered two gunshot wounds to his left leg and a graze wound to his right forearm, police said. He showed up at Evanston Hospital, where his condition stabilized, police said.No one was in custody as Area North detectives investigated the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.UPDATE:'A ray of sunshine': Vigil honors slain familyThe Long Branch teenager who allegedlykilled his parents, sister and a family friendon New Year's Eve opened fire "at close range" using a semi-automatic rifle containing 15 bullets, prosecutors said Tuesday.Law enforcement officials also revealed a third person - a woman in her 20s - fled the house when the shots began, along with the teen's grandfather and brother.The 16-year-old alleged shooter, whose name is being withheld, is expected to make his first appearance in court at 11 a.m. Wednesday, Monmouth County Prosecutor Christopher J. Gramiccioni said during a press conference."This is a heartbreaking family tragedy," said Gramiccioni, who did not reveal any possible motive for the shooting.Linda and Steven Kologi, at left, and their 18-year-old daughter, Brittany Kologi, were shot and killed on New Year's Eve in their home in Long Branch along with a 70-year-old family friend Mary Schulz. The Kologi's 16-year-old son has been charged in the four killings. (GoFundMe)The teen's court appearance was delayed Tuesday after The Asbury Park Press and NJ Advance Media filed a motion seeking access to the hearing, which is being held in family court because of the teenager's age. A spokesman for the prosecutor's office Tuesday evening said the judge denied the application for access.Prosecutors are seeking to waive the case up to adult court and said they expect a judge's decision within 60 days.Gramiccioni said the woman in her early 20s escaped with the shooter's grandfather and brother as they heard the shots from  a Century Arms semi-automatic rifle.The teenager's parents, Steven Kologi and Linda Kologi, were gunned down, along with their 18-year-old daughter Brittany Kologi and family friend Mary Schulz, 70, around 11:45 p.m., prosecutors said.Gramiccioni said he did not believe there was any time for family members to try to convince the teenager not to shoot."We think this was fairly sudden and quick," Gramiccioni said.The gun was loaded with 15 7.62mm rounds at the time of the shooting and was legally owned by a resident of the multi-family house on the 600 block of Wall Street, Gramiccioni said. He declined to say whether the teenager shot all 15 rounds.Each person who died suffered from multiple gunshot wounds, and prosecutors were not considering filing charges against the gun's owner, Gramiccioni said.He said there was no indication any financial problems of the family played a role in the killings.The 16-year-old is charged with four counts of murder and weapons offenses. He is being held at the Middlesex County Youth Detention Center and is represented by a public defender.Gramiccioni said the family members were in different rooms at the time of the shooting.Schulz lived in Ocean Township and had a "close family relationship" with the 16-year-old's grandfather, Gramiccioni said.Family friends have described the teen as having special needs. Gramiccioni said he could not comment on the teenager's mental status.The 16-year-old attended a school, Gramiccioni said, but he declined to identify the school."A quadruple homicide investigation, this is the first that I've seen or heard of it and certainly the first that I've participated in as prosecutor in this county," Gramiccioni said.The Kologis' oldest son, also named Steven Kologi,wrote on Instagram Mondaythat his parents were "great people" and that Brittany was "beautiful and smart."A GoFundMe page established by a family friend to cover funeral expenses has alreadyraised more than its goal of $20,000."Linda, Steven, and Brittany were all beautiful people with the kindest hearts you could imagine," Brian Yunker, of West Long Branch, wrote on the page. "All donations will go directly to a proper burial. Thank you all for the support."Brittany Kologi, 18, had recently finished her first semester as a freshman at Stockton University, where she was a heath sciences student and lived on campus, according to the school."We are shocked and saddened by the reports of the death of freshman Brittany Kologi under such tragic circumstances," the school said in a statement, adding that counseling staff are available for her friends and classmates at Stockton.Funeral services have not been announced. A vigil has been scheduled for 6 p.m. Tuesday at Franklin Lake Park in West Long Branch.The press conference at the Monmouth County Prosecutor's Office to discuss the latest developments regarding the deadly shootings in Long Branch.Staff reporter Kelly Heyboer contributed to this report.Marisa Iati may be reached atmiati@njadvancemedia.com. Follow her on Twitter@Marisa_Iatioron Facebook here. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Have a tip? Tell us.nj.com/tipsNote to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesNORTHWEST MIAMI-DADE, FLA. (WSVN) - Rescue crews took five people to the hospital after, police said, they were shot in a residential neighborhood in Northwest Miami-Dade, Tuesday night.Police responded to the scene of the shooting in the area of Northwest 18th Avenue and 86th Terrace, just after 8:15 p.m.“At a single family residence where we identified five victims of gunshot wounds,” said Miami-Dade Police Detective Lee Cowart.Investigators identified the victims as 22-year-old Taurean Neal, 20-year-old Jada Miller, 19-year-old Antwon Brown and 18-year-old Ulysses Britt. An unidentified 17-year-old victim was also injured in the shooting.Jeffrey Humes, Miller’s uncle, said his niece was shot six times in her arms and legs.“You know what kids do after Christmas,” Humes said. “You know, they gather at their friends’ house.”They were standing outside when someone opened fire, and they scattered. “As far as we know, they were over at a friend’s house and somebody came up in a drive-by and started shooting,” said Humes.“Our victims, once the shooting occurred, fled the scene, and that’s where I suspect that they ended up seeking medical attention,” said Cowart.The victims scatted after the shooting, and minutes after the original call, two blocks away from the crime scene, another call came in related to the shooting.Humes said the victims of the initial shooting remain in the hospital. Two of the victims had to undergo a second surgery, Wednesday, according to family members.“Two of them are in surgery as we speak, but the rest of them are stable,” said Humes. “Thank God that everybody is OK.”Neighbors who were too afraid to appear on camera told 7News they heard at least 20 shots. Some said they initially thought they were fireworks and only realized it was a shooting after they heard police sirens.Police had blocked off several sections of the street as they investigated. They were seen searching for shell casings and interviewing neighbors.“It’s a terrible, violent crime,” said Cowart. “There’s too much gun violence right now, and we’re trying to address that.”Paramedics transported the victims to area hospitals. As of Wednesday, all victims are said to be in stable condition.7News cameras captured paramedics taking four of the victims out of ambulances outside Jackson Memorial Hospital.The 17-year-old victim is a Miami-Dade County Public Schoolss student. Superintendent Alberto Carvalho commented on the shooting, Wednesday morning, tweeting, “We cannot allow these actions to be tolerated in our neighborhoods. Cowardly silence kills. #SpeakUp.”Devastating December. Two teenagers became the latest victims of unacceptable gun violence, along with 3 others last night. Another mass shooting in our community. We cannot allow these actions to be tolerated in our neighborhoods. Cowardly silence kills.#SpeakUp— Alberto M. Carvalho (@MiamiSup)December 27, 2017Officials have not provided further details about the person or people behind this shooting or the circumstances leading up to the incident. It remains unclear whether the victims were the subjects’ intended targets.“We just want, as a family, for the violence to stop,” said Humes. “That’s the most important thing. And anybody that did this – turn yourself in.”If you have any information on this shooting, call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS. Remember, you can always remain anonymous, and you may be eligible for a $1,000 reward.Copyright 2021 Sunbeam Television Corp. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Posted By:Kelly BenfordDecember 26, 2017VICKSBURG, MS (Ben Caxton)  — A Christmas Eve shooting in downtown Vicksburg has left five people injured. Police were called to L.D.’s lounge just before midnight Sunday and found one victim, Ledarius Sproulls, outside on the ground. Sprouls was transported to UMMC in Jackson for treatment. Four others, Treyvonne Williams, Zarian Price, Jobie Gordon and Erica Harris had already been taken to Merit Health River Region Medical Center by private vehicles. None of the injuries appear to be life-threatening. Police have detained 21-year-old Denzell Watts for questioning. L.D.’s lounge, which according to Vicksburg Mayor George Flaggs has been the scene of other shootings has been closed until the owner can come to an agreement with the city for providing upgraded security. A restaurant and catering business at the site are not affected by the closure order.Your email address will not be published.CommentName*Email*WebsiteApril 7, 2021On April 22, Boutique Air of Greenville will begin flight flying from Greenville Mid-Delta Regional Airport to New Orleans, LA. The new route will offer one daily round-trip on Thursdays, Fridays and Sundays. “We believe this is the right route at the right time for our citizens in the Mississippi…March 31, 2021March 24, 2021March 23, 2021March 4, 2021March 3, 2021OffbeatOffbeatOffbeatOffbeatOffbeatOffbeatOffbeatOffbeatPosted By:Kelly BenfordJune 24, 2019VICKSBURG, MS (Ben Caxton) — Mary Margaret Hyer was crowned Miss Mississippi 2019, Saturday night, beating out 44 other ladies during the week-long competition in Vicksburg. For the first time, the state competition did not have a swimwear component, a result of changes within the Miss America organization in an…COPYRIGHT 2015-2021 | VIRTUAL NEWSMAN NETWORK & DELTA RADIO NETWORKKLFYby:StaffEUNICE, La. (KLFY)-Acting on a warrant from the Eunice Police Department, Carencro Police and the Lafayette Parish Sheriff’s Office located and arrested Rontreal  J. Prejean, aka “D-Jack”, 18, of the 400 block of Madison Street in Lafayette.Prejean is charged with the degree murder of Tyrie Frederick,  23, of Eunice, and three counts of attempted first degree murder.According to Eunice Chief of Police, Randy Fontenot, officers responded on December 23 at 1:20 a.m. at the Southeast Neighborhood Center on City Ave. in Eunice.The shooting occurred following an altercation during a Christmas party at the center.Prejean, a rapper hired who was to entertain the party, allegedly pulled a handgun and began shooting at the victim, striking and killing him, police said.Frederick was transported to the hospital where he was pronounced dead.Three others, 14 and 15-year-old boys and a 22-year-old woman, were also shot.They were all treated for non-life threatening injuries.Sergeant Robert Brickley, lead investigator in the case, has said that his investigation is far from complete.“We still have many witnesses to interview and the investigation is still very much ongoing,” Sgt. Brickley said.The Eunice Police Department asks that if you have any information or knowledge concerning this case, please call the Police Department at 337-457-2626 or Sgt. Brickley at 337-457-6575.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.Bellard tells KLFY Jose Antonio Higareda was killed when the tornado struck the home he was living in.   He was 27 years old.MAMOU, La. (KLFY) -   A GoFundMe account has been set up for the mother of 3 children who's home was burned by an arsonist.33-year old James N. Rozas has been arrested in connection with the fire.  He's charged with four counts of Attempted 2nd Degree Murder, one count of Aggravated Arson, one count of Simple Arson and one count of Violation of a Protective Order. Additional charges from other agencies are expected.UPDATE:  The two other deceased individuals have been identified as 27-year-old Derrell W. Smith, Jr. of Lake Charles and 24-year-old Kelsie Murphy of Crowley.UPDATE, 9:07 p.m.:  The preliminary investigation by State Police revealed a vehicle was traveling east in the westbound lanes of travel on I-10 before colliding with another vehicle head-on. Shortly after the initial impact, a Ford F-250 collided with one of the vehicles. Debris from the crashes caused minor damage to a passing 18-wheeler.Four men were injured early Saturday morning in a drive-by shooting in Birmingham, according to police.One of the men suffered life-threatening injuries, police said.The shooting occurred at around 3 a.m. in the area of 3rdAvenue North and 9thStreet North in west Birmingham.Sgt. Bryan Shelton said the motive behind the shooting is unknown at this time.No suspects are in custody.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesPACOIMA (CBSLA) —Five people have been taken to a hospital after a shooting in Pacoima.Stu Mundel, reporting from Sky9, said at least five people suffered gunshot wounds.The shootings took place outside a home at Jouett and Paula Streets in Pacoima.The victims include two men in their 30s as well as a 9-year-old girl.The two men are believed to be in critical condition. Another victim, also believed to be a man in his 30s, had a wound to his extremities.The motive for the shooting is unknown.The victims were possibly shot with a rifle.LAPD and LA City Fire were both on scene.It was unclear if there was a suspect in custody.COLUMBUS, Ohio– One person was killed and three people were hurt after a drive-by shooting in south Columbus Wednesday.Police said officers were called to the 200 block of East Barthman Avenue around 9:10 p.m.Two people were taken to Grant Medical Center in critical condition.  A 9-year-old victim was transported to Nationwide Children’s Hospital in stable condition.A fourth victim was treated by medics.Thirty-two-year-old Chaz A. Robertson died from his injuries.Columbus Division of Police Sgt. Stan Latta said the shooting happened at a vigil being held for a man killed in a shooting on Monday.Two others were injured inMonday's shooting, which also occured in the 200 block of East Barthman Avenue.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Police released additional information Wednesday afternoon in connection with the arrests of three people and two drive-by shootings Tuesday in west Louisville. Six people were injured.Marcus Greene, Dae-Vaughn Sullivan and Mekell Williams were booked early Wednesday.Green is charged with several counts of assault. Sullivan is charged with wanton endangerment. Williams is charged with receiving stolen property.Police said the men were driving around in a stolen vehicle shooting at people who seemed to be random targets.Investigators said Tuesday's string of drive-by shootings started on St. Louis Avenue when a 15-year-old boy was shot at, but not hit.An hour later, police said the same vehicle was seen on South 32nd Street, where two people were shot. About an hour after that, the same vehicle was seen again when four more people were shot in a drive-by at 17th and Hale streets."We can connect those shooting through that vehicle. Now, were the same group of people in that car during the shooting on 32nd Street and the shooting on 17th Street? Were the same combinations of people in that car? Were the same shooters in that car? I don't know at this time?" LMPD Lt. Emily McKinley said.Police said all six victims have non-life-threatening injuries.McKinley said the quick arrests were due to good police work and help from victims and witnesses."They communicated what they saw, what they heard. They led us to the evidence that we found, leading us to these arrests," McKinley said.Police said there could be several more arrests in each of the drive-by shootings.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.newsCrimeByClaire Z. Cardona5:21 PM on Dec 13, 2017 CSTUpdated at 5:20 p.m. Wednesday:Revised to include reward information.Four people, including two juveniles, were wounded Tuesday night in a shooting near a Garland elementary school, police said.Police received multiple calls about shots being fired about 6:30 p.m. next to Northlake Elementary School at Bosque and Lavaca drives, Lt. Pedro Barineau said.Two teens, a 13-year-old girl and a 16-year-old boy, were hospitalized. A man was grazed by a bullet and treated at the scene, he said.As they were investigating, police learned a fourth gunshot victim, a man, was at Baylor Medical Center at Garland, Barineau said.None of the injuries were thought to be life-threatening.Police are investigating the shooting as a gang-related incident. They believe two groups showed up there to fight, and one group began shooting at the other, Barineau said.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call Garland police at 972-485-4840. Anonymous tips may be made by calling Crime Stoppers at 972-272-8477 or by visitingwww.garlandcrimestoppers.org.A reward of up to $5,000 is being offered for information that leads to an arrest.Claire Z. Cardona, Breaking News Producer. Claire joined The Dallas Morning News as an intern in 2012. She now writes about crime, other breaking news and the Dallas Zoo. She grew up in New Orleans and graduated with a journalism degree from the University of Texas at Austin.Stay up-to-date with the crime and public safety news your neighbors are talking about.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasAt about 9:10 AM on Thursday, January 25, 2018, members of the Boston Police Fugitive Apprehension Unit arrested 28-year-old Shawquan D. Jackson of Dorchester for violations of the auto laws, firearm related offenses, and for charges connected to a non-fatal shooting that occurred in the area of Mass Ave and Proctor Street in the early morning hours of December 9, 2017.Officers conducting surveillance relative to the ongoing non-fatal shooting investigation observed Jackson to be operating a motor vehicle with a revoked driver’s license in the area of 950 American Legion Highway. Officers conducted a stop of the vehicle and, after placing Jackson under arrest for the above violation of the auto laws, recovered a loaded black and gray Smith & Wesson SD9 VE firearm from Jackson’s person. Further investigation revealed that the firearm had been reported stolen in 2016 out of Clayton County, GA.Jackson was charged with Operating a Motor Vehicle after License Revoked, Unlawful Possession of a Firearm, Unlawful Possession of Ammunition, Unlawfully Carrying a Loaded Firearm, Unlawful Possession of Large Capacity Feeding Device, and Receiving Stolen Property. Officers are seeking additional charges related to the following incident:At about 12:20 AM on Saturday, December 9, 2017, officers from District B-2 (Roxbury) and C-6 (South Boston) responded to a radio call for a person shot in the area of Proctor Street and Mass Ave. Officers located a 27-year-old male victim suffering from apparent life-threatening gunshot wounds and a female witness. Officers also located three additional male victims suffering non-life-threatening injuries in the area of 63 R Boston Street. All victims were transported to Boston area hospitals.Powered bySquarespaceFiled under:One man was killed and at least 13 other people were wounded in Wednesday shootings across Chicago.The fatal shooting happened about 12:15 p.m. in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side. Witnesses told investigators that 26-year-old Eric S. Thomas was in the 3200 block of West Walnut when a dark vehicle pulled up and someone inside fired shots, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office. Thomas, who lived in the block, was shot in the chest and left leg. He was taken to Stroger Hospital, where he was pronounced dead at 12:43 p.m.The day’s latest shooting happened at 9:53 p.m. during an attempted robbery in the Southwest Side Marquette Park neighborhood. A 22-year-old man was standing in an alley in the 7200 block of South Kedzie when a male walked up to him, pulled out a gun and announced a robbery, police said. The victim started to struggle for the weapon, at which point the suspect fired multiple shots. The man suffered a graze wound to the chest and two gunshot wounds to the arm. He was taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where his condition was stabilized.Four people were shot about 8:15 p.m. near the Wilson CTA station in the Uptown neighborhood. They were standing on the sidewalk in the 1100 block of West Wilson when two males got out of a vehicle and opened fire, police said. A male, whose age was unknown, was shot multiple times and taken in critical condition to Illinois Masonic Medical Center. A 19-year-old man was shot in the left leg, a 20-year-old woman was shot in the buttocks and a 57-year-old man was shot in both legs. They were also taken to Illinois Masonic, where their conditions were all stabilized.Shortly before 7 p.m., a 27-year-old man and 15-year-old boy were both wounded in another East Garfield Park neighborhood shooting. They were walking in the 200 block of North Homan when a male with dreadlocks walked up to them, fired shots and ran off, police said. The boy was struck in the back and shoulder and took himself to Mount Sinai Hospital, while the man was shot in the right hip and taken by paramedics to Stroger Hospital. Both of their conditions were stabilized.A 22-year-old man was shot while driving and crashed his vehicle at 11:49 a.m. in the South Side Englewood neighborhood. Someone in a dark SUV fired shots while the man was driving in the 1100 block of West 56th Street. The victim was shot in the left side of the chest, lost control of his vehicle and struck a tree, police said. He was taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition.About 10:30 a.m., a 15-year-old boy was shot during an attempted robbery in the Heart of Chicago neighborhood on the South Side. He was in a fight with another male in the 2500 block of South Blue Island when the male pulled out a handgun and demanded his property, police said. The suspect then opened fire before running off. The boy was shot in the hand and was taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition stabilized.About 8:45 a.m., a 30-year-old man was in the 4700 block of North Whipple in the Albany Park neighborhood on the Northwest Side when someone walked up to him and opened fire, police said. He was shot in the cheek and taken in serious condition to Illinois Masonic Medical Center.A 20-year-old man was walking at 2:17 a.m. when someone in a black car fired shots in the 1000 block of North Clark on the Near North Side, police said. The man was struck in the left arm and taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital, where his condition stabilized.About 30 minutes earlier, a 30-year-old man was shot while driving in the Irving Park neighborhood on the Northwest Side. He was driving about 1:40 a.m. in the 3500 block of North Keeler when someone fired shots, striking him in the cheek and left arm, police said. He was taken to Illinois Masonic, where his condition stabilized.The day’s first shooting happened shortly after midnight in the Chatham neighborhood on the South Side. A 25-year-old man was walking in the 7800 block of South King Drive when someone in a gray car fired shots, police said. He suffered gunshot wounds to the right hand and chest and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where his condition was stabilized.Additionally,a Chicago Police officer was shot in the handat 11:22 p.m. during a foot pursuit near the 9500 block of South Calumet in the Far South Side Rosemoor neighborhood. The officer was taken in good condition to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, according to CPD spokesman Anthony Guglielmi, who said the officer “should be okay.”On Tuesday,five people were woundedin citywide shootings.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Doctors at Lurie Children’s Hospital said Kayden Swann "continues to demonstrate positive improvements," though he is still in critical condition in the pediatric intensive care unit.Kunickis, a 6-3 210-pound junior, was born with a right arm that ends at the elbow.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Two men are behind bars, accused of killing Jonathan Booker, a photographer who died when he was caught in crossfireduring a shooting in the Edge District in December.Four men were responsible for the shooting, according to Memphis Police Department. Despite surveillance footage being captured by a nearby business, the case went cold for months.Police said there was an altercation inside a venue on Marshall Avenue that spilled outside before shots rang out, but Booker, who was engaged and planning on getting married in 2018, was an innocent bystander.Wednesday, MPD announced two men had been arrested and charged with reckless homicide in Booker's death: Hayden Bowen, 24, and Calvin Smith, 21.However, Booker's family said a reckless homicide charge seems too lenient.Juni Ganguli, a local defense lawyer who's not affiliated with the case, said based on what's called transferred intent, if the people seen in the  surveillance video from the night of the incident were intending to shoot to kill, then a reckless charge doesn't seem most appropriate."Without knowing the facts of the case, it would seem that there would be a higher charge than reckless homicide," he said. "Reckless homicide seems to be a very generous charge."Just a few weeks ago,police charged Jerry Edwards with attempted murder. He's accused of firing shots and hitting two other people the same night. They survived their injuries.Bowen and Smith are due in court Thursday morning for a bond hearing.Copyright 2018 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Dave Bartkowiak Jr., Digital Managing EditorDerick HutchinsonDave Bartkowiak Jr. is the digital managing editor for ClickOnDetroit.If you need help with the Public File, call (313) 222-0566.Detroit police are working to find suspects in a drive-by shooting that left one person dead and four others wounded Thursday night on the city’s east side.Several gunshots were fired from a vehicle, believed to be a dark late-model Oldsmobile Alero. The bullets struck a group outside a home in the 11000 block of Gunston at about 8:35 p.m., Detroit police Capt. Darin Szilagy said.One of the victims, identified only as a male, was pronounced dead at the scene.Four others, including a female, were rushed to a hospital.One was in critical condition and underwent surgery. Three others were listed in stable condition, Szilagy said.Two women and three young children in the home at the time of the shooting were not injured.Meanwhile, investigators with the DPD homicide task force and gang intelligence unit were interviewing witnesses, canvassing the area and seeking surveillance footage from nearby businesses as well as residences to help identify the suspects.“We need to resolve this,” Szilagy said. “We don’t want gunmen like this out there.”Anyone with information is asked to call homicide investigators at (313) 596-2260 or the 9th Precinct at (313) 596-5900. Anonymous tips also can be submitted through Crime Stoppers of Michigan at 1-800-SPEAK-UP.CLEVELAND, Ohio (WOIO) - One of the suspects charged in connection to a shooting that resulted in the death of a 12-year-old boy entered a plea on Monday.The plea change was made during a court appearance for 17-year-old A-Mier Taylor at the Cuyahoga County Court of Common Pleas.Plea expected from suspect linked to drive-by shooting that killed 12-year-old boy, injured 5 others https://bit.ly/2kAglQlAs part of the agreement, Taylor pleaded guilty to one count of murder and four counts of attempted murder.Investigators said Taylor, who was 15 years old at the time of the shooting, was riding around Cleveland with several other people when they fired at least 20 rounds into a group of children on Buckeye Road in November 2017.Twelve-year-old Abdel Bashiti was at his family’s beauty supply store when he was struck by a stray bullet. He suffered fatal injuries and died from the gunshot wound.Five other children were injured during the shooting.Taylor was initially charged as a juvenile, but his case was bound over in Cuyahoga County and adult charges were presented.Larissa Harris, her brother Marvin Harris, and several teen suspects were also arrested in connection to the shooting.Taylor will be sentenced on Oct. 9 at 10 a.m.Copyright 2019 WOIO. All rights reserved.Sia Nyorkor joined Cleveland 19 in 2015 and reports weekdays for the 4, 5 and 6 p.m. newscasts.1717 E. 12th StreetCleveland, OH 44114(216) 771-1943A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.GET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XOUR PICKS:Police say an argument preceded a shooting that injured three men and a teen boy shortly after 1 a.m. Saturday in Minneapolis.Officers responded to 911 callers who reported hearing gunshots in the 3600 block of Emerson Avenue North.When they arrived, they found a 33-year-old man and a 17-year-old boy in the front yard of a residence, both suffering from gunshot wounds. They were transported to North Memorial Health Hospital. The man had a non-life threatening wound, police said. But the teen’s injury was significant, according to a news release.A third victim, a 36-year-old man, was found in an alley near where the other two were injured. He had been shot. He was transported to North Memorial and is in stable condition.While officers were securing the scene, they were notified that another victim related to the same shooting had been dropped off at Hennepin County Medical Center. He is a 20-year-old man and had a non-life threatening gunshot wound to the shoulder.Officers recovered a handgun at the scene. No arrests were announced as of Saturday afternoon.Anyone with information is encouraged to text TIP411, enter MPD, a space and then the information. Or call 612-692-TIPS.Sign up for Newsletters and AlertsAs you comment, please be respectful of other commenters and other viewpoints. Our goal with article comments is to provide a space for civil, informative and constructive conversations. We reserve the right to remove any comment we deem to be defamatory, rude, insulting to others, hateful, off-topic or reckless to the community. See our full terms of usehere.COLUMBUS, GA (WTVM) - Columbus police are investigating another shooting.That one happening on the 1400 block of 15th Street early Thursday morning. There were seven victims in that shooting, according to police reports.The extent of their injuries if any are unknown at this point and no arrests have been made.If you have any information on this shooting please call police at (706) 653-3100.Copyright 2017WTVM. All rights reserved.|For more news, download the WTVM apphere.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Hayley Flores, 26, and Robert Bill, 24, were in love. The El Sobrante couple moved in together about a year ago with plans to start a family soon, friends said.But their bright future was cut short when the two were killed by gunfire about 7:30 p.m. Tuesday in a residence on the 900 block of View Drive, in the Hilltop Green neighborhood, according to Lt. Felix Tan of the Richmond Police Department.“Hayley was the life of the event. She was under 5-feet, but she had the biggest personality and heart. (Bill) was super nice. He was funny and he loved Hayley,” said Jeanne Miller, a friend of the victims.Two other gunshot victims were taken to a hospital. Their conditions were not released.“I was and still am hurt,” said Miller of Richmond. “I thought about how happy I was (that Flores) was there when I went into labor and that she loved my son. I thought about how happy I was that I got to hug her and kiss her goodbye. And lastly, I hope she gets justice.”The shooting appears to be targeted, Tan said. No suspects had been identified and police have yet to comment on a motive.Flores was known for her love to dance Cumbia and Bachata. And among their friends, Bill was known for his adoration of Flores and always striving to protect her, Miller said.Miller met Flores when the two were students at Leadership Public Schools in Richmond. They graduated in 2011 and Flores was working two jobs - at TJ MaXX and Staples in Pinole. Bill attended Pinole Valley High School and was working as a chef at Jupiter’s in Berkeley.“He was fun, down to earth. He was a good person. He didn’t deserve what happened,” said Courtney Merkt, 21, of Pinole. “They both didn’t deserve it.”When Merkt heard the two had been killed, she said she was in denial. She frantically started calling both Flores and Bill in hopes that their death was just a rumor. When the two didn’t answer, Merkt said the truth sunk in.“I couldn’t believe it had happened. I was just Snapchatting with her. She just posted something on Snapchat being happy and then this happened,” Merkt added.A vigil for Flores is being held at 5 p.m. on Friday at Leadership Public Schools.“She was determined to be a role model for people who knew her,” Miller said. “It was important to her to make a difference.”Sarah Ravani is a San Francisco Chronicle staff writer. Email:sravani@sfchronicle.comTwitter:@SarRavaniSarah Ravani covers Oakland and the East Bay at The San Francisco Chronicle. She joined The Chronicle in 2016 after graduating from Columbia University's Graduate School of Journalism. Previously, she covered breaking news and crime for The Chronicle. She has provided coverage on wildfires, mass shootings, the fatal shooting of police officers and massive floods in the North Bay.GET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XTrending:Rancho Tehama >> A Tehama County sheriffs deputy and a Corning police officer have been cleared to return to duty following the conclusion of an investigation into the Nov. 14 shooting incident in Rancho Tehama Reserve in which a 44-year-old Rancho Tehama man killed five people, including his wife, and injured several others.The investigation showed that the shooter, Kevin Janson Neal, died of a self-inflicted gunshot to the head, according to a Nov. 15 autopsy by a forensic pathologist.The investigation showed Neal acted alone and there was no evidence or information to indicate the involvement of anyone else, according to a press release issued Friday by the Tehama County Sheriff’s Office.The two officers, neither of whom was injured in the gunfire, exchanged gunfire with Neal after he was observed driving on Rancho Tehama Road firing multiple rounds from a rifle out the driver’s window at a vehicle being driven by Francisco Cardenas, the release said.Cardenas received a gunshot wound in the leg and additional shrapnel injuries from bullets ripping through his vehicle, but is recovering, according to the release. Cardenas’ vehicle had 15 bullet holes in it.The Corning officer pursued the vehicle driven by Neal west on Rancho Tehama Road as shots were being fired, ramming the rear of the vehicle and forcing it off the road, the release said.The sheriff’s deputy arrived as Neal was firing rounds at the Corning officer’s vehicle, which was hit five times. The deputy’s vehicle was hit three times. Both officers returned fire with four rounds fired by the Corning officer and eight by the deputy.Following this exchange of gunfire, Neal’s fire stopped and he was found dead in the driver’s seat of the vehicle with an obvious gunshot wound to the head.Sheriff Dave Hencratt has concluded the officers involved in the shoot-out acted in the defense of Cardenas, the community and themselves and that both officers were within the law.Both have returned to work at their respective agencies, the release said.Sign up for email newslettersA car was riddled with bullets outside Dirtty’s Jazz and Blues Club in Gary, where seven people were shot Sunday morning.GARY — A fight began inside a nightclub in the city's Miller section and later erupted into a shooting outside the business leaving seven people wounded, police said.A 26-year-old man remained in critical condition Monday after the shooting about 2:30 a.m. Sunday at Dirtty’s Jazz and Blues Club in the 4600 block of Melton Road, police said.Six others — including two men, ages 28 and 22, and three women, ages 28, 24 and 20 — were in stable condition, police Lt. Dawn Westerfield said.A third man suffered a leg injury while running for safety, police said.A person of interest was cooperating with detectives Monday, and police were working to identify additional persons of interest, Westerfield said.The shooting appears to be an isolated event, and no shots were fired inside the club.Police have been called to the club a total of 14 times in the past two years, mostly for nonviolent events such as alarm calls, Westerfield said.On Sunday night, the club appeared closed.A maroon Chevrolet Impala with Indiana plates parked in front of the club Sunday night was riddled with bullet holes. The parking lot was filled with half-empty beer bottles, broken glass, spilled food and stray cats.The live music venue sits in a commercial stretch filled with gas stations and fast-food restaurants, where U.S. 12 and U.S. 20 split on the city's east side.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call Detective Sgt. William Fazekas at 218-881-1210. To remain anonymous, call 866-CRIME-GP.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Lake County Courts and Social Justice ReporterSarah covers crime, courts and public safety. She began her career at The Times in 2004. Contact her at sarah.reese@nwi.com or 219-933-3351.A roundup of crime stories from throughout the Region during the past 24 hours.Here are the top 5 trending stories today.CROWN POINT — A 33-year-old Gary man has been charged with punching another man during the commotion early Sunday morning at Dirrty's Jazz Clu…One person is in custody and Gary police are tracking down another person of interest after seven people were shot early Sunday morning at a n…GARY — Two people were wounded in separate shootings Wednesday and Thursday, police said.GARY — Police on Tuesday asked for tips about a shooting last month that seriously wounded an 18-year-old man.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.An arrest was made in connection with a deadly concert shooting at Underground Atlanta, police said.Jonathan Bautista, 23, was captured in Social Circle on Wednesday, three days after shots rang out at The Masquerade on Lower Alabama Street. Social Circle is about 45 miles east of Atlanta.RELATED:Police ID persons of interest in deadly shooting at Underground AtlantaDetails about the arrest were not released, but Atlanta police Sgt. John Chafee said Bautista was charged with two counts of murder in the deaths of Ewell Ynoa, 21, and Giovan Diaz, 22.Just before 9:40 p.m. Sunday, authorities responded to The Masquerade and learned two of the four victims got rowdy and climbed onto the stage during a break before the concert’s main act, Officer Lisa Bender said at the time.“Another patron took issue and an argument ensued,” she said.The patron pulled out a pistol and shot the rowdy concertgoers, according to police. The gunman also fired toward the ground, and “most likely” hit the other victims at that time, Bender said.The crowd, including the victims and the gunman, ran toward the front exit.Two people collapsed going up a flight of stairs that led to the exit, Bender said.“The suspected shooter, still armed, was witnessed by unarmed security but was not successfully detained,” she said.One of the victims died on the scene. That person had a gunshot wound to the chest.The others were taken to Grady Memorial Hospital, where the second person was pronounced dead with gunshot wounds to the upper and lower torso.The two survivors were stable with foot and ankle wounds, officials said.RELATED:The Masquerade moves to new home in Underground AtlantaWhen The Masquerade relocated last November from its longtime home on North Avenue to Kenny’s Alley, the Underground location had originally been conceived as a temporary space. Management later signed a lease that will last at least 10 years.Officials announced the deal last month.RELATED:The Masquerade staying put at Underground AtlantaDALLAS (CBSDFW.COM) –Police say four people were shot and one person died in a disturbance outside a Dallas bar early Saturday morning.Officers responded to the shooting call at Emerald City Grill in the 2500 block of Martin Luther King Boulevard and Atlanta Street at around 1:45 a.m. Police say there appeared to be a disturbance inside the bar that spilled to the outside.According to police, when the people involved were pushed outside, shots were then fired. Three men and a woman were struck by gunfire. All four were transported to Baylor Hospital for treatment.Police say one of the victims, 28-year-old Johnny Williams, died from his injuries.Johnny Williams (Dallas PD)There have no arrests so far in this case.If you previously used a social network to login to WRAL.com, click the “Forgot your password” link to reset your password.Mask dispute at Fayetteville sports bar prompts fight that ends with security guard shotSlain woman, murder suspect had been friends since middle schoolCOVID-19 vaccine clinics put J&J vaccine on hold after adverse reactions; CDC finds no safety issue with vaccineAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyDuke to require proof of vaccination before students can enroll for Fall semesterNo region in the world spared as virus cases, deaths surgeIsolated showers and thunderstorms on tap again for SaturdayHail, flooding throughout central NC as more severe weather awaits on SaturdayAverage number of Atlantic hurricanes grows, 2021 could be another active seasonTriangle reels in profit, exposure when MLF comes to townPro fishing returns to Triangle with events at 3 area lakesBring back the roars: The patrons return to the MastersAmazon warehouse workers reject union bid in AlabamaBusiness owners struggling to fill open positionsJobs remain unfilled as unemployment benefits outpace wagesEditorial: Find ways to ease voting, not restrict itPATRICIA MURPHY: Fighting business, baseball and future to defend lie about the pastEditorial: Ignoring their own warnings about the N.C. LotteryExpect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodIs that a firecracker in her bag of kale from Target?Wondering about your tax refund? 5 On Your Side looks into delaysNorth Carolina families united by shared slave history connectAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyWoman who coughed on cancer patient gets 30 days in jailFoodie News: Union Special bakery is expandingVirtual Fun Roundup: Observe the moon, T. rex bites, storytimeWeekend best bets: Southern Ideal Home Show, shrimp boil and drive-in moviesWRAL WeatherCenter ForecastEvening Pick 3 Pick 4 and Cash 5Expect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodPublished: 2017-11-11 07:20:00Updated: 2018-07-13 14:06:20Posted November 11, 2017 7:20 a.m. ESTUpdated July 13, 2018 2:06 p.m. EDTFayetteville, N.C.— One man died Saturday morning and four others were injured in a shooting at a gentlemen's club on Bragg Boulevard.Around 2 a.m., officers with the Fayetteville Police Department responded to a shooting at Diamondz Gentlemen's Club, located at 2835 Bragg Boulevard. At the scene, police found five victims suffering from gunshot wounds.All the victims were transported to a local hospital, where 40-year-old Akash R. Talati died as a result of his injuries. Officials said one victim is in critical condition, one is in fair condition and two others have been released from the hospital.Markeese Dewitt, 23, was charged Saturday night with attempted murder in connection with the shooting. He was receiving treatment at an area hospital Saturday night and will be arrested upon release, police said.A memorial for Talati was growing outside the club Saturday night as homeowners in the area expressed shock about the shooting."For the first three months, whenever I walk by, it was always a nice vibe. They're just nice people, having a good time. Nothing is going on," said Sean Daley, who recently moved to the area.According to posts on social media, Talati was the owner of the Diamondz Gentlemen's Club, but police would not confirm that information.The names of the remaining victims are being withheld until family can be notified.The shooting is currently under investigation and police have not released a motive.Anyone with any information is asked to contact Detective J. Littlejohn with the Fayetteville Police Department at 910-818-3468 or Crime Stoppers at 910-483-8477.SUGGEST A CORRECTIONMore On ThisIMAGES: Man charged in Fayetteville strip club shooting that killed 1, injured 42Markeese Dewitt, 23, was charged Saturday night with attempted murder in connection with the shooting. He was receiving treatment at an area hospital Saturday night and will be arrested upon release, police said.A memorial for Talati was growing outside the club Saturday night as homeowners in the area expressed shock about the shooting."For the first three months, whenever I walk by, it was always a nice vibe. They're just nice people, having a good time. Nothing is going on," said Sean Daley, who recently moved to the area.According to posts on social media, Talati was the owner of the Diamondz Gentlemen's Club, but police would not confirm that information.The names of the remaining victims are being withheld until family can be notified.The shooting is currently under investigation and police have not released a motive.Anyone with any information is asked to contact Detective J. Littlejohn with the Fayetteville Police Department at 910-818-3468 or Crime Stoppers at 910-483-8477.Copyright 2018 by Capitol Broadcasting Company. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.©2021  Capitol Broadcasting Company, Inc.Credit: DaytonDailyNewsCredit: DaytonDailyNewsUPDATE @ 2:15 p.m.Trotwood Police Chief Erik Wilson told our news station that the child struck by gunfire is a 5-year-old boy and has a non life threatening leg injury.  Additionally, Chief Wilson informed that three adult males involved in the shooting all went into surgery and will be listed in critical condition until it can be seen how they recover from surgery.RELATED: See more trending stories on WHIO.comAuthorities say they have some good leads they are following, but have not named any persons of interest to this point. They currently believe more than one person entered the house where the altercation started. We will continue to update this story with the latest information as it becomes available.UPDATE @ 12:49 p.m.Trotwood police Chief Erik Wilson said all three male victims in their 20s were out of surgery Friday afternoon, but still in critical condition. Wilson said a gunshot wound to a 5-year-old boy was superficial.Wilson said very little additional information will be available prior to Monday.EARLIER REPORTTrotwood police said four people, including a child, were shot inside a Trotwood home during an altercation early Friday morning.Around 1:30 a.m., residents inside a home in the 100 block of Olive Road answered a knock on the door, said Trotwood police chief Erik Wilson. The person came inside an an altercation ensued, and the victims were shot multiple times, he said.>>TRENDING: Fire destroys Food for Less; residents lose ‘go-to-store’The suspect and victims likely know each other.Three adults are in serious condition and were in surgery as of Friday morning. A child was grazed by a bullet and was taken to Dayton Children’s Hospital. The child did not suffer life-threatening injuries.>>Miami Valley Crime NewsWilson said police are familiar with the house and have responded to the house on multiple occasions, although the nature of the calls was not released.>>Miami Valley’s Most WantedOne of the adult victims ran across the street seeking help, police said.A suspect has not been identified.>>Bullet strikes woman in Trotwood; resident hears three to four gunshotsSign up for our newslettersThe wife of the man who opened fire at a church in Sutherland Springs last November says he tied her to their bed before leaving for the shooting in which more than two dozen people were killed.In a series of interviews with the San Antonio Express-News, Danielle Kelley said her husband, Devin Kelley, behaved strangely detached that morning until he put their 2-year-old son in the bedroom and forced her into the bedroom. She says he bound her to the bed using rope, handcuffs, and tape as their son cried.She said Devin told her he loved her, kissed their 5-month-old daughter in her crib and told their son, "I'll be right back." He grabbed his rifle and two handguns, donned military-style tactical gear and body armor, then left. Devin Kelley killed himself after the shooting.WATCHVIDEOSSanta Monica party bus shooting suspects sought; 1 killedKTLAby:Marissa WenzkeA shooting at what sheriff’s officials described as a biker bar in Gardena left four people injured in the early hours of Saturday, Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department officials said.Sheriff’s deputies responded to the shooting, which was near the intersection of 163rd and Main streets, at about 12:15 a.m., officials said.Although authorities originally said two people were struck by gunfire, they later raised the number to four.It was still unclear exactly how the shooting unfolded, but deputies said there was a large gathering.At least two of the gunshot victims were taken to nearby hospitals for treatment, but officials said all four sustained wounded that were not life-threatening.Deputies said the venue was known to be a “biker bar.”No further details were available.#HappeningNow,#LASDCarson Station Deputies Responding to the Gardena Area Regarding a Large Party Disturbance and Gunshot Fire. Stay Clear— LA County Sheriffs (@LASDHQ)November 4, 2017SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.MenuBuffalo Police report a shooting occurred Friday night just after 10:30 p.m. in the 100 block of Roosevelt Avenue.Three males, 15, 16, 18 and a 19-year-old female were struck by gunfire outside in a large group of people, according to police.Officials believe there was a party going on when a vehicle pulled up and opened fire on the crowd. Three victims, including the female, were taken to ECMC.The 16-year-old male has been treated and released, the 19-year-old female and the 18-year-old male are in stable condition.A 15-year-old Sloan male went to Women and Children's Hospital with apparent non-life threatening injuries.Police ask anyone with information to call or text the TIPCALL Line at 847-2255.ST. TAMMANY PARISH, LA (WVUE) - St. Tammany Parish Sheriff's Deputies announce the arrest of a man after a shooting in Lacombe leaves one man dead and four other individuals injured. The shooting took place on Nov. 3, just after 9:30 p.m. in the 27000 block of Mirmar Street. The person taken into custody has been identified as 27-year-old Herman Williams of Pearl River.According to police, deputies arrived on scene and found a man identified as 25-year-old Jarred Kirsch lying in the doorway of the home suffering from multiple gunshot wounds. He was pronounced dead on the scene. Police also found four other individuals on scene, suffering from non-life threatening wounds.Through their investigation, detectives learned that Kirsch and Williams forced their way into the house before gunfire was exchanged. Investigators believe that the house wasn't chosen at random and that it was drug-related.Police say that Williams ran away before responding deputies arrived on scene. He was arrested by U.S. Marshal's Task Force members in New Orleans on Nov. 14. He was brought to the St. Tammany Parish Jail where he was booked with one count of aggravated burglary with a dangerous weapon and four counts of attempted second degree murder.The investigation into the matter continues.Copyright 2017WVUE. All rights reserved.1025 S. Norman C. Francis Pkwy.New Orleans, LA 70125(504) 486-6161A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Posted:Thursday, July 26, 2007 12:00 amVera Mae HaleODESSA Vera Mae Hale, 98, of Ellisville, Miss., died Tuesday, July 24, 2007, in Ellisville.Services will be at 2 p.m. Friday at Temple Baptist Church Harvester Class with David Newton officiating. Burial will be at Sunset Memorial Gardens.She was born in McCamey.SURVIVORS Daughter, Donna L. Sullivan of Odessa; and two grandchildren.Posted inDeath NoticesonThursday, July 26, 2007 12:00 am.CLICK HEREto view full version  of OA Social Marketplace.TodayTomorrowmondaytuesdayBrandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Brandpoint (BPT)Having a pet is a lot of responsibility, and we’ll help by giving you lots of tips and tricks!More >>Our fitness articles will help teach you how to work out with gym- and home-based exercises.More >>Enjoy the crosswords challenge in our free daily puzzles, from the harder Sunday crossword to the quicker daily.More >>Every Sudoku has a unique solution that can be reached logically. Enter numbers into the blank spaces so that each row, column and 3x3 box contains the numbers 1 to 9.More >>Odessa, 
                            TX432-362-0004Odessa, 
                            TX432-550-3668Odessa, 
                            TX432-337-4661Odessa, 
                            TX432-333-7602© Copyright 2021,Odessa American, Odessa, TX. Powered byBLOX Content Management SystemfromTownNews.com. [Terms of Use|Privacy Policy]PETERSBURG, VA (WWBT) - One person is dead and three others were injured in a Petersburg shooting early Saturday morning.According to police, the shooting happened on North Sycamore Street at Franklin Street around 2:30 a.m. Investigators found 40 bullet casings around the area of the shooting."I heard a 'boom, boom, boom, boom, boom,'" said a man who wished not to be identified said. He lives in the neighborhood and heard the events take place.Mark Thornton, 26, of Dinwiddie County, was pronounced dead at the scene, police say.Another man was flown to VCU Medical Center. Two others were taken to hospitals by ambulance. The extent of their injuries is unclear.Police say all other people shot range in age from 27 to 30 years old."It's getting worse. There's good people who work here," another resident said.Currently police have no suspects or motives in the shooting. Anyone with information is asked to call Petersburg/Dinwiddie Crime Solvers at 804-861-1212.Copyright 2017 WWBTNBC12. All rights reservedReport an ErrororSubmit a Tip to NBC125710 Midlothian TurnpikeRichmond, VA 23225(804) 230-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) –Four people were shot Friday evening in San Francisco’s Western Addition neighborhood, according to police.The shooting was reported at 7:25 p.m. in the 1100 block of Fillmore Street.All four of the victims were taken to a hospital with injuries not considered life-threatening, police said.Officers have detained two possible suspects, according to police.TM and © Copyright 2017 CBS Radio Inc. and its relevant subsidiaries. CBS RADIO and EYE Logo TM and Copyright 2017 CBS Broadcasting Inc. Used under license. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. Bay City News contributed to this reportA Lake County man accused of killing his 85-year-old father and a longtime friend during an October rampage in which he also allegedly trained his gun on at least five other people will face trial on a long list of felony counts including murder, attempted murder, arson and assault.Alan Leroy Ashmore, 61, was at home in Clearlake Oaks on Oct. 23 when he apparently blew up because a 22-year-old woman refused his advances, Lake County District Attorney Don Anderson said.Ashmore held the woman at knifepoint and, when she fought back, shot her in the foot before she escaped, authorities said.When Ashmore tried to chase after her, his father, Douglas Ashmore, 81, intervened and Alan Ashmore shot him in the face, killing him instantly, officials said.A neighbor who witnessed the shooting, Harold Noell, drew fire next, but Ashmore’s pistol misfired and Noell got away, authorities said.After retrieving a 12-gauge shotgun from his house, Ashmore then fired into three neighboring houses before driving a short distance and encountering another man, Richard Braden, who was shot and killed in his car.A responding CHP officer, Steven Patrick, also was shot but survived because of his bulletproof vest, Anderson said.As Ashmore went to a nearby gas station, where he stole a soda, and then a convenience store, where he took cigarettes and a lighter, Ashmore fired his weapon at one of the clerks, and missed, and threatened another with his gun, authorities said.He later threatened another man in an attempt to steal his vehicle, though the driver sped off before he was hurt, Anderson said. Ashmore also lit two fires on the side of the road at one point, apparently to distract pursuing officers while he drove from place to place, finally surrendering when he hit a law enforcement roadblock on High Valley Road on the north side of Clear Lake.During a daylong preliminary hearing Wednesday, a judge heard testimony and determined there was sufficient evidence to try Ashmore on two counts of murder, two counts of attempted murder, one count of attempted murder of a peace officer, five counts of assault with a deadly weapon, four counts of shooting at an occupied dwelling, two counts of arson as well as arson, robbery, burglary and being a felon in possession of a firearm.He is scheduled to appear in Superior Court on ?April 24.You can reach Staff Writer Mary Callahan at 707-521-5249 or mary.callahan@pressdemocrat.com. On Twitter @MaryCallahanB.UPDATED: Please read and follow our commenting policy:Four people were injured in a shooting overnight (WFSB)The Hartford Police Department said they are investigating a shooting that sent four people to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries around 12 a.m on Saturday night.Police said the shooting happened in the area of Wethersfield Avenue and Elliott Street and the Major Crimes Unit and Violence Reduction Team responded as well.Police have said no arrests have been made and a motive is not known.The shooting is still under investigation by police.Refresh this page for updates as they come into our newsroom.Copyright 2017 WFSB (Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Public FileFor questions about WFSB's FCC online public file or help with the FCC online public file, contact: WFSB Human ResourcesPhone: 515-284-3707Email: Shannon.lampe@meredith.comThe Tampa Police Department is investigating an overnight shooting in the Robles Park area that injured four people.The shooting occurred in the 400 block of E. Nordica Street in Tampa early Saturday morning.Police said there was some sort of disturbance outside the address between several individuals.Three people were taken to the hospital with minor, non-life threatening injuries, police said. One person was taken to Brandon Regional by a personal vehicle. They may have serious injuries, officials said.After speaking with the victims, police said an unknown mini-van type vehicle drove by and shot into a crowd of people standing outside.No suspect(s) has been identified at this time.The victims have been identified as Ronnie O'Neil, Anthony Lewis, Ruby Alexander, and Donnie Miller.This is an ongoing investigation.This is a developing story, please check back for updates.&amp;amp;nbsp;George William Lehman was sleeping on the porch of the house at 164 Eubanks St. East in Oceanway early Saturday only to find four family members suffering from gunshots when he woke up."Three of my nephews were shot. My niece was shot," Lehman said as he recounted the startling scene when he came out of his sleep about 3:15 a.m. Saturday. "It was brutal, dude. It was brutal."The pre-dawn quadruple shooting resulted in at least one critical injury to a man. Jacksonville police had not released any names of the victims as of Saturday afternoon.The shooting occurred in a quiet neighborhood about 1/4 of a mile off North Main Street. Officers located four victims with apparent gunshot wounds — two men, a woman and a 17-year-old boy.Lehman didn’t mention any names but said he was unaware of any strife in the family."There were no arguments," Lehman said outside the home Saturday afternoon.Police have provide little information was provided about what led up to the shooting, only that someone fired into the residence, then ran to an unknown vehicle to flee the scene.Lehman only said he woke up from his slumber to find his niece and nephews injured throughout the small one-story house and he began to provide as much help as he could."I went in to [the house] to help my niece," Lehman said.He declined to elaborate further and broke off an interview with a reporter to go back into the home, noting that he was still upset."I don’t really want to talk. My family got shot up," Lehman said.Next door at 152 Eubanks St. East, Gerald Griffin said he was unaware of any trouble at his neighbor’s home. But he also was awaken by the sound of gunfire."I thought it was firecrackers," Griffin said. "Then there was a bunch of cop cars, fire trucks and all that stuff all over the street."Griffin said he was unaware of any tension at his neighbor’s house and found them to be relatively quiet on the secluded street.Drew Dixon: (904) 359-4098.George William Lehman was sleeping on the porch of the house at 164 Eubanks St. East in Oceanway early Saturday only to find four family members suffering from gunshots when he woke up."Three of my nephews were shot. My niece was shot," Lehman said as he recounted the startling scene when he came out of his sleep about 3:15 a.m. Saturday. "It was brutal, dude. It was brutal."The pre-dawn quadruple shooting resulted in at least one critical injury to a man. Jacksonville police had not released any names of the victims as of Saturday afternoon.The shooting occurred in a quiet neighborhood about 1/4 of a mile off North Main Street. Officers located four victims with apparent gunshot wounds — two men, a woman and a 17-year-old boy.Lehman didn’t mention any names but said he was unaware of any strife in the family."There were no arguments," Lehman said outside the home Saturday afternoon.Police have provide little information was provided about what led up to the shooting, only that someone fired into the residence, then ran to an unknown vehicle to flee the scene.Lehman only said he woke up from his slumber to find his niece and nephews injured throughout the small one-story house and he began to provide as much help as he could."I went in to [the house] to help my niece," Lehman said.He declined to elaborate further and broke off an interview with a reporter to go back into the home, noting that he was still upset."I don’t really want to talk. My family got shot up," Lehman said.Next door at 152 Eubanks St. East, Gerald Griffin said he was unaware of any trouble at his neighbor’s home. But he also was awaken by the sound of gunfire."I thought it was firecrackers," Griffin said. "Then there was a bunch of cop cars, fire trucks and all that stuff all over the street."Griffin said he was unaware of any tension at his neighbor’s house and found them to be relatively quiet on the secluded street.Drew Dixon: (904) 359-4098.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Florida Times-Union  ~ 1 Independent Drive, Suite 200, Jacksonville, FL 32202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.WATCHVIDEOSQuadruple shooting in Chester4 hurt after shooters fire from bridge onto basketball court. Walter Perez reports during Action News at 11 p.m. on October 21, 2017.The man accused of killing three people and shooting three others in a spree this month that started at his workplace in Maryland and ended in his home state of Delaware will not appear in court Tuesday as scheduled, after he was indicted on additional charges.A New Castle County grand jury returned an indictment against alleged shooter Radee Labeeb Prince, 37, Monday morning with eight counts including attempted first-degree murder, six weapons-related charges and a charge of resisting arrest.A new court appearance for Prince has not yet been set, Delaware Department of Justice spokesman Carl Kanefsky wrote in an email.Last week, officials announced their decision to first prosecute Prince in Delaware because, they said, that state does not have parole in criminal cases, while Maryland does. In Delaware, Prince faces a maximum prison term of life without parole, officials said in the statement.[Suspect in deadly Md. workplace shooting will first face trial in Del.]"Prince will ultimately face trials in both states," according to a joint statement from the Delaware Department of Justice and the State's Attorney's Office in Harford County, Md.Harford County Sheriff Jeffrey R. Gahler has said that surveillance video showed Prince, shortly before 9 a.m. on Oct. 18, with co-workers at Advanced Granite Solutions, in a business park in Edgewood, Md. Prince had the employees gather around him and, as they got closer, pulled out a handgun and fired, according to a description from Gahler.After the shooting in Maryland, authorities allege Prince drove to a used-car dealership in Wilmington, Del., where he shot an acquaintance in the head and body.In Maryland, Prince is charged with three counts of first-degree murder and two counts of attempted murder. If convicted, he would face the possibility of multiple life sentences.[Victim in Maryland workplace shooting had complained about suspect’s anger, family says]John Edinger, the public defender representing Prince, said, "he's a citizen that's presumed innocent. Until the state can formally present its case before a jury, no one should be jumping to conclusions at this point."On the day of the shootings, law enforcement officials searched for Prince and his photo appeared on websites and TV stations as the suspect. The manhunt eventually ended when tipsters reported his vehicle in a Newark, Del., neighborhood about 20 miles southwest of Wilmington, Del.Prince was arrested by federal agents after a foot chase during which Prince tossed away a .380-caliber handgun, authorities said.Read more:The Boy Scouts are letting in girls. That won't be anything news for these Maryland teens.'It's been a good life: A 100th birthday celebration for a woman many called mom.A man with a machete killed their parents. Then it was their turn to speak in court.Former financial adviser to Mike Tyson, Glen Rice sentenced for embezzling $1 millionThanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByLarry CelonaandJoe MarinoSubmitOctober 17, 2017|9:34pm|UpdatedOctober 18, 2017 | 1:56amFour people were wounded in a drive-by shooting Tuesday night in Brooklyn, authorities said.The victims — 15-, 21-, 31- and 46-year-old males — were standing outside a building at 181   Martense St.,  at 8:08 p.m., when shots rang out from a passing car in East Flatbush,   law enforcement sources said.One of the victims was a local barber, according to the owner  of nearby Brooklyn’z Blade Unisex.  The victim works at another barber shop and had dropped by to say hello at Brooklyn’z Blade Unisex moments before the shooting.“After the shots stopped I saw the barber holding his stomach, he was yelling, `Call the police!’ ”  the shop owner said. “I just know he got shot in his hand and looked like the same shot hit his hand and his stomach — his whole shirt had blood all over it.”Three minutes later and 1 ½ miles to the north, a 27-year-old man was shot near the corner Bedford Avenue and Union Street, police said.A suspect was picked up for that second shooting, law enforcement sources said. While that suspected gunman wasn’t a motorist, sources said, investigators want to know if there’s any connection between the two attacks that happened so relatively close together.All five of the shooting victims  are expected to survive, police said.Additional reporting by David K. LiRead NextBill would allow pets on MTA subways and buses during emer...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationLots of sunshine. High 79F. Winds W at 10 to 15 mph..Clear to partly cloudy. Low around 50F. Winds NW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:32 pmYour Star, Your WorldBill Graham / The Meridian StarThe owner of Frank's Drive-In, 52-year-old Robert Trout, died during an armed robbery of a bar on Fifth Street in Meridian on Oct. 16.DavisSandersBill Graham / The Meridian StarThe owner of Frank's Drive-In, 52-year-old Robert Trout, died during an armed robbery of a bar on Fifth Street in Meridian on Oct. 16.The suspects of the Oct. 16 fatal shooting of Robert Trout at Frank's Drive-In are now in custody at the Lauderdale County Detention Facility.Dystiny D. Davis, 25, and Donshay Meundre Sanders, 21, were transferred from the custody of the Killeen, Texas Police Department to Meridian, following their capture Nov. 21 in Killeen.SandersDavis, of Killeen, and Sanders, of Meridian, face charges for the murder of Trout and the attempted murder of three others, as well as armed robbery. Davis and Sanders were denied bond because of their capital murder charges.DavisMeridian Sgt. Dareall Thompson said the Meridian Police Department anticipates more arrests in the case and said details will be released Monday following a preliminary hearing at noon.The charges come after Trout, 52, died and three others were shot during an armed robbery of Frank's Drive-In, a bar on Fifth Street in Meridian.A Monday night shooting at Frank’s Drive-In, a bar on Fifth Street in Meridian, killed one …One person was shot and killed and three were injured during an armed robbery at Frank’s Dri…The victim in Monday's fatal shooting has been identified as Robert Trout, the owner of Fra…Two suspects in an October murder in Meridian have been arrested in Texas.Two defendants in a 2017 murder in Meridian are headed to prison.FOLEY, Ala. [ndash] Graveside services for Inna Belle Van-Austin, will be Saturday, April 10, 2021, at 11 a.m. in Emelle, Ala. She passed away March 26, 2021, in Foley, Ala. Arrangements by Bumpers Funeral Home of York.STARKVILLE - Sharon Dexter Henson, 76, entered the gates of Heaven on March 29, 2021, after having lost her hard battle with cancer. She is survived by her two children, Rodney Henson and wife Susu of York, Ala., Shannon Henson Morris and husband Mike Mathews of Prosper, Texas; three grandch…PACHUTA [ndash] Arrangements were incomplete at Berry & Gardner Funeral Home for Mr. Jerry Robinson, 85, of Pachuta, who died Wednesday, April 7, 2021, at Rush Foundation Hospital, Meridian.Born Jan. 24, 1974, Meridian Miss. and died April 5, 2021, Meridian Miss. She is survived by Richard Anthony Reede; her son, Rick Austin Reede; her sister, April Gower Hardin (Jason) of Atlanta; brother, Van Gower of Hattiesburg. Miss., Lisa Reede Covington, Mrs. Angela Reede Daniels (Dale) …Sorry, there are no recent results for popular videos.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up now to get our FREE breaking news coverage delivered right to your inbox.First Amendment:Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.WATCHVIDEOSNeighbors remember 4-year-old shot to deathA 4-year-old girl and a man are dead after a quadruple shooting that took place in an apartment complex breezeway in southwest Houston.MenuAuthorities have identified a 19-year-old woman who was fatally wounded in adrive-by shooting at a west Phoenix house party.They say Jermonee Tolliver Moore was taken to a trauma center after the shooting early Sunday and later died."She's a joy, cut down in her prime," said Mable Lee Rockett, the victim's grandmother. "Teach your kids. Teach them the value of life.  Teach them to love their mother.  Praise them, because we're not promised tomorrow.”Police say three men also were shot and two suffered critical injuries.The wounded men range in age from 19 to 21. Their names haven't been released.Phoenix police say officers responded to a home near 107th Avenue and Camelback Road about 2 a.m. Sunday.Witnesses say several men and women were involved in a fight at a party and were asked to leave.Police say an unknown person arrived at the home and fired numerous shots."My daughter lost so much blood. They had to bring her back six times. The last time she just didn't,” said Kimberly Moore, the victim’s mother. “I was able to be there though. I held her hand. She took her last breath, I was with my daughter."They say there isn't a viable suspect description and the investigation is ongoing."Whoever did this, or if you know something, we beg you, say something. Do the right thing. Be a man," said Rockett.Anyone with any information is urged to contact the Phoenix Police Department.Report a typoSAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) – Four people were hospitalized after a shooting in San Francisco’s Mission District on Tuesday evening, according to police.The shooting was reported at 7:06 p.m. in the area of 25th Street and Treat Avenue.A suspect chased the victims and shot at them. All four, men ages 60, 56, 44 and 39, were hit and suffered injuries that were not life-threatening, police said.The suspect, described as a man believed to be between 18 and 25 years old, remains at large.Anyone with information about the case is encouraged to call the Police Department’s anonymous tip line at (415) 575-4444 or send a tip by text message to TIP411 with “SFPD” in the message.© Copyright 2017 by CBS San Francisco and Bay City News Service. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.CW39 Houstonby:Ciara R.HOUSTON — Five people were injured during a drive-by shooting Monday morning at a night club in the South Union area, the Houston Police Department said.Officers responded just after midnight to a shooting call at the Turning Point Club in the 3300 block of Old Spanish Trail.Investigators said two of the victims were found outside the club when officers arrived. They were taken to the hospital by paramedics.The three remaining victims were taken to the hospital in private vehicles, police said. It’s unclear whether they were inside or outside the club when the shooting happened.Officers also found two cars with bullets holes and a store down the street that was struck by gunfire, the police department said.All five victims are expected to survive their injuries, according to police.SubmitHOUSTON (CW39) A FlashMob is happening today in Downtown Houston by an organization called Black Menswear. The organization works to improve the perception of black men and encourages positivity within the black community.Black Menswear focuses on three community-building pillars: FlashMob photoshoots, culture content creation, and social media influence.HOUSTON (CW39) As part of its ongoing commitment to help connect low-income families to the internet so they can fully participate in educational opportunities and the digital economy, Comcast today announced plans to equip Harris County community centers with WiFi enabled "Lift Zones" to provide students who do not have Internet at home with safe spaces to participate in distance learning.In partnership with Harris County, Comcast is providing WiFi hotspots to help students get online, participate in distance learning and do their homework. This initiative provides free connectivity inside partner community centers for the next three years.HOUSTON (CW39) Today we celebrate the Houston Astros doing it #fortheH and winning "in the H" during the home opener on this edition of Houston Happens with Maggie Flecknoe and Star Harvey from 9:30-10am on April 10, 2021.Maggie takes a swing at finding out what it takes to become a professional baseball player.MenuAn investigation is underway after four men were shot at a party in west Phoenix Saturday morning.Before 2:30 a.m., officers responded to a party involving young adults near 87th Avenue and Thomas Road.Officers located four victims, all in serious condition, according to Phoenix police.The victims are expected to survive their injuries, police said.Police say between 30 to 50 people were at the party at the time of the incident.Anyone with information on this crime is asked to call the Phoenix Police Department.Report a typoFiled under:Five people were wounded in a shooting early Friday in the Gresham neighborhood on the South Side.The five victims initially told police that someone confronted them in an alley at 1:18 a.m. in the 8000 block of South Marshfield before firing shots, according to Chicago police. They then become uncooperative, and additional details were not available.Two 17-year-old boys and a 38-year-old man were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, police said.One of the teenage boys was shot in the back, and his condition stabilized, police said. The other was in good condition with a gunshot wound to the leg.The man was struck in the leg, and his condition stabilized, police said.Two women — ages 19 and 20 — were taken to Holy Cross Hospital with gunshot wounds to the leg, police said.The younger woman was in good condition, police said. The older woman’s condition had stabilized.Area South detectives were investigating the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.PerezOrtizFour people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.CASA GRANDE — Police have identified the two suspects and the four victims in Thursday's deadly shooting.Casa Grande police said Alec Perez, 31, and Rodney Ortiz, 22, were arrested in connection with the shooting that occurred at a duplex in the 400 block of West 13th Street at 8:15 a.m.PerezPerez and Ortiz were booked into the Pinal County Adult Detention Center Thursday afternoon on charges of premeditated murder in the first degree, according to Pinal County Sheriff's Office inmate lists.Perez and Ortiz are accused of shooting the four people Thursday. The victims were identified as Crysta Proctor, 29; Connie Carrera, 31; Jose Martin Aguilera, 27; and Justin Allen Yates, 32. All the victims were of Casa Grande.OrtizCGPD Sgt. Chris Palmer said Proctor and Perez were married but estranged. The couple had a history of domestic violence, he confirmed. Police have called the shooting a case of domestic violence.The mother of Alec Perez released a statement Friday afternoon saying she was dismayed by the shooting and offered condolences to the families of the victims."I have no words to convey the level of shock, horror and dismay felt by the shooting incident in Casa Grande," said Mary Lou Rodriguez, of Hayden, in an email to PinalCentral. "I love my son, Alec. However, I do not condone or accept violent behavior as acceptable. In this tragic moment of profound sadness, I express my condolences to the victims’ families and their loved ones."A family spokesman said Rodriguez and other family members wouldn't have anything more to say at this time.The four victims were friends. Palmer said police still were trying to determine the relationship between the two suspects, Perez and Ortiz.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Casa Grande Police Department officers responded to a home in the 400 block of West 13th Street at 8:15 a.m. Thursday where four people were found shot to death.Casa Grande Police Department officers responded to a home in the 400 block of West 13th Street at 8:15 a.m. Thursday where four people were found shot to death.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande that police are calling a case of domestic violence.Casa Grande Police Department officers responded to a home in the 400 block of West 13th Street at 8:15 a.m. Thursday where four people were found shot to death.Casa Grande Police Department officers responded to a home in the 400 block of West 13th Street at 8:15 a.m. Thursday where four people were found shot to death.Palmer declined to say what types of guns were used in the shooting.Perez and Ortiz are the only suspects believed to be involved.Palmer said police continue to investigate the shooting and urged the public or any witnesses who might know any information to call 421-8700.CASA GRANDE — Four people were killed in a shooting Thursday morning in Casa Grande and two …CASA GRANDE — Court and police records show one of the suspects in Thursday’s shooting had threatened to kill his estranged wife earlier.CASA GRANDE — The quadruple murder in Casa Grande Thursday attributed to domestic violence came at the start of Domestic Violence Awareness Month.CASA GRANDE — A fire broke out early Saturday morning at the same housing complex where four people were shot and killed a couple days prior.FLORENCE — The two men accused of shooting and killing four people last week in Casa Grande have been charged with multiple counts of murder.FLORENCE — Prosecutors have decided to pursue the death penalty for two men accused of killing four people in Casa Grande.FLORENCE — Alec Perez, accused of killing four people in 2017 in Casa Grande, was in Pinal County Superior Court on Monday.FLORENCE — Without the need for deliberation, Pinal County Superior Court Judge Patrick Gard decided Friday that Alec Perez could face the dea…Follow CBSMIAMI.COM:Facebook|TwitterMIAMI (CBSMiami) – Parents are speaking out after what Miami-Dade police are calling a “non-fatal shooting” of four adults one hour after a candle light vigil for a woman who was murdered last week.The vigil, held NW 20th Avenue and NW 65th Street, was for Victoria Tutson. The 30-year-old mother of four was riding in a car with a friend when someone shot at it. Tutson, who was struck by several bullets, was taken to North Shore Hospital where she died.Laveta Wesley said her 31-year-old son Edward Jordan was at the vigil for Tutson when a car drove by and fired on them. Jordan was hit in the side.“I’m heartbroken because my son is laying up here in trauma, not knowing that it was, anybody could have been killed, anybody,” she said outside the hospital.Devontae Hemans, 18, who was sitting on a porch near the vigil, was also wounded. He is a senior at Miami Central Senior High School.His mother, Latrese Williams, told CBS4’s Peter D’Oench, “I’m very heartbroken and I am devastated because this happened to my child.  My heart also goes out to the other parents. This is terrible, just terrible, especially for the family of the mother who lost her life last week.”“I don’t feel good about that, man. Kids are supposed to be out in the open, at 8 o’clock at night people are shooting, that don’t make no sense,” said Hemans’s stepfather Anthony Hemans.“It’s senseless you know. A lot of that happens, a lot of kids die from that every year. People need to stop, that’s what they need to do, ya’ll need to stop because it don’t make no sense. Innocent people are getting killed,” said Devontae’s stepmother, Jennifer Johnson.The shooting at the vigil happened just blocks away from where Tutson was shot. In both cases, shots were fired by someone in a silver vehicle. Police have not said if the shootings are related.Wesley said she wants answers.“Yes, I really do. Why? Why? And to find out who did and why,” she said.Miami-Dade Police say two females who are 19 and 25 years old were also wounded in the Tuesday night drive-by that happened at 8:48 p.m. near the Lincoln Fields apartments.Anyone with information that can help the police is urged to call Crime Stoppers at (305) 471-TIPS.AdvertisementSupported byByKen Belson,Jennifer MedinaandRichard Pérez-PeñaLAS VEGAS — At first, it sounded like fireworks — a loud, crackling noise. Then the awful realization began to spread, unevenly, through the huge crowd.It dawned on people when they heard screams, when they saw bloodied victims collapse around them, or when others stampeded for the exits, trampling some of the people in their way.Many of the terrified concertgoers followed their instincts and crouched or lay flat, not realizing that they remained exposed to a gunmanlodged high above them. Others surged into surrounding streets and buildings, leaving behind debris lost in the panic — drink cups, shoes, and cellphones that kept ringing for hours, as relatives and friends tried to reach their loved ones and find out if they were safe.[MGM Resorts Internationalhas agreed to pay up to $800 million to settle lawsuits from victims of the October 2017 Las Vegas mass shooting.]How one of the deadliest mass shootings in American history unfolded.By sunrise on Monday, the staggering toll at an outdoor country music festival on a cool desert night was becoming clear: at least 59 people killed, the police said, and 527 injured, either by gunfire or in the flight to safety.A lone gunman perched on the 32nd floor of the Mandalay Bay Resort and Casino had smashed the windows of his suite with a hammer, taken aim at a crowd of 22,000 people, and committed one of thedeadliest mass shootings in American history. Late on Monday, law enforcement officials said they still had no idea what the motive was.The police said they found 23 firearms in his suite. And when they searched the attacker’s house, they discovered an additional 19 firearms and, according to Sheriff Joseph Lombardo of the Las Vegas Metropolitan Police Department, “some explosives, and several thousand rounds of ammo.” He added that they also found ammonium nitrate, a fertilizer sometimes used in making bombs, in the gunman’s car.The sheriff said some rifles found in the hotel room may have been modified to make them fully automatic. Automatic rifles, which fire multiple rounds with a squeeze of a trigger, are highly regulated, and on videos posted online by witnesses, the rapid-fire sound indicated that at least one weapon was fully automatic.Down below at the Route 91 Harvest Festival, Melissa Ayala, 41, was drinking and laughing with four friends from California when they heard the gunfire, which at first they thought was fireworks. Then a man near her fell with a bullet wound to his neck. “There was blood pouring everywhere,” she said.And then: “It was just total chaos,” she said. “People falling down and laying everywhere. We were trying to take cover and we had no idea where to go.”The police identified the gunman asStephen Paddock, 64, a retiree with no significant criminal history, who liked to gamble and seemed to live a quiet life with his girlfriend in Mesquite, Nev., about 80 miles northeast of Las Vegas. He shot himself to death before the police entered his room.The Islamic State claimed on Monday that the gunman was “a soldier of the Islamic State,” but provided no evidence. The group has generally been accurate in claiming only violence carried out by those directed by ISIS or inspired by their ideology online. However, in recent months, the group has become more sloppy and has made at least two false claims, including for an attack on a casino in Manila and a bomb plot at Charles de Gaulle airport in Paris.Aaron Rouse, the F.B.I. special agent in charge in Las Vegas, said that so far there was no proof that Mr. Paddock had links to any international terrorist organization.Speaking at the White House,President Trump called the shooting“an act of pure evil,” ordered flags flown at half-staff, and said he wouldtravel to Las Vegason Wednesday.On Capitol Hill, Representative Nancy Pelosi, the House Democratic leader, sent a letter to House Speaker Paul D. Ryan calling for him to create a select committee on gun violence to “study and report back common sense legislation to help end this crisis.”Previous mass shootings have not generally resulted in changes to federal gun laws. Asked at a news conference about whether the president, who has said that some mass shootings could be mitigated if victims had more liberty to buy guns, would now ask for changes to gun laws, his press secretary, Sarah Huckabee Sanders, said that “there will be, certainly, time for that policy discussion to take place, but that’s not the place that we’re in at this moment.”“I think one of the things that we don’t want to do is try to create laws that won’t stop these types of things from happening,” she added.Last Thursday, officials said, Mr. Paddock checked into the gold-tinted, 43-story Mandalay Bay, at the southern end of the string of big hotels that line South Las Vegas Boulevard, the renowned Las Vegas Strip. He took Suite 32135, one of the hotel’s “Vista” suites, which spread out over 1,700 square feet and offer floor-to-ceiling windows. “This is the perfect Las Vegas suite for those who seek the perfect views,” the hotel’swebsitesays.He brought in more than 10 suitcases during his stay, but no one saw anything amiss, the sheriff said.Over the following three days, the Las Vegas Village and Festival Grounds, northeast of the Mandalay Bay, played host to the Route 91 Harvest Festival, featuringdozens of country music acts.It was after 10 p.m. Sunday, while Jason Aldean was on stage singing “When She Says Baby,” that the first burst of gunfire hit the crowd. At 10:08, someone broadcast on a police radio channel, “we got shots fired — sounds like an automatic firearm,” and less than a minute later, “It’s coming from upstairs in the Mandalay Bay.”Video of the shooting captured nine seconds of continuous, rapid bursts of fire, followed by 37 seconds of silence from the weapon, as some in the crowd screamed in panic and others looked around in confusion. Mr. Aldean kept singing for a few seconds before realizing what was happening and taking cover.Gunfire then erupted again and again, in rapid-fire bursts.Jamey Eller, 66, said she and her friends hit the ground with the first fusillade, and then “the second round came and we started to belly-crawl.” As the shooting continued, they decided they had to get up and run.“We had no idea where we were going,” she said. “We just kept hearing shooting. It felt like they were following us.”Her sister, Cindy McAfee, 56, called her husband, Steve McAfee, who had stayed back in their hotel room — on the 32nd floor of the Mandalay Bay, where the gunman was. “He was looking down and seeing what was going on and said, ‘Just get out of there — he’s not in the venue, he’s here,’ ” Ms. McAfee said. “It was absolutely the most scared I’ve been in my entire life.”Almost nine minutes after the shooting began, an officer radioed, “We’re still taking gunfire, we’re pinned down.” Seconds later, an officer broadcast: “We need to snuff the shooter before there are more victims. Anybody have eyes on him?”Some survivors tried to climb the chain-link fence topped with barbed wire around the nearby McCarran International Airport, until firefighters ripped the fence up from the ground, allowing them to crawl under it.Krystal Legette, who was visiting from New York, was at the Sundance Helicopters office at the airport, waiting for a sightseeing flight around the city, when, she said, three women burst into the building, screaming, “They’re shooting, they’re shooting!” Then another woman came in, bleeding from a bullet wound in her right arm, and Ms. Legette, a nurse, and three others applied a tourniquet.More and more people ran into the office, until about 100 had taken shelter there, she said. A worker turned out the lights, locked the doors and told everyone to go inside closets and other areas away from the windows.Political leaders have done nothing to curb the bloodshed since the Pulse nightclub massacre in Orlando last year.Ambulances arrived at the festival grounds quickly, but were overwhelmed. Some victims were rushed to hospitals in cars and the backs of pickup trucks. Paramedics’ radio frequencies were so clogged that some used cellphones to call ahead to emergency rooms.“It was a wide range of injuries, from gunshots to shrapnel wounds, to trample injuries, to people trying to jump fences,” said Greg Cassell, chief of the Clark County Fire Department.As survivors poured into nearby streets and buildings, the police swarmed the Mandalay Bay, conducting a room-by-room search starting on the 29th floor, Sheriff Lombardo said. At one point, he said, Mr. Paddock fired at them through the door of his suite, wounding a hotel security guard. The officers backed off, he said, and then SWAT teams went in.The police also searched for Mr. Paddock’s girlfriend, Marilou Danley, thinking that she might have been with him, in part because he had been gambling using a Players Club Card, a kind of casino debit card, that was issued in her name. Later, it was determined that Ms. Danley was out of the country. The police searched the couple’s home in Mesquite and another house Mr. Paddock owned in northern Nevada.Hours after the shooting, as guests returned to the Mandalay Bay to retrieve luggage, those who had been at the concert were still in shock.Ms. Ayala and her friends from California described how they had run for several minutes, reaching the top of the MGM Grand parking lot, where they continued to see the chaos on the Strip below. They called their children, worried that it would be the last time they spoke.They flagged down a driver who agreed to take them to a friend’s timeshare, far off the Strip.“It wasn’t until we got there and locked the door behind us that we felt safe,” Ms. Ayala said. “That was the first time I really breathed.”AdvertisementMEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Police need your help locating a murder suspect.They are looking for40-year-old Demarcus Moss, who is accused of shooting and killing a 15-year-old in September after they got into a fight.Police were close to taking Moss into custody when they spotted him on Elvis Presley and Bellevue on Thursday, but he took off on foot.If you see Moss or know where he is you're asked to call Crime Stoppers at 901-528-CASH.Copyright 2017 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A man shot to death Thursday night (Sept. 28) in the 7th Ward has been identified by the Orleans Parish Coroner's Office as 18-year-old Mylan Lassai.New Orleans police responded to a shooting near the intersection of Allen and North Rocheblave streets around 9:04 p.m. Thursday. There they found four men with gunshot wounds outside on the street and sidewalk.One of the men, now identified as Lassai, died after being taken to the hospital. The three other victims -- an 18-year-old, a 23-year-old and a 30-year-old -- were in stable condition, with wounds to their arms and legs that were not life-threatening, police said.Police are still investigating what led to the shooting, which occurred across the street from a corner store in the neighborhood. At least six yellow evidence cones had been placed at the corner of Allen Street and North Rocheblave Street late Thursday night.Those living nearby said they did not see the shooting nor did they recognize the victims, but said they heard about eight shots. Onlookers stood gripped Thursday night by the chaotic scene colored by red and blue emergency lights."You could smell the blood," one woman said.5th District Commander Frank Young, who was at the scene, called the shooting "disheartening.""Especially in this neighborhood," Young said. "We've been making great progress in this neighborhood."Homicide Detective Thadeus Williams is leading the investigation into the quadruple shooting. He can be reached at 504-658-5300.Anyone with information on the shooting can also call Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111 or toll-free at 1-877-903-STOP.Reporter Laura McKnight contributed to this story.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?WATCHVIDEOSVigil held for teen killed in Germantown shootingJai Custus' classmates penned goodbye messages on a basketball at his school, (Mathematics, Civics and Science Charter school)@6abcpic.twitter.com/Vp51gJ3cetBoy, 16, killed in Germantown shooting; another teen in custody. Sarah Bloomquist reports during Action News at 5pm on September 27, 2017.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Memphis Police Department arrested a man accused ofshooting four people at a Memphis barbershop.The shooting happened Tuesday afternoon at the barbershop at Chelsea Avenue and North Hollywood Street.Three people were taken to the hospital in non-critical condition. The fourth was taken to the hospital in critical condition. The victims were all men, likely in their late-teens or 20s.The victims told police they were walking, heard shots, and then realized they had been shot.A witness said a woman dropped off two men who confronted the victims before shots were fired.Darren Johnson was arrested for the shooting.Johnson is charged with being a convicted felon in possession of a handgun, evading arrest, possessing a firearm during a dangerous felony, theft of property, aggravated assault, and three counts of attempted first-degree murder.Copyright 2017 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Michael Richardson was outside talking to neighbors Tuesday night when he heard the gunfire on nearby Lyndale Avenue."You live in Baltimore and you are used to it. You could be standing in front of the [police] district and bullets will be flying," said Richardson, 26, who sat on a nearby stoop the day after a quadruple shooting killed two in Northeast Baltimore.Around 10 p.m. Tuesday, an officer on patrol saw people running from the street after hearing gunfire in the 3200 block of Lyndale Avenue. Four victims were found — two men were pronounced dead at the scene; two other men were taken to an area hospital.Police said Angelo West, 42, of the 4700 block of Hampnett Avenue in Lauraville, and Charles Hamilton, 39, of the 1300 block of Canberra Drive in Essex, were pronounced dead at the scene. They are among several victims this week. Six people have been killed since Sunday.Two other men — a 26-year-old who had been shot in the abdomen and a 25-year-old who had been shot in the leg — were were taken to area hospitals and are expected to survive their injuries, police said.Family of West and Hamilton could not be reached Wednesday. No suspect information was available Wednesday morning.By late Wednesday morning, the crime scene east of Belair Road had been cleared except for a small scrap of yellow police tape in front of a brick rowhome with boarded up windows at the corner of Lyndale and St. Cloud avenues. Police officers in marked cruisers and SUVs passed the intersection regularly.Richardson watched as TV cameramen shot video of the passing police cars, and other vehicles slowed to survey the area. He said many residents would be outside on their porches on a warm day but many elderly were scared by the recent shooting."It's the guns, not even the drugs," that scare people away, he said. "Bullets ain't got no name."Richardson said hedidn't know what caused the shooting, but said he suspected outside perpetrators. "They come and chill in the hood and they bring their beef up here."He described the neighborhood as close-knit but no neighborhood in the city is immune to the violence, which has spiked this year.So far, Baltimore has had 264 homicides this year, and 29 this month.A man was shot around 9:30 p.m. in the 2300 block of West Lafayette Avenue in West Baltimore. The 27-year-old was later pronounced dead at a hospital.Another man was shot in the head around 4:45 a.m. Wednesday, near Rose Hill Avenue and Old York Road in the Pen Lucy neighborhood. Police said the victim, a 56-year-old man, was taken to an area hospital and is in good condition.At 2 p.m. Wednesday, officers were called to the intersection of Washington Boulevard and Harman Avenue in Morrell Park where a 27-year old man had been shot. Police said he was shot by an unknown suspect in the 1900 block of Harman Avenue. He was taken to an area hospital for treatment.Police on Wednesday also identified several victims of recent homicides. Michael Blevins, 24, was shot Saturday in the 700 block of Newington Avenue in Reservoir Hill, and died the next day, police said. Sean White, 23, was killed Monday in a shooting in the 1100 E. 20thStreet in East Baltimore; and Gerry Hall, 41, of the 2000 block of Kennedy Avenue, was killed Monday in a separate shooting in the 2400 Barclay Street in Barclay.Homicide detectives are investigating, and anyone with information about any of the recent shootings is asked to call 410-396-2100. Anonymous tips can be called in to Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP, or texted to 443-902-4842.Crime videosRecommendedA gunman opened fire at four people sitting outside in the Brooklyn neighborhood of South Baltimore on Sunday night, police said.The shooting happened around 8 p.m. in the 500 block of E. Patapsco Avenue. A 34-year-old man was shot in the back, a 29-year-old man was shot in the left leg, a 26-year-old woman was shot in the stomach and a 32-year-old man was shot in the arm.The 32-year-old man took himself to a local hospital, while the others were taken by ambulance. All were stable on Sunday night, police said.After the shooting, at least 19 evidence markers littered the street and sidewalk in front of a convenience store. The markers surrounded a folding chair draped with a cloth in the street and another couple of folding chairs set up on the sidewalk.Several people walked up to the crime scene tape, unsuccessfully trying to convince police to let them cross to go into a nearby bar.Later Sunday in Waverly, two men were injured in a shooting.Just before 9:30 p.m., officers found a 25 year-old man with a gunshot wound to the left leg and a 27-year-old man with a gunshot wound to the leg in the 3800 block of Old York Road.Both victims, who police said were uncooperative, are expected to survive their injuries.Anyone with information on either shooting can call detectives at (410) 396-2221 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP.cwells@baltsun.comtwitter.com/cwellssunRecommendedOne person was killed and eight others wounded Sunday after a masked man opened fire following a church service in Antioch.The shooter, identified asEmanuel Kidega Samson, a 25-year-old Rutherford County man, accidentally shot himself after he was confronted by an armed member of the congregation. Samson was treated at an area hospital and was released into police custody, according to Metro Nashville Police.Samson will be charged with one count of murder, additional charges will come later, police said. Police say he previously attended the church.The woman killed has been identified as Melanie Crow Smith, 38. Smith was a mother who lived in Smyrna.More:Nashville churchgoer, called a 'hero' for stopping shooting, asks for prayers for victims, shooterMore:Nashville church shooting: The tragedy as told through heroes and survivorsPolice say the gunman wore a neoprene ski mask when he shot and killed Smith in the parking lot of Burnette Chapel Church of Christ, as the service ended shortly after 11 a.m.With his blue Nissan Xterra still running, the gunman then entered the rear sanctuary doors of the church and began "indiscriminately" shooting, police said.Among those shot were three men and three women, police spokesman Don Aaron said.The church's minister Joey Spann, 66, and his wife, Peggy, 65, were both injured in the shooting, said Nashville Christian School in a statement on Facebook. Spann is a Bible teacher and a high school and middle school basketball coach.Churchgoer Caleb Engle, who was hailed by police as a "hero," confronted the shooter while inside the church and was violently pistol whipped, Aaron said. During theconfrontation with Engle, the gunman shot himself in the left side of his chest, Aaron said. Shortly after the shooting, the gunman was transported to Vanderbilt University Medical Center, he said.After the struggle, Engle exited the sanctuary, got a gun from his vehicle and guarded the shooter until police arrived, Aaron said.About 42 people were inside the church at the time of the shooting, officials say. All victims, including the shooter, were taken to area hospitals.More:Burnette Chapel Church of Christ shooting suspect told police he 'fired upon the church building'More:Burnette Chapel Church of Christ to hold prayer vigil after deadly shootingMinerva Rosa, who was inside the church during the shooting, said she began applying pressure to the minister's chest while waiting for authorities to arrive. As the shooter entered the church, Rosa said, Spann shouted: "Run."Although congregants attempted to run away, some were shot from behind, said Rosa, who had blood on her blue dress and cell phone case. "Our church is senior people. They didn't make it out."A spokesman for Vanderbilt University Medical Center said two of the victims are critically injured, with four others in stable condition.Update:Antioch church shooting: Five victims remain hospitalized, one in critical conditionMore:Antioch church shooting: 10-year-old boy helped barricade door inside buildingIn addition to the Spanns, police identified the victims as William Jenkins, 83, Marlene Jenkins, 84, Linda Busch, 68, Katherine Dickerson, 64 and Engle, 22. Police identified one of the victims as David Spann — his colleague Mike McPherson confirmed that Spann's full name is David Joseph Spann.All victims were in stable condition, with the exception of David Spann, who was in critical-stable condition, authorities said."The two critical patients suffered gunshot wounds to (their) chest and torso," said John Howser, spokesman for the hospital. "The four other patients suffered gunshot wounds to their extremities."After identifying the shooter, who had two pistols, police said Samson was a legal U.S. resident but not a U.S. citizen, who came from Sudan in 1996.Samson was medically cleared for release by Sunday afternoon and was set to be arrested and charged with homicide and attempted homicide.Although it's unclear if race or religion played a role in the shooting, authorities, including the federal Justice Department, have opened acivil rights case.Samson, who is black, alluded to an attack Sunday morning, posting cryptic messages on Facebook.More:Before Antioch church shooting, suspect made cryptic Facebook postsWitnesses at the scene described the bloody aftermath of the shooting.Joe Love, 67, and his wife Donna Love, 56, who live across the street from the church said they initially heard the shots but thought it was a nearby car crash."All of the sudden, this man and woman came up to the porch," Joe Love said.Love walked over to the church with the pair and saw a woman's body lying in the parking lot. Love also said he saw an elderly man with a walker lying on the ground, adding he had apparently been knocked down by the shooter.The woman who approached Love initially identified herself as the sister of the deceased woman. Love and the sister covered up the victim with two towels."He shot her like she was a damn dog in his backyard," Love said.Shortly after 1 p.m., a bomb squad on the scene could be seen removing a black plastic case that appeared to be the size of a rifle from the shooter's vehicle. The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives were also at the scene.By mid-afternoon, police said Samson, the shooter, would be medically cleared for release and would immediately be arrested and charged with homicide and attempted homicide.The church, which has a weekly service at 10 a.m., is located at 3890 Pin Hook Road, a two-lane road lined with one story, single-family homes and old-growth trees, near Percy Priest Lake.The shooting quickly sent shockwaves throughout the neighborhood. Steven Whidby, who lives about six houses from the church, said he's known the minister his whole life."It’s just a lil' country church," he said. "It’s just a sad day when people do something like that at a church."After the shooting, the usually quiet area was suddenly transformed, being shut down by authorities. Police tape was draped around the scene with helicopters hovering overhead.Natalie Allison, Anita Wadhwani and Andrew Nelles contributed to this report.SYRACUSE, N.Y. -- The site of a quadruple shooting early Sunday morning calls itself "Hush Lounge" but operates out of a boarded-up upholstery business. There isn't a sign, and the windows are boarded up.Police are "looking into" whether the site is operating legally, said spokesman Sgt. Richard Helterline.Four people were shot and suffered non-life-threatening injuries at a shootout around 3 a.m. At least two guns were fired, and there were at least 10 gunshots, police said.The shooting began after a "large fight" inside and outside the lounge, and bullets sprayed across East Fayette Street. The fallout was visible early Sunday morning: Bloody footprints and a Honda SUV damaged by gunfire.Helterline said police are still investigating the circumstances behind the shooting. He also said the lounge has drawn investigators' attention.They'll be looking into whether the lounge was serving alcohol. They would not be able to do so after 2 a.m. It was not immediately clear whether the lounge had a liquor license.This screenshot from Facebook appears to show the inside of Hush Lounge, which operates out of a boarded-up upholstery business. Kawan Woodley, an owner, posted this picture from "teen night" about 11:30 p.m. on Friday."(Hush is) a place that hosts after hours events at times, and depending on what they are doing it may or may not be legal," Helterline said. "We are looking into it.  They would not be able to serve alcohol there without a permit, and surely not after 2 a.m.  At this time we do not know if they were serving or not."The lounge could be operating legally if it does not serve alcohol, Helterline said."If they just have people over, then it may not be breaking any laws," he said.The New York State Liquor Authority's website has no record of a liquor license at the address.The site at 1226 E. Fayette is a boarded-up upholstery business called "Silverbush." On Sunday morning, the site was too dark to see inside except for a cigarette butt that sat inside on a windowsill.Helterline said he was not sure if the upholstery business still operated.Business records in Syracuse.com archives show a Hush Lounge was incorporated in 2014 on 1200 E. Fayette Street by Kenneth Kinsey and Kawan Woodley.Woodley and Kinsey could not be immediately reached Sunday.Woodley's Facebook page shows lively scenes at what he called "Hush Lounge" in recent days, including a post from Friday night around 11:30 p.m. for "teen night.""Hush lounge teens rocking better then (sic) the adults," he wrote in the post, accompanied by a blurry picture or people dancing.A neighbor who witnessed the shooting and heard about 10 gunshots early Sunday called the place a nuisance. He said he'd called 911 on it in the past. The neighbor declined to be identified out of fear of retaliation.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesA 27-year-old South Jersey man has been charged with murder and attempted murder nearly six months after a shooting at an Atlantic County condominium complex which leftone dead and three hurt.Matthew Gonzalez (Atlantic County Prosecutor's Office)Matthew Gonzalez, of the Mays Landing section of Hamilton, is also charged two counts of aggravated assault and weapons offense, the Atlantic County Prosecutor's Office said in a statement Thursday.Gonzalez opened fire during a fight at the Brandywood complex around 5:30 p.m. on Sept. 24, officials said. Theshooting killedTaufeeq Mitchell, 31, of Mays Landing. The other three people who were shot survived, though one was critically injured, officials said at the time.The weapons offenses include possession of a firearm without a permit and possession of a weapon for an unlawful purpose.Gonzalez is being held at the Atlantic County jail. Authorities have never disclosed a motive for the shooting.Jeff Goldman may be reached atjeff_goldman@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@JeffSGoldman. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMenuFour suspects believed to be tied to the Martini's Bar homicide were arrested on Tuesday, according to the Bakersfield Police Department.On Dec. 12, Skylor Billings, Daniel Willis and Gary Pierson were arrested for the murder of Edwin Smith on Sept. 23. Police said Gary Clayton was also arrested for accessory to murder.Smith and three other victims were shot outside Martini's Bar in southwest Bakersfield. The three additional victims were treated for minor to moderate injuries.BPD said the arrests were part of the multi-agency investigation that started in March of this year. Police arrested more than35 gang members and associates of the West Side Crips.One of Editor & Publisher’s ‘10 That Do It Right 2021’Windy with showers and thunderstorms likely. High near 65F. Winds SSW at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Showers this evening becoming a steady light rain overnight. Low near 45F. Winds SSW at 15 to 25 mph. Chance of rain 80%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:27 pmReporterDANVILLE — Danville police need help finding the person or people responsible for a shooting in that city early Saturday that left five people wounded.A release from Cmdr. Joshua Webb of the Danville Police Department said officers were called to Seminary and Jackson streets just after 3 a.m. for shots being fired.Officers confirmed that there had been a shooting at a party in that area. Shortly after that, they learned that five people had taken themselves to an area hospital for treatment.Officers found and talked to three women and two men who were wounded. Police said none of their injuries appeared life-threatening.The victims ranged in age from 17 to 37. One man and one woman were from Danville. The other three victims were visiting from Champaign.Anyone with information on this shooting is asked to call Danville police at 217-431-2250 or Vermilion County Crime Stoppers at 217-446-8477.ReporterMary Schenk is a reporter covering police, courts and breaking news at The News-Gazette. Her email is mschenk@news-gazette.com, and you can follow her on Twitter (@schenk).Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.We'll send breaking news and news alerts to you as they happen!Get the latest local and national news.Have the latest local news delivered every afternoon so you don't miss out on updates.Each day's obituaries, delivered to your inbox.Receive occasional local offers from our website and its advertisers.Get the latest headlines on local sports!Get our expert short-term forecast, summary of the weather details and news of any severe weather.Top trending stories from the week.Hartford police arrested a man on Tuesday in connection with a September double homicide.Latroy Johnson, 40, of Windsor, was taken into custody during a probation meeting in Hartford on Tuesday, police said.Police say Johnson shot four people on Albany Avenue in the early morning hours of September 23, killing two.One of the victims, 31-year-old Joshua Taylor, died at the scene. Taylor was Johnson's intended target, according to police.The second victim, 37-year-old Jovan Wooten, returned fire when Johnson started shooting, but he was shot in the face and died of his injuries nearly a week later, police said. Wooten was licensed to carry his weapon, according to police.The investigation led detectives to Johnson, and they secured an arrest warrant for him on Monday.Johnson is charged with two counts of murder, first-degree assault, and criminal possession of a firearm.He is scheduled to be in court on Wednesday.GARY — Eight people were wounded in four separate shootings during the past week, police said.Five people with gunshot wounds were located after police responded about 12:05 a.m. Wednesday to the Oak Knoll Apartments in the 4300 block of 23rd Court, Cpl. Douglas Drummond said.The wounded included three Gary women, ages 28, 29 and 31, and two Gary men, ages 31 and 33, police said.Witnesses told police the group was outside when a man came out from between buildings and opened fire, Drummond said.Several of the victims were taken by ambulance to a local hospital, and others were taken in private cars, police said. None of their wounds were life-threatening.A 33-year-old Gary man, who was related to one of the victims, was arrested about 2 a.m. Wednesday at the hospital after refusing to wait for nurses to let him into a waiting room, cursing at nurses, running from police, barricading himself in a room and fighting with police, Drummond said.Just before 1 a.m. Wednesday, police found a 32-year-old Gary man with a gunshot wound after they were called to the 1100 block of Broadway.The man told police he was walking in the 1100 block of Washington Street when two people in a red Ford pickup truck pulled up and the passenger opened fire, Drummond said.On Tuesday, police found a 25-year-old Gary man with multiple gunshot wounds after responding about 9 a.m. to the 1500 block of Harrison Boulevard.The man told police he was walking in the area when a man in a red Mitsubishi pulled up from behind, pointed a handgun at him and fired about 20 shots, Drummond said. The man was taken to a local hospital for treatment.On Sept. 15, a 17-year-old Hammond boy was wounded during a car chase, police said.Carlos Santos, 17, of Hammond, and Luis Pimentel-Maldonado, 18, of Calumet City, are accused of pushing a woman out of a speeding car after a strong-arm robbery in Gary. The woman suffered injuries including a brain bleed and broken femur.According to a probable cause affidavit, the teens and the woman — who was accompanied by two men — met at a fast-food restaurant near Fifth Avenue and Grant Street for a cellphone sale.The teens are accused of robbing the woman, speeding off from the restaurant and pushing her out near the intersection of Grant Street and Ninth Avenue.Police said two men, who had been with the woman, chased after the teens' car and didn't notice when the woman was pushed out of it.The chase continued through Gary's West Side until one of the men in the pursuing vehicle fired shots, striking Santos near West 15th Avenue and Ralston Street, Drummond said.The man who fired the shots drove off, but the other man in that car remained at the scene and spoke with police, Drummond said.The woman was later found by police on the side of the road bruised and scratched, the affidavit said. She was transported to an Illinois hospital.Santos, who was shot in the buttocks by a bullet that exited his thigh, was transported by the Gary Fire Department for treatment.Santos and Pimentel-Maldonado were each charged Saturday with robbery resulting in serious bodily injury and kidnapping, court records show.Detective Sgt. Michael Barnes is investigating the shootings from Tuesday and Wednesday. Anyone with information is asked to call him at 219-881-1210. To remain anonymous, call 866-CRIME-GP.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Lake County Courts and Social Justice ReporterSarah covers crime, courts and public safety. She began her career at The Times in 2004. Contact her at sarah.reese@nwi.com or 219-933-3351.A roundup of crime stories from throughout the Region during the past 24 hours.One man was killed and two others injured in an early morning shooting Saturday that caused a vehicle to careen off the Grant Street bridge in…CROWN POINT — A criminal court judge granted a modest bond reduction for a teenager jailed on charges of robbery and kidnapping.GARY — Police are investigating after a 17-year-old boy said he was attacked and shot at while riding his bike late Sunday night in the city's…GARY — Yellow crime scene tape cordoned off parts of the city's Tarrytown neighborhood Thursday where a 33-year-old Gary man exchanged gunfire…CALUMET CITY — A man and woman were killed in a shooting Wednesday in Calumet City just west of the Indiana-Illinois border.The FBI office in Chicago has released video of an alleged kidnapping Dec. 20 in an effort to learn more about the incident in which a Calumet…CROWN POINT — Two teenagers are accused of pushing a woman out of a speeding vehicle after a strong-arm robbery in Gary, causing the woman to …Here are the top 5 trending stories today.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A 27-year-old African-American man has died and three others were injured in a drive-by shooting Sunday on Detroit's west side, police said.The shooting happened at about 8:50 p.m. Sunday in the 5000 block of Stanton Street near Grand River Avenue and West Warren Avenue, Detroit Police Department spokeswoman Jennifer Watson said.The four victims were standing in front of a building when a vehicle approached them and someone inside it opened fire on the group, she said.One person in the group died from a gunshot wound, according to authorities. The other three are at a hospital listed in stable condition.Police said the three surviving victims of the shooting have not provided investigators with any information on the vehicle or the suspects.cramirez@detroitnews.comPETERSBURG — After receiving numerous tips from the public, the Petersburg Police Department announced that they have identified and arrested a man in connection to the Harding Street shooting that occurred on September 17, 2017. Marquise Edmonds, 22 of Petersburg, was arrested and charged with reckless handling of a firearm.The shooting, which occurred around 9:30 p.m. at the intersection of Harding and Mistletoe Street on September 17, left one male victim dead and several others wounded.PETERSBURG — After receiving numerous tips from the public, the Petersburg Police Department announced that they have identified and arrested a man in connection to the Harding Street shooting that occurred on September 17, 2017. Marquise Edmonds, 22 of Petersburg, was arrested and charged with reckless handling of a firearm.The shooting, which occurred around 9:30 p.m. at the intersection of Harding and Mistletoe Street on September 17, left one male victim dead and several others wounded.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Progress-Index  ~ 15 Franklin Street, Petersburg, VA 23803~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.UPDATED: Wed., Sept. 27, 2017Caleb Sharpe flipped a coin and it came up heads. So the Freeman High School sophomore loaded a  semi-automatic rifle and ammunition into a golf bag, embarking on a path that would leave one young man dead and see the 15-year-old Sharpe transformed into a notorious school shooter, according  to court documents released Wednesday.Had the coin come up tails, Sharpe told investigators, “he would not do it and never think about it again.”Documents released Wednesday show that Sharpe, 15, told detectives after the Sept. 13 shooting at Freeman that he had been watching documentaries of other school shootings, including Columbine and Sandy Hook, for about a year. He watched a documentary called “Mind of a Rampage Killer” about 10 times, according to court records.Clad in a dark blue T-shirt and saggy brown pants, Sharpe appeared in Spokane County Juvenile Court on Wednesday as prosecutors filed 51 new counts of second-degree assault charges relating to the other students who were nearby that day.Those charges were added to the first-degree murder case for the killing of 15-year-old Sam Strahan, and three counts of attempted first-degree murder for the shootings of three girls.Although state law mandates that Sharpe have a hearing within 14 days of being charged to determine whether he will stand trial as an adult, Superior Court Judge Michael Price set that hearing for April 2, 2018.Both Spokane County Prosecutor Larry Haskell and defense attorney Bevan Maxey agreed to waive the rule.“I have all kinds of concerns for him remaining in custody,” Maxey said. “But to have everybody properly prepared, that’s the priority. It’s not a matter to rush to court in 14 days.”Sharpe turns 16 on Oct. 10. Maxey said he didn’t want to comment about the ongoing case, but he believes the matter should stay in juvenile court.“We prefer that he be handled as a juvenile,” Maxey said. “That’s what he is.”Sharpe’s parents and several family friends attended the hearing. They did not comment.“It’s been hard on everybody involved,” Maxey said. The Sharpe family “really  does care about everyone else, not just themselves.”Court documents reflect a troubled youth who became obsessed with violence.Not longafter the Sept. 13 shooting, sheriff’s detectives Scott Bonney and Marc Melville interviewed Sharpe. They wrote that Sharpe told them about watching  documentaries on past school shootings.Sharpe “concluded that Eric (Harris) and Dylan (Klebold)” – the perpetrators of the Columbine High School shooting in 1999 – “were stupid because they were ‘overblowing it so much.’ Sharpe said he began to like their plan more and more,” court documents state. “He watched about Sandy Hook and decided these people were not smart, because they killed themselves in the end.”On the day of the shooting, Sharpe said he loaded an AR-15 semi-automatic rifle into a golf bag to conceal it. In his left pocket, he placed a .32-caliber handgun. Both guns “belonged to his father, and he took them without permission,” the detectives wrote.Sharpe said he knew Sam Strahan and they had been friends, but they had drifted apart. Sharpe “had been building up anger at people for months, even years, and he had been thinking about doing this for two years,” detectives wrote.On Sept. 12, he flipped the coin. Detective Mike Drapeau noted that when he searched Sharpe’s home, he found a quarter on the floor. It was tails-side up. He also found a penny, heads up.Sharpe then told the detectives details about how he loaded the golf bag  onto the school bus  and later approached the hallway. He pulled out the AR-15, which jammed, and he could not make it work, so he  discarded it  and pulled the pistol out of his coat.At about the same time, he noticed Sam Strahan near him and shot him  once in the abdomen and once in the cheek, killing him. “He didn’t really care if (Strahan) was dead or anything, so he left SDS (the  Decedent) and began firing down the hall into a crowd of what he estimated to be about fifteen students huddled by the lockers,” detectives wrote. “Sharpe said he shot three other students whose names he did not know.”Sharpe said he did not intend to kill himself, and he denied being a victim of physical or sexual abuse.“Sharpe said the plan went exactly as intended,” detectives wrote. “His plan was to shoot some people at school, just like he did. Sharpe said he was not planning on shooting any particular people; he just planned on shooting people in general.”Previously, Sharpehad given other friends notes indicatingthat he was about to do something that may cause others harm.Strahan was killed just two months after his father,49-year-old Scott Strahan, was killed on Father’s Dayin a tragic accident. Strahan’s family gatheredSaturday to remember Sam.Upon searching the Sharpe home, Drapeau wrote that he found several journal entries written by the boy, who had just begun his sophomore year.In a notebook, Drapeau found several handwritten notes, including a diagram of the upstairs hallway at Freeman High School. Written inside was “Killing is fun and I enjoy it,” “I am smarter than the cops,” along with a hand-drawn Punisher logo and the phrase “wait till school.”Punisher, depicted as a skull, is a violent, fictional Marvel Comics character obsessed with vengeance.In a second notebook, detectives found that Sharpe had written the full rifleman’s creed and select quotes from the movie “Full Metal Jacket.” He also wrote a list, which was a who’s who of school shooters.“I am the one who deserves to live, but I still need Caleb until I kill all those … kids,” Sharpe wrote, according to court documents. “Then Caleb will finally die while I live on even if it is in prison I will live on.”In his yearbook, detectives found  an “X Kill” written on photographs of students, Drapeau wrote, noting that there were 26 students whose photographs had been crossed out.One of those photos was of Sam Strahan, he wrote.Local journalism is essential.Give directly to The Spokesman-Review's Northwest Passages community forums series -- which helps to offset the costs of several reporter and editor positions at the newspaper -- by using the easy options below. Gifts processed in this system are not tax deductible, but are predominately used to help meet the local financial requirements needed to receive national matching-grant funds.Get the day’s latest Coronavirus news delivered to your inbox by subscribing to our newsletter.UPDATED: 8:29 p.m.If you suffer from joint pain, you know how it can greatly affect the quality of your life.© Copyright 2021, The Spokesman-Review |Community Guidelines|Terms of Service|Privacy Policy|Copyright PolicyIncident occurred along 400 block of South Duke StreetIncident occurred along 400 block of South Duke StreetSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Incident occurred along 400 block of South Duke StreetPolice in York are investigating a shooting that left four people injured.- Download the WGAL app- LIKE WGAL on FacebookThe shooting happened before 10 p.m. Wednesday along the 400 block of South Duke Street at East Maple Street.They say the victims were transported to York Hospital, which locked down a unit when they arrived. It is routine to close off a section of the hospital after a shooting if a suspect hasn’t been caught. Authorities say two men and two women were injured. They say one woman was shot in the arm and the other was shot in the leg. They say a man was shot in the torso and a juvenile male was shot in the calf.Gunfire also hit at least two homes, according to police.Police say there may have been more than one shooter and believe the adult male was the intended target. The investigation is ongoing.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.PLANO, Texas-The man who killed eight people during a Cowboys watch party in Plano last September had a blood-alcohol level that was four times the legal limit.The Collin County Medical Examiner’s autopsy report on 32-year-old Spencer Hight showed a blood alcohol content of .33 percent at the time of his death.By comparison, .08 is the legal limit for drunken driving arrests in Texas. Most people pass out between .25 and .3. Anything over .3 is generally considered life-threatening. People often stop breathing over .4, according to theAwareAwakeAlive.org.His wife, who had filed for divorce, was having a Dallas Cowboys watch party.According to search warrant affidavits, Hight showed up with weapons at the Local Public House, a bar just three blocks away from the murder scene at his wife's house.A bartender called police and told them she “observed the suspect with a pistol and a knife and stated that she was following him on Spring Creek Parkway to the home where the murders happened but drove away before the shooting started,” the affidavit states.AdvertisementHight ultimately shot and killed his ex-wife, 27-year-old Meredith Hight, and their friends, some of whom stood in their wedding.The victims included Anthony Michael Cross, 33, Olivia Nicole Deffner, 24, James Richard Dunlop, 29, Darryl William Hawkins, 22, Rion Christopher Morgan, 31, Myah Sade Bass, 28, and Caleb Seth Edwards, 25. Carly Shockey was the sole survivor of the shooting after she was shot in the jaw.A Plano police officer, who responded in minutes, went into the home before backup could arrive. He shot and killed the gunman. The medical examiner determined Hight was shot three times and died as a result of those injuries.“Mr. Hight was shot by law enforcement while he was committing multiple murders with a firearm. The manner of death as homicide is only meant to reflect that he died at the hands of another,” the ME stated.It is not clear yet how much alcohol, if any, the bar served to Hight. The TABC is still investigating that part of the case.A Collin County grand jury reviewed the case in February and declined to take action against the officer who killed Hight.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsPolice say one man has been arrested after a shooting outside of a club early Sunday morning that left four people injured.The shooting happened just before 2 a.m. in the 2100 block of North Claiborne Avenue.Officials said three women and one man were shot.Detectives discovered that the man who was shot and 31-year-old Lionel Cheneau got into an argument inside of the club. After the two exited the club, the victim went to the passenger side of his car and Cheneau reportedly shot multiple rounds toward the victim and a group of bystanders who were women. The man is in critical condition while the three women are in stable condition, police say.Following the shooting, Cheneau reportedly flagged down Louisiana State Police patrolling the area and stated that he was allegedly shot at by unknown subjects, according to NOPD. He was then taken to the Fifth District station where he reportedly confessed to his involvement in the incident during an interview by detectives.Cheneau was booked in the Orleans Parish Justice Center for attempted second degree murder and three counts of aggravated battery by shooting.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.SELMA, AL (WSFA) - The Selma Police Department is investigating a shooting that left four people injured, two of them critically, Saturday night.The shooting happened around 11:30 p.m. in the 900 block of Kings Bend Road, space typically rented for parties.Investigators said 27-year-old Iris Dawson was shot in the back and a 43-year-old Jimmie Gunn was shot in the facial area. Both are in critical condition.Another woman, 27-year-old Quadranna Surles, was shot in the shoulder but later released from the hospital. The fourth victim, a 22-year-old man, was shot in the wrist but refused treatment at the hospital.Police said five vehicles were shot into during the incident.The Selma Police Department is asking anyone with information on this case to call 334-874-2125 or call the secret witness line at 334-874-2190. (Crime Stoppers at 334-874-2588 or 1-866-442-7463).A motive for the shooting was not clear nor have any suspects been identified.Copyright 2017WSFA 12 News. All rights reserved.445 Dexter AvenueSuite 7000Montgomery, AL 36104(334) 288-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Filed under:Four people were shot Wednesday evening on the Near West Side.They were standing in a parking lot about 5:35 p.m. in the 2700 block of West Madison when a dark-colored sedan pulled up to them and someone inside began firing, Chicago Police said.A 32-year-old man was shot in his chest and took himself to Stroger Hospital where he was listed in serious condition, police said.A 37-year-old man was shot in his buttocks and a 54-year-old man was shot in his left foot, police said. Both were taken to Mount Sinai, where they were in good condition. A 27-year-old woman was also in good condition at Mount Sinai after suffering a gunshot wound to her left arm.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:Four people were wounded in a shooting Monday night in west suburban Bellwood.The shooting happened about 11 p.m. in the 1000 block of Bellwood Avenue, according to a statement Bellwood Police Chief Jiminez Allen. A woman and three men were outside when someone opened fire and struck them.The men, ages 47, 31 and 23 and the woman, 30, were all taken to Loyola University Medical Center in Maywood to be treated for non-life threatening injuries, Allen said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Trending:A 36-year-old man arrested in connection with the fatal shooting of two men and wounding another in the unincorporated Lennox area is also suspected of fatally shooting his father and wounding a woman in the Del Rey section of Los Angeles, it was reported Tuesday.According to the Los Angeles Police Department, officers were summoned at 6:20 p.m. Sunday to the 11800 block of Wagner Street, near Culver Boulevard, where a man — later identified by the coroner’s office as 67-year-old Roberto Saucedo of Culver City — was pronounced dead.A middle-aged woman in serious condition was taken from the scene to a hospital, according to the LAPD.The man suspected of shooting the two victims fled the scene, police said without identifying the suspect.According to ABC7, Roberto Saucedo, who was related to an LAPD employee, was killed by his son Juan Saucedo after the two had gotten into an argument.An LAPD spokesman was not immediately able to confirm ABC7’s account, and a sheriff’s spokesman said he had no information about Juan Saucedo’s alleged role in the shootings in Los Angeles.The sheriff’s department reported that Saucedo was arrested after allegedly shooting three victims in Lennox, where gunfire was reported at 6:48 p.m. Sunday in the 10100 block of South Firmona Avenue, near Century Boulevard and the border with Inglewood.When deputies arrived, they found a man — later identified by the coroner’s office as Jesus Estevez Martinez, 27, of Los Angeles — dead from a gunshot wound to the upper body, Deputy Kelvin Moody of the Sheriff’s Information Bureau said.According to ABC7, Juan Saucedo is suspected of carjacking Martinez’s vehicle near the first shooting scene and driving it, with Martinez still inside, to Lennox, where Martinez was fatally shot.Deputies learned that the suspect might have run toward the 10600 block of Mansel Avenue, near Lennox Boulevard, where he shot another man, Moody said. The second victim was found and taken to a hospital, where he was pronounced dead. His name has not been released.The suspect then ran toward the 10400 block of Mansel Avenue where he attempted a carjacking and shot the man driving the vehicle, Moody said. Arriving deputies detained the suspect without further incident and the wounded victim was taken to a hospital in fair condition.“The motive and relationship, if any, between the victims and the suspect is unknown at this time,” Moody said of the Lennox shootings.No other suspects were sought.Saucedo was booked on suspicion of murder and was being held in lieu of $2 million bail. He is scheduled to appear in Inglewood Superior Court Wednesday, according to sheriff’s inmate records.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.LOUISVILLE, KY (WAVE) - Two men were indicted Monday in connection with a road rage shooting police say targeted a family of four.Randall Paul Buford and Christopher Douglas Pinguely were both indicted on several charges, including four counts of Criminal Attempted Murder and four counts of first-degree Assault.>> PREVIOUS STORY: Police: 2 adults, 2 kids injured possible road rage incident in BuechelThe shooting happened Sept. 2 on Bardstown Road, near Watterson Trail.All four family members were injured, but only one was actually shot.The duo was also charged with failure to stop and render aid.Copyright 2017WAVE 3 News. All rights reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — One person was killed and three others were wounded in an Auburn Gresham shooting early Saturday, police said.At 1:20 a.m., the victims were sitting on a front porch in the 8300 block of South Hermitage Avenue when three people got out of a white car, walked up to the victims and fired shots, police said.A 26-year-old man was hit in his chest and stomach and was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where he was pronounced dead, police said.James McChristian, of the same block where he was shot, was pronounced dead at 2:03 a.m., according to the Cook County Medical Exmainer's Office. An autopsy showed he died from a gunshot wound in his torso in a homicide.A 25-year-old woman was hit in her stomach and was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where her condition was not available but she was listed as "stable," police said.A 23-year-old woman was hit in her leg and was in good condition and a 23-year-old man was hit in his shoulder and was in good condition. They were also at Advocate Christ Medical Center.A police source said the shooting was gang-related.No one was in custody.Next inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamNext inEnglewood, Auburn Gresham & ChathamCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.EVANSVILLE, Ind. — Five people were shot Sunday morning in front of Sidetrack Tavern.John E. Perteet, 32, of Evansville, fired six to seven shots in front of the barshortly after 3:15 a.m., according to investigators.He was arrested on preliminary charges including aggravated battery with a firearm, criminal recklessness with a firearm and possession of a firearm by a felon.Perteet's bond was set at $500,000 cash-onlyduring a probable cause hearing Monday morning. He is being held in the Vanderburgh County Jail.Police said they are still looking for a motive and connections.The incident was the third mass shooting near an Evansville bar since 2015. Here are descriptions of the other two from the C&P archives:Oct. 26, 2015Five people were shot near the 711 Tavern on Virginia Street.Among the five people injured were three of the four men accused of trying to rob an apartment, which shares a building with the bar.Investigators said the group was believed to have targeted the apartment because there were drugs and money inside.The four men police say were involved in the robbery were identified as Marquell Jackson, 22; Jarvice Sears, 19; Diego Thomas, 21, and Oneil Bruin, 20. All but Jackson suffered gunshot wounds.The other two men injured, identified as Logan Orth, 22, and Cameron Kendall, 27, allegedly exchanged gunfire with the group on two separate occasions.Orth was one of several people inside the targeted apartment when the group — all of whom reportedly wore masks and were armed — came in and tried to carry out the robbery.None of the other eight people inside that residence were injured. Orth was visiting the apartment and was not a resident there.According to the police affidavit, Orth was shot in the neck and the chest after grabbing a gun and firing at the group during the attempted robbery.Then, as the group was trying to flee the building, police say the men encountered a neighbor who had opened the door and they shot at him.That man — Kendall — grabbed his own weapon and shot back at the group. Kendall's abdominal wound required surgery, according to investigators.Aug. 27, 2017A shooting at American Legion Otis Stone Post 354 killed one person and wounded three.More:Fatal American Legion shooting leads to decades behind bars for Darius BushrodA witness told police Darius Bushrod asked someone for $5, was refused and then got into an argument with 32-year-old Anthony Blaylock, according to a probable cause affidavit filed in the case.People separated the men and took Blaylock to the parking lot. Shortly after, Blaylock and Bushrod confronted each other again and were “face to face” near the building, police wrote in the affidavit.Bushrod allegedly fired at Blaylock while they were close and began backing away, still shooting toward Blaylock.Police say surveillance videos from the American Legion showed a man identified as Bushrod pulling up his arm and moving away from another man with “small flashes” coming from an object Bushrod had in his hand, believed to be a gun.Video also showed several people scattering when the gun was fired, according to the affidavit.Blaylock was taken to Deaconess Hospital, where he was pronounced dead. An autopsy found he died of multiple gunshot wounds.Three more people were also injured in the gunfire.More from C&P:Reggie Lovett Jr., 18, was arrested on four counts of attempted murder by the Gainesville Police Department.A Gainesville man suspected of wounding four teenagers in an August drive-by shooting in the Duval neighborhood stemming from an argument at a high school football game was arrested Tuesday afternoon.Reggie Lovett Jr., 18, 369 NW 39th Road, was charged with four counts of attempted murder by the Gainesville Police Department.The shootings occurred about 10:37 p.m. on Aug. 25 in front of a convenience store at 1600 NE Eighth Ave.Shots were fired at people on the sidewalk from a westbound car. The driver continued on and the car was not located, police said at the time.Two of the injured were 18 years old, one was 16 and one was 17. None of the injuries were life-threatening.Lovett’s arrest report states that a girl got involved in an altercation with another person at a football game at nearby Citizens Field. The girl picked up several friends including Lovett, who sat in the back driver’s side seat.She drove onto Eighth Avenue. Lovett is accused of rolling down the window and firing several shots toward people. One of the other people in the car identified Lovett as the shooter, the report states.The girl in a sworn statement to police on Feb. 22 admitted to being the driver and identified Lovett as the shooter, adding he was the only person in the car with a gun, according to the arrest report.Lovett was interviewed in relation to the case in September, telling police he was home at the time of the shooting. He provided police with the name of a girl who he said would corroborate that, but police reported she denied ever meeting him in person or being at his home.At the the time of his arrest, Lovett said the girl and others came to his house the night of the shooting to try to recruit him but that he stayed home. Police reported he admitted to lying about the girl at his house.The girl is listed as a co-defendant in the report but court records on the charges were not available.A Gainesville man suspected of wounding four teenagers in an August drive-by shooting in the Duval neighborhood stemming from an argument at a high school football game was arrested Tuesday afternoon.Reggie Lovett Jr., 18, 369 NW 39th Road, was charged with four counts of attempted murder by the Gainesville Police Department.The shootings occurred about 10:37 p.m. on Aug. 25 in front of a convenience store at 1600 NE Eighth Ave.Shots were fired at people on the sidewalk from a westbound car. The driver continued on and the car was not located, police said at the time.Two of the injured were 18 years old, one was 16 and one was 17. None of the injuries were life-threatening.Lovett’s arrest report states that a girl got involved in an altercation with another person at a football game at nearby Citizens Field. The girl picked up several friends including Lovett, who sat in the back driver’s side seat.She drove onto Eighth Avenue. Lovett is accused of rolling down the window and firing several shots toward people. One of the other people in the car identified Lovett as the shooter, the report states.The girl in a sworn statement to police on Feb. 22 admitted to being the driver and identified Lovett as the shooter, adding he was the only person in the car with a gun, according to the arrest report.Lovett was interviewed in relation to the case in September, telling police he was home at the time of the shooting. He provided police with the name of a girl who he said would corroborate that, but police reported she denied ever meeting him in person or being at his home.At the the time of his arrest, Lovett said the girl and others came to his house the night of the shooting to try to recruit him but that he stayed home. Police reported he admitted to lying about the girl at his house.The girl is listed as a co-defendant in the report but court records on the charges were not available.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Gainesville Sun  ~ 2700 SW 13th St., Gainesville, FL 32608~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Filed under:Four people, including two teenage boys, were wounded in a drive-by shooting Tuesday morning in the Austin neighborhood on the West Side.The victims were walking in the 300 block of North Central Avenue about 10:40 a.m. when a black Dodge Charger drove past and someone inside fired multiple shots, according to Chicago Police.A 14-year-old was shot in chest and right arm, and was taken to Stroger Hospital, along with a 16-year-old boy who was struck in the lower back, police said. Both of their conditions were stabilized.A 21-year-old man was shot in the left ankle and was taken to Loyola University Medical Center in Maywood; while a 22=year-old man was hit in the right leg and took himself to West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Park, police said. Their conditions were also stabilized.No one was in custody as Area North detectives investigated.A police source said three of the victims are documented gang members.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.NEWARK-- Authorities are investigating an overnight shooting that struck four people in Newark, officials confirmed Monday.All four people shot in the Fabyan Place incident at 3:26 a.m. Monday suffered non-life threatening injuries, Newark police said. Three have been treated for their injuries and released, and one refused treatment, police said Monday afternoon.Authorities did not immediately release details on what may have prompted the shooting. No arrests have been made. Detectives from the Major Crimes Division are investigating.No other details were immediately available.Jessica Mazzola may be reached atjmazzola@njadvancemedia.com. Follow her on Twitter@JessMazzola. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesIf you previously used a social network to login to WRAL.com, click the “Forgot your password” link to reset your password.Mask dispute at Fayetteville sports bar prompts fight that ends with security guard shotSlain woman, murder suspect had been friends since middle schoolCOVID-19 vaccine clinics put J&J vaccine on hold after adverse reactions; CDC finds no safety issue with vaccineAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyDuke to require proof of vaccination before students can enroll for Fall semesterNo region in the world spared as virus cases, deaths surgeIsolated showers and thunderstorms on tap again for SaturdayHail, flooding throughout central NC as more severe weather awaits on SaturdayAverage number of Atlantic hurricanes grows, 2021 could be another active seasonTriangle reels in profit, exposure when MLF comes to townPro fishing returns to Triangle with events at 3 area lakesBring back the roars: The patrons return to the MastersAmazon warehouse workers reject union bid in AlabamaBusiness owners struggling to fill open positionsJobs remain unfilled as unemployment benefits outpace wagesEditorial: Find ways to ease voting, not restrict itPATRICIA MURPHY: Fighting business, baseball and future to defend lie about the pastEditorial: Ignoring their own warnings about the N.C. LotteryExpect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodIs that a firecracker in her bag of kale from Target?Wondering about your tax refund? 5 On Your Side looks into delaysNorth Carolina families united by shared slave history connectAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyWoman who coughed on cancer patient gets 30 days in jailFoodie News: Union Special bakery is expandingVirtual Fun Roundup: Observe the moon, T. rex bites, storytimeWeekend best bets: Southern Ideal Home Show, shrimp boil and drive-in moviesWRAL WeatherCenter ForecastEvening Pick 3 Pick 4 and Cash 5Expect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodPublished: 2018-04-23 15:19:00Updated: 2018-07-13 14:08:14Posted April 23, 2018 3:19 p.m. EDTUpdated July 13, 2018 2:08 p.m. EDTBy     Matthew Burns, WRAL.com senior producer/politics editorEnfield, N.C.— A fourth man was charged Monday in theAugust deaths of four people in an Enfield home, authorities said.Dontayvious Devonte "Moochie" Cotton, 24, of Weldon, was indicted by a grand jury on four counts of murder and one count each of robbery with a dangerous weapon and burglary. He was already in the Halifax County jail on unrelated charges, and he was ordered to be held without bond on the murder charges.Authorities didn't disclose what evidence linked Cotton to the crimes.Janice Harris, James Harris, Peggy Whitley and James Whitley were shot on Aug. 21 while sitting at the Harrises' kitchen table playing cards, authorities said.Authorities said a family member went to check on the residents of the home at 980 Fishing Creek Road, in the Glenview community west of Enfield, and found the bodies. Some items were missing from the home, but there were no apparent signs of a struggle, authorities said at the time.Halifax County Sheriff Wes Tripp said last fall that the home might have been targeted and thekillings might have been gang-related.Jim Harris, 88, was a gunsmith and had a federally licensed firearm business that he ran out of his home.James Whitley, 76, was a farmer and his 67-year-old wife a former hairstylist. Janice Harris, 72, was an administrative assistant for a local builder.Matthew Lewis Simms, 25, of Enfield, was arrested in October, andKeyon Quarice West, 23, and James Edward Powell, 25, both of Roanoke Rapids, were arrested in January.SUGGEST A CORRECTIONMore On ThisTwo suspects in Enfield quadruple homicide also charged in other killingsTwo more charged in Enfield quadruple homicideIMAGES: Fourth man charged in Enfield quadruple homicide2Man charged in 2015 homicide now charged with killing two Enfield couplesHalifax sheriff: Quadruple homicide near Enfield may be gang-relatedSheriff IDs couples killed in Halifax County home invasion; reward offeredshow allAuthorities said a family member went to check on the residents of the home at 980 Fishing Creek Road, in the Glenview community west of Enfield, and found the bodies. Some items were missing from the home, but there were no apparent signs of a struggle, authorities said at the time.Halifax County Sheriff Wes Tripp said last fall that the home might have been targeted and thekillings might have been gang-related.Jim Harris, 88, was a gunsmith and had a federally licensed firearm business that he ran out of his home.James Whitley, 76, was a farmer and his 67-year-old wife a former hairstylist. Janice Harris, 72, was an administrative assistant for a local builder.Matthew Lewis Simms, 25, of Enfield, was arrested in October, andKeyon Quarice West, 23, and James Edward Powell, 25, both of Roanoke Rapids, were arrested in January.SUGGEST A CORRECTIONMore On ThisTwo suspects in Enfield quadruple homicide also charged in other killingsTwo more charged in Enfield quadruple homicideIMAGES: Fourth man charged in Enfield quadruple homicide2Man charged in 2015 homicide now charged with killing two Enfield couplesHalifax sheriff: Quadruple homicide near Enfield may be gang-relatedSheriff IDs couples killed in Halifax County home invasion; reward offeredshow allAuthorities said a family member went to check on the residents of the home at 980 Fishing Creek Road, in the Glenview community west of Enfield, and found the bodies. Some items were missing from the home, but there were no apparent signs of a struggle, authorities said at the time.Halifax County Sheriff Wes Tripp said last fall that the home might have been targeted and thekillings might have been gang-related.Jim Harris, 88, was a gunsmith and had a federally licensed firearm business that he ran out of his home.James Whitley, 76, was a farmer and his 67-year-old wife a former hairstylist. Janice Harris, 72, was an administrative assistant for a local builder.Matthew Lewis Simms, 25, of Enfield, was arrested in October, andKeyon Quarice West, 23, and James Edward Powell, 25, both of Roanoke Rapids, were arrested in January.SUGGEST A CORRECTIONMore On ThisTwo suspects in Enfield quadruple homicide also charged in other killingsTwo more charged in Enfield quadruple homicideIMAGES: Fourth man charged in Enfield quadruple homicide2Man charged in 2015 homicide now charged with killing two Enfield couplesHalifax sheriff: Quadruple homicide near Enfield may be gang-relatedSheriff IDs couples killed in Halifax County home invasion; reward offeredshow allSUGGEST A CORRECTIONMore On ThisTwo suspects in Enfield quadruple homicide also charged in other killingsTwo more charged in Enfield quadruple homicideIMAGES: Fourth man charged in Enfield quadruple homicide2Man charged in 2015 homicide now charged with killing two Enfield couplesHalifax sheriff: Quadruple homicide near Enfield may be gang-relatedSheriff IDs couples killed in Halifax County home invasion; reward offeredshow allCopyright 2018 by Capitol Broadcasting Company. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.©2021  Capitol Broadcasting Company, Inc.A 22-year-old woman from Bloomfield died of her injuries after she was shot in Newark on Monday, authorities said.Shirlena Coke and three men were on the 700 block of S. 19th St. around 5:45 p.m. Monday when they were hit by gunfire, the Essex County Prosecutor’s Office said in a statement.Coke was taken to a local hospital, but could not be saved, authorities said. The three men are expected to survive.Police did not disclose whether Coke or the three men were the targets.No arrests have been made.PEQUANNOCK ARREST:Suspect hiding in water found by police dogPORT AUTHORITY ARREST:Lodi man on cocaine possession chargesPATERSON ARREST:Man charged with attempted murder twice in three yearsEight people were shot  between Monday evening and  Tuesday morning, and one of those eight died, Memphis police said.An overnight shooting at 7th and Bickford in North Memphis left a 46-year-old man dead, police said on Twitter.Four others were hurt in a drive-by shooting when bullets were fired into a group shortly after 9 p.m. near the Dixie Grill and Deli corner store.The store is roughly 200 yards north of Poplar Avenue and the Memphis VA Medical Center.Three of the injured were adults, and a juvenile was in critical condition at Le Bonheur Children's Hospital, according to a police report."I just wish it would stop," said David Biles, 39, who works in the corner store. "One thing we need is to get these guns off the street."Biles said he heard loud shots right outside - maybe five shots, but he wasn't sure. "Everybody got to ducking and running."He said he went outside a short time later. "I did see a guy running to a car holding his stomach," he said. That car sped off.Biles believes the shooting was gang-related, but he said he doesn't know what specific gang or gangs were involved or what led to the shooting.As of Tuesday afternoon, all the victims from the shooting on Decatur were still alive, police spokeswoman Lt. Karen Rudolph wrote in an email.Police said on Twitter that the suspects in the drive-by shooting may have been inside a black Ford truck and a silver Chevy Malibu.Two more people were shot in the 1200 block of College Street in South Memphis at 1 a.m., police said. Both were in non-critical condition.And shortly before 9 p.m. Monday evening, a man arrived at a fire station at 6675 Winchester in Hickory Hill with a gunshot wound and was transported to the Regional Medical Center in critical condition, the police department posted on Twitter.The suspect was in a brown Camry and the victim may have been shot in a nearby apartment complex, police said.It wasn't immediately clear what led up to the shootings. They're apparently not related, Rudolph wrote in an email. "No arrests have been made; however, it is believed that the suspect/s are possibly known to at least one of the victims who were shot," she wrote.The bloody night was a reminder of the city's ongoing struggle with gun violence. The number of victims in one night was unusually high, but shootings, many of them nonfatal, are common here. The city saw a record 228 homicides last year. (The city has seen 123 homicides so far this year, lower than last year's pace, according to The Commercial Appeal'sHomicide Tracker.)More:Memphis' first slaying of 2017 follows 228 in 2016Reach reporter Daniel Connolly at 529-5296, daniel.connolly@commercialappeal.com, or on Twitter at @danielconnolly.A gunman shot four people Sunday at a Brooklyn house party, cops said.The suspect opened fire at the large gathering near 100th St. and Avenue M in Canarsie about 3 a.m., officials said.A 29-year-old woman and a 42-year-old man were both shot in the buttocks. Two other men, aged 28 and 32, were shot in the right arm.All four victims went to Brookdale University Hospital with nonlife-threatening injuries, cops said.One of the victims heard two men arguing before shots were fired. It wasn't clear if the victims knew the gunman.Police were still searching for the suspect Sunday night.Filed under:A man was killed and six other people were wounded in a West Pullman neighborhood mass shooting early Sunday on the Far South Side.About 2:30 a.m., the group was in the parking lot of a banquet hall in the 11900 block of South Loomis when a male in a black SUV opened fire, according to Chicago Police. The SUV then sped away.“Two officers actually witnessed the shooting, took off after the offender’s car,” First Deputy Superintendent Kevin Navarro said at an unrelated press conference Sunday afternoon.“There was a slight pursuit on the expressway at which time the officers lost the vehicle on the expressway,” Navarro said.Kolby Craig, 33, was shot in the head and pronounced dead at the scene at 2:35 a.m., police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said. He lived in the Englewood neighborhood on the South Side.A 30-year-old man was shot in the left leg; a 31-year-old woman was shot in the left leg; a 32-year-old woman was shot in the right leg; a 32-year-old man was shot in the abdomen; a 33-year-old woman was shot in the left leg; and a 36-year-old man was shot in the buttocks, police said.Three people were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, while two others were taken to Stroger Hospital, said Chicago Fire Department spokesman Larry Langford. They were all listed in serious-to-critical condition.A seventh person was shot and taken to MetroSouth Medical Center in Blue Island, Langford said. That person was in fair-to-serious condition.An eighth person, a 40-year-old man, was struck by the shooter’s vehicle and suffered a broken right ankle, police said. He was taken to Christ, where his condition stabilized.The owner of the banquet hall has voluntarily closed the property in the wake of the shooting, Navarro said.Area South detectives were investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Gallery: Two charged in deadly shootout outside Cleveland barCLEVELAND, Ohio -- Two more men are charged in connection with a shootout outside a Cleveland bar that left one dead and four others injured.Clarence Bennett, 37, and Lance Franklin, 31, are both charged with aggravated murder in connection with the Aug. 19 shootout at Freck's Lounge. Neither are in police custody and warrants were issued Friday for their arrest.Another man,John Mittman III, 21, was previously charged with aggravated murder in the shootout. He is being held in the Cuyahoga County Jail on $1 million bond.Mittman used an assault rifle during the shootout and Bennett and Franklin used handguns, according to court records.Darryl Howard, 45, died in the shooting.The shootout happened after a fight broke out at the bar on Superior Avenue and East 112th Street, police said. The fight spilled outside and witnesses told police at least three people fired shots at each other, according to police reports.Officers recovered several bullet casings from different guns and towed three vehicles as part of the investigation.Howard died at the scene and four others between the ages 29 and 45 were injured in the shooting. Those injuries were not life-threatening, police said.Both Bennett and Franklin have criminal histories.Bennett spent three years in prison in 2012 on three separate cases, including one in which he pistol-whipped a woman's face, fired three gunshots at her and pointed his gun at police officers responding to the scene. He was also convicted of possessing a gun as a felon and for an attempted robbery the same year.He also served a three-year sentence in 2000 for shooting a man in the 1200 block of East 105th Street, and has been convicted of drug trafficking four times, drug possession four times and receiving stolen property.Franklin served 10 months in prison for a 2010 kidnapping and assault. He has also been convicted of drug possession, possessing a weapon as a felon and aggravated assault for a 2007 attack on a 16-year-old boy inside a pizza shop.He was charged in a 2008 deadly robbery, but prosecutors dropped that charge a month later.To comment on this story,please visit our crime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWATCHVIDEOS4 shot in WyandanchTrending:Two men in their 20s who were killed in a gunbattle between six men in North Hollywood earlier this week were identified Thursday.Jawara Tucker, 29, and Ryan Anthony Dunk, 25, both of New York, died in the shootings, said Ed Winter of the Los Angeles County Department of Medical Examiner-Coroner.The shooting occurred shortly after 11:30 p.m. Monday in the 5000 block of North Klump Avenue.Six men who knew each other were standing and talking in the area when suddenly several shots were fired within the group, the Los Angeles Police Department said.•RELATED STORY:NoHo Arts District shooting leaves 2 dead, 2 woundedTucker was struck several times before he was transported to Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles, where he died at 12:30 a.m., Winter said.Meanwhile Dunk was pronounced dead at the scene at 11:52 p.m.Autopsies were pending for both men, Winter added.From the scene, LAPD detective Meghan Aguilar said four of the men — ages 25 to 35 — were struck. The shooting was not gang-related, she said.Authorities said two handguns were found at the scene with numerous casings from rounds fired. The guns and rounds were located near the dead man, now known to be Dunk.“We are actively looking for those two individuals who were in the group that fled the scene,” Aguilar said shortly after the shooting.Meanwhile, LAPD Lt. Mike Kozak told reporters at the scene that some of the victims may have been among the shooters.Anyone who has information about the case can call (877) LAPD-247.City News Service contributed to this report.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByTina MooreandDaniel PrendergastSubmitAugust 6, 2017|4:31pmAt least 12 people were shot in separate incidents in Manhattan and The Bronx early Sunday, police said.The bloody morning kicked off in Harlem when a 53-year-old man was shot in the lower back as he was getting into a car near the corner of Seventh Avenue and W. 145th St. around 1:20 a.m.The injured man then walked several blocks to Harlem Hospital where he told doctors what happened. Police were then notified.About two hours later in The Bronx, four people were shot as they were standing in front of a nightclub on Unionport Road in Parkchester.A 56-year-old woman was grazed in the face, police said.The gunman also struck a 20-year-old man three times in the left leg, a 22-year-old man once in the right arm and right leg and a 31-year-old man once in the left foot.They were all taken to an area hospital in stable condition for treatment.Police sources said it’s believed the victims may have been innocent bystanders and were likely not the intended targets.At around 4:20 a.m. in Harlem, a 32-year-old man was shot in the arm as he was driving north on Lenox Ave. and W. 131st St. in Harlem.The man then drove to W. 137th St. and Adam Clayton Powell Jr. Blvd. before pulling over.EMS workers treated him at the scene and he refused further medical attention, officials said.Minutes later, six people were shot when a gunman opened fire on Wickham Ave. in the Wakefield section of The Bronx around 4:30 a.m.Four men, 30, 28, 28 and 22, were all struck in the arms and legs while two women, 20 and 21, were struck in the back and hand, respectively, officials said.A 22-year-old man was taken into custody at the scene and charges against him are pending, police said.All the victims in Sundays shootings are expected to survive.Read NextTrump Jr.'s meeting with a Russian lawyer was a bad idea: ...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationThanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByTina MooreandDaniel PrendergastSubmitAugust 6, 2017|4:31pmAt least 12 people were shot in separate incidents in Manhattan and The Bronx early Sunday, police said.The bloody morning kicked off in Harlem when a 53-year-old man was shot in the lower back as he was getting into a car near the corner of Seventh Avenue and W. 145th St. around 1:20 a.m.The injured man then walked several blocks to Harlem Hospital where he told doctors what happened. Police were then notified.About two hours later in The Bronx, four people were shot as they were standing in front of a nightclub on Unionport Road in Parkchester.A 56-year-old woman was grazed in the face, police said.The gunman also struck a 20-year-old man three times in the left leg, a 22-year-old man once in the right arm and right leg and a 31-year-old man once in the left foot.They were all taken to an area hospital in stable condition for treatment.Police sources said it’s believed the victims may have been innocent bystanders and were likely not the intended targets.At around 4:20 a.m. in Harlem, a 32-year-old man was shot in the arm as he was driving north on Lenox Ave. and W. 131st St. in Harlem.The man then drove to W. 137th St. and Adam Clayton Powell Jr. Blvd. before pulling over.EMS workers treated him at the scene and he refused further medical attention, officials said.Minutes later, six people were shot when a gunman opened fire on Wickham Ave. in the Wakefield section of The Bronx around 4:30 a.m.Four men, 30, 28, 28 and 22, were all struck in the arms and legs while two women, 20 and 21, were struck in the back and hand, respectively, officials said.A 22-year-old man was taken into custody at the scene and charges against him are pending, police said.All the victims in Sundays shootings are expected to survive.Read NextTrump Jr.'s meeting with a Russian lawyer was a bad idea: ...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationOAKLAND, CA — Seven people were injured in a shooting Sunday afternoon in Oakland, and the suspect or suspects remain at large, according to police.The shooting was reported at 4:43 p.m. in the 1000 block of 106th Avenue, police said.According to police, six male victims were taken to a hospital in stable condition.Police have not made any arrests or identified any suspects in the case, police said.— Bay City News; Image via ShutterstockTo request removal of your name from an arrest report, submitthese required itemstoarrestreports@patch.com.LAKEWOOD - More than a day after gunfire erupted at a party at Brooks Road Sports Complex, police have identified the four victims of the shooting.Curtis Alexander, 28, of Englishtown, and Jerry Lee Dorsey, 53, Jermeler Sample, 29, and Dajuan Morris, 24, all of Lakewood, were shot at the party Saturday evening, according to an email from Detective Sgt. Greg Staffordsmith.Alexander, Dorsey and Morris were all shot in the leg. Sample was shot in the abdomen. They were treated at Monmouth Medical Center Southern Campus (formerly Kimball Medical Center), in Lakewood.More:Police investigate suspicious car in LakewoodStaffordsmith said Sunday morning that all the victims are expected to survive. Police said they are still searching for witnesses and seeking to speak to anyone with more information about the events that led to the Saturday night incident.Sample and Dorsey were transferred to Jersey Shore University Medical Center in Neptune. The other two victims remained at Monmouth Medical's Southern Campus.No additional information was available as of Monday morning, Staffordsmith said.Authorities ask anyone with information to call Lakewood Detective Oscar Valmon at 732-363-0200, extension 5347.Authorities recovered at least three guns as part of the investigation. Two guns were left unattended outside the hospital, including one in a minivan with Vermont plates that was abandoned in front of the hospital.More:Roads to be repaved in the Lakewood Industrial ParkNeighbors said they saw several cars parked at the sports complex Saturday night. Paoula Bautiusta, who lives across the street with her husband and children, says she was taking out the trash when she saw more than a dozen cars speeding out of the complex down Brook Road around the time of the shooting.She said two police cruisers arrived minutes later."This hasn't happened before, and we've lived in this house for seven years," she said. "You get worried because we live close by and because of the kids."Authorities believe the shooting occurred during a party at the complex, a wooded park near the Lakewood-Howell border with a Little League field, a playground, a football field, two soccer fields and a picnic area.Township police got a call around 9:40 p.m. Saturday from a woman saying she was taking a gunshot victim from the park to the hospital, Staffordsmith said. The caller did not identify herself or give any more information.More:Lakewood PD: Dog alerts homeowner of burglaryAs officers headed to the park, they got a call from the hospital reporting that several gunshot victims were dropped off, Staffordsmith said.When they arrived at the park Saturday evening, officers started questioning people, searching for potential witnesses.Guilty plea:Guilty plea in fatal Lakewood stabbingThat's when they say they saw a man in the passenger seat of a vehicle near the entrance hiding a gun. Passenger Jahquan Fenn, 25, of Lakewood, was arrested on the weapons charge. Also arrested were Donaysha Peace, 21, of Waretown and Sanaya Smuoone, 20, of Lakewood on a charge of possession of a controlled dangerous substance.Officers arrived at the complex to find Alexander, who was shot in the leg. Lakewood Emergency Medical Services took him to Monmouth Medical Center Southern Campus.When police arrived at the hospital, they learned of the other three victims.Watch the video above for a look at one of the crime scenes associated with the shooting Saturday night in Lakewood.The dark-colored minivan with Vermont plates outside the hospital was surrounded by crime scene tape and guarded by police.An Asbury Park Press photographer observed Sheriff's officers recover a weapon from the Vermont-registered vehicle.Authorities found another gun on the ground between two parked cars, Staffordsmith said.Officers continued looking for people of interest at the park until early Sunday, stopping vehicles near the scene of the shooting.More:State decision delayed on Lakewood 1,800-home planThe sports complex remained closed Sunday morning with township officers guarding the entrance.Authorities ask anyone with information to call Lakewood Detective Oscar Valmon at 732-363-0200, extension 5347.This is a developing story. Visitapp.comagain for new information as it becomes available.Erik Larsen: 732-682-9359 or elarsen@gannettnj.comPress Staff Writer Jean Mikle contributed to this story.August 7, 2017TALLAHASSEE, Fla. (WCTV) -- The Tallahassee Police Department has identified the victim of a Saturday morning shooting that ended near Call Street and Stadium Drive.Police have identified the victim as Travis Wilson, 26.Police say an investigation revealed that the incident did not start near the Whataburger on Lake Bradford Road as first believed.TPD investigators say they have determined that shots were first fired in the parking lot of the Waffle House restaurant at 1939 West Tennessee Street, just prior to the homicide.Several minutes later, Wilson and three others were shot while traveling in the 1700 block of West Tennessee Street. The victims’ vehicle came to rest at the intersection of Call Street and Stadium Drive.Wilson later died from his injuries. Three others were taken to the hospital.Investigators believe there were other drivers traveling in the 1700 block of West Tennessee Street at the time who may have witnessed the shooting, as well as witnesses at the Waffle House when the shots were fired in the parking lot.TPD has set up a hotline for information related to the shooting, at (850) 891-4462. Witnesses may also remain anonymous by calling Crime Stoppers at (850) 574-TIPS. Citizens may also call TPD directly at (850) 891-4200.August 5, 2017TALLAHASSEE, Fla. (WCTV) -- An early morning shooting in Tallahassee Saturday left one person dead and three others injured.According to the Tallahassee Police Department, it happened around 3:30 a.m. near the intersection of Call Street and Stadium Drive.Officers believe the incident started at the Whataburger on Lake Bradford Road.They say several vehicles were involved in the incident. All of the victims were either taken by ambulance or they took themselves to local hospitals.If you have any information, call the Tallahassee Police Department at (850) 891-4200.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A man was shot in the head in a quadruple shooting Wednesday in east Baltimore, police said.City police said officers were called around 12:07 p.m. to Broadway at Eager Street for a report of a shooting. They found a 19-year-old woman who was shot in the leg, police said. Paramedics took her to a hospital.Police received a call that three others involved in the shooting arrived at a hospital on their own. An 18-year-old man was shot in the shoulder, a 25-year-old man was shot in the shoulder, and a 30-year-old man was shot in the head.Anyone with information is asked to call police at 410-396-2221 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 866-7LOCKUP.Also on WBALTV.com:Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Moments before a gunman shot into a crowd of people on the West Side Tuesday night, a 66-year-old man was sitting on the porch of his Humboldt Park home with relatives, holding a 6-month-old baby in his lap, according to Chicago police and relatives.Four people, including the older man who's known as a longtime mechanic in the neighborhood, were shot in the attack in the 800 block of North Monticello Avenue about 8:25 p.m. Someone had taken the baby inside just before shots rang out, said a relative waiting outside the emergency room at Mount Sinai Hospital, where two of the injured were being treated."They were just sitting outside after a long day of work," said the woman, 36, who did not want to be identified. "You just really have to be a heartless person to shoot on a porch full of kids and the elderly."The four victims were among 11 people shot between Tuesday and Wednesday mornings. Ten of the victims were shot in less than nine hours Tuesday, including a critically injured 16-year-old boy, police said.The 66-year-old man who suffered a gunshot wound to the right side and a 17-year-old boy who suffered a gunshot wound to the left side were both taken to Mount Sinai Hospital; a 31-year-old man who suffered a gunshot wound to the left side and a 31-year-old man who was shot in the abdomen were taken to Stroger Hospital, according to police.One of those taken to Stroger was initially believed to be in "very critical" condition, an official said. All four had been stabilized at the hospital, according to official police information, but specific conditions for them were not released.The gunman came up to the porch on foot and opened fire, police said. Area North detectives had no one in custody, and no description of the attacker was released.About a dozen people gathered at Monticello and Chicago avenues, between a run-down building and a vacant lot, staring down the street as they spoke among themselves near the block-long crime scene. Numerous shell casings were found inside the perimeter.Diane Ashford stood outside the scene and a man who she knew asked, "What happened? Who got hurt?""My uncle, the one who's always fixing up your car," she replied.Ashford said she received a frantic call from her son, telling her that her uncle, a neighborhood mechanic known as Pops, was shot and rushed to the hospital."It's something bad always happening over here," Ashford said. "I was scared because I got a call from my son who was crying. ... He said, 'They're shooting! They shot Pops!'"As others were escorted out of the scene, a woman stopped and told them, "Prayers go out to your family."A relative at Mount Sinai Hospital said Pops was the 66-year-old and that he's lived in the home where the shooting happened for more than 30 years.2 teens injured in separate shootingsTwo other teenagers were shot in earlier attacks Tuesday, police said.On the South Side, a 15-year-old boy was shot was shot in the left arm and grazed in the abdomen in the East Chatham neighborhood about 9:15 p.m., police said. He was walking west in the 8200 block of South Ellis Avenue when multiple people came up to him and one shot him. He was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where his condition was stabilized.Earlier in an unrelated attack on the South Side, a 16-year-old boy was shot about 12:50 p.m. in 7800 block of South Dobson Avenue in the Grand Crossing neighborhood. The boy had been shot in the chest, according to police.The teen was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center, where he was listed in critical condition, police said. Information on the circumstances of the shooting wasn't released.In other shootings:No one had been arrested in the attacks, police said.Check back for updates.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneCloudy skies early, followed by partial clearing. High 56F. Winds WNW at 15 to 25 mph.  Higher wind gusts possible..A clear sky. Low 27F. W winds at 10 to 20 mph, decreasing to less than 5 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 11:51 amTOPPENISH, WA - On 08-01-2017 at about 3:15 a.m., the Yakima County Sheriff's was notified of a shooting with multiple gunshot victims, that had just taken place in the 8000 block of Lateral C. Road in Toppenish.Yakima County Sheriff's Deputies along with Yakima Nation Tribal Police, Toppenish Police, and Wapato Police responded. Six known gunshot victims were transported to area hospitals.Investigators in the area obtained a description of the suspect vehicle and detained two persons out of the vehicle. An 18-year-old male from Toppenish was one of the two people inside the vehicle and was subsequently arrested and booked into the Yakima County jail for felony assault and drive by shooting charges.The investigation to this point suggests that prior to gunshots being fired, two females at the party became involved in a fight. Very shortly after this fight, the 18-year-old suspect retrieved a shotgun loaded with birdshot and fired several rounds into a crowd of people injuring at least six people. The injuries range from very minor injuries to major injuries, although none of the injuries are believed to be life-threatening at this point.Investigators have impounded the vehicle that the suspect was located inside of and the shotgun is believed to be inside the vehicle.The victims include:A 21-year-old male from SunnysideA 25-year-old female from White SwanA 22-year-old male from ToppenishA 19-year-old male from PascoAn 18-year-old male from PascoA 19-year-old male from PascoThe Yakima County Sheriff's Office is investigating and the investigation is ongoing.Anyone with information regarding this case is asked to call the Yakima County Sheriff's Office at 574-2500 or 800-572-0490. Tips including anonymous tips can also be called into Crime Stoppers of Yakima County at 248-9980 or 800-248-9980 or on the internet atyakima.crimestoppersweb.com.Currently in KennewickSorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up to get breaking news, weather forecasts, and more in your email inbox.Sign Up NowGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WATCHLIVEShootout in Southwest Fresno leaves 7 injuredDECATUR — Four people were shot Monday night near Jasper and Main Streets, according to the Decatur Police Department. All four went to HSHS St. Mary’s Hospital for treatment.About 10:30 p.m., police responded to the scene, where they found shell casings from a gun, according to a news release from Lt. Brian Cleary.The victims included a 22-year-old woman, two 22-year-old men and one 24-year-old man. The woman was later transported to HSHS St. John’s Hospital in Springfield for life-threatening injuries.The investigation is ongoing and police have made no arrests. Police encourage anyone with information to contact the Decatur Police Department (217) 424-2711 or Crime Stoppers at (217) 423-8477.For some residents who live in the vicinity of the shooting, the sound of gunfire in the streets is nothing new. Lisa Garner said her home is six blocks away, and the noise from multiple gunshots was enough to wake her up."I woke up from being sound asleep, so I don't know how many gunshots there were," she said Tuesday morning while shopping at a neighborhood convenience store."At least once a week I hear gunshots, and I hear them somewhere in town, even if it ain't near me, although I've had it happen across the street right next to my house," she said. "This town is so screwed up, it's pathetic."Garner, 56, is helping to look after three granddaughters ages 7, 2 and 1, and fears for their future. She said the gunshots didn't wake them up because hearing them is not unusual: "They are used to all that." But she worries about the dangers of stray bullets and the risk of an accidental wounding — or worse."If I had the money, I'd be gone, I'd take my grandbabies and I'd be gone," she said. "But I've lived where I am for a year because it's the only thing I can afford."chettinger@herald-review.com|(217) 421-6985Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Public Safety ReporterPublic safety reporter for the Herald & Review.PLEASANT HILL, Calif. — A 25-foot electric passenger train and hauling trailer that were stolen from the San Francisco Bay Area were recovered…DECATUR — Police said a Decatur man whipped his two sons, both younger than 14, with a leather belt after one of them had asked for an air con…CHARLESTON — An apparent exchange of gunfire between people in a vehicle and one on foot reported by witnesses led to a Monday standoff with p…SHELBYVILLE — A 26-year-old Shelbyville man has been sentenced to three years in the Illinois Department of Corrections for kicking and stompi…DECATUR — A Decatur 31-year-old man repeatedly beat his girlfriend in front of their children Tuesday night before threatening her with a knif…DECATUR — The woman shot and wounded in Decatur on Monday night remains in “pretty serious condition,” according to Detective Sgt. Chris Copel…Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.newsCrimeByLiz  Farmer11:26 AM on Aug 5, 2017 CDTThe president of an El Paso chapter of the Bandidos biker club recently died, several days after getting shot during a bar fight with a rival club, police said.Juan Martinez, 61, was one of four men shot during the fight Sunday night at Mulligan's Chopped Hog on the east side of the city, police said.He'd been in the hospital since then and died Thursday,The El Paso Times reports.Officers arrested the suspected shooter, 34-year-old Javier Gonzalez of the Kinfolk Motorcycle Club, Wednesday, police said.One of the gangs was told to leave the bar Sunday night, which sparked an argument between the two groups, police said. They have not specified what group was told to leave.Local Bandidos member Ashley "Smiley"Brecker told KFOX-14that he'd been there right before the gunfire."One of them came in helmet on, full leathers, gloves and just started shooting the place," Brecker said.The incident also wounded 49-year-old Ballardo Salcido, 47-year-old David Villalobos and 36-year-old Juan Miguel Vega-Rivera, police said.Martinez is one of several Bandidos leaders who were arrested last year for allegedly assaulting two members of a rival gang with a bat and baton outside a restaurant,The El Paso Times reports.The Bandidos made state and local headlines two years ago after adeadly shootoutwith the Cossacks biker group at a Twin Peaks restaurant in Waco. The gunfight left nine people dead and about 20 people injured.Bandido Motorcycle Club National President Clifton "Dozer" Roberts traveled to El Paso before Martinez died. He said during an "unprecedented" press conference that he made the trek to check on his brothers and to set the public straight that the club isn't there to harm the city."El Paso's been our home. These guys have raised families, they work here, live here - for many, many years," Roberts said. "So by no means are we planning to turn this into a war zone."Liz  FarmerStay up-to-date with the crime and public safety news your neighbors are talking about.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasWAVY.comby:WAVY Web StaffNORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) – A federal jury convicted a Norfolk man, who is a violent 11-time felon, on all drug and gun counts charged against him Wednesday.Demetrius Antwon McGregor, 35, was convicted on charges including two counts of being a felon in possession of a firearm, one count of possessing with intent to distribute cocaine, and one count of possessing firearms in furtherance of a drug-trafficking crime.“Demetrius McGregor has a long record of violent gun crime in Hampton Roads. Serial violent felons who continue to arm themselves are major drivers of the gun crime that plagues our communities, and we will continue to prioritize cases like this one,” said G. Zachary Terwilliger, U.S. Attorney for the Eastern District of Virginia.Court records indicate that McGregor was arrested on a warrant by Norfolk Police and a U.S. Marshal on Oct. 6, 2017. They recovered a loaded Sig Sauer handgun from his waistband.“Firearms in the possession of a convicted felon are always a public safety concern, but especially so in the hands of a career criminal with nearly a dozen convictions for violent and lawless behavior,” said Ashan M. Benedict, Special Agent in Charge of ATF’s Washington Field Division.“This conviction on all charges confirms that repeated, unlawful behavior will not be tolerated and we are grateful to U.S. Attorney Terwilliger and our law enforcement partners in Hampton Roads for this successful outcome.”The court documents revealed that when investigators obtained a search warrant for McGregor’s apartment, they found 18 bags of cocaine, two assault rifles — one of which was loaded and had been reported stolen — four additional large-capacity magazines, dozens of rounds of .45 and 9mm caliber ammunition, and two digital scales in a closet.Additionally, they found a Sig Saur .45 caliber magazine “designed for the gun taken from his waistband” under the mattress and two additional digital scales sitting out in the open. The .45 caliber ammunition from the closet and in the magazine under the mattress matched the brand of the ammunition in the handgun recovered from McGregor.“Law enforcement must continue to surgically remove those from the streets that plague our communities surrounding gun crime across Hampton Roads,” said Larry D. Boone, Chief of Norfolk Police. “Additionally, we must not only target violent individuals, but we must also target those sources that afford violent felons to arm themselves in the first place, otherwise the measurable outcomes will be minimum.”McGregor also has prior convictions including prior convictions for both malicious and unlawful wounding, use of a firearm in commission of a felony, attempted robbery, and conspiracy to commit robbery as well as four convictions for maliciously shooting into an occupied vehicle.McGregor faces a minimum of five years and a maximum of life in prison when sentenced on Feb. 4, 2020. Actual sentences for federal crimes are typically less than the maximum penalties. A federal district court judge will determine any sentence after taking into account the U.S. Sentencing Guidelines and other statutory factors.Assistant U.S. Attorneys William B. Jackson and Joseph E. DePadilla are prosecuting the case.A copy of this press release is located on the website of theU.S. Attorney’s Officefor the Eastern District of Virginia.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- Police are investigating an undetermined death Saturday afternoon near the Norfolk Premium Outlets.Law enforcement tweeted saying they received a call just after 12 p.m. to respond to the 1600 block of Premium Outlets Boulevard for the incident.PORTSMOUTH, Va. (WAVY) -- Elizabeth River Crossings sent out a reminder on Thursday for the Good Citizen Scholarship application deadline.The Good Citizen Scholarship is awarded to ten Norfolk/Portsmouth graduating seniors who show excellent character, demonstrate leadership, and make positive contributions to both their school and community.HAMPTON, Va. (WAVY) -- A hiring event is being held in mid-April by 'Educate and Vaccinate' for outreach specialists.In the position, specialists would inform community members about the benefits of vaccinations, help with registration, and assist with logistics for recruiting programs.Buffalo police investigated a fatal shooting on Detroit Street on July 27. (Derek Gee/Buffalo News)Cornelius Caddele was killed July 29 in a shooting on Carl Street.Buffalo police have released the names of the city's four most recent homicide victims.The four killings happened over a nine-day span.Police have not announced arrests in any of these cases.Buffalo police say there have been 31 homicides in the city so far this year, though the department's list does not include cases where the killings may be ruled justified. Their total also does not include the cases of two men,Wardel DavisandJose Hernandez-Rossy, who died in separate incidents while police were arresting or attempting to arrest them. Both of those cases have been ruled homicides by the Erie County Medical Examiner's Office.Related:Map of shootings in Buffalo from 2011 - 2016Chicago gets bad rap, but gun violence in Buffalo isn't much betterIn Buffalo's children, wounds no one seesThe smart way to start your day. We sift through all the news to give you a concise, informative look at the top headlines and must-read stories every weekday.Buffalo police say an Amherst man was shot in the 100 block of Jefferson Avenue early Sunday, sometime shortly after midnight.Buffalo police say an Amherst man was shot in the 100 block of Jefferson Avenue early Sunday, sometime shortly after midnight.Prosecutors allege that Mark M. Miller owned and operated several businesses, “which engaged in a wire fraud scheme related to unlawful debt collection activities."Prosecutors allege that Mark M. Miller owned and operated several businesses, “which engaged in a wire fraud scheme related to unlawful debt collection activities."Workers restoring the historic building recently came across the names.Workers restoring the historic building recently came across the names.The longtime director of a Christian youth camp in Delevan is refusing to step down despite complaints that he inappropriately touched young women and girls.The longtime director of a Christian youth camp in Delevan is refusing to step down despite complaints that he inappropriately touched young women and girls.Suddenly, the pandemic that has ravaged the world is raging far worse not in the United States, but on the other side of the Peace Bridge.Suddenly, the pandemic that has ravaged the world is raging far worse not in the United States, but on the other side of the Peace Bridge.More than 111,000 Western New Yorkers have contracted Covid-19 since March 2020 and nearly 2,300 have died of it.The final pieces of the budget, which was due by March 31, are still under negotiation, but officials are banking on legalization of mobile sports betting to be in it to help finance massive spending hike desires.The final pieces of the budget, which was due by March 31, are still under negotiation, but officials are banking on legalization of mobile sports betting to be in it to help finance massive spending hike desires.According to Forbes, the 20 richest owners controlling major league sports have a combined net worth of $426 billion, up 60% from a year ago.According to Forbes, the 20 richest owners controlling major league sports have a combined net worth of $426 billion, up 60% from a year ago.The seven-day average positive rate for the five counties the state calls Western New York was 4.7% after reports were compiled among those receiving tests for the virus Sunday.The seven-day average positive rate for the five counties the state calls Western New York was 4.7% after reports were compiled among those receiving tests for the virus Sunday.In one of the incidents, police found a 22-year-old Hamburg man shot inside an apartment and a side porch of the home on fire.In one of the incidents, police found a 22-year-old Hamburg man shot inside an apartment and a side porch of the home on fire.Buffalo police investigated a fatal shooting on Detroit Street on July 27. (Derek Gee/Buffalo News)Cornelius Caddele was killed July 29 in a shooting on Carl Street.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.SALISBURY, NC (WBTV) - Two men, who police say are gang members, have been arrested in connection with a deadly shooting that happened in Salisbury over the weekend.Dequan Robertson and Anthony Gill were both killed by gunfire on Saturday just after 2 a.m. in the 100 block of W. Fisher Street. At least two other people were injured.Tuesday morning, police said Jalen Lamont Cook and Zakelo Duren, both 23, were wanted in the deadly shooting. Cook was arrested Tuesday afternoon, Duren was arrested a short time later."I'm innocent," Duren said while walking into the magistrate's office. "I lost two of my brothers that night.""We need to get them arrested, they are a danger to the community," Salisbury Police Chief Stokes said early Tuesday.Stokes says the two are in the Bloods gang but says the shooting is not necessarily gang-related.Cook faces two murder charges and a charge of assault with a deadly weapon. Duren faces a charge of inciting a felonious riot.Gill will be remembered during a funeral service on Thursday at the chapel at Noble and Kelsey Funeral Home in Salisbury.On Monday morning, the body of Shawn Spry was found in a yard behind an apartment building on Link Avenue. Police said that Spry had been shot to death.Family and friends of Spry have created a crowd sourcing page to raise money for funeral expenses:https://www.gofundme.com/ssfe17On Tuesday, police said that the two cases were not related and that neither case was a random act of violence.If you have any information about this shooting, you're asked to call the Salisbury Police Department at 704-638-5333. Tips may be submitted online here:http://tips.salisburyrowancrimestoppers.orgCopyright 2017 WBTV.  All rights reserved.David is a bureau reporter covering Salisbury, Concord, and Kannapolis and "wherever they send me." He grew up watching WBTV and it was the only TV station he ever wanted to work for.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Four people were injured Friday night when gunfire erupted along North Washington Street, according to city police.About 10:45 p.m., patrol officers in the area of West Seventh and North Washington streets reported gunfire south of their location, said Sgt. Andrea Janvier, a spokeswoman with the Wilmington Police Department. At the same time, Shot Spotter technology alerted police to gunfire in the 400 block of N. Washington St., she said.Officers immediately found a 26-year-old man at the scene with gunshot wounds to his stomach and arm areas, Janvier said. He was offered first aid until paramedics could get him to Christiana Hospital, where he was admitted in critical condition, she said.Three other people also suffered injuries by gunfire or debris associated with the shooting.A 33-year-old woman was found inside of a vehicle parked in the 400 block of N. Washington St., Janvier said. She had a graze wound on her neck and was taken to Christiana Hospital in stable condition.LOCAL NEWS:Delaware's medical marijuana Robin Hood or convicted drug dealer?CRIME:Applebee's employee shot during apparent robbery in NewarkA 35-year-old man was outside that vehicle and had a graze wound to his upper left arm, she said. He was also taken to Christiana Hospital in good condition.Police were then notified about another man, identified as 40 years old, who was inside a home in the block, Janvier said. He had graze wounds to his right arm and right eye, she said.He was taken to Christiana Hospital and described in good condition.A Wilmington Police Department Forensics Service Unit vehicle was at the scene Friday night.Police said no information was immediately available on the suspect in the shooting.Anyone with information should call Detective Jeffrey Dickerson at (302) 576-3961. Tips may also be provided to the Delaware Crime Stoppers Tipline at 1-800-TIP-3333, or at delawarecrimestoppers.org. Citizens may also text a tip to NIXLE at 888777.On Friday afternoon,a 23-year-old man was shot deadin Wilmington's Hedgeville neighborhood.Friday night's shooting brings Wilmington's shooting victim total this year to 126 people, 22 fatally. The gun play has outpaced the previous six years, which averages to 73 shootings in the same time period.Contact Alonzo Small at (302) 324-2856 orasmall@delawareonline.com. Follow him on Twitter @P_AlonzoSmall.Corley Peel, ReporterMichelle Ganley, Digital Content Team Managing Editor, Graham Media GroupCorley Peel, ReporterMichelle Ganley, Digital Content Team Managing Editor, Graham Media GroupJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– Two men were arrested in a quadruple shooting that injured three people and killed another man, the Jacksonville Sheriff’s Office announced at a news conference Wednesday afternoon.Ernest Alexander, 27, and Cory Lawson, 24, are both charged with murder and three counts of aggravated battery.Theshooting took place July 25 in a wooded areabehind the Raceway convenience store on Golfair Boulevard in Northwest Jacksonville.Malcom Osborne, 24, was shot and killed, police said. It was first reported as a triple shooting, but police said Wednesday that Osborne was one of four people who were shot. The other three were injured.The Sheriff's Office said Alexander’s arrest took place Wednesday, and Lawson was taken into police custody Dec. 14.Police didn’t release a motive for the shootings.When News4Jax called Osborne's mother, Evelyn Johnson, she had not been told of the arrests. But she said the news was a relief for her family, and she felt like a huge weight had been lifted off her shoulders."I know what happened, but I don't really want to accept that it happened," Johnson said. "It's like a heaviness that nobody should ever go through."For the last five months, Johnson said she had been watching a video full of pictures of her son, praying there would be an arrest in his death before the end of the year.Her prayers were answered on Wednesday, and she said the arrests were the best Christmas gift she could have ever gotten."Justice is going to prevail for Malcolm," Johnson said. "That's all I want -- justice."Osborner's mother plans on facing Alexander and Lawson in court Thursday morning.“I have a question to ask, 'Why? You ran him down, and you shot him, in the back. He was trying to get away, you could have just let him go along," she said.Johnson said she'll keep praying that the men accused of killing her son pay the consequences.Copyright 2017 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.Reports weeknights for The Ten O'Clock News and News4Jax at 11.Michelle is the Managing Editor of Graham Media Group's Digital Content Team, which writes for all of the company's news websites.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.Filed under:One man was killed and three others were wounded in a shooting Sunday morning in the South Side Avalon Park neighborhood, police said.The men were shot about 5:15 a.m. in the 1500 block of East 82nd Street, according to Chicago Police.Lavondell C. Noble, 40, suffered gunshot wounds to the neck and right hand; and a 23-year-old was shot in the face, Chicago Police and Cook County medical examiner’s office said.They both showed up at South Shore Hospital, where they reported being shot at 5:45 a.m. in the 7900 block of South Phillips. They were later transferred to Stroger Hospital, where Noble, a South Shore neighborhood resident, died at 8:03 a.m, the medical examiner’s office said. The 23-year-old’s condition was not immediately known.The other men gave differing accounts of what happened, but police said the violence was connected, police said.A 31-year-old man told investigators he was walking on the sidewalk in the 1500 block of East 82nd Street when someone in a white sedan opened fire, striking him in the groin and back, police said. He was taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where his condition was stabilized.A 34-year-old man was shot in the left forearm and was taken to Ingalls Memorial Hospital in Harvey, where his condition was stabilized, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Johntel 'Black' Cooper charged with felonious assaultSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Johntel 'Black' Cooper charged with felonious assaultA man police said is suspected in a shooting that left five people injured earlier this month has been arrested, according to court records.crashed a car fleeing police Saturday, Cincinnati officers said.Johntel "Black" Cooper, 24, of Walnut Street in Over-The-Rhine, is being held on a $620,000 bond in the Hamilton County Jail.He is wanted in connection witha July 22 shooting at Lang and Peete streets.Five people were injured in the shooting.Cincinnati police said that he was nearly arrested Saturday in Winton Place. Officers were pursuing Cooper's car when he crashed on Winton Road, got out and ran, they said.A gun was recovered from the car, police said.Cooper is charged with nine crimes including felonious assault, failure to comply with a police officer and carrying weapons under disability.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.RICHMOND, VA (WWBT) - Five people are in the hospital after they were hit in a drive-by shooting in Richmond's east end early Wednesday morning.Police were called to the 2300 block of Bethel Street in Whitcomb Court around 2:30 a.m. When they arrived on the scene, they found five people - three males and two females - all with gun shot wounds. Two of the victims are juveniles. They were transported to VCU Medical Center with non-life-threatening injuries.The victims, who were at different homes along the street, say they were just sitting outside on their porches when someone in a dark-colored Jeep SUV came driving down the road and started shooting. The vehicle then drove away from the scene.Witnesses say one of the victims, a teenage girl, was shot in the leg."She was crying and got shot in the leg. She kept saying, 'It hurt. It hurt. It hurt. I can't feel nothing,' " said a neighbor at the scene, who asked to remain anonymous.A family friend said the girl is recovering well.A nearby van on the street could be seen with a driver's side window shattered."Everybody hit the ground. People heard people yelling and running," said one woman, who asked not to be identified.Just four days ago, a man was shot in Whitcomb Court a block over from the scene of Wednesday's drive-by. He had life-threatening injuries.This year, crime has intensified in Richmond's public housing neighborhoods, including a double shooting, leaving two teenagers dead in Mosby Court. Another deadly shooting took the life of Virginia State Police Special Agent Michael Walter.Richmond police are currently installing a shot detection system around the city, letting officers know in real time where and when gunfire breaks out.Now police are looking for that dark-colored SUV that could be a Jeep. If you have any information that can help police, call Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000.Copyright 2017 WWBTNBC12. All rights reservedReport an ErrororSubmit a Tip to NBC12Allison Norlian is a reporter for NBC12. She joined NBC12 in April of 2016. Allison's work has been nominated twice for an Emmy Award.Kelly Avellino is an anchor and reporter for NBC12 News. Kelly covers the Richmond city beat and is honored to help share the voices and stories of the many incredible people who make up RVA.5710 Midlothian TurnpikeRichmond, VA 23225(804) 230-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.ByNicole Santa CruzJuly 26, 2017Siosifa Maama, a 21-year-old Tongan man, was shot and killed Wednesday, July 19, in the 11400 block of South Broadway in the Broadway-Manchester area of South Los Angeles, according to Los Angeles County coroner’s records.Shortly before 10 p.m., between four and six people drove to a marijuana dispensary and tried to rob the store, Los Angeles Police Det. Nate Kouri said.The would-be robbers struggled with Maama, a security guard, who was shot.Two other people inside the business also were shot, Kouri said. A third person was wounded and ran away.Maama was pronounced dead at the scene at 10:10 p.m., according to coroner’s records. The other shooting victims are expected to survive their injuries, authorities said.Some of the suspects, described only as black men and possibly about 30 years old, fled on foot, while others drove away in a light-colored sedan, Kouri said.Anyone with information is asked to call detectives at (323) 786-5111. Those who wish to remain anonymous can callCrime Stoppersat (800) 222-8477.Contactthe Homicide Report. Follow@nicolesantacruzand@latimeshomicideon Twitter.------------FOR THE RECORD5:15 a.m. Aug. 5:An earlier version of this article referred to Maama as Samoan. He is Tongan.Do you have information to share about the life of 
                    Siosifa Toetuu Mooni Maama
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:I trust that LAPD will find the killers of this hardworking man.Thank you for the article. I'm sure you've been told this already but just in case you haven't Sifa is of Tongan decent.Four people, including girls ages 5 and 9, were shot Tuesday evening on Milwaukee's north side, police said.The girls, and two men, ages 20 and 40, were taken to hospitals and are expected to survive, according to a Milwaukee Police Department news release.The shooting was reported shortly after 6:30 p.m. in the 3000 block of N. 39th St., according to police, who were seeking suspects Tuesday night.No additional information was immediately available Tuesday night.Gallery: 4 teens shot in TrentonTRENTON-- The teenager shot in the head in TrentonTuesday night during a burst of gunfirethat also wounded three other teens died at a city hospital Thursday morning, officials said.Kyler Bragg was 15.He was pronounced dead at about 10 a.m. at Capital Health Regional Medical Center, where he was taken following the 9:45 p.m. shooting at Division and Hewitt streets in the city's Chambersburg section.The Mercer County Prosecutor's Office announced Bragg's identify and death Thursday afternoon, but made no other statements about the shooting, nor reported any arrests or charges in the ongoing investigation.In addition to Bragg, a 16-year-old boy was shot in the arm, another 16-year-old boy was wounded in the thigh and a 16-year-old girl was struck in the shoulder and back. They suffered non life-threatening wounds. None have been publicly identified.On Facebook Thursday afternoon, people mourned Bragg on his page, where he went by the name Ky Numbaeight.You fought a good one lil bro 😔 it's messed up you ain't make it man I really thought you was going too😓 I love you kyler sleep easy😪😇Authorities believe the four victims were together at the intersection when they were targeted because the shooter or shooters thought the teens had robbed them.Police officials have said two of the teens apparently fired back as they ran from the initial gunfire.Records show Bragg lived a few doors away from the intersection, on Division Street.Bullet casings were scattered over a large area when Trenton police officers arrived to the shooting scene on Tuesday night.Investigatorson Wednesday morningwalked among 44 yellow evidence markers dotting the street and sidewalk down to Cummings Avenue.The prosecutor's Homicide Task Force took over the investigation's lead on Wednesday with Bragg - then unidentified - in grave condition.Kevin Shea may be reached atkshea@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@kevintshea. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWATCHVIDEOS2 dead, 3 injured in South Philadelphia shootingsA 9-year-old boy was among two juveniles killed as gun violence across Chicago over the weekend left eight others dead and at least 41 people wounded.The 9-year-old was shot and killed when someone in a vehicle opened fire on the car he was riding in near midnight in the 3500 block of East 97thStreet.The boy was shot in the back and taken to Comer Children’s Hospital where he later died, according to police.A 31-year-old man was also shot in the back, face and chest, authorities said. He was taken in critical condition to Advocate Christ Medical Center."I was speaking on the phone in my house when I hear screaming, it's just screaming, screaming," said a witness at the scene. "[The man] tells everybody in front, 'They killed my son, they killed my son.'"A 17-year-old was also shot and killed in the 4500 block of West Jackson Friday night.At least eight others were killed in shootings across the city of the summer weekend.A 21-year-old man was killed on West Pershing on Friday evening, according to Chicago Police. Two more people were wounded in the shooting, as a 19-year-old was shot in the head and hand and a 22-year-old was shot in the back.A violent Friday night continued when a 26-year-old was shot and killed in the 4600 block of South Washtenaw. A silver SUV pulled up to the victim and one of the occupants opened fire, striking the man multiple times.Another man was shot and killed in the 10600 block of South Green Bay Ave. on Friday night. While exiting a vehicle, two men were shot when a white SUV drove by and an occupant fired shots at the car.A 49-year-old man was shot in the back and transported to Christ Hospital, where he was pronounced dead on Saturday. A 54-year-old man was also wounded in the shooting after being shot in the face.The violence continued on Saturday morning, as a 20-year-old man was shot and killed in the 4400 block of West Monroe. Police were called because of shots fired at the scene, and when they arrived they found the man lying in the street after suffering a gunshot wound to the head. He was pronounced dead at the scene, according to police.An attempted robbery ended in the death of a 60-year-old man on Saturday morning in the city’s East Garfield Park neighborhood. The victim was approached by an unknown assailant, who demanded money from him. A struggle ensued, and the man was shot in the left shoulder. He was taken to Mt. Sinai Hospital, where he was pronounced dead.A 58-year-old man was shot and killed in the 1100 block of West 95thStreet on Saturday afternoon. At approximately 4:15 p.m., the victim was walking when a dark-colored vehicle approached, and one of the occupants fired multiple shots. The man was shot in the mouth and torso, and was pronounced dead at the scene, according to police.Sunday morning saw two more people shot and killed, including a 31-year-old man in the 3900 block of West Arthington. He was approached by another man on a sidewalk, and he was shot in the neck by the unknown assailant, who also shot a 32-year-old man in the leg.A 23-year-old man sitting in a parked car in the 2100 block of East 71st Street was shot and killed when two men walked up to the car and fired shots. He was taken to Northwestern Hospital with gunshot wounds to his chest and his arm, and he was pronounced dead a short time later.Friday:Saturday:8Newsby:Matt ChaneyBRUNSWICK COUNTY, Va. (WRIC) — Representatives from the Brunswick County Sheriff’s Office are reporting that seven people suffered injuries in a shooting that happened early Sunday morning in Lawrenceville.The sheriff’s office received a call about the shooting at a residence in the 500 block of Sturgeon Road at around 2:30 a.m.When police arrived on the scene they determined that everyone who had been injured in the shooting left the scene prior to their arrival.Shortly thereafter, six patients arrived at Southern Virginia Regional Medical Center in Emporia and on other arrived at Community Memorial Hospital in South Hill.The seven people with injuries were identified as Anfernee Turner, 21 of Emporia, Gregory Terry, 20, of Emporia, Sadequa Gillis, 21, of Emporia, Dana Adams, 18, of Lawrenceville, Patrice Rhodes, 23, of Alberta, Ricky Johnson Jr., 23, of Emporia, and Shylice Wright, 21, of Alberta.Officials report that five of the victims have been released from the hospital, but two are still being treated.Investigators responded both to the scene of the shooting and the hospitals to collect evidence.No arrests have been made in the case.Anybody with information related to this crime should contact the Brunswick County Sheriff’s Office at (434) 848-3133 or Brunswick County Crime Solvers at (434) 848-2336.This is a developing story. Stay with 8News online and onairfor the latest updates.Never miss another Facebook post from 8NewsFind 8News onTwitter,Facebook, andInstagram; send your news tips toiReport8@wric.com.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.VICTORIA, Va. (WRIC) -- Victoria Fire and Rescue responded to a single crash early Saturday morning.The crash happened on Nottoway Blvd and the person involved was assessed but not transported to the hospital.NORFOLK, Va. (AP) — A federal grand jury has indicted four people for their roles in a scheme to use the identities of 35 Virginia prison inmates to secure more than $300,000 in pandemic-related unemployment benefits, federal authorities said Friday.Two women worked with two inmates at correctional institutions to collect information of other inmates to apply for the unemployment benefits, according to a news release from the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of Virginia. The two men who were serving time were accused of providing information for inmates where they were incarcerated, according to the news release.RICHMOND, Va. (WRIC) -- Here’s the latest coronavirus update from the Virginia Department of Health for Saturday, April 10:Virginia is getting 77,847 doses into arms each day on average, an increase of nearly 20,000 from this time last month. According to the state’s health department, 98.4% of the doses Virginia has received have been administered.WarrEDWARDSVILLE — A Florida man was indicted Thursday on multiple charges relating to a July 2017 shooting in Alton’s Oakwood Estates.Jomar M. Warr, 28, of Winter Park, Florida, was indicted on four counts of attempted first degree murder and four counts of aggravated battery with a firearm, all Class X felonies; aggravated discharge of a firearm, a Class 1 felony; and unlawful possession of weapons by a felon, a Class 2 felony.He had been previously charged, but the indictments added specific language that had not been included in the original charging documents, according to a State’s Attorney’s Office official.According to court documents, on July 8, 2017, Warr allegedly shot at and hit four separate people with the intent to kill them. At the time he had a prior conviction for aggravated assault with a deadly weapon out of Florida in 2014.The victims were shot in the hand, head, arm and back.According to affidavits filed in late July 2017 as part of an attempt to seize approximately $8,400 in suspected drug sale proceeds, Warr was fleeing when police responded at 1:32 a.m. July 8 to a report of shots fired. People told police they saw Warr and two associates flee in a white Ford Mustang and gave a license plate number.Police said the car was rented at Lambert St. Louis International Airport. People familiar with the incident told police who was involved, and they traced them to Florida.Two others were arrested at the time and charged with obstructing justice.At the time Alton police said Warr was in an argument over a dice game, just prior to the shooting.He was arrested in Florida in July 2017 and has been in custody at the Madison County Jail in lieu of $1 million bail since then.In a separate indictment handed down Thursday, Jerwane M. Alexander, 31, of St. Louis, was indicted on four counts of burglary, all Class 2 felonies; and one count of aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer.He had originally been charged in late January.According to court documents, the incidents occurred between Dec. 31 and Jan. 3.On Dec. 31 Alexander allegedly entered the Walgreens store at 2001 Madison Avenue twice to commit theft. On Jan. 1 he allegedly went to the Walgreens at 3732 Nameoki Road. And on Jan. 3 he allegedly went to the Madison Avenue Walgreens. Those incidents resulted in burglary charges.On Jan. 5 while attempting to burglarize the CVS at 3319 Nameoki Road, according to additional charges filed at the time, he also attempted to flee a Granite City police officer in a 2007 Mercury Milan at speeds more than 21 miles per hour above the posted limit.A Granite City man also has been indicted for armed robbery.Hardigrew C. Bridger Jr., 55, was indicted on a single count of armed robbery, a Class X felony. He had originally been charged Feb. 19.According to court documents, on Jan. 22 Bridger allegedly used a bludgeon to take an unspecified amount of cash from another person. Bail was set at $150,000.Other indictments handed down Thursday include:• Jason D. Wanick, 48, of Wood River, was indicted for unlawful possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine, a Class X felony. He had originally been charged March 3. On March 2 he allegedly was found in possession of 15-100 grams of methamphetamine with intent to deliver. Bail was set at $100,000.• Kevin R. Rosenthal, 50, of St. Louis, was indicted for offenses relating to motor vehicles, a Class 2 felony; and possession of stolen property, a Class 4 felony. The case was presented by the Metro East Auto Theft Task Force. On March 3 Rosenthal allegedly was found to be in possession of a stolen 2016 Dodge Journey out of Missouri; and also had possession of property stolen from Home Depot and Rural King. Bail was set at $60,000.A Columbus man has been charged in connection with the fake gender-reveal party shooting that killed one and injured eight in Colerain Township in 2017.Vandell Slade, 30, has been charged with murder, attempted murder and felonious assault, according to an indictment filed Wednesday in Hamilton County Common Pleas Court.Three other men were charged in the shooting in December.On July 8, 2017, Autum Garrett, 22, was shot and killed at a supposed gender-reveal party for Cheyanne Willis, who was 21. Colerain police eventually determined they were dealing with witnesses who had connections to more than one drug ring.More:Co-worker: Autum Garrett, killed in Colerain Township shooting, lived for her familyMore:Arrests made in mass shooting at fake Colerain gender-reveal partyWillis told the media that she lost her fetus after being shot in the thigh. But a week later, police announced Willis had admitted she had not been pregnant. Slade's charges also stem from injuries Willis suffered in the shooting.Prosecutors say Willis was the target of the shooting.According to court documents, Roshawn Bishop and another man wanted her dead and "enlisted the help of Vandell Slade."Slade produced two shooters-for-hire: James Echols and Michael Sanon, both from Columbus, officials said. Slade drove the two men to Willis' home the night of the mass shooting, the documents state."Echols and Sanon opened the screen door to the living room...and opened fire with the intent to kill everyone inside," prosecutors said.Garrett was fatally shot three times. Her husband was shot in the head and wrist, lost his eyesight in one eye and suffered brain damage. The couple's 1-year-old child was shot in the knee and arm. Their 3-year-old was shot in both his calf and his head. Both children survived.An 8-year-old was also among the victims along with Elijah Clemmons, Lori White and Morgan Bradley.Willis, the alleged target, was shot once in the left thigh.Police said the shooting wassparked by drug activity. Police also reported there were no indications the Garrett family was connected to the drug activity that sparked the shootings. It was a case of wrong place, wrong time.More:Subscribe now for unlimited access to Cincinnati.comHere are the other men charged in the shooting:There is a warrant out for Slade's arrest and he has a criminal record in the Columbus area. He was convicted of weapons charges and attempted felonious assault in 2008.Slade was implicated in the shooting of his own brother in 2017,according to Columbus Police.Slade should be considered armed and dangerous, police said. Anyone with information about where he is should call 513-321-COPS (2677).When asked if others could be charged, Colerain Township Police Chief Mark Denney said the investigation is continuing and declined to comment further.The Enquirer will update this story as more information becomes available.Lots of sunshine. High 79F. Winds W at 10 to 15 mph..Clear to partly cloudy. Low around 50F. Winds NW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:32 pmYour Star, Your WorldWhitney Downard / The Meridian StarMichael Williams, accompanied by Meridian Police Detective Kevin Boyd, enters the Meridian City courtroom Monday for his hearing related to a quadruple shooting earlier this month.A drive-by shooting near the Highway Village Apartments earlier this month was an act of gang retaliation that wounded four innocent bystanders at a birthday party, police said.During the preliminary hearing Monday in Meridian City Court for Michael Williams, 14, of Meridian, police described the events of July 6 when four men were injured in a drive-by shooting at the Wesley House's Playground for Jesus on 8th Avenue.Meridian Police Officer Anthony Ball told the court that Williams stated that Kudarrius (D. Tubbs) and Cedmondray (Lewis) picked him up and gave him a gun, telling him that they were seeking retaliation for a gunshot wound one of them had suffered earlier.A driver, who faces no charges and has not been named, drove Williams, Tubbs and Lewis to their homes for supplies, such as an AK-15 or 'Chopper' for Tubbs, according to Ball's recounting of Williams' statement.Ball, part of the Meridian Police Department's Gang Unit, said Tubbs and Lewis wanted to shoot at a crowd celebrating a birthday at the Wesley House's Playground for Jesus, where some Black Disciples (or BD for short) from a rival gang would be.The shooting, around 7:30 p.m. that Thursday, occurred with children and bystanders present, police said.Because Williams was behind the driver, he told Ball he shot over the roof and aimed into the sky, rather than shooting directly into the crowd, Ball said.Williams also told Ball that Tubbs and Lewis, while leaving, shot at a white car with three passengers as they left the scene, Ball said.After police released his photo following the incident, Williams' turned himself into police and police charged him with three counts of conspiracy, three counts of drive-by shooting and three counts of attempted murder.Williams' public defender, Joseph Denson, argued that Williams should not face conspiracy charges because, per the testimony of Williams, Williams never discussed the shooting beforehand."There were four people in the car," Denson said. "The driver had more to do with conspiring than my defendant."Conspiracy, Denson said, occurred when people agreed to commit a crime but Williams never verbally agreed.Ball disagreed."He agreed to the conspiracy when he shot out that window," Ball said.The defender also said Williams shot into the air and no evidence contradicts that claim. Because of this, Williams should not be charged with attempted murder but a lesser charge."It's not attempted murder (if he shot in the air) because there was no intent," Denson said. "It would be murder by way of recklessness."Ball said the driver had stated that, despite the driver's pushback, Tubbs and Lewis insisted and said 'No, we're going to kill someone today.' "None of the victims shot were part of the BD gang, Ball testified.Ball added that the fourth victim had not been identified to him before he filed the affidavit, hence why there were only three charges.The court disagreed with the defense's motions and charged Williams with all nine counts but reduced his bond from $270,000 to $150,000 or $20,000 for each attempted murder and drive-by shooting charge and $10,000 for each conspiracy charge.After the hearing, Williams' mother, Mary Williams, briefly spoke about previous gang encounters."Our house has been shot up 16 times. I could have been killed," Mary Williams said.Williams said she thought the Meridian Police Department should have investigated those reported shootings more seriously."We did not deserve to be targeted. It's gang activity. They target the families to continue the cycle of violence," Williams said.Tubbs, 20, and Lewis, 19, both waived their right to a preliminary hearing and accepted a bond of $270,000 last week.FOLEY, Ala. [ndash] Graveside services for Inna Belle Van-Austin, will be Saturday, April 10, 2021, at 11 a.m. in Emelle, Ala. She passed away March 26, 2021, in Foley, Ala. Arrangements by Bumpers Funeral Home of York.STARKVILLE - Sharon Dexter Henson, 76, entered the gates of Heaven on March 29, 2021, after having lost her hard battle with cancer. She is survived by her two children, Rodney Henson and wife Susu of York, Ala., Shannon Henson Morris and husband Mike Mathews of Prosper, Texas; three grandch…PACHUTA [ndash] Arrangements were incomplete at Berry & Gardner Funeral Home for Mr. Jerry Robinson, 85, of Pachuta, who died Wednesday, April 7, 2021, at Rush Foundation Hospital, Meridian.Born Jan. 24, 1974, Meridian Miss. and died April 5, 2021, Meridian Miss. She is survived by Richard Anthony Reede; her son, Rick Austin Reede; her sister, April Gower Hardin (Jason) of Atlanta; brother, Van Gower of Hattiesburg. Miss., Lisa Reede Covington, Mrs. Angela Reede Daniels (Dale) …Sorry, there are no recent results for popular videos.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up now to get our FREE breaking news coverage delivered right to your inbox.First Amendment:Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.Adrienne Cutway, Web EditorAdrienne Cutway, Web EditorPINE CASTLE, Fla.– An 11-year-old girl was grazed by a bullet and three other people were shot at a July Fourth party in Pine Castle Tuesday afternoon, according to the Orange County Sheriff's Office.The girl's injury was minor.Deputies said partygoers were inside and outside a home on Lancaster Road around 1:38 p.m. when gunfire erupted outside. A 35-year-old man at the scene was founded conscious and alert, but wounded, according to a news release.He was taken to Orlando Regional Medical Center. A short time later, a 15-year-old boy and 19-year-old man arrived at ORMC with gunshot wounds. Both victims had been at the party and were taken to the hospital in a private vehicle, deputies said.The 15-year-old suffered a minor injury. Both men are in serious condition with non-life-threatening injuries, according to the news release.Deputies said several of the witnesses were "unruly and uncooperative" and one of the men who was shot refused to provide authorities with his name. Officials believe two people had guns.Deputies described the shooting as stemming from from a domestic incident. No suspects are at large.Check back with News 6 for more on this developing story.Copyright 2017 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Adrienne joined News 6's digital team in October 2016 to cover breaking news, crime and community interest stories. She graduated from the University of Central Florida and began her journalism career at the Orlando Sentinel.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.MenuThe Oakland County Sheriff's Office says a man has been arrested and charged for a quadruple shooting in Pontiac that left one person dead last week.According to police, the shooting happened around 4 a.m. Monday, July 3, in the 50 block of Thorpe.Marcus Burkett, 23, was shot and killed, while a 17-year-old woman, 17-year-old man and 19-year-old man were also shot. They are expected to be OK.Police arrested 19-year-old William Nelson, who was also shot in the incident. He was charged with open murder, two counts of possession of a firearm in the commission of a felony and assault with intent to murder.Nelson was arraigned Saturday and held in jail with no bond.NewsGallery: 4 shot in Jersey CityJERSEY CITY- A teenage boywho was among four people shoton Wilkinson Avenue Sunday night remains hospitalized this morning in stable condition, officials said.The four victims, two juveniles and two adults, all suffered injuries that were not considered life-threatening on Wilkinson Avenue at about 9 p.m., city spokeswoman Jennifer Morrill said.The youngest victim, a 12-year-old boy, was shot in the back while two 18-year-olds suffered gunshot wounds to their arm and shoulder. A 16-year-old victim was shot in the back and stomach and remains hospitalized, Morrill said.Sources say the 16-year-old was rushed into surgery Sunday night.A tense scene played out on the block between Ocean Avenue and Martin Luther King Drive late Sunday night. Residents say the sounds of the gunshot mixed with fireworks that were being set off. Some estimated hearing about five shots fired."This is sad, this has gotta stop," one woman said.Another woman began screaming and cursing at police when they were wrapping up their investigation outside of her home just before 11 p.m.On Monday morning, residents were sweeping up crime scene tape that was left behind while a police van was parked at the spot of the quadruple shooting.No one has been arrested and the shooting remains under investigation. No one answered the door where the 12-year-old boy lives.Caitlin Mota may be reached atcmota@jjournal.com. Follow her on Twitter@caitlin_mota. FindThe Jersey Journal on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWSPA 7Newsby:Kim KimzeyGREENWOOD, S.C. (WSPA) — Police say a man turned himself in after a shooting outside a Greenwood bar and grill sent four people to the hospital.Christopher Longshore Jr., 22, has been charged with four counts of attempted murder and possession of a weapon during the commission of a violent crime, according to police.Longshore turned himself in on Monday.Officers responded to a shooting around 2:05 a.m. July 2 at the Rajn Rooster on Highway 72 Bypass NE.Investigators say a group of people got into an argument outside the bar and it escalated into gunfire.Police found two women and two men with injuries.The four victims were transported to the hospital and have since been released, police say.Longshore is in the Greenwood County jail.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.MYRTLE BEACH, SC (WBTW) - A man who was shot at Donny's Saloon in Myrtle beach has died from his injures, according to the coroner, and four people have been charged with obstructing justice.Jas’sier Wilson, 26, of Surfside Beach, died on April 2 at Grand Strand Regional Medical Center of injuries related to the shooting. He was shot on March 25 at the saloon on 3rd Ave. S. at about 10:55 p.m., according to police.(KTVX) -- Millions of vaccine shots have been given across the U.S., and as that number grows, there is the potential for researchers to learn more about how the vaccine affects people's health.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is currently tracking any side effects of receiving the vaccine through a tool called v-safe.Watch a replay of the service in the player above.MANHEIM, Pa. (WBTW) -- A Celebration of Life was held Friday for Julie Eberly, a Pennsylvania mother of six who was killed in a road rage shooting on I-95.Please purchase a subscription to read our premium content. If you have a subscription, please log in or sign up for an account on our website to continue.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Occasional light rain. High 63F. Winds SSE at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 90%..Partly cloudy skies this evening. Increasing clouds with periods of showers late. Low 46F. Winds SSE at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 50%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:50 pmFour people were treated at local hospitals after an early Saturday morning shooting at SS Friendly Mart in Pembroke Township.Kankakee County sheriff's deputies responded to the convenience shop — located at County Road 2727 S 13000E — after hearing multiple gunshots about 2:10 a.m. They noticed people fleeing the area upon arrival. Deputies impounded a car that had multiple gunshots.Later that morning, four people went to Riverside Medical Center and Presence St. Mary's Hospital with graze and bullet fragment wounds. They were all treated and released.Chief Deputy Ken McCabe, of the Kankakee County Sheriff's Office, said nobody has cooperated with the investigation so far."We didn't even get a call from the people at the shop," McCabe said. "Had our guys not heard those gunshots, we wouldn't have found out about this until people showed up at the hospitals."Those with information are asked to contact the Kankakee County Sheriff's Office at 815-802-7100. Anonymous tips also can be left by calling Crime Stoppers at 815-932-7463.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.NEWARK — A shooting in New Jersey's largest city has left two men dead and two others wounded.Essex County prosecutors say the shooting occurred Saturday night at a site near Lincoln Park in Newark.Paterson:Man killed in stabbing; N.Y. man under arrestBronx Lebanon Hospital shooting:Ex-doctor sought to extract revenge on former colleagues at Bronx hospitalThey say one man was pronounced dead at the scene, while another died a short time later at a hospital. Those 26-year-old victims were identified Sunday as Niger Farrell, of East Orange, and Darnell Holmes, of Newark.Two other East Orange men, ages 25 and 28, were wounded in the shooting. Authorities say their injuries are not considered life-threatening, but further details were not released.Further details on the shooting were not disclosed, including what type of weapon may have been used. No arrests have been made.A motive for the shooting remains under investigation.Trending:OAKLAND — Three men and a woman were shot in East Oakland Saturday night, police said.At about 8 p.m., bullets hit victims at different places within a short distance on the 2300 block of Humboldt Avenue, about five blocks from the intersection of 35th Avenue and Foothill Boulevard.Two of the wounded were shot outside an apartment complex, another was parked in a car and the fourth person was struck by a round that went inside a home.All four victims were taken to hospitals in stable condition.No arrests were made. Police said the gunman approached from nearby Lynde Street.One man who lives near the shooting thought at first he heard the start of July 4th fireworks.“But it was at least more than 10 gunshots,” he said.Check back for updates.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersThanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByTina Moore,Kevin SheehanandGina DaidoneSubmitJuly 2, 2017|6:28pm|UpdatedJuly 14, 2017 | 10:07amA doctorshot by Bronx hospital madman Henry Bellotook a bullet to his wrist — and at one point, it was feared that he might not be able to continue practicing medicine, a friend told The Post on Sunday.But victim Dr. Hassan Tariq, 32, an attending physician at Bronx-Lebanon Medical Center, had surgery and “can move his fingers — and that’s the most important thing,’’ said the co-worker pal, Dr. Rafeeq Ahmed.“The orthopedic surgeon has not given her final diagnosis, but it does not look like this will prevent him from being a doctor,” Ahmed said.Ahmed said he doesn’t believe that Tariq was being targeted specifically.“[Tariq] does not know the man who shot him. I do not know him, either,” Ahmed said.Several other victims of Bello’s bloodbathalso were identified by law-enforcement and hospital sources.They include: a stand-out former Canadian college student, Dr. Justin Timperio, 29, who was shot in the chest; Dr. James Matthew, who was shot in the knee but may have hurt his head when he fell and is currently in the neurological surgery unit at Mt. Sinai, and Dr. Oluwafunmike Ojewoye, who is from Baltimore and specializes in health-care disparities involving minorities.Timperio is also an accomplished photographer who posted candid street shots, architectural photos, and portraits to his Flickr account.At Bronx Lebanon on Sunday, Ojewoye’s relatives said she is resting comfortably and still shocked about the shooting.Dr. Tracy Sin-Yee Tam, 32,was shot dead, and a sixth victim was a patient who has not been identified.Colleagues left flowers outside the Tam’s family’s Queens home Sunday, and her father was seen embracing a neighbor before returning to his own home.Tam was “well-loved, well-respected” and “always covering others shifts, always helping out someone whenever she could,” said Shailee Udani, 42, who attended Touro College with Tam and was a resident at Palisades Medical Center alongside the woman three years ago.A GoFundMe for Tamhas raised more than $13,000.Additional reporting by CJ SullivanRead NextElderly man kills home invader during fightShare SelectionThis story has been shared 140,664 times.140,664This story has been shared 68,091 times.68,091This story has been shared 64,418 times.64,418© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal Information(CBS) —Five people were shot Tuesday night in the South Austin neighborhood on the West Side.At 8:48 p.m., a male walked up to five people in the 200 block of South Lotus, opened fire and ran away, according to Chicago Police.An 16-year-old boy was shot in the knee, a 19-year-old woman suffered gunshot wounds to the back and arm and a 20-year-old woman was shot in the arm, police said. They were taken to Stroger Hospital.Also, a 39-year-old woman was shot in the leg and an 18-year-old man was shot in the leg, police said. They were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital.All five victims were in serious condition, police said.About a dozen residents milled outside crime scene tape blocking off Lotus between Adams and Quincy. Detectives shone flashlights outside a convenience store.A woman trying to walk home flagged down an officer as the crime scene blocked her path.“We just had five people shot and there are shell casings everywhere,” the officer said. “You’ll have to walk around.”A man who identified himself only as William, a former resident of the neighborhood who has since moved to the western suburbs, said that the stretch of Lotus south of Madison is a busy drug market throughout the week.Acquaintances told him the shooting stemmed from a dispute over money.“Cars line up and down this street every day with people looking to score,” he said.(Source: Sun-Times Media Wire © Chicago Sun-Times 2017. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.)Twenty-nine shots were fired and four people were wounded late Sunday night in Southeast Washington. No one was killed.The incident happened just before midnight Sunday in the 5900 block of Southern Avenue SE near East Capitol Street SE.One person was shot in the chest and another was shot in the arm, according to a police report. A third person was shot in the hand and wrist. Another victim, police said, drove himself to a hospital after being shot in the leg.They were all treated at hospitals for their injuries.A Shot Spotter device picked up the sound of 29 shots that were fired along Southern Avenue.Witnesses were not able to give descriptions of the suspects, according to D.C. police. Several buildings and cars in the area were also damaged.ST. LOUIS• A North County teen was killed and three others were injured when someone opened fire on them in St. Louis Sunday afternoon, police said.Officers were called to a reported shooting in an alley behind the 5000 block of Thekla Avenuejust after 4 p.m. Sunday. They found Antonio Straughter, 16, dead from a gunshot wound.Another boy, 14, was found with a shot to the side. He was taken to a hospital in critical but stable condition. Two others, 16 and 15, suffered minor graze wounds.Police say a male got out of a vehicle and fired shots at the teens as they walked in the area. Authorities did not release a description of the shooter or vehicle.Antonio lived in the 2400 block of Wharton Court, near the Missouri River north of Florissant.Antonio Maurice Straughter was shot to death in an alley near Thekla Avenue on Sunday, June 15, 2017. Photo courtesy CrimeStoppersShake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A shooting in Fort Lauderdale claimed the life of one person and left four others injured early Saturday morning, police say.According to Fort Lauderdale Police Department spokesperson Tracy Figone, the shooting occurred at 2335 NW 16th Court around 1:15 a.m.When officers arrived, they discovered that five males had been shot. The four men who were injured were transported to Broward Health Medical Center for non-life threatening injuries. One man was pronounced dead on scene.Fort Lauderdale detectives identified the man who was killed as 22-year-old Jerrod Bel Air.Police identified the three adults wounded as Tony Harden, 27, Tevin Dean, 22, and Christopher Smith, 24. Officials have not identified the 16-year-old male who was also injured.Investigators say the victims were attending a large block party in the neighborhood when an unknown suspect or suspects starting shooting into the crowd of people.Detectives are encouraging anyone who was at or near the incident to please contact police at 954-828-5534.A Queens teenager visiting his aunt in Harlem heard the chilling words "It's time to get lit" before bullets suddenly pierced his right thigh and right foot.The 19-year-old told cops he didn't know what was happening until he was on the ground bleeding.Two women, ages 21 and 25, strolled through a huge crowd toward a barbecue in Morningside Park before a gunman sprayed half-a-dozen bullets, sending hundreds of people running for their lives. The younger woman was hit in the left foot; the other woman was hit in the right thigh.In all, seven people were wounded in three separate shootings within an hour in a two-block area near 116th St. and Manhattan Ave. in Harlem on the night of June 24.Thoughthe shootingsdid not happen in the park itself, they have thrown a chill into what has been a renaissance of the storied 122-year-old greensward — which stretches from 110th to 123rd Sts. and was once known as one of the most dangerous in the country.Back in 1992, thousands of crack vials and syringes littered the park, and locals feared going in there at night. Today, the park is an idyllic place with strollers, packed playgrounds and kids playing hoops. There's even a pond packed with turtles and its own waterfall."It's a beautiful moment for the city that folks have returned to these parks," said City Councilman Bill Perkins, who lives in the area. "It's the first time in a long time that I've seen any beef. This broke the paradise and brought us back to the bad old days. The gun situation is out of hand. There's too much weaponry out there."Perkins said he looked out his window and saw a sliver of the aftermath of one of the shootings."It's scary that that is already taking place and the season is still young," he said. "That's a wound to the community that resonates throughout the neighborhood."Victoria Michaelek, 65, said the shootings shook her up, but won't make her change her patterns."I was worried at the time, but we'll still come to the park during the daytime, just not after dark. This is still our park," she said.John Smith, 47, a 14-year resident of the neighborhood, said it's just part of living in New York."This is New York City, there's crime everywhere," he said. "It's unfortunate that we had shots go off here, but before that, crime here hasn't been that bad. So my family and I aren't any more concerned."The shootings appear to have stemmed from fights that started in the aftermath of several barbeques in the park, including the eighth annual "Dear Summer" party, which attracted more than 1,000 people.An organizer of the Dear Summer event, Shareef Moore, said he had a proper permit, as he has had in every year of the event, and paid the $250 clean up fee required by the city."This event has never been associated with any violence and has always been to promote putting an end to violence by bringing people together through love," he said. "Our crowd typically consists of college graduates and young professionals, some who work in politics, law enforcement, finance etc. Our actual BBQ ended at 8:45 p.m. at which time people began to disperse from the Park. There were two other BBQs in the same vicinity to ours which ended around the same time. These shootings occurred two and three hours after our event ended.""The shootings didn't take place in the park, but certainly the fact that there was a huge gathering in the park and it wasn't dispersed earlier in the day could be a factor," said Brad Taylor of the nonprofit Friends of Morningside Park.Gunfire first erupted at 114th St. and Manhattan Ave. just outside the park after two men fought over a woman at 10:37 p.m., sources said. Cops were already in the area at the time monitoring the gathering.Five people were hit, including the two young women. The three other people hit included two gang members, sources said. One of the victims was shot in the wrist and a second was shot in the right foot and midsection.Then, an hour later, about 11:35 p.m. bullets struck a 23-year-old man from Hackensack, N.J., right after he chatted with a young woman near W. 116th St. and Frederick Douglass Blvd.He told cops a man in a black baseball cap and a white T-shirt walked up and pulled a gun. The victim took off and ran north and almost made it to 118th St. when he was shot in the right buttocks and right arm.Ten minutes later, near W. 114th St. and Adam Clayton Powell Blvd., a 19-year-old Queens man visiting family heard someone say, "It's time to get lit!" He heard gunshots next. He ran west on W. 114th St. as bullets slammed into his thigh and right foot.In a period where shootings citywide are at historic lows, the number of shooting victims through June 25 in the 28th Precinct is up to 13 compared with seven in the same period in 2016.During a community meeting Thursday, Deputy Inspector Chris McIntosh of the 28th Precinct told members of the Harlem community that detectives have identified several people they want to speak with about Saturday's shootings.One cop at the meeting said the size of the crowd took police by surprise."It was just unexpected," Officer Nerys Ramirez said. "To have 20 or 25 officers trying to safely get hundreds of people out of the park, it's too much."The precinct plans to increase patrols for the July 4 holiday and throughout the summer. McIntosh said four extra cars will be on patrol on Independence Day to prevent violence and the use of illegal fireworks.On Friday night, the NYPD stationed a mobile command post at W. 116th St. and Morningside Ave. It remained there throughout the weekend. A floodlight was also set up at the cookout area near that intersection. At least six vehicles were seen in the park Saturday night.WILLINGBORO – A weekend house party in Willingboro took a violent turn when gunfire erupted, injuring four teenagers.It was one of two shooting incidents in an 18-hour period in the township.None of the injuries was life-threatening, according to detectives, who did not announce any arrests.Police said they found dozens of teens leaving a large house party on Pastoral Lane around 12:10 a.m. Saturday after gunshots were fired.A dispute between two groups at the party spilled into the street, where the gunfire occurred, witnesses told police.More:Olga's sign will outlive landmark dinerMore:Willingboro man slain in Maple Shade shootingMore:Charge: First a piggyback ride, then murderMore:Christie praises new Burlington County prosecutorPolice found no injured people at the scene, but four victims later showed up at area hospitals.A 19-year-old Burlington City boy with a gunshot wound to his leg went to Lourdes Medical Center of Burlington County in Willingboro.Two other victims, an 18-year-old Willingboro man who was shot in the thigh and a 15-year-old Willingboro boy with gunshot wounds in the hand and leg, sought treatment at Virtua Memorial Hospital in Mount Holly.A fourth victim showed up several hours later, around 11:30 a.m., at the Lourdes emergency room. The 18-year-old Irvington man told police he was intoxicated when the gunshots rang out and did not realize until later that he’d suffered graze wounds to his leg and ankle.Later that evening, Willingboro police responded to a drive-by shooting.A 25-year-old Elizabeth man was sitting in his car on Hillcrest Lane about 6 p.m. when another vehicle pulled up and someone fired two gunshots at him, shattering his windows, police said. The shooter then drove away.Police said the victim suffered injuries from the glass and possibly a graze wound, but did not require hospitalization.Detectives ask anyone with information about the shootings to call (609) 877-3001 or the Citizen Tip Hotline at (609) 877-6958.Burlington County Prosecutor Scott Coffina said he has urged the Willingboro Police Department to use resources available through his recently launched Enough is Enough Safes Streets Initiative. The effort helps local departments obtain additional manpower in "pre-planned operations aimed at preventing or responding to gun crimes and related criminal activity," the prosecutor said.“It is my understanding that the Willingboro Township Council soon will consider a resolution that would allow the police department to take advantage of this program, which provides additional officers for short-term operations at no additional cost,” Coffina said. “I encourage the council to grant approval for this measure, and look forward to receiving a proposed operation from the Police Department to address street-level violence and the shootings that continue to occur in Willingboro.”Police in standoff with suspect after double shooting in Old North St. Louis. (Credit: KMOV)Police at the scene of a double shooting in Old North St. Louis on Sunday, June 18, 2017 (Credit: KMOV)Police in standoff with suspect after double shooting in Old North St. Louis. (Credit: KMOV)Police at the scene of a double shooting in Old North St. Louis on Sunday, June 18, 2017 (Credit: KMOV)ST. LOUIS (AP) -- A St. Louis woman critically wounded in a mass shooting in June has died from her injuries.Police say 42-year-old Twona Parson died Wednesday, six weeks after she was among four people shot by Marlo Boyd, who fatally shot himself in the head after police arrived.The shooting happened June 18 in an apartment. Police have not disclosed a motive but say the gunman and victims were connected.Officers called to the scene found a 15-year-old girl and 39-year-old woman both critically injured. Officers then heard gunshots and a SWAT team was called in.Once police were able to enter the apartment they found 18-year-old Deanna Williams and Boyd dead, and Parson critically injured.Parson, Williams and Boyd all lived in the apartment.Please subscribe to access more content.To continue viewing the content you love, please sign in or create a new accountWe use cookies and other tracking technologies to improve your browsing experience on our site, show personalized content and targeted ads, analyze site traffic, and understand where our audiences come from. To learn more or opt-out, read ourCookie Policy. Please also read ourPrivacy NoticeandTerms of Use, which became effective December 20, 2019.By choosingI Accept, you consent to our use of cookies and other tracking technologies.Four people were shot early Sunday in the Humboldt Park neighborhood on the West Side.They were standing on the sidewalk shortly after 2 a.m. in the 3300 block of West Crystal when two people shot them from a nearby street corner and ran away, according to Chicago Police.A 25-year-old man was shot in the right shoulder and taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition stabilized, police said.Two 26-year-old women and a 27-year-old man were taken to Saints Mary and Elizabeth Medical Center, where their conditions were stabilized, police said. One of the women was shot in the right leg, and the other was shot in the left shoulder. The man was shot in the chest.Privacy Notice/Terms of Use© 2021 Chicago Sun-TimesPlease subscribe to access more content.To continue viewing the content you love, please sign in or create a new accountWe use cookies and other tracking technologies to improve your browsing experience on our site, show personalized content and targeted ads, analyze site traffic, and understand where our audiences come from. To learn more or opt-out, read ourCookie Policy. Please also read ourPrivacy NoticeandTerms of Use, which became effective December 20, 2019.By choosingI Accept, you consent to our use of cookies and other tracking technologies.Four people were wounded, two critically, Saturday afternoon in a West Side shooting in the Austin neighborhood.They were shot at 4:36 p.m. in the first block of North Latrobe, according to Chicago Police.A 21-year-old man was shot in the chest, police said. He was taken to Loretto Hospital in critical condition.A woman, 20, was taken to Stroger Hospital in critical condition with gunshot wounds to the back and chest, according to police.Two other men, ages 22 and 24, were both shot in the leg and also taken to Stroger, where their conditions were stabilized, police said.More details about the shooting weren’t immediately available.Privacy Notice/Terms of Use© 2021 Chicago Sun-TimesColumbus Police have identified the five victims after a fatal shooting inside Delfin Night Life Nightclub.Police say it happened around 12:30 Saturday morning at 6252 Busch Boulevard in the Continent.Two people were transported to Riverside Hospital in critical condition.According to Columbus Police, Domineek Sharp, 21 died from a gunshot wound. The other four people were injured by gunshot wounds: Quisaiah Davis, 23; William Campbell, 24; Dejon Lockett 23; and a 17-year-old who was not identified.Columbus Police say there could be more than one shooter, but no other suspect information is available at this time..@ColumbusPolicesay they are dealing with multiple locations with evidence.@10TVpic.twitter.com/zZUptYpX7mStay with 10TV and 10TV.com for updates on this story.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.RICHMOND, VA (WWBT) - A homicide suspect is behind bars after seeing himself on an NBC12 segment.Ty'Quan Greene was featured inNBC12's Fugitive Friday slideshow. He is wanted in connection to a quadruple shooting that left one person dead.Richmond Police say the 20-year-old suspect turned himself in to the Richmond City Justice Center on Wednesday. He is currently charged with six counts of shooting from a motor vehicle in public.Police say the shooting happened on June 15 of last year. Officers responded to the 4100 block of Old Brook Road around 7:27 p.m. and found four victims. One of the victims - 18-year-old Jacquesha Clanton - died at the hospital. The other victims were treated for non-life threatening injuries.Anyone with information about the shooting should call Crime Stoppers at 780-1000.Copyright 2018WWBTNBC12. All rights reserved.Report an ErrororSubmit a Tip to NBC125710 Midlothian TurnpikeRichmond, VA 23225(804) 230-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Please purchase a subscription to read our premium content. If you have a subscription, please log in or sign up for an account on our website to continue.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.To continue access through your current subscription, click the get started button, and enter the 5 digit pin you were provided.To continue access through your print subscription, click the get started button, and enter the 5 digit pin you were provided.Unlimited access to the Taos News website for a full year!  Plan includes access to our e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.Unlimited access to the Taos News website for 30 days.  Plan includes access to our e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.Unlimited access to the Taos News website for 30 days.  Plan includes access to our e-edition print replica online.  This is a one-time purchase.  Your subscription will not renew.We offer home delivery of the Taos News in selected areas within Taos.Click Here to See if you Qualify(Shaded area on map only).  (this subscription option includes unlimited digital access).  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News delivered to your Taos County address every week for a full year! We offer our lowest mail rates to zip codes in the county.Click Here to See if you Qualify.Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online. Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News delivered to your Taos County address every week for 26 weeks! We offer our lowest mail rates to zip codes in the county.Click Here to See if you Qualify.Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online. Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your New Mexico state residence every week for a full year!  For readers who live in New Mexico but outside of Taos County.  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your New Mexico state residence every week for 26 weeks!  For readers who live in New Mexico but outside of Taos County.  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your New Mexico state residence every week for 13 weeks!  For readers who live in New Mexico but outside of Taos County.  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your out of state residence every week for a full year!  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your out of state residence every week for 26 weeks!  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.The Taos News mailed to your out of state residence every week for 13 weeks!  Plan includes unlimited website access and e-edition print replica online.  Your auto pay plan will be conveniently renewed at the end of the subscription period. You may cancel at anytime.You'll receive FIVE of our top national magazines, including Discover Taos Winter Edition, Discover Taos Summer Edition, Taos Gallery Guide, Fall Festivals, and Best of Taos, delivered to your home address anywhere in the US for the special low rate of $55.In addition, you'll receive access for a full year to all content on TaosNews.com, including the e-edition digital replica, and a weekly digest of what's happening in arts and entertainment in Taos!Sunny. High near 65F. Winds W at 15 to 25 mph..Clear skies. Low around 30F. SW winds at 10 to 20 mph, decreasing to less than 5 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 12:48 pmAssistant EditorDamian Herrera has been cleared by the New Mexico Behavioral Health Institute to stand trial in two murder cases filed for a 2017 shooting spree that killed five.Jesse Moya/Taos NewsUpdated Jan. 16 at 4:20 p.m.State mental health experts have found an Ojo Caliente man charged with killing three of his family members and two strangers in 2017 competent, according to the district attorney in Taos.Eighth Judicial District Attorney Marcus Montoya said judges presiding over two cases filed for the alleged murders will make the final call regarding whether Damian Herrera is prepared to stand trial.Montoya's prosecutors are pursuing a first-degree homicide case in the death of Michael Alan Kyte of Tres Piedras. Kyte was one of two men investigators believe Damian Herrera slayed at random after he allegedly shot and killed his mother, stepfather and brother at his family's home in La Madera on June 15, 2017.Charges connected to the murders of Herrera's family and Manuel Serrano, another stranger Herrera is accused of killing at a gas station in Abiquiú the day of the killing spree, are being prosecuted separately by a team of state attorneys in New Mexico's 1st Judicial District.Questions regarding Herrera's mental health were raised in the immediate aftermath of the shootings by two of Herrera's surviving sisters, who said their brother had told them he heard voices. Last summer, Herrera was sent to the state hospital in Las Vegas after the courts deemed him "incompetent," or mentally incapable, to stand trial.On Wednesday (Jan. 15), Montoya said the New Mexico Behavioral Health Institute released its final report, declaring Herrera competent.The state and defense attorneys in either case will argue whether Herrera is ready for trial.Assistant EditorLog InAll comment authors MUST use their real names. Posts that
cannot be ascribed to a real personwill not be moderated.Keep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.FOX 2by:Joe MillitzerST. LOUIS — The FBI is looking for more information about the man accused of shooting at a congressional baseball practice in Virginia Wednesday morning.   If you have any information concerning James Hodgkinson, 66, please contact the FBI’s Washington, D.C. Field Office at 202-278-2000 or visittips.fbi.gov. They say that no amount of information is too small to include in their investigation.   The accused shooter was killed during a shootout with police.Investigators say that Hodgkinson has been living out of his car in Alexandria since March of this year.   His vehicle was found on the scene of the shooting.  They believe that he has been living out of his car on East Monroe street in Alexandria.  They are also soliciting tips from people who may have encountered him then or during his travels/Police have searched his home in Belleville. They are currently speaking to people who know the accused shooter in Illinois.The Belleville News Democrat reports thatHodgkinson was told to stop shooting in the woods near his home just a few months ago.  Neighbors called police on the afternoon of March 24th after they heard 50 shots fired into pine trees.  Police told him to stop shooting even though he has a valid firearms owner ID.The St. Clair County prosecutor says Hodgkinson has an arrest record. It is not very extensive. He was involved a shoving match.  The 2006 case was dismissed after the alleged victim didn’t show up for the court hearing.  In 2011 he was also involved in a traffic accident.FOX 2 interviewed Hodgkinson in 2011 during an “Occupy”protest at Kiener Plaza in downtown St. Louis.“The 99 percent are getting pushed around and the one percent don’t give a damn.  So, we got to speak up for the whole country,” said Hodgkinson.Rep. Steve Scalise, a congressional staffer and members of the Capitol police force were shot Wednesday in Alexandria, Virginia, during Republicans’ early-morning practice ahead of a charity baseball game.At least six people including Scalise, the third ranking member of House Republican leadership as the majority whip, were hospitalized.Scalise was in critical condition after surgery, according to So Young Pak, spokeswoman for MedStar Washington Hospital Center. Scalise is out of his first surgery, according to a Scalise aide. It is not clear if he will have a second surgery. His wife Jennifer and their two young children are traveling up from New Orleans to Washington now to be with him.A congressional staffer, Zach Barth, was also shot in the leg and has since been released from the hospital. Matt Mika, a lobbyist for Tyson Foods and former staffer, was also identified as one of the victims. He was out of surgery and in critical condition as of Wednesday afternoon, according to a statement from his family.House Speaker Paul Ryan also identified two members of the Capitol Police who were injured, Crystal Griner and David Bailey. In a statement, Capitol Police said Griner was in “good condition in the hospital having been shot in the ankle,” and that Bailey “was treated and released having sustained a minor injury during the incident.”Rep. Roger Williams, a Texas Republican, was also hospitalized and released with an injury to his ankle.As of Wednesday afternoon, Mika was in surgery and in critical condition, according to a statement from his family.Lawmakers who were there described a chaotic scene, with many members of the congressional GOP baseball team huddled in a dugout while Capitol police who were part of Scalise’s security detail and local Alexandria police engaged in a shoot-out with Hodgkinson. Congressional and law enforcement sources described it as a “deliberate attack.”Traces are still being done on the two firearms recovered at the scene — an SKS rifle 7.62 (which is a Chinese-made AK variant) and a .9 mm pistol, a law enforcement source tells CNN.Later, House Republican and Democratic leaders called for unity and praised the police, while Trump in an address from the White House said that the prayers of the nation and world are with Scalise.“Congressman Scalise is a friend, and a very good friend,” Trump said. “He’s a patriot. And he’s a fighter. He will recover from this assault — and Steve, I want you to know that you have the prayers not only of the entire city behind you, but of an entire nation, and frankly the entire world. America is praying for you and America is praying for all of the victims of this terrible shooting.”Ryan condemned the shooting and praised the Capitol police on the House floor later Wednesday.“We are united. We are united in our shock. We are united in our anguish. An attack on one of us is an attack on all of us,” Ryan said, drawing a bipartisan standing ovation.Members practicing for traditional baseball gameMembers of Congress were practicing for a game that was scheduled for Thursday night at Nationals Park. Rep. Martha McSally, R-Arizona, said the game will still go on as scheduled. The annual game has been played since 1909, and McSally said lawmakers applauded the announcement at an all-members meeting.Rep. Joe Barton, who manages the Republican team, said at a news conference that the game has added the Fallen Officers Fund as a charity it’s sponsoring.Rep. Mike Doyle, who manages the Democratic team, said at the same conference that they would like to host the entire Republican team at the Democratic club for dinner to reflect Wednesday night. “Some of them have probably never set foot in that building,” he joked.Lawmakers describe a terrifying sceneLawmakers who spoke at the scene to reporters described a normal morning practice, at a field where they’ve practiced for years, when suddenly shots rang out. Lawmakers, staff members and even the young son of one of the members ran for cover, jumping into dugouts and over fences to avoid the gunshots.Members described Scalise dragging himself roughly 15 yards away from second base, where he had been playing, and lying there until the shooter was neutralized, at which point some of them ran to assist him and apply pressure to the wound until he could be evacuated. Once they were able, Sen. Jeff Flake said he and Rep. Brad Wenstrup, who is a physician, went to where Scalise was lying to apply pressure to the wound. Scalise was coherent the whole time, Flake said.Kentucky Sen. Rand Paul told CNN “it would have been a massacre” without the Capitol Hill Police officers present.“Nobody would have survived without the Capitol Hill police,” Paul said on CNN. “It would have been a massacre without them.”“We had nothing but baseball bats to fight back against a rifle with,” Alabama Rep. Mo Brooks said.Flake added that he saw a member of Scalise’s security detail return fire on the gunman for what felt like 10 minutes, even though the police officer was wounded in the leg.“Fifty (shots) would be an understatement, I’m quite sure,” Flake said when asked about the total amount of gunfire, including police returning fire.Brooks said the shooter was behind the third base dugout and didn’t say anything.“The gun was a semiautomatic,” Brooks said, adding that he was sure it was a rifle but unsure what kind. “It continued to fire at different people. You can imagine, all the people on the field scatter.”Shooter identifiedHodgkinson’s Facebook page is largely political, his profile picture is a caricature of Bernie Sanders as Uncle Sam.The Facebook feed is filled with anti-Trump sentiments such as “Trump is guilty and should go to prison for treason.”He also “liked” a political cartoon that suggested Scalise should be fired. On March 22, he posted “Trump is a Traitor. Trump Has Destroyed Our Democracy. It’s Time to Destroy Trump & Co.”Vermont Sen. Bernie Sanders said both in a statement and on the Senate floor that he had learned the shooter volunteered on his presidential campaign — and that he condemned the shooting “in the strongest possible terms.”“I have just been informed that the alleged shooter at the Republican baseball practice is someone who apparently volunteered on my presidential campaign,” Sanders said.“I am sickened by this despicable act. Let me be as clear as I can be. Violence of any kind is unacceptable in our society and I condemn this action in the strongest possible terms,” he said. “Real change can only come about through nonviolent action, and anything else runs against our most deeply held American values.”Capitol Hill increases security, cancels eventsThe news of the shooting reverberated on Capitol Hill, where security was increased and regular proceedings were canceled or postponed.He also said he’d seen an image of members of the Democratic congressional baseball team huddled in prayer after learning of the shooting.“Every day we come here to test and to challenge each other. We feel so deeply about the things that we fight for and the things that we believe in. At times, our emotions can clearly get the best of us. We are all imperfect. But we do not shed our humanity when we enter this chamber. For all the noise and all the fury, we are one family,” Ryan said.The House decided to not hold any votes on legislation Wednesday, and many hearings were delayed. The House Natural Resources Federal Lands Subcommittee also canceled a scheduled meeting to debate gun legislation.Capitol Hill Police notified congressional offices that the security presence on the Hill would be increased “out of an abundance of caution.”Members of Congress targeted in the past by violenceScalise is the first member of Congress to be shot since former Arizona Rep. Gabby Giffords in January 2011. Giffords was shot in the head by Jared Lee Loughner at a “Congress On Your Corner” event at a Tucson grocery store. Giffords, who authorities said was the main target of the shooting, survived the attack but six others were killed and an additional 12 were injured.Loughner pleaded guilty in 2012 and was sentenced to life in prison without the possibility of parole.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.Fox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Darren SweeneyCANTON, Ohio — Police in Canton are trying to figure out who fired the shots that sent four people to the hospital.Police were called to the intersection of 14th St. NE and Gibbs Ave. NE just before 10 p.m. Wednesday for reports of shots fired.When they arrived, they learned that four people had been shot, police said in a news release.All four victims had been driven to the hospital by private vehicle to be treated for injuries that were believed to be non-life threatening.Davonte Baker, 22, Armani Sharpe, 19, and a 17-year-old were all treated and released.Tre’Juan Johnson, Jr., 19, remained in the hospital early Thursday morning.Canton Police were asking anyone with information to call the Detective Bureau at (330)489-3144 or to text CANTON and your tip to 847411.SubmitCOLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.Sign InSign InThe Star EditionCHANGE LOCATIONThis copy is for your personal non-commercial use only. To order
    presentation-ready copies of Toronto Star content for distribution
    to colleagues, clients or customers, or inquire about
    permissions/licensing, please go to:www.TorontoStarReprints.comSAN FRANCISCO—A San Francisco UPS driver who killed three colleagues in a shooting rampage at a company warehouse was armed with two stolen guns and appeared to target his victims, police said Friday.Police Commander Greg McEachern told a news conference that investigators have not yet determined Jimmy Lam’s motive, but “the shooting appeared purposeful and targeted.”Lam, 38, shot and killed three fellow drivers and wounded two others before killing himself in front of police in the June 14 shooting. An 18-year veteran of UPS, Lam opened fire at a morning meeting of UPS drivers before the drivers went out on deliveries.Read more:‘I can’t understand why this happened’: Survivor recounts San Francisco UPS shootingLam began by shooting Benson Louie, 50, in the meeting before turning the gun on Wayne Chan, 56, McEachern said. He then walked outside and confronted Mike Lefiti, 46, and fatally shot him multiple times.Lam didn’t say anything during the rampage, McEachern said.Lam was armed with two stolen weapons. One was an assault pistol that is illegal in California and was stolen in Utah, which he used in the killings, McEachern said. Lam also had a semi-automatic handgun stolen from Napa County, California.It was not known who stole the weapons, McEachern said.A San Francisco Police Department official told The Associated Press last week that Lam appears to have felt disrespected by co-workers, but it’s not clear what role that played in the shooting.“We are going to work painstakingly to try to get a motive,” McEachern said.Friends and colleagues have said that Lam struggled with personal issues and was depressed a few years ago. They said Lam had shown improvement, but he started to look troubled a few weeks ago. That was around the time Lam filed a grievance in March claiming he was working excessive overtimeInvestigators have recovered a journal from Lam’s home and are reviewing it, along with his computer, he said.Copyright owned or licensed by Toronto Star Newspapers Limited. All
    rights reserved. Republication or distribution of this content is
    expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Toronto
    Star Newspapers Limited and/or its licensors. To order copies of
    Toronto Star articles, please go to:www.TorontoStarReprints.comAfter six people were killed and two others wounded in a spate of shootings in Baltimore Monday night into Tuesday morning, Police Commissioner Kevin Davis announced a week-long initiative to deploy more officers on the streets.Effective immediately, all patrol officers and detectives will be required to work 12-hour shifts, rather than their standard 10-hour shifts, and every sworn officer in the department capable of being deployed will be on the street, Davis said Tuesday afternoon."There will be a visible, overt presence," he said.Less than an hour after his announcement, officers were called to the scene of a quadruple shooting in the 3300 block of Ayrdale Avenue in Northwest Baltimore, where four men — ages 19, 20, 23 and 55 — were wounded, police said.There were so many shell casings on the scene that detectives appeared to run out of evidence markers to flag them all, using bits of trash instead.Hayward Lewis, 57, said he was standing outside the Pro Kutz barbershop when he heard the gunfire and "hit the deck."He still had blood on his white T-shirt from a friend who was shot in the leg and who he said begged him not to leave as they waited for an ambulance."It's sad," Lewis said of the violence as he ate an egg custard snowball. "Just sad."Davis called the latest violence — in a record-setting year for it — "unconscionable," and said he joined community members in being "pissed off" about it."We're just as angry and frustrated and ticked off about it as anyone else watching, and I expect people to be upset," Davis said. "I expect people to want a better Baltimore, to want a sense of peace and tranquility that when they leave their home, or go to their car, or go to the store, or go to work or walk in the neighborhood, that they don't have to put up with this crap."We get that and we understand that and we're going to keep fighting our way through this...," he said. "We are responsible for public safety in the city of Baltimore, and we're going to keep working our hearts out until we get to a safer and better place. You can trust me on that."Davis said the causes of the violence are both systemic, with roots in socioeconomic disparities, and petty, related to street disputes.Most recently, he said, a seizure of 45 kilograms of heroin and fentanyl by the Drug Enforcement Administration had "unanticipated consequences" by "drying up a drug market" and sparking turf battles in West Baltimore.Some of the shootings were retaliatory, he said. He said police believe younger Black Guerrilla Family and Bloods gang members are "vicious killers who don't give a damn about adhering to any pre-existing code of conduct that existed in their criminal enterprises" in previous generations.Manysee the city in crisiswith some saying the problems with drugs and the associated violence in Baltimore are not new, and criticizing Davis for not having a cohesive crime plan. Some also have questioned whether outside scrutiny of the department, including under the consent decree with the U.S. Department of Justice, has contributed to a soft-on-crime approach in the city.Davis said he does have a plan, which is being implemented, and that police reforms and crime reductions can be achieved if other partners in the criminal justice system — from prosecutors to judges to lawmakers in Annapolis — join police to do more to combat the gun violence.Currently, he said, gun offenders in Baltimore "do not fear an arrest, they do not fear a successful prosecution, and, quite frankly, they don't even fear a damn guilty verdict" because they often get off lightly.Davis said police have tracked all gun convictions since the beginning of 2016, and 60 percent of those offenders received suspended sentences. Because people don't fear consequences, they carry guns everywhere and wind up using them to settle "petty B.S. disputes," he said.Davis previously lobbied, unsuccessfully, for misdemeanor illegal possession of a firearm to be made a felony, and he said he will return to Annapolis to talk to lawmakers again to "hopefully wake them up" to the need for the change.Baltimore State's Attorney Marilyn J. Mosby declined to comment through a spokeswoman. A spokeswoman for the Maryland judiciary, representing judges in Baltimore, did not respond to a request for comment.Del. Curt Anderson, a Baltimore Democrat and chair of the city's House delegation, said he and other city legislators acknowledge the need for harsher penalties for illegal gun possession and have supported Davis' efforts to change the law, but "the problem with the bill in the past is that creating a felony for the possession of a gun doesn't resonate with folks in the rural counties of Maryland as well as some of the suburban counties of Maryland."State Sen. Robert A. Zirkin, a Baltimore County Democrat who chairs the Judicial Proceedings Committee, could not be reached for comment. He's previously said Davis' proposed legislation is "not the answer."Davis said he is in "constant contact" with Mayor Catherine Pugh about the violence. He said the enhanced deployments, similar to those seen during past spikes in city violence, would be effective through this weekend, at which point he and his top commanders would review the strategy.Police could not provide a cost for the deployments immediately. The department already struggles with excess spending on overtime — in the tens of millions of dollars every year — and has said it does not have enough officers to fill patrol shifts.Meanwhile, the city is experiencing a record level of violence. Including the six killings between Monday night and Tuesday morning, there have been 159 homicides in 2017.The first victim was found in a car around 8:20 p.m. Monday in the 1100 block of Mount Holly Street in the Edmondson Village neighborhood. The man was taken to University of Maryland Shock Trauma Center, where he died. Police said they did not know his identity and had no motive in his killing.About 8:35 p.m., officers located 28-year-old Rodney Wheatley with gunshot wounds to the back and arm in the 200 block of S. Bentalou Street in the Millhill neighborhood of Southwest Baltimore, where he lived. He was transported to Maryland Shock Trauma Center, where he died.Police said Wheatley had been arguing with a suspect before being shot, and that a "person of interest" in the shooting has been identified. Davis said detectives believe the dispute was drug related.About 10:35 p.m. Monday, officers found 37-year-old Charmane Wilson with gunshot wounds in the 1700 block of Gertrude Street in West Baltimore. Wilson was pronounced dead at a local hospital.Officers had responded to the same block about an hour before for a report of a common assault, police said. The shooting occurred after they left, police said. Wilson lived on the block.Davis said her shooting was related to a "neighborhood dispute involving bullying."About 2:45 a.m. Tuesday, officers responded to the 2500 block of Boston Street in Canton for a report of an injured person and found a male victim shot and bleeding from the forehead, police said. The victim was transported to an area hospital, where he was pronounced dead, police said.About 3:30 a.m., officers located four shooting victims in the 1200 block of Bonaparte Avenue, in the East Baltimore Midway neighborhood, police said.All of the victims were transported to a local hospital, where a 26-year-old man and a 21-year-old woman were both pronounced dead, police said. A 24-year-old man is listed in critical condition, police said, while another male victim was treated and released.Davis said police had determined a "drug and gang nexus" in the shooting.After Tuesday's quadruple shooting on Ayrdale Avenue in Forest Park, Lewis Bush, 51, rode up on a bright green bicycle to survey the scene."Unbelievable," he said, after asking who'd been shot.Bush said kids these days have "no morals," and don't know how to fight without using guns like people did in the past. But then he lifted his shirt to show off scars on his stomach and back, from shootings he'd survived several decades ago."By the grace of god," he said, "I'm still here."Anyone with information is asked to call homicide detectives at 410-396-2100, text a tip to police at 443-902-4824 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7-LOCK-UP.krector@baltsun.comtwitter.com/rectorsunRecommendedCharmaine Wilson, 37, called police Monday night. One of her sons had been bullied and his bike seat was stolen. Another confronted the people he believed were responsible, and was assaulted.Officers responded and took a report. Right after they left, Wilson — a mother of eight — was approached by an unknown suspect and shot to death."It's a petty dispute that's resolved with gun violence," Police Commissioner Kevin Davis said Wednesday morning.Mayor Catherine Pugh, who appeared with Davis at City Hall to discuss recent violence in the city, said such incidents "pique people's fears, because they think they can't get engaged in the process of trying to help us reduce crime.""We want to protect anybody who wants to come forward," she said. "We don't want this to happen to anybody who wants to step up and help us reduce the violence that's happening in the city."About four hours after Wilson was killed in West Baltimore, Sebastian Dvorak, 27, was shot to death on Boston Street in Canton.Police spokesman T.J. Smith said Wednesday the shooting appears to have occurred during a robbery. Investigators believe there might be more than one suspect. They released surveillance video featuring persons of interest.Dvorak was a bartender at several Ryleigh's Oyster locations, including in Mount Vernon and Hunt Valley. Brian McComas, the chain's owner, said Dvorak was meant to work on Tuesday afternoon but never showed up for his shift.His killing was "hitting the Ryleigh's family pretty hard," McComas said."It just shows you that this kind of stuff is far-reaching and is reaching epic proportions," McComas said. "It's just out of control."Dvorak's family could not be reached for comment Wednesday.Dvorak and Wilson were two of six people killed in Baltimore between Monday night and Tuesday afternoon. Twelve people were shot in that span.Police said officers were called to a local hospital about 1:31 a.m. Wednesday and located another victim: a 25-year-old man who had been shot in the arm.Police said he was "being highly evasive and refusing to cooperate with investigators," so they did not know where the shooting had occurred.There have been 159 homicides in Baltimore in 2017 — a historic pace.Davis on Tuesday said he would send every sworn officer in the department capable of being deployed out onto the streets for a week. Patrol officers and detectives are to work 12-hour shifts instead of the standard 10-hour shifts.Police on Wednesday identified other victims from the recent spate of violence.A man who was shot to death in his car in the 1100 block of Mount Holly St. in Edmondson Village about 8:20 p.m. Monday was identified as Marco Stevenson, 22, of the 4300 block of Cedar Garden Road. Police have said they have no motive in the killing.A man and woman who were shot to death in a quadruple shooting in the 1200 block of Bonaparte Ave. in East Baltimore Midway about 3:30 a.m. Tuesday were identified as Antonio Griffin, 26, of the same block, and Tereze Pinkney, 22, of the 4800 block of Bowland Ave.The two other victims in the shooting survived. Davis said police had determined a "drug and gang nexus" in the shooting, but did not elaborate.Police previously identified Rodney Wheatley, 28, as the man shot to death about 8:35 p.m. Monday in the 200 block of S. Bentalou St. in the Millhill neighborhood of Southwest Baltimore. Police said they believe Wheatley was engaged in a drug dispute with a suspect. They said they had identified a person of interest in the shooting.Police had also previously identified Wilson, the mother who was shot about 10:35 p.m. Monday in the 1700 block of Gertrude St. in West Baltimore.Wilson lived on the block. Her family could not be reached for comment Wednesday.Officers were back on the block Wednesday afternoon knocking on doors and looking for tips that could lead them to the people responsible for Wilson's death.A woman who identified herself as Wilson's daughter shouted at the officers as they walked the block, accusing them of only pretending to care after not being there for her mother when she needed them. She said she held her mother in her arms as she died."Nobody was here when I was holding my mother. Nobody. She took her last breath. None of these police officers was here," the woman said.Smith said the officers who took Wilson's report Monday night were still in the area investigating the alleged assault of her son — checking cameras at a convenience store around the corner — when she was shot.He called the shooting "reckless and egregious," and said it "should outrage the entire community, the entire city."Smith also said it should not stop citizens from providing tips to the police."We can't allow this to discourage us. That's what those bad guys want. They want to be able to run the streets and do whatever they want and think that nobody's going to call" the police, Smith said. "We need the community to continue to call."He said the crime's brazenness "underscores the reason why we should collectively band together to make sure that [criminals] can't operate with absolute impunity."The Housing Authority of Baltimore City confirmed it also was "looking into this tragic situation," but could not release any additional information. The family lives in The Dukeland, a public housing development on Gertrude Street.Davis said the officer who responded to Wilson's call did his job properly.The "appropriate focus" was arresting the person responsible for "the brazen and callous act of killing this woman," he said. "And that's what we're going to do."Davis again blamed the violence in the city in part on what he says are Maryland's lax gun possession laws."It's a petty dispute that's resolved with gun violence because [the shooter] has access to a firearm, because he chooses to arm himself and in a society and a state that doesn't view the illegal possession of a firearm as a serious crime," he said.Police on Tuesday released data from gun cases in the city since January 2016 that showed that 60 percent of the defendants found guilty had more than half of their sentence suspended. The department said individuals out on a suspended sentence or on probation for a gun arrest often re-offend.Pugh said officials are "not taking this seriously at the court level enough in terms of the sentences."She said Baltimore and surrounding jurisdictions are prepared to go to Annapolis together next year to push for a change in the law.Pugh and Davis backed a bill this year that would have imposed a minimum one-year sentence, which could not be suspended, for repeat gun offenders. Anthony McCarthy, a spokesman for Pugh, said she doesn't think a first illegal gun posession offense should be a felony, but that subsequent gun arrests should.Any change would not go into effect until summer 2018.McComas, the Ryleigh's owner, said Dvorak was "a young guy with a lot of life ahead of him," and a hard worker.Officers who responded to the 2500 block of Boston St. about 2:45 a.m. Tuesday found Dvorak shot and bleeding from the forehead, police said."You could call on him to come in and cover a shift and he'd walk in and be happy to do it," McComas said. "He was one of the good guys. Responsible. Pitched in all the time.""He was just a fun, happy, young guy with lots of life ahead of him," McComas said. "That just got stolen."Police asked anyone with information to call homicide detectives at 410-396-2100, text a tip to 443-902-4824 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7-LOCK-UP.krector@baltsun.comtwitter.com/rectorsunRecommendedFiled under:While his friend was bleeding from a gunshot wound in his passenger seat, Quentin Robeson said he went 60 mph down Douglas Boulevard and didn’t stop at any red lights as he sped to Mount Sinai Hospital early Sunday.“All I could think was, ‘hurry,'” said 34-year-old Robeson.His friend was one of nine people shot about 3:15 a.m. near Christiana and Douglas, according to Chicago Police. They were gathered in the 3300 block of West Douglas when a black vehicle approached and people inside fired shots.A 17-year-old boy was shot in the buttocks, another 17-year-old boy was shot in the hand, a 22-year-old man was shot in the ankle, a 23-year-old man was shot in the back, a 29-year-old man was shot in the hip, a 30-year-old man was shot in the lower leg, a 33-year-old woman was shot in the leg and a 35-year-old man was shot in the leg, police said. All eight victims were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where their conditions were stabilized.A ninth victim, a 26-year-old man, was shot in the leg and taken to Rush Oak Park Hospital, where his condition was stabilized.A police source said several of the victims are documented gang members and the shooting appears to be gang-related.At least 30 shell casings could be seen in the street and on the sidewalk at the intersection in the Lawndale neighborhood on the Southwest Side.The mass shooting happened while between 30 and 50 people were gathered on the block, listening to music and drinking, according to Robeson, who lives in Calumet City and has two daughters, ages 3 and 5.He was standing just outside his 2007 Chrysler 300 talking to his cousin, 23-year-old Vic Tetter, when dozens of shots rang out, he said. Both men “hit the ground.”That’s when his 23-year-old friend, who was sitting in the front passenger seat of his car, yelled, ‘I’m hit!’ Robeson then jumped in the driver’s seat and sped away.Tetter also jumped in the vehicle, ripping off his white t-shirt and applying pressure to their friend’s gunshot wound.“I just tried to keep him calm,” said Tetter, who has a 4-month-old daughter and lives in Lansing.Tetter added that Robeson got to Sinai in less than 3 minutes. The pair stood outside the hospital early Sunday, adding that their friend was in surgery. Robeson’s car, one of four vehicles that sped to the hospital after the shooting, could be seen with a bullet hole in the back window. Crime scene tape roped off the four cars just outside the hospital’s emergency entrance.GalleryRobeson and Tetter had driven from the suburbs into the city to get food from Hody’s Grill near Cicero and Roosevelt, where Robeson’s father works. They stopped by the gathering on Douglas for “only 10 minutes” to see another one of Robeson’s cousins, who was not injured in the shooting.“We were just having a nice time,” said Robeson, who suffered a laceration to his face but was not hospitalized. “I guess we were in the wrong place to be having a nice time.”The 23-year-old victim’s brother, who asked not to be identified, was sitting in the back seat of Robeson’s vehicle when the shots rang out. He ducked and was not injured, although a bullet flew “right past” his head.“This is just the city we live in — the world we live in,” said the brother, who stood outside the hospital with Robeson and Tetter, among more than a dozen other people.At the crime scene, a 33-year-old woman sat on the curb just outside the police tape, holding her head in her hands. She was sitting inside her white 2014 Nissan Altima listening to music when the gunfire erupted. She was not struck, but her car was riddled with bullet holes and at least one window shattered.She said her friend, who was standing in the street at the time, was shot and taken from the scene via ambulance.“I just want to go see my friend, but I can’t get my car,” said the woman, who asked not to be named. She didn’t want to leave her vehicle with no window at the corner of Douglas and Christiana.“This is f–cking sickening,” she said. “You can’t even enjoy yourself in this city anymore.”Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.WATCHVIDEOS3 teens, 1 child shot at apartment complex in N. Harris Co.A 16-year-old girl was shot in the face while three other teens were hit by bullets after a fight.WREG.comby:Nina HarrelsonMEMPHIS, Tenn. — Shots rang out in the middle of a party at a Memphis apartment complex Saturday night, sending four people to the hospital.It happened at the East Street Apartments, just yards away from the MPD Crump police precinct.Police say one of those victims, an 18-year-old man, is now fighting for his life.Frank Ford describes what happened outside his door as complete chaos.He says he was inside listening to music around 10 p.m. when he heard what he thought were fireworks.“Boom, boom, boom, boom, boom, boom, boom, boom!” he said. “Everybody’s running, hiding, ducking and stuff.”He says he heard about seven gunshots and then saw four people lying on the ground.One man was screaming for help.Police say at least three of those people had been shot: an 18-year-old man, a 24-year-old man and a 20-year-old woman.The fourth victim was already on her way to the hospital when police arrived, so it’s unclear whether she was shot or injured during the confusion.Investigators say it all started over a party.A man inside the apartment where it happened was hesitant to go on camera Sunday morning, but he told WREG a man he didn’t even know started shooting at people after being turned away.“These kids. They fight, they have to go get a gun now,” Ford said. “When we were coming up, we didn’t have to go get no gun. We fight, we’re friends. The generation now, you whoop me, I go get a gun. It’s crazy.”Ford – who has lived here for about six years – tells us he’s not used to dodging bullets in his own apartment, right across the street from the police station.“This part here, we’ve never had nothing like that ever happen,” he said.His advice for kids – put the guns down.“Let’s do something other than start battling,” he said. “Put your mind to something else. What they’re doing is only causing more problems.”So far, police haven’t named a suspect or given a description of the gunman.If you know anything that could help, call Crime Stoppers at 528-CASH.SubmitMISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.(NEXSTAR) – Pfizer and BioNTech requested Friday that the U.S. Food and Drug Administration grant emergency use approval to start administering the COVID-19 vaccine to children ages 12 to 15.The companies said in a news release that they plan to request the same authorization – which could help children return to classrooms sooner – from other regulatory authorities around the world this week.Two were killed and five others were hospitalized after a shooting in Fort Worth late Friday night.A witness, Ethel Love, reported hearing dozens of shots from multiple guns on Davis Avenue, near New York Avenue in Fort Worth, close to I-35W.Gunfire in this area is "a regular thing," said Love. "I've been staying on Davis street since 1972 and seven people have passed away and I'm just... really tired of it."The latest news from around North Texas.The deceased have since been identified as Ramsez Hall and Shemeka Rodriguez - the daughter of East Fort Worth Neighborhood Coalition President Melinda Hamilton.Two of the injured were taken by ambulance, and the other three taken by private vehicles, to nearby hospitals early Saturday morning.Fort Worth's gang units were on scene investigating, but the cause of the shooting is still unclear and the department is urging anyone with more information to contact them.This story will be updated as more details are released.Spenser Heaps, Deseret NewsThis archived news story is available only for your personal, non-commercial use. Information in the story may be outdated or superseded by additional information. Reading or replaying the story in its archived form does not constitute a republication of the story.SANDY — Social media posts from the gunman who killed a mother and her 6-year-old son and also shot two other children reveal that he made threats toward the woman for keeping their relationship a secret.In private Instagram posts in the two days leading up to the violent shootings Tuesday near a Sandy elementary school, Jeremy Patterson, 32, wrote that the woman, who was no longer dating him, had hidden their relationship and attempted to "control" him after they broke up.In a caption for a meme posted on the day of the shootings showing a grinning child who won't reveal a secret, Patterson wrote:"How can you love someone so much and keep you such a secret?? After 6 months, I never met her friends, family or kids!!! I don't think anyone deserves to be kept a secret. I love Memorez Rackley and she's never been a secret in my life!"Another post, written Monday, includes a picture of a character from the "Saw" horror films, with the words "Let the games begin." In his caption, Patterson wrote: "My ex thinks she can control even when we aren't together!!!!" followed by an expletive and the words, "Let the games begin … " with another expletive.Police are considering the social media posts as they work to piece together details of what led up to the devastating shootings.Sandy Police Sgt. James Nielsen said Wednesday that Patterson had some kind of a relationship with Rackley, but he was not the father of any of her children. Sandy police were contacted about another incident involving Patterson over the weekend.At 2:34 a.m. on Saturday, Rackley called police to report that Patterson was harassing her by telephone, according to Nielsen. At Rackley's request, police talked to Patterson and asked him to stop contacting her. The sergeant declined to provide more information about that incident.Three days later, Patterson shot Rackley, her 6-year-old son Jase, her 11-year-old son Myles, and an 8-year-old girl who were all heading home from school. Patterson then shot and killed himself. Rackley and her kindergartener son died at the scene. The other two children were hospitalized.Neilsen called the deadly attack rare for the Sandy neighborhood."It's tragic in every aspect you could possibly look at," Nielsen said. "There's nothing good that has come out or will come out of this case."Rackley, 39, was walking home with her two youngest boys from schoolTuesday, joining many other parents and students heading home from classes at Brookwood Elementary School. Though her home was only about a block away, neighbors said Patterson did something to frighten Rackley to the point that she flagged down a driver for help."(Rackley) comes running over to (the driver) saying, 'This man's stalking me, can you help me? Can you give me a ride?" said Kathy Peterson, who lives near the scene of the shootings.The driver told Peterson that moments after Rackley and her sons climbed into her SUV, Patterson arrived and rammed the SUV with his truck near the corner of Alta Canyon Drive (8645 South) and Snowville Drive (2230 East), immobilizing the vehicle.Police say he then jumped out and opened fire.Terrified, the driver — who the Rackley family would come to call the "good Samaritan" — and three children she had been taking home with her ran to Peterson's home, pounding on the door."I ran to the door and there's these three little girls, one of them is covered in blood, and this woman is hysterical," Peterson recalled. "The woman was screaming, 'He's going to kill us all!'"As she hurried them inside, Peterson said she began praying and felt a calm feeling come over the group."They were just so scared," she said. "They wanted to be in the safest place. We went into my kitchen where there's a high window. They didn't want to be anywhere near windows. They really thought that man was going to come kill them all."In Peterson's house, it was discovered the driver's 8-year-old girl had also been shot. When EMTs arrived to take her and her mother to a hospital, Peterson said the other two girls from the driver's carpool stayed hidden in her home with her for more than an hour. To comfort the girls, Peterson said she gave the children teddy bears and said prayers with them.The shootings sent the quiet Sandy neighborhood into chaos, with other parents and children scrambling for cover and strangers rushing to take them in.Emily Loveland's 10-year-old son was walking home from school when he called to tell his mom something was happening. As she went out to meet him, Loveland said she realized there had been a shooting and began hurrying nearby children and some parents into her home.Moments later, a friend arrived with her own children and another group she had piled into the back of her SUV before rushing to the nearest home she knew."I bet we had 15 kids in there," Loveland said. "We just got them inside, locked the doors — tried to, you know, get a show on and get them a treat and try and get them all calmed down until we could get ahold of their parents."Once the scene was cleared, Loveland said she and her friend took the children along a back road to meet their parents back at the school."I think it's a motherly instinct and you kind of forget about your own safety and you just want to make sure that your children and everyone else's children are somewhere safe," Loveland said. "I feel very strongly that anyone would have done the same thing for my child."Police said Myles remained hospitalized in critical condition Wednesday but had stabilized. According to neighbors, the 8-year-old girl was released from the hospital Wednesday.Though Patterson is dead and no suspects remain in the case, Nielsen said detectives will thoroughly investigate the shooting, in part to answer questions and give closure to the Rackley family and the family of the good Samaritan."We will go through everything and finalize every detail and get the families the answers as soon as we can, but we're not going to make it fast. It's going to take a little time because we need to make sure we get it right," Nielsen said.A search of Utah State Court records shows no prior criminal history or protective orders against Patterson.In a brief statement released Wednesday, the Rackley family spoke of both their grief following the shootings and appreciation for those who helped them in the chaos afterward."Our family is heartbroken by the events of yesterday. We are focusing on supporting our injured son in his recovery," the statement says. "We are grateful to the good Samaritan that stopped to help our family, and our thoughts are also with their daughter who was injured. At this time we appreciate the prayers of so many."The family also said those wishing to contribute to memorials for the mother and her young son may do so through the Rackley Memorial Fund at Mountain America Credit Union.Additionally, aGoFundMe campaign*established late Tuesday had raised more than $19,000 by Wednesday night.Help for people in abusive relationships can be found by contacting the YWCA's Women in Jeopardy program at 801-537-8600, or the statewide Domestic Violence Hotline at 800-897-LINK (5465).Contributing:Ladd Egan*KSL.com does not assure that the monies deposited to the account will be applied for the benefit of the persons named as beneficiaries. If you are considering a deposit to the account, you should consult your own advisors and otherwise proceed at your own risk.Editor's note:This story has been updated to correct Myles Rackley's age as 11 years old, per family members.Emilee Speck, Digital journalistEmilee Speck, Digital journalistORANGE COUNTY, Fla.– The man who shot and killed five of his former Fiamma Inc. coworkers before turning the gun on himself was legally intoxicated, according to an autopsy report from the Orange County Medical Examiner’s Office.John Neumann Jr.,a 45-year-old Army veteran, walked into the Orange County business on Forsyth Road the morning of June 5 opening fire on his former manager and coworkers.Robert Snyder, 69, Brenda Motanez-Crespo, 44, Kevin Clark, 53, Jeffrey Roberts, 57, and Kevin Lawson, 46, were all killed. Read more about the victimshere.Snyder, the lead manager at Fiamma, fired Neumann from the Orange County RV accessory business in April, deputies said. Snyder warned others of thegunman's behavior prior to the shooting.Neumann died of a self-inflicted gunshot wound to the head, chief medical examiner Dr. Joshua Stephany concluded in his report.The toxicology report also shows that Neumann had an alcohol concentration of .085, measured by the ethanol, or drinking alcohol, found when the autopsy was performed the day he died.The legal definition of intoxication, under Florida law, is .08 or above for drivers. However, Stephany pointed out that there is no legal limit for walking around.Toxicology experts said that because of processes that happen postmortem blood-alcohol concentration can vary."By the progress of decomposing, your body produces alcohol though fermentation," Stephany said.The changes in a body's alcohol levels are vary less the less time between death and an autopsy. Neumann's autopsy was compete within hours after his suicide.That is why the when the medical examiner's officer performs an autopsy they extract blood and eye fluid for a ethanol test, where there is less room for error.The investigation into the shooting in ongoing, according to the Orange County Sheriff's Office.Copyright 2017 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Emilee is a digital journalist for News 6 and ClickOrlando.com, where she writes about space and Central Florida news. Previously, Emilee was a space writer and web editor for the Orlando Sentinel and a producer at the Naples Daily News.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.ST. LOUIS• Prosecutors on Thursday charged a Greendale man in Saturday's shooting deaths of two people at a St. Louis gas station.Ollie Lynch Jr., 25, of the 2200 block of Atwater Avenue in the small north St. Louis County city ofGreendale, was charged with two counts of first-degree murder, three counts of first-degree assault, unlawful use of a weapon and six counts of armed criminal action.Jalen Woods, 17, and Amber Green, 25, were inside a car with three other people refueling at a station on Union Boulevard whentwo masked men approached and opened fireabout 12:50 a.m., police said. Lynch and another gunman used an assault rifle and a 9mm pistol to fire at the Dodge Avenger in which the five people sat.The gas station is at Union Boulevard and  Theodosia Avenue.The people in the car tried to flee, and crashed into an air dispensing machine, where police found the victims, police said.Green was pronounced dead at the scene. Woods was pronounced dead at a hospital.Police initially said a third person had died and a fourth was taken to a hospital in critical condition, but on Monday said that two men from the car, ages 23 and 18, were at a hospital in critical but stable condition.A fifth person from the car, a 25-year-old woman, suffered a scrape on her foot and was treated at the scene.A judge ordered Lynch held without bail.Ollie Lynch, of Greendale in North County, was charged June 8 with murdering two people at a gas station in St. Louis.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Joel Currier is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch. Follow him on Twitter here: @joelcurrier.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.New Orleans police are seeking a man who investigators believe has information about aJune 3 shootingin Mid-City that left three people dead and two others wounded.Dianta Tropez, 23, is not considered a suspect at the time, but is wanted for questioning, according to an NOPD news release Wednesday (Sept. 6).On Saturday, June 3 about 12:40 a.m., an estimated 200 people were at a party held at the Mid-City Event Center at 3717 Tulane Ave. when shots were fired outside, striking five people.Zachary Nelson, 21, Aaron Melton, 24, were found dead at the scene, and Larry King, 25, was brought to the hospital where he later died. Two other people were also wounded.The shooting occurred in the same block where three people were killed and two others were wounded by gunfire inOctober.Surveillance videofrom a nearby business captured the moments after the June quintuple shooting. The video shows crowds of people running away from the scene.Anyone with information about Tropez' whereabouts is asked to call NOPD Homicide Det. Jamaane Roy at 504-658-5300 or Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?ByNicole Santa CruzJune 21, 2017Duane Travon O'Steen, a 40-year-old black man, was shot and killed Friday, June 2 in the 200 block of West 89th Street in Broadway-Manchester, according to Los Angeles County coroner's records.About 9:45 p.m., O'Steen was standing in front of a home with other people who were gathered to celebrate a birthday, said Los Angeles Police Det. Dave Garrido.A sedan traveling eastbound on West 89th Street drove by the home, and a person inside began firing at the group, Garrido said.O'Steen along with three others -- two women and a man -- were wounded. O'Steen was taken to a hospital, where he was pronounced dead at 10:56 p.m., according to coroner's records.The other three victims were treated for their injuries and are expected to survive.Detectives believe the shooting may be related to an ongoing gang fued in the area, Garrido said.Anyone with information is asked to call detectives at (323) 786-5111. Those who wish to remain anonymous can callCrime Stoppersat (800) 222-8477.Contactthe Homicide Report. Follow@nicolesantacruzand@latimeshomicideon Twitter.Do you have information to share about the life of 
                    Duane Travon O'Steen
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:The Laredo Police Department analyzes the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers on June 2, 2017.The Laredo Police Department analyzes the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers on June 2, 2017.The Laredo Police Department analyzes the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers on June 2, 2017.The Laredo Police Department analyzes the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers on June 2, 2017.Laredo Police Department officers guard the scene where an LPD officer was treated for his injuries following a shootout with a homicide suspect outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson and Hillside roads.Local and state law enforcement and Fire Department personnel responded to the scene of a shootout between a homicide suspect and Laredo police officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson and Hillside roads.Local and state law enforcement and Fire Department personnel responded to the scene of a shootout between a homicide suspect and Laredo police officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson and Hillside roads.Laredo police investigators survey the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson Road and Hillside Road.Laredo police investigators survey the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson Road and Hillside Road.Laredo police investigators survey the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson Road and Hillside Road.Laredo Police Department spokesman Joe Baeza addresses members of the media as investigators survey the scene of a fatal shootout between a homicide suspect and LPD officers outside a Valero gas station Friday, June 2, 2017, at the corner of McPherson Road and Hillside Road.The Laredo Police Department announced at about 4:30 p.m. Friday that Antonio Gerardo Rodriguez, pictured, was wanted for questioning in connection with a homicide.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.Laredo police found a woman fatally shot Friday morning after conducting a welfare concern check in the 400 block of East Travis Street. Police said they wanted to question her boyfriend in connection with the slaying. Officers later encountered him at a convenience store. The man allegedly opened fire on the officers. He was killed while three officers were wounded.A man wanted for questioning in connection with a homicide was killed and three Laredo police officers were wounded Friday in a shootout, according to LPD.Police said Antonio Gerardo Rodriguez exchanged gunfire with the officers in the parking lot of a Stripes convenience store located at McPherson and Hillside roads.EMS crews took the three officers and Rodriguez to local hospitals. Rodriguez was pronounced dead shortly thereafter. The officers' conditions are unknown."We ask the community for prayers for the officers and their families," said Investigator Joe Baeza, LPD spokesman.Police said in a public advisory issued at about 4:20 p.m. Friday that they were attempting to locate Rodriguez in connection with the slaying of his girlfriend."Mr. Rodriguez is considered armed and dangerous," police said in the advisory.At about 5 p.m., officers saw a vehicle matching the description of the one driven by Rodriguez. It was parked outside the Stripes. Police said Rodriguez opened fire on the officers as they approached the vehicle. The officers returned fire."It was intense," Baeza said of the shootout.LPD said it had been searching for Rodriguez after his girlfriend, Reyna Gonzalez Zamora, 50, was found dead at about 11:15 a.m. Friday. Her body was found when LPD conducted a welfare concern check at her apartment in the 400 block of East Travis Street.She had been shot once in her upper torso, police said. Gonzalez was pronounced dead at the scene.UPDATEDat 3 p.m. Monday with additional details from court records.ST. LOUIS •A man charged in a brazen quadruple-shooting that critically injured a 7-year-old girl and killed her parents and another man turned himself in to police over the weekend.The St. Louis Circuit Attorney's Office issued at-large warrants Friday for Jerome Leon Buress Jr., 28, of the 4900 block of Alcott Avenue in St. Louis. He turned himself in to police on Sunday, police said. He was being held without bail.He is charged with three counts of first-degree murder in theJune 2 shooting deaths of Derrick Irving, 27, Jessica Garth, 24, and Julian Hayes, 37. Irving and Garth's 7-year-old daughter, Deniya, was shot in the head and critically injured.Deniya Irving, 7. Photo courtesy of a GoFundMe account created for Deniya and her family.Police say all four victims were in a Honda Civic near Beacon and Lillian avenues shortly before 4 p.m. when Buress approached the car and opened fire into it. Before fleeing the shooting, Buress told at least one person standing nearby "not to say anything," court records say.Deniya was taken to a hospital where she was put on life support. Her 5-year-old sister was also in the car during the shooting but was unharmed.In addition to murder charges, Buress is also charged with six counts of armed criminal action, two counts of assault, and one count each of shooting a firearm at a motor vehicle and tampering with a witness. St. Louis Circuit Judge Michael Stelzer granted the state a protective order to file charges identifying the witness only as "secret witness."Jerome Leon Buress Jr., of St. Louis, was convicted in a quadruple shooting that left three adults dead and a 7-year-old girl injured.Jessica Garth, 24, and Derrick D. Irving, 27, were killed in a triple fatal shooting in the Walnut Park East neighborhood Thursday, June 1, 2017. Their 7-year-old daughter, Deniya, was critically injured.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Jerome Leon Buress Jr., of St. Louis, was convicted in a quadruple shooting that left three adults dead and a 7-year-old girl injured.Deniya Irving, 7. Photo courtesy of a GoFundMe account created for Deniya and her family.Jessica Garth, 24, and Derrick D. Irving, 27, were killed in a triple fatal shooting in the Walnut Park East neighborhood Thursday, June 1, 2017. Their 7-year-old daughter, Deniya, was critically injured.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Jury selection will begin Monday morning in the trial of a man charged in a fatal shooting outside a Middletown bar nearly 18 months ago.Malcolm Franklin, 28, formerly of Louisiana, is charged with murder as well as three counts of felonious assault for gun violence in 2017 at D&J Nite Spot. Franklin has been housed in the Butler County Jail since his arrest on $1 million bond.Last week both prosecutors and the defense team told Butler County Common Pleas Judge Charles Pater they were ready for trial.MORE: Spider bite delays murder trialIn August, Franklin’s trial was delayed at the request of the defense — attorneys Frank Schiavone III and Frank Schiavone IV — after Schiavone IV suffered a health issue.A pool of 60 potential jurors have been called for selection and the trial is expected to last for five days, according to Schiavone IV.After selection is completed, the jury is expected to view the scene on Elliott Drive, according to the defense.Franklin allegedly shot Julian Marquis Johnson, 23, outside the bar during the early morning hours of May 30, 2017. Three others were also injured by gunfire, according to Middletown police.Middletown police Detective Jon Rawlins testified during a previous hearing that Franklin confessed to killing Johnson.MORE: Interview and stop of fatal Middletown bar shooting at issue in hearingDefense attorneys filed motions to suppress statements Franklin made to police without an attorney present and the traffic stop of his client after the shooting because they said there was no probable cause. After a hearing in February, that motion was denied by Pater.Sign up for our newsletters3 other people injured in violence at Waterfront Park3 other people injured in violence at Waterfront ParkSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.3 other people injured in violence at Waterfront ParkMonday's homicide at Waterfront Park was not random and was "gang-involved," Louisville Metro police Chief Steve Conrad said.Four people were shot Monday night at Waterfront Park. One died and the other three suffered what appear to be non-life-threatening injuries in two shooting incidents.Police said it began around 4:25 p.m. Monday when University of Louisville police called Louisville Metro police officers on a report of an out-of-control pool party in the Fourth Division.Fourth Division Maj. Josh Judah said the pool party crowd wanted to keep partying and headed to Waterfront Park.Judah said the real-time crime center began monitoring the crowd and officers began heading toward Waterfront Park.First Division Maj. Eric Johnson said the Big Four Bridge was mostly closed to traffic from 7 p.m. to 9 p.m. Monday. During that time, Johnson said there were some small scuffles in the crowd.When the shots were fired, there were 32 officers at the park and 20 within eyesight of the shooting scene, which was about a half-mile in size.“Last night was not a staffing issue. No amount of police could have prevented this,” Johnson said.The park was filled with people as shots rang out near the Big Four Bridge.Witnesses said people ran in all directions to get away from the gunfire.Homicide Unit Lt. Emily McKinley said there were several witnesses to the shootings, but not a single person has come forward to police.“This 'no snitch' mentality is literally and figuratively killing us,” McKinley said.McKinley said LMPD is reviewing all the video from the scene, but police need the public’s help"We need those details to put our evidence together," McKinley said.Police asked that people not let fear overcome their humanity and asked witnesses to step forward.The man who died has been identified as Anton Brown, 22. The coroner said Brown died of a gunshot wound to the torso just before 10 p.m. at University Hospital.Anyone with information on the shootings is asked to call the LMPD tip line at 502-574-LMPD.To get breaking news alerts sent to your phone,download the WLKY app here.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.PHENIX CITY, AL (WTVM) –  Phenix City police are investigating after 12 people were shot at a party early Sunday morning.According to police, the shooting happened Sunday morning around 4:30 off of Brickyard Road on the 100 block of 6thStreet S.When police arrived on the scene, a male had been shot near the top of the head and was taken to Midtown Medical Center in Columbus with non-life-threatening injuries.Investigators went to meet with the victim at the hospital when 11 other victims arrived with injuries. All of the injured were attending a party on the 100 block of 6thStreet S. So far we do not know the identities or conditions of the people injured.Neighbors say this neighborhood usually doesn't see much trouble.One woman, who requested we conceal her identity, says she was home at the time shots were fired in her neighborhood."I heard gunshots, well I just stay to myself and not tend to nobody business," the neighbor said.No arrests have been made so far in this case.This is an ongoing investigation, anyone with information is asked to contact Phenix City police at 334-298-0611.Copyright 2017WTVM. All rights reserved.|For more news, download the WTVM apphere.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.MANHATTAN — A bike-riding gunmanwho shot four people on West 14th Street on Memorial Day weekendturned himself in Thursday afternoon, police said.Ricardo Daniell, 31, was partying at a club early in the morning on May 27 prior to being seen on video getting on a bike before he opened fire on four men standing in front of 318 W. 14th St. near Eighth Avenue.A 41-year-old man was critically injured and a 42-year-old man was hit in the chest but was in stable condition after the shooting. Another 42-year-old man was shot in the back and 35-year-old man suffered a graze wound.Investigators were still not sure what sparked the shooting, an NYPD spokesman said.Police also arrested Paola Betances, 22, in connection with the incident shortly after it occurred and charged her with drug possession.It was not clear how she is connected to Daniell.The shooter turned himself into the NYPD's Sixth Precinct at about 2:45 p.m. Thursday and was expected to be charged in the shooting.Next inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoNext inGreenwich Village & SoHoCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.A Mississippi man convicted in eight killings has been given the death penalty for four of the slayings.MAGNOLIA, Miss. (AP) — A Mississippi man convicted in eight killings has been given the death penalty for four of the slayings.Jurors on Thursday agreed unanimously to sentence Willie Cory Godbolt to death on four capital murder convictions arising from the eight killings in May 2017.He is getting life sentences for the other four murder convictions.Godbolt told jurors Thursday he had prayed to be a better man, but the devil was not going to let that happen.He said that before the shootings, he thought his daughter was in danger from a relative.That caused a woman in the courtroom to yell at Godbolt to shut up.Data is updated nightly.Data is updated nightly.1359 Beech Springs Rd.Saltillo, MS 38866 USA(662) 842-7620All content © copyright WTVA. Copyright © 2021 Allen Media Broadcasting, LLC All Rights Reserved. Generated: 2020-12-31 11:00:02pmA man was found dead in a Des Moines church parking lot early Sunday, one of four shooting victims discovered by police.Police have identified the victim who died as Ruot Gach, 19, of Carroll.The slaying is thethird fatalshooting inor just outside Des Moines'Beaverdale neighborhoodin the past two months.According to a news release, police and rescue personnel were called at 2:33 a.m. to the parking lot of Zion Lutheran Church, 4300 Beaver Ave. Responders took one shooting victim, Yien Nhial, 27, of Des Moines, to a hospital. Gach was found dead at the scene.Witnesses told police about a vehicle that might have been involved; after a short pursuit, police found another man shot inside, according to the news release. That man, Simon Joseph, 23, of Des Moines, has also been hospitalized. Police planned to interview the other people in the vehicle.One firearm has been recovered so far, police said in a 4 p.m. update.A fourth man, Tethloach Jack, 28, of Des Moines, showed up at a hospital himself with apparent gunshot wounds, police said.In the wake of the tragedy, Zion Lutheran Church held service at 9 a.m. as usual. Cars crowded into the parking lot, surrounding the taped-off crime scene with minivans and sedans full of adults and children in their Sunday best.The church's lead pastor John Kline addressed the violence in the community as the service began."Right now in our city, there's an awful lot of people killing an awful lot of people," Kline said. "What I want to keep in front of us is that fact that what happened this morning early is why we do what we do … We have a heavy responsibility."Kline assured the congregation that the church will always be a safe place for them but said the violence is a reminder of why they pray and why they need to continue community outreach."The world is a dangerous place, and Zion is a part of the world," Kline reminded churchgoers.Zion member Faith Sherman said she was shocked when she heard about the homicide."When I found out my heart just sank," Sherman said. "Not just because it's close to our church, but just another young life …"Sheman said Gach's death and Kline's sermon reminded her how important it is to reach out to those who are suffering."You know, we just have to build up with love and care for one another," Sherman said. "You can't just change things, but I guess we have renewed urgency to reach out and care about our neighbors."Kline told the congregation that an engagement party was held Saturday night before the shooting, but he said he didn't believe it was connected to the incident in the parking lot.The Rev. Al Perez, Zion's director of community engagement, said the church already planned to meet with the Des Moines chief of police and other Des Moines pastors Thursday to talk about ways to combat violence in the neighborhood.Perez said the meeting will still take place, but with a new level of gravity."For any young person to go down before their time is really hard," Perez said. "But what we're trying to look at here is to continue in our mission. Our mission here is to offer hope to people … We need to communicate more. We want to communicate and serve better our police department, serve our school district and serve our city in tangible ways. We want to continue to be a beacon of hope."Interactive:View map of Des Moines homicides since 2015Kline said the only positive to come from the incident was that it would help bring the community together to pray more and ramp up outreach."There needs to be justice and we also need to look at: Why does this keep happening? Why is that people seek a new identity as a killer? Why? Why is it that the kids don't seem to know what respect is, but they know when they feel disrespected … There is a better way."Des Moines had already exceeded the number of homicides it recorded in all of 2016—13 in total. Sunday's is the 15th killing in the city in 2017. Police Chief Dana Wingert has said thatloose-knit street gangs have contributed to an uptick in violence, some of it random and affecting bystanders, although many homicides involve people who know each other well.But as many focus on the violence behind the numbers, Kline told his congregation to focus on faith."A moment like this can either break us or it will spur us on," Kline said. "A moment like this will either bring us into despair or it will give us hope and divine power to change the city. And I think that by now you've got to agree with me that things need to change."MenuPolice are investigating a shooting involving multiple people in Mesa Sunday night.Officers responded to the Albertsons parking lot in the area of Val Vista and University drives around 7:30 p.m. after receiving reports of a shooting. When officers arrived to the scene they found two people suffering gunshot wounds in the parking lot, a Mesa police spokeswoman said.Witnesses told police that four people arrived at the parking lot in the same car, police said. Shortly after the group arrived gunshots were heard in the car and the suspect sped off before police arrived. Both people are hospitalized with serious injuries.Shortly after the incident in the Albertsons parking lot, a third victim was found just blocks away from the first scene near University Drive and Camino Street.According to police, the person also suffered injuries and was taken to the hospital. His or her condition hasn't been released and it's unknown how they were injured at this time.Authorities were able to locate the suspect's car near Adobe and Greenfield roads. The driver was also found with injuries and taken to the hospital, officials said.His condition hasn't been released.It's believed all four of the people know each other, a Mesa police spokesperson said. It's possible that the incident is drug-related.An investigation into the incident is ongoing.Report a typoFive men were shot at the Club One nightclub in Dolton early Sunday morning, police said.The shooting started just before 3 a.m. in the second level of the club at 14112 Chicago Road.Police said one witness account of what happened that hasn't been verified was that a man reached into a woman's purse, pulled out a gun and shot four other men.The shooter was then shot himself by an unknown gunman while running away about 200 feet from the business, according to another unverified account.The five gunshot victims were transported to an area hospital and two were in serious condition as of Sunday afternoon.Dolton Police Chief Robert Collins said an employee told police that the shooting started after an argument between two or more patrons on the second level.Police were continuing to interview witnesses, shooting victims and review surveillance footage Sunday.Dolton village trustees held a press conference Sunday outside the village hall, which is across the street from Club One."We are going to research who the owners are and if they have a liquor license," Trustee Duane Muhammad said. "This club should be shut down."He said the mayor issues liquor licenses in the village and doesn't need consent from the board.Muhammad said officials will hold an emergency meeting with Mayor Riley Rogers and urge him to revoke the liquor license if there is one and shut Club One down.He said residents in the area have complained about lack of parking and trash left in the streets by club patrons.The club was shuttered Sunday morning with signs stating "Closed by police order."An unopened package of medical gauze presumably left behind by paramedics was lying on the ground just outside the front door of the club.Before the press conference, a woman arrived in front of the club and said she works there and was trying to retrieve her car keys she left inside during the commotion.She said she didn't want to be identified because she was going to quit working there because of the shooting."It's just sad that we can't party in peace," she said.She said she was working at the lower level bar when she heard the shots from upstairs and saw people jumping off a balcony.Frank Vaisvilas is a freelance reporter for the Daily Southtown.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneA 57-year-old woman was shot through the wall of an apartment in West Fort Worth Monday night, about two miles from where four people were shot a day earlier.[[422534174,C]]It appeared both shootings were related, police said.Monday’s shooting happened in the 3000 block of Lackland Road about 11 p.m.The latest news from around North Texas.The woman was shot in the left shoulder and taken to the hospital, according to a police report.On Sunday at about 7 p.m., officers responded to a shooting in the 2800 block of Las Vegas Trail.Four young men were injured in that attack.Police said gang members may be responsible for both shootings.Fort Worth police officer Daniel Segura said Tuesday morning that no other information was available.Gallery: Trenton standoff continues into 2nd dayUPDATE:Trenton standoff suspect charged with murder of bystanderTRENTON-- A city man was arrested Thursday evening afterkeeping police at bay for more than 30 hoursin a tense standoff in South Trenton that left one person dead and three other police officers wounded.Tyleeb Reese, 35, exited a home on the 300 block of Centre Street shirtless at 5 p.m. and immediately was taken into custody.Tyleeb Reese surrenders to police. Photo courtesy of Omar Vazquez.For over 24 hours, police negotiators had communicated with Reese through a loud speaker.At 4:40 p.m. Thursday, he dialed the Trenton police dispatch center and told 911 operators he was going to surrender, officials said.A short time later, spokesmen for the New Jersey State Police, Trenton police and the Mercer County Prosecutor's Office announced an end to the 35-hour standoff.The incident is under investigation and the spokesmen did not announce any new charges against Reese.Reese barricaded himself inside the house after members of the U.S. Marshals NY/NJ Regional Fugitive Task Force attempted to serve him a warrant early Wednesday related to a Megan's Law offense.Authorities said Reese opened fire, killing a neighborhood resident, 56-year-oldRobert Powell Jr., and wounding three other Mercer County Sheriff's Officers.For the next 35 hours, numerous local, state and federal authorities - many clad in tactical gear and toting rifles - descended on the neighborhood, just south of downtown and about a mile from the Statehouse complex.Negotiators, using the loud speaker, pleaded for Reese to surrender peacefully, bringing up numerous topics and offers - from cigarettes and medical aid for his leg, to his teenage son - in an attempt to get him to emerge from the row house.At 4 p.m. Thursday, the police tactics changes. A tactical police vehicle called a Rook arrived from the Pennsylvania State Police and it lifted several cars from in front of the house and deposited them down the street.Other tactical vehicles then made several passes in front of the house before Reese surrendered, coming out with his hands raised."It was a collaborative effort with multiple agencies," Trooper Lawrence Peele said.Reese is a convicted sex offender who also has charges of eluding police and interfering with officers attempting to make an arrest, court records and previous reports show.Kevin Shea may be reached atkshea@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@kevintshea. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesGallery: Man dies, several injured after a shooting on the 600 block of Copeman Boulevard in FlintFLINT, MI - A 23-year-old Flint man has been charged in the quadruple shooting on Copeman Boulevard last week that left one man dead and three others injured.Maurice Antoine-Hakeem Dobson-El has been charged with first-degree premeditated murder, three counts of assault with intent to murder and four counts of felony firearm in connection to the shooting the morning of Thursday, May 4. He also was charged with a misdemeanor charge of malicious destruction of property.Police responded at about 9 a.m. to the 600 block of Copeman Boulevard and found Theodore Samuel Sharp III suffering from gunshot wounds.Sharp, 18, died at the scene.Three others- two men and a woman, all in their twenties - were transported to Hurley Medical Center where they were treated for gunshot wounds.One man was initially listed in serious condition while the two others were in good condition following the shooting.MLive-The Flint Journal has not been able to reach the Flint Police Department for condition updates on the victims.A fight took place between someone at a home in the area and the people who were shot, police previously said.The three shooting victims were found in a van, while Sharp was found in the street.Dobson-el was arraigned on the charges on Monday, May 8. He is being held in the Genesee County Jail without bond.He is due back in court for a probable cause conference on May 16.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesNews4Jax.com StaffNews4Jax.com StaffJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– Police have identified a man killed in a mass shooting Tuesday in Northwest Jacksonville.Garry Johnson, 35, was shot about 11 p.m. Tuesday at a home on West 24th Street near West Myrtle Avenue, in the Moncrief Park neighborhood.Police have not released the names of three other men who were also shot, but one of the injured was reported to be in critical condition and the other two had non-life-threatening injuries.Police towed away a car riddled with bullets. The police report indicates that bullets also hit two homes and an SUV.The shooting was four miles from Ken Knight Drive,where two teenagers and three young adults were shot Sunday night.Anyone with information that can help police is asked to call 866-845-TIPS.Copyright 2017 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.A Dallas man whofatally shot his roommate before shooting and critically wounding a neighbor and a responding paramedic Mondaywas the subject of an open investigation by the FBI prior to the attack, officials say.Officials with the Dallas FBI, police and fire departments held a news conference Tuesday morning to share the latest information into the investigation into 36-year-old Derick Lamont Brown, the man police identified as Monday's shooter, and the condition of those injured.NBC 5 Investigateslearned Monday thatBrown has ties two black nationalist groupsincluding the Dallas chapter of the New Black Panther Party and the Huey P. Newton Gun Club.The latest news from around North Texas.Eric Jackson, Special Agent in Charge of the Dallas FBI, said Tuesday the bureau had an active, open investigation into Brown prior to the shooting and that they were reviewing their case file. The FBI could release no other information about their open investigation.Dallas Assistant Police Chief Randy Blankenbaker then shared in greater detail the events as they unfolded Monday, saying Brown was acting erratically in his home that morning and that for an unknown reason he took his roommate, 67-year-old Arthur Riggings, into a back room and fatally shot him.Brown's girlfriend, who was also in the home at the time, then ran from the home and was not injured, police said.A neighbor, identified by police only as a 24-year-old Latin male, heard the gunshots and went outside to investigate. Police said Brown, who had gone outside, then shot his neighbor with a 7.62 caliber semi-automatic rifle.Paramedics responding to a suicide call at about 11:30 a.m. discovered the neighbor lying in the street and stopped to provide medical care.The paramedics quickly came under fire; paramedic William An was hit at least once and immediately collapsed to the ground. A second paramedic was able to take cover and was not injured.Officers William Bruce Jr. and Thomas McPherson arrived at the scene at 11:36 a.m. to find the neighbor and An both collapsed in the road and critically wounded. At the same time, they came under fire and attempted to take cover, police said.Bruce suffered a minor calf injury, possibly from bullet fragments, police said.Moments later, officers Matthew Merta and his unnamed partner, a 1-year veteran, arrived at the location. Brown, who had retreated to his yard at this point, turned and pointed his rifle the officers. Merta's partner then fired his shotgun toward Brown.Police believe Brown was struck by a single pellet from the shotgun blast and suffered only a minor, non life-threatening injury. He then retreated further and entered his house.Blankenbaker said additional officers then began to arrive at the scene, including Sgt. Robert Watson and officers Christian Jackson, Gary Green, Gabriel Pina and Mathew Kalash."Officer Merta, Sgt. Watson and Officer Kalash placed the critically injured paramedic in the sergeant’s car and the sergeant transported him to Baylor Hospital. Officers Jackson, Green and Pina pulled the Latin male victim to safety so he could be transported to the hospital," Blankenbaker said in a statement. "Each of these events took place while the officers were still exposed to potential gunfire from the suspect. All of these officer’s actions are more than commendable and should be considered heroic."With the wounded evacuated and the suspect believed to be barricaded inside his home, police shut down roads and blocked access to the area until the SWAT team arrived and used a robot to search Brown's home. Inside police found Brown and his roommate dead -- Brown from an apparent self-inflicted gunshot wound.Dallas Fire-Rescue spokesman Jason Evans said Tuesday that paramedic William An is an 11-year veteran of the department. He is married and has a 3-year-old son and a second child on the way. On Tuesday, Evans said An is stable, but remains in critical condition at Baylor University Medical Center in Dallas."The information I have received up to this point is that he has been in and out of sleep and able to verbalize things to the medics. You know, he complained of having a lot of pain, which is completely understandable given the circumstances. He's undergone several procedures to help address the injuries from the shooting," Evans said. "At least at this juncture, as opposed to what it was yesterday, the outlook seems to be a lot more positive."The injured neighbor remains in critical condition at Parkland Memorial Hospital in Dallas.Blankenbaker said Brown's criminal history includes arrests for aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, possession of a controlled substance, unlawful carry of a handgun by a license holder and driving while intoxicated. Police said Brown was well-known by law enforcement because of his "excessive arrest history."NBC 5 has learned Riggings' only criminal history is for marijuana possession.Public SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accidentPublic SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accidentAccident occurred Friday night on Fairmount Avenue in TalmadgeCaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingCaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingThe men, affiliated with the boogaloo movement, are accused of covering up their association with a man accused of murdering a federal security guardBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBook chronicles Lange’s budding career, which shaped her into an influential Depression and World War II photographerPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingSean Spear is the new president and CEO of Community HousingWorks, the San Diego nonprofit that develops, rehabilitates and operates affordable housing communities in the county and throughout California, while also offering programming, resources, and other forms of support to its residentsPoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadClassical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’Classical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’The world premiere of ‘El Mesías: Messiah for a New World’ is set to be performed in spring 2022 in San Diego and Baja CaliforniaHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversAdding one brings shade, home for creatures and psychological benefitsBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputeColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usSara Watkins’ new ‘Under the Pepper Tree’ features a Nickel Creek reunion trackEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageWARNING: DISTURBING CONTENT DA finds officer-involved shooting of man who opened fire at a poolside birthday party was justifiedA woman injured when a gunman opened fire on a poolside birthday party at a University City condominium complex in April filed a lawsuit on Wednesday claiming the gunman’s family should have known he was a “walking time bomb.”Charnee James, 24, was one of seven adults who were shot when 49-year-old Peter Selis opened fire on partygoers in a pool area at the upscale La Jolla Crossroads complex on Judicial Drive. Selis, who lived at the complex, was shot and killed by San Diego police officers who rushed to the scene.James was shot in both legs. She suffered “considerable nerve damage” and incurred hundreds of thousands of dollars in medical bills as a result of her injuries, the lawsuit reads. She also lost her new job, and her ongoing therapy prompted her to move back home to Michigan.She claims that Selis’ family was negligent because they knew or should have known Selis was a danger to himself and others because he was obviously struggling. The lawsuit claims there warning signs those closest to him should have noticed including a recent break up and crippling debt.Selis’ brother-in-law, Stuart Posnack, is CEO of Garden Communities, a development firm that is the parent company of La Jolla Crossroads LLC, which owns the complex where the shooting occurred. Both companies are named in the lawsuit, as is the estate of Peter Selis.The suit also claims an unnamed security guard company in charge of watching over the property was negligent in failing to prevent the shooting and for failing to protect victims once the shooting started.James is seeking unspecified damages.Twitter: @LAWinkley(619) 293-1546lyndsay.winkley@sduniontribune.comSign up to get Breaking News email alertsGet alerts on severe weather, road closures and other major breaking news.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the San Diego Union-Tribune.Follow UsMore from this AuthorWatchdogA Palpable Fear: Minorities describe encounters with San Diego police, sheriff’s deputiesWatchdogA Palpable Fear: Minorities describe encounters with San Diego police, sheriff’s deputiesIn nearly 90 percent of police beats throughout San Diego, Blacks were stopped at higher rates than WhitesMore CoverageWatchdogThe Color of Authority: San Diego police, sheriff’s deputies disproportionately target minorities, data showWatchdogThe Color of Authority: San Diego police, sheriff’s deputies disproportionately target minorities, data showBlacks, Latinos, Native Americans bear brunt of racial biases in local policingHealthA food-bank worker meets South Bay’s unprecedented needsHealthA food-bank worker meets South Bay’s unprecedented needsRosy Vasquez and her team helped feed thousands who faced hunger for the first time.Public SafetyAttempted robbery ends with victim being stabbed in chestPublic SafetyAttempted robbery ends with victim being stabbed in chestThe man drove himself to the hospital for injuries not believed to be life-threateningPublic SafetyMan shot after refusing to turn over cellphonePublic SafetyMan shot after refusing to turn over cellphoneThe man’s injuries were not believed to be life-threateningPublic SafetyPacific Beach fight leaves man with stab woundsPublic SafetyPacific Beach fight leaves man with stab woundsThe man’s injuries were not believed to be life-threateningMore in this sectionPublic SafetyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleySan Diego police said the driver of a blue or black Chevrolet Blazer left the scene after badly injuring the 30-year-old man on Friars RoadPublic SafetySan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesSan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesAmong 11 proposed reforms were recommendations to eliminate existing gang injunctions, explore alternatives to arresting low-level offendersPublic SafetyPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarThe collision happened on Del Mar Heights Road and Durango Drive, west of I-5CourtsOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornRelease of Kelsey Carpenter comes after California Supreme Court ruling targeting cash bailPublic SafetyDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policeDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policePolice said a woman reported a domestic violence incident on Lodi Street near Cole Street shortly before noon. The woman said her son had punched and kicked her, possibly carrying a firearm and a BB gun into San Clemente CanyonPublic SafetyDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensaryDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensarySheriff’s officials said deputies found more than 3,000 pounds raw cannabis and marijuana-infused products at shop near Sweetwater Springs BoulevardBreakingPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatWith nearly 52 percent of the vote, Weber is expected to take the Assembly seat formerly held by her mother, Shirley WeberNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HouseNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HousePresident Joe Biden has restored the prisoner-of-war/missing-in-action flag to its former location atop the White HouseNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtPresident Joe Biden has ordered a study of adding seats to the Supreme Court, creating a commission that will spend the next 180 days examining the incendiary political issues of expanding the court and instituting term limits for its justicesMusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50MusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50Born Earl Simmons, the New York-based rapper and actor was hospitalized after having a heart attack following a drug overdoseNational EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99National EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99Buckingham Palace says Prince Philip, the irascible and tough-minded husband of Queen Elizabeth II, has diedMost read news storiesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasAfter Border Patrol apprehends the families in Texas, they are flown to San Diego and sent to Tijuana, a city they do not knowEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageHealthCalifornia’s coronavirus vaccine supply will dip just as eligibility spikesHealthCalifornia’s coronavirus vaccine supply will dip just as eligibility spikesCountywide data show that major health systems and pharmacy chains have led San Diego’s immunization campaignLatestNational SportsSaturday’s TransactionsNational SportsSaturday’s TransactionsBASEBALL Major League Baseball American League DETROIT TIGERS — Placed RHP Julio Teheran on the 10-day IL.National SportsLate goals hurt Man City, boost Liverpool in Premier LeagueNational SportsLate goals hurt Man City, boost Liverpool in Premier LeagueOne stoppage-time goal slowed Manchester City’s march to the Premier League titleNational SportsAvalanche acquire goaltender Devan Dubnyk from SharksNational SportsAvalanche acquire goaltender Devan Dubnyk from SharksThe Colorado Avalanche have acquired goaltender Devan Dubynk from the San Jose Sharks for defenseman Greg Pateryn and a fifth-round pick in the 2021 draftPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceSign Up For Our NewslettersFollow UsVic Micolucci, I-Team reporter, anchorAshley Spicer, Reporter, anchorNews4Jax.com StaffVic Micolucci, I-Team reporter, anchorAshley Spicer, Reporter, anchorNews4Jax.com StaffJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– A mass shooting Sunday night near Reese Park off Ken Knight Drive North in Northwest Jacksonville left five young men injured.The victims, two 17-year-olds, an 18-year-old, a 19-year-old and a 20-year-old, showed up around 10 p.m. at Fire Station 26 off Commonwealth Avenue about 6 miles away with multiple gunshot wounds. News4Jax is not naming the victims because the shooter or shooters have not been caught.The young men were taken to UF Health Jacksonville with non-life-threatening injuries.Police believe that they were shot at a party, but they don't yet know who fired the shots or why.Remnants from the party could be seen around the area of the shooting, along with broken glass from vehicles hit by the gunfire.Police said they found a mess when they arrived. They said everyone had left and no one wanted to give them information about what happened.Neighbors said they are not happy.The JSO crime-mapping tool shows dozens of crimes reported within a half-mile of the area in the last month:News4Jax crime analyst Gil Smith said he’s worried that more violence will come after Sunday's shooting, because a lack of cooperation can be an indicator that the victims plan to retaliate.He said he believes that the men were targeted and that the shooter or shooters knew they would be there.“Usually (when) you have something like this with very young people involved, it's either going to be gang-related, drug involvement or some type of dating incident,” Smith said. “It's going to be one of those three things or a combination of those.”News4Jax found a bullet at the scene and turned it over to police.Smith said police are probably not going to be able to solve the crime without help from the community.Anyone with information is asked to call the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office at 904-630-0500. Tipsters can remain anonymous and possibly be eligible for a reward by calling  First Coast Crime Stoppers at 1-866-845-TIPS.Copyright 2017 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.Lifetime Jacksonville resident anchors the 9 a.m. weekday newscast and is part of the News4Jax I-Team.Lifetime Floridian anchors weekends and reports weekdays on issues in Nassau and Baker counties and beyond.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.KTLAby:Nisha Gutierrez-JaimePolice are asking for the public’s help in identifying the gunman who killed one man and injured three others in a shooting over the weekend in Boyle Heights.LAPD responded Saturday about 3:40 a.m. to a shooting call near the intersection of Murchison Street and Lancaster Avenue and found four people suffering from gunshot wounds, police said in a released statement.Investigators said an unknown man approached a group of people and fired multiple times before driving away from the scene in a dark sedan.Joselito Ulloa, 32, died of his injuries at the hospital, police said. The other three victims were treated at the hospital and released.The suspect is described as a Hispanic man. The suspect’s vehicle was described as a dark-colored, four door sedan with tinted windows.Anyone with information was asked to call Hollenbeck Gang Detective Carreon at 323-342-8998.SubmitTwo women were fatally shot inside an apartment complex and police say they may know the identity of the assailant.The identities and ages of the women killed Friday night and a description of the potential suspect were not released due to the ongoing investigation, Fresno Police Lt. Paul Cervantes told the Fresno Bee.A New York man is facing hate crime charges after police said he made threats and anti-Asian American remarks — to an undercover officer assigned to a hate crimes task force.Juvian Rodriguez, 35, was arrested Friday afternoon after the alleged confrontation near Penn Station.As governors loosen long-lasting coronavirus restrictions, state lawmakers across the U.S. are taking actions to significantly limit the power they could wield in future emergencies.The legislative measures are aimed not simply at undoing mask mandates and capacity limits that have been common during the pandemic. Many proposals seek to fundamentally shift power away from governors and toward lawmakers the next time there is a virus outbreak, terrorist attack or natural disaster.SACRAMENTO (CBS13)- Sacramento Police Department responded to a report of a loud party at the 3800 block of 26th Avenue Saturday night at 11:15 pm.Upon arrival, officers located five people with non-life threatening gunshot wounds.According to Sacramento Police Department, a party was taking place at a residence when a dispute occurred. The dispute moved to outside the home where a person pulled out a gun and started shooting.Victims were transported to area hospitals, one in serious condition.No arrests have been made yet.Trending:Family members Manuel Sahagun and Maria del Rosario Sahagun grieving at Sheriff Press Conference of the shooting death of Jose Ricardo Sahagun. Los Angeles Thursday, May 4, 2017. (Photo by Walt Mancini/Pasadena Star-News/SCNG)Christopher Bergner, Captain of Sheriff Homicide  Bureau with detectives and Whittier Police Department, family members of the victim, discussed circumstances surrounding the arrest of two suspects responsible for the weekend shooting spree in the Whittier and La Mirada areas. (Photo by Walt Mancini/Pasadena Star-News/SCNG)Prosecutors filed a murder charge and 14 attempted murder charges, among other allegations, Thursday against a man and woman they say embarked on a random shooting spree in the Whittier area leaving one man dead and three others wounded.Alejandro Lazo, 21, and his girlfriend, Reyna Gomez, 26, both of Whittier, whothemselves were shot and woundedSaturday followingthe rampage, had been held in the days since aspersons of interestas they recovered from their injuries in a jail ward at Los Angeles County-USC Medical Center.Both suspects are self-described gang members with criminal records.Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department Homicide Bureau Capt. Christopher Bergner announced Thursday that the couple had been formally arrested in connection with the crime spree.In addition to the single murder count and more than a dozen attempted murder counts, the Los Angeles County District Attorney’s Office also filed one count of carjacking against each defendant, according to spokesman Greg Risling.Gomez was also charged with torture for allegedly shooting a man in the groin during the bizarre attacks that unfolded in Whittier, La Mirada and Pico Rivera. Both suspects were also accused of the special allegations that they personally used firearms, and that the crimes were gang-related.Investigators could not explain why the suspects carried out their rampage, Bergner said.“These were senseless acts of violence, acts committed on innocent people that were merely enjoying the day, running errands, in what they believed to be a safe area,” the captain said. “The individuals that were victims of this crime, these were random targets of violence that were unprovoked.”The investigation continues, and detectives are seeking additional suspects believed to have played roles in portions of Saturday’s crime spree, Bergner said. He declined to comment further regarding any outstanding suspects.“They’re also reviewing similar crimes in the area to see if the suspects were also involved in any additional crimes that we haven’t yet reported,” Bergner said.The spate of violence began about 1 p.m. Saturday in the10000 block of Carmenita Roadin South Whittier, where a man waswounded in the leg in a drive-by shooting. The attackers, later identified as Lazo and Gomez, were in a white Kia Rio when they carried out the Carmenita Road shooting.The suspects turned up again about 2:15 p.m. in the11100 block of Rosehedge Drive in Pico Rivera, where they carjacked a man at gunpoint and fled in his green Nissan Pathfinder SUV, Deputy Lilian Peck of the sheriff’s Information Bureau said in astatement. The victim was unhurt.Just over an hour later, another shooting linked to the couple was reported behind a Starbucks coffee shop atWhittier Boulevard and Colima Road, Whittier police Lt. Bryan Ellis said. Gomez is accused of shooting a man in the groin as he walked down the street, officials said. The victim, a man in his 50s, suffered non-life-threatening injuries.The suspects then headed down Colima Road in the carjacked Pathfinder and opened fire at two motorists who were stopped at a traffic lightnear Lambert Road, Peck said. No one was injured in the car-to-car attacks.The shooters continued south toImperial Highway and La Mirada Boulevard, where they shot a man in the arm as he was sitting in a car about 4 p.m., according to Peck.“Norwalk Sheriff’s Station deputies responded to the La Mirada shooting but quickly learned another shooting occurred just south of them, at the intersection ofSanta Gertrudes Avenue and Alicante Road, La Mirada,” Peck said.“The fourth victim, Jose Ricardo Sahagun, a 44-year-old father of two little boys, was struck multiple times with gunfire as he sat in his car, waiting at a traffic light. Other victims in nearby vehicles were also fired upon indiscriminately, but Jose was the only person injured and he was pronounced dead at the scene,” Peck said.Sahagun succumbed to his injuries at a hospital.The search for the killers continued for more than two hours before deputies found the carjacked Pathfinder abandoned at Amelia Mayberry Park in South Whittier shortly after 6 p.m., Peck said. “It was there the suspects unloaded the vehicle they used as a mobile gun turret,” she said.But gunfire erupted again about 8 p.m., this time outside a motel in the 15000 block of Carmenita Road, authorities said. This time, it was the suspects who had been wounded in a shooting.“Both suspects were shot in the torso and when they realized the gravity of their injuries, they flagged down a concerned citizen and asked her to dial 911 for them,” Peck said.Lazo and Gomez were found sitting in the white Rio believed to have been used in the first shooting, officials said. A gun was recovered from the car, and has since been linked to the numerous nearby crime scenes, Bergner said.The circumstances of Lazo and Gomez’s shooting remained under investigation by the Whittier Police Department. No suspect description was available.Family members of Sahagun thanked the police and God for the arrests in the slaying of their loved one, as well as the community for its outpouring of support.The Compton social worker and former schoolteacher left behind a wife and two sons, ages 4 and 7.“While this is a positive step toward justice and closure, there’s no reconciling of the fact that the taking of an innocent life has devastated both our family, and the community,” said Maria Del Rosario Sahagun, Sahagun’s sister.Family members described Sahagun as an example for the community. A viewing for the shooting victim has been scheduled for 5 to 10 p.m. Saturday at All Souls Mortuary, 4400 Cherry Ave. in Long Beach.A Mass will take place 10:30 a.m. Monday at Our Lady of Perpetual Help Church, 8545 Norwalk Blvd. in Whittier, to be followed by burial at All Souls Cemetery in Long Beach.A fund to benefit Sahagun’s family has been set up online atwww.gofundme.com/jose-ricardo-sahagun.Detectives described both Lazo and Gomez as gang members, but declined to name the gang they belong to.Both were released from jail late last year after serving time for prior convictions, officials said.Los Angeles County court records show Lazo pleaded guilty to extortion and assault with a deadly weapon on Feb. 23, 2016. On the same date, he was also convicted of possession of methamphetamine in a separate case. He pleaded no contest to petty theft on Dec. 26, 2014.Gomez pleaded no contest to possession of methamphetamine and possession of drug paraphernalia on July 6, 2015. She also pleaded no contest to possession of methamphetamine on July 9, 2015, and to possession of methamphetamine for sale on Jan. 8, 2014.Gomez was convicted of assault likely to produce great bodily injury and possession of marijuana for sale on June 11, 2012.She pleaded no contest to four counts of vandalism on Sept. 23, 2010, and one count of vandalism on Jan. 31, 2011. She was convicted of assault with a deadly weapon on Oct. 20, 2009.According to county booking records, Lazo was being held without bail, while Gomez was being held in lieu of $12 million bail. They are scheduled to make their initial court appearance Friday in the Downey branch of Los Angeles County Superior Court.If convicted as charged, both suspects could spend the rest of their lives in prison.Staff writer Ruby Gonzales contributed to this report.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.HomeSportsOpinionSectionsAboutMoreA Germantown man has been found guilty of murder for his involvement in a quadruple shooting at a Germantown townhouse which left one man dead and three others suffering from gunshot wounds on April 29, 2017. Police also believe that he is responsible for the killing of another man in Prince Georges County while he was on the run after the first shooting.Montgomery County State’s Attorney John J. McCarthy, announced today that a jury found Furl John Williams, 26, of Fort Washington, guilty on multiple counts including Felony Murder which carries a maximum penalty of life in prison without parole.Williams, who at one point, was a resident of the 18800 block of McFarlin Drive in Germantown, was found guilty of Felony Murder for the homicide of 19-year-old Amaru Amir Santos Johnson and the shooting of three other people in a townhouse at 12839 Kitchen House Way.Williams is the second suspect to either be found guilty or plead guilty to crimes connected with this incident. In December, 25-year-old Clarksburg resident, Eric Anthony Lee pleaded guilty to two counts of Armed Robbery and four counts of First Degree Assault. He remains in the Montgomery County Correctional Center awaiting sentencing.“Shooting multiple people in a home invasion simply will not be tolerated,” said Ramon V. Korionoff, spokesman for the State’s Attorney’s Office. “Violet criminals will be apprehended, prosecuted and do jail time.”On Saturday, April 29 in 2017 at approximately 12:55 am, the Emergency Communications Center received multiple calls for a shooting that had just occurred inside of the residence. Officers from the 5th District along with Fire and Rescue personnel responded and located two adult male victims and two adult female victims at the home suffering from apparent gunshot wounds. The three remaining victims were transported to local hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries.According to court documents, Williams and Lee were the Kitchen House Way neighborhood at about midnight, an hour before the shooting. At about that time two female victims were accosted by Lee and Williams, as they left their vehicle and were walking toward the residence.Charging documents state that one suspect, Williams, produced a handgun, took their bags, and gave them to a second suspect who proceeded to rummage through them. Williams placed the handgun to the victims’ heads on several occasions made them lie face down in the parking lot. “He repeated to the victims he did not want them to lose their life over this,” said the court documents.Police believe that Williams and Lee took two female victims’ purses, wallets, keys, and a cell phone, and fled on foot but may have ultimately fled the area in a vehicle. The robbery victims fled to the townhouse at 12839 Kitchen House Way, where the shooting ultimately occurred.According to the charging documents, at least one of the people who would later be shot had witnessed some portion of the armed robbery. Another witness called Amaru Johnson, known as “AJ” and four other people to let them know that a robbery was taking place. Johnson and four others came to the residence, where the victims and witnesses discussed the robbery and determined that Eric “Little Eric” Lee was one of the men who committed the robbery. According to court documents on Maryland Judicial Case Search, Lee had once lived at an address on Dairymaid Drive in Germantown which is which is about 2,000 feet from the townhouse where the shooting took place.Johnson was about to contact “Little Eric” via SnapChat and told him to return to the scene and bring the stolen belongings back, said the charging documents.According to police, shortly before 1:00 am on Saturday, April 29, 2017, Eric Lee and Furl Williams returned to the Kitchen House Way address, where Johnson and two other shooting victims were waiting outside. The charging documents state that Lee told police that it was Williams who walked up to the front of the residence and began “shooting in the direction of the victims.”Police say that Williams immediately shot the first victim in the right femur and the adult male victim fell to the ground, as Johnson and another victim ran into the townhouse. The first victim heard more gunshots and scrambled to a neighbor’s house to get help. Johnson was shot in the chest while in the front foyer of the townhouse, while two more adult female victims were also shot, one in the head and the other in the left leg.Court documents state that the three remaining people in the residence fled out the back door and jumped off the back deck. Police believe that Williams fled through the front door, but before leaving, he pistol-whipped the first shooting victim and asked “where the marijuana was” and fled.Roughly, nine hours later that morning at 10:21 am on April 29, 2017, MCPD received a call about an illegally parked car at 13302 Queenstown Lane in Germantown. Police responded and discovered a blue 2009 Toyota Camry parked in front of a “No Parking” sign. After a check, it was determined that the vehicle was stolen 12 days earlier during an armed carjacking in Prince Georges County on April 17, 2017, court documents reveal. Queenstown Lane is a little more than half-a-mile from the townhouse where the shooting took place.While investigating the stolen vehicle, detectives discovered the purses, wallets, keys and the cell phone belonging to the two female victims of the armed robbery at the Kitchen House Way address. Investigators also discovered latent fingerprints in the driver’s side door of the stolen Toyota, according to court documents.  Detectives determined that fingerprints belonged to Furl John Williams, whose criminal history includes arrests for robbery, theft, motor vehicle theft, and assault.After the shootings, it Williams fled to Prince Georges County where on May 3, the day after Montgomery County issued an arrest warrant, Prince Georges County Police say he shot and killed a man who was pumping gas at an Exxon gas station in Suitland.A Prince Georges County Police say that on May 3, 2017 shortly after midnight, patrol officers responded to the gas station in the 4700 block of Silver Hill Road. The officers found the victim — 27-year-old Wayne Pope of Suitland — outside suffering from a gunshot wound to the upper torso. He was pronounced dead at the scene.The preliminary investigation reveals the victim had gone into the gas station to make a purchase. When he was returning to his car, the Williams approached him armed with a gun. Pope and Williams got into a struggle, and Williams shot the victim during that struggle and then stole his car. He was arrested by Prince Georges County Police.On Friday, the Montgomery County jury found Williams guilty of 14 counts of the 23-count indictment including Second Degree Felony Murder for the death of Amaru Johnson, Home Invasion, two counts of Armed Robbery for the robbery of the first two victims, one count of Attempted Armed Robbery, four counts of First Degree Assault, four counts of Use of a Firearm in Commission of a Felony, and Possession of a Firearm by a Person Convicted of a Disqualifying Crime.Williams will be sentenced at 2:30 pm on Sept. 7, before Judge Gary Bair in the Circuit Court for Montgomery County in Rockville. He faces life in prison. State’s Attorney McCarthy thanked Assistant State’s Attorneys Marybeth Ayres and Peter Larson for their prosecution of the case.Captions:Top: Furl John Williams, formerly of the 18800 block of McFarlin Drive in Germantown has been found guilty of the murder of 19-year-old Amaru Amir Santos Johnson on April 29, 2017 in Germantown and 13 other crimes. He is also charged with the killing of 27-year-old Wayne Pope at an Exxon gas station in Suitland in May of 2017. Photo courtesy MCPD.Next: In December 2017, Eric Anthony Lee, of Clarksburg pleaded guilty to two counts of Armed Robbery and four counts of First Degree Assault. Photo courtesy MCPD.Video: MCPD body-camera video of the shooting as police first arrived at the Kitchen House Way townhouse were four people and Amaru “AJ” Johnson was killed by Furl Williams. Photo courtesy State’s Attorney’s Office.Next: One of the victims, suffering non-life threatening injuries after being shot in the incident at the townhouse on Kitchen House Way is wheeled to an MCFRS ambulance to be transported to a local hospital.Next: Montgomery County Police photo, used as evidence during Williams’ trial, showing blood stains on the back deck of the townhouse at 12839 Kitchen House Way where four people were shot in April 2017. Photo courtesy State’s Attorney’s Office.Next: Prosecution photo of the inside of the stolen blue Toyota Camry police find parked 13302 Queenstown Lane in Germantown. Police found Williams fingerprints in the vehicle. Photo courtesy State’s Attorney’s Office.Next: Prosecution photo of a cell phone, belonging to one of the initial robbery victims, in this case, found under the seat of the blue Toyota Camry found in Germantown. Photo courtesy State’s Attorney’s Office.Photos by Germantown Pulse.Germantown, Maryland's Hometown News SourceLike what you read? Donate now, helpGermantownPulseprovide more news to the community© 2016 by Germantown Pulse.Former NBA All-Star Brandon Roy was one of four people wounded in a Compton shooting Saturday evening, authorities said.Two men walked up to Roy and a group of people he was with in the 2000 block of North Nestor Avenue around 9 p.m. Saturday, according to Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department Sgt. Rick Mejia. The men then opened fire for “no apparent reason,” Mejia said.Roy and the other three wounded all were released from area hospitals over the weekend, Mejia said. All of the victims were men, and they were in Compton with Roy for “some type of gathering,” he said.A motive for the shooting was not immediately clear and no arrests have been made, according to Mejia.The men did not say anything before opening fire.Roy, 32, was the sixth pick in the 2006 NBA Draft and became a star shooting guard for the Portland Trail Blazers. He won the NBA’s Rookie of The Year award in 2007 and was named to the Western Conference All-Star Team three years in a row.Chronic knee injuries forced Roy to retire in 2011. The Blazerswished him well in a statementreleased early Wednesday morning.“Like many others, we’re just learning of the injury suffered by former Trail Blazers player Brandon Roy in a shooting over the weekend in California. According to those reports, Brandon was wounded as a bystander, but is expected to recover,” the team said. “Our thoughts and prayers are with Brandon and his family during this time.”Roy now coaches the men’s basketball team at Nathan Hale High School in his hometown of Seattle, according to anESPN report on the shooting. He was named the Naismith High School Coach Of The Year in 2016 after leading the team to an undefeated season, according to the ESPN report.A woman who answered the phone at the high school referred all questions to a spokesman for Seattle’s public school system. The spokesman did not immediately return a call seeking additional comment.Los Angeles Times Staff Writer Richard Winton contributed to this report.james.queally@latimes.comFollow@JamesQueallyLATfor crime and police news in California.ALSOSurvivors of San Diego shooting believe gunman targeted black people; police doubtfulTwo killed in shooting at Pomona grocery storeLAPD officer at center of high-profile shooting in Venice also faces domestic violence chargesThe perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsJames Queally writes about crime and policing in Southern California, where he currently covers Los Angeles County’s criminal courts and the district attorney’s office.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsGallery: Multiple shootings on one night in NewarkNEWARK-- A man and woman were killed and five others, including a 15-year-old girl, werewounded in a string of shootingswithin a five hour span in Newark, officials said Friday.The overnight outburst of gun violence began around 8:30 p.m. Thursday when Newark police rushed to reports of several people shot on the 1100 block of South Orange Avenue, Acting Essex County Prosecutor Carolyn A. Murray and Newark Public Safety Director Anthony Ambrose said in a statement.At the scene, officers found four people wounded, authorities said. One of the victims, Derron Roane, 25, of Elizabeth, died minutes later at University Hospital.The quadruple shooting also left a 29-year-old man in critical condition and a 35-year-old man and a 15-year-old girl with non-life threatening injuries, according to Chief Assistant Prosecutor Thomas Fennelly, of the county's homicide unit.The killing occurred about a mile from Seton Hall University's South Orange campus. Campus public safety officials issued an alert warning students of police activity in the area, but a spokeswoman said no one associated with the school was involved in the shooting.Authorities said the second deadly shooting occurred around 1:30 a.m. Friday. Police responded to a shooting at a residence on the 200 block of North 9th Street where they found 37-year-old Virdia Beard shot multiple times on the porch, the prosecutor's office said.Beard, of Newark, was declared dead at the scene a short time later, according to Fennelly.Ambrose and Murray said the deadly shootings were unrelated, but did not disclose a possible motive for the attacks. Essex County's Major Crimes Task Force, included city detectives, were investigating the killings.Two people suffered non-life threatening injuries in another shooting around 10 p.m. on the 300 block of 6th Avenue, according to police.Authorities urged anyone with information on the fatal shootings to call the Prosecutor's Office tip line at 877-847-7432.Noah Cohen may be reached atncohen@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter @noahycandon Facebook. Find NJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFour men were rushed to the hospital after being injured in what police are calling a drive-by shooting in Southwest Miami-Dade Wednesday morning.Police responded to the scene near Southwest 139th Avenue and 264th Street shortly before 8:30 a.m. in the Naranja neighborhood. Officials say the victims were sitting in front of a house when a dark-colored vehicle drove up and opened fire.Two of the men were transported by helicopter while the other two were transported by ambulance. All of the victims were listed in stable condition as police continued to search for the shooter.The victims were later identified as 35-year-old Tommy Mayfield, 44-year-old Frank Luis, 64-year-old Tommy Butler and 34-year-old Broderick Richardson.Neighbors said the shooting happened as families were heading off to work and school."You coming by and shooting up, it's ridiculous, it's really ridiculous, it really is, it's sad," Tamika Vail said.Police said officers found a car that matched the description of the one involved in the shooting and when they tried to stop it, the car fled.A brief police pursuit ensued and a suspect bailed out of the car in the area of Southwest 250th Street and Southwest 122nd Avenue.A woman who stayed in the car was taken into custody while a suspect armed with a handgun fled on foot, police said.A perimeter was set up and a second suspect was taken into custody after a physical confrontation with officers, police said.#BREAKING4 people rushed to hospital after drive-by shooting in SW#Miami-Dade@nbc6pic.twitter.com/3T3oR9ztYoDetectives were working to determine the possible involvement of the two suspects in the shooting.Police said the armed suspect was later caught.Officers identified two of the suspects; Byron Curry, 26 and Tony McGhee Jr., 26. Both men were charged in connection to the shooting.A Brevard County grand jury issued an indictment for Derrick Flowers Tuesday for two counts of first-degree pre-meditated murder.Flowers, 31, was formally charged in connection with the April 21 shooting deaths of 27-year-old Joshua Wadlington and 38-year-old Michael Landon at a home on Vernon Drive in Palm Bay. According to the State Attorney's office, Flowers also shot and wounded 31-year-old Marlin Haugen and was also indicted on one count of aggravated battery with a firearm and possession of a firearm by a convicted felon.  Police did not provide a motive in the deadly incident.The grand jury heard testimony from a detective, medical examiner and witnesses before issuing the indictment. No court appearances have yet been scheduled for Flowers.More:Police: Tampa man slays neo-Nazi roommates over Islam disrespectMore:Woman claims to be God, moves into Melbourne Beach mansionTrending:VALLEJO — Nine teens were injured, including four who were shot, during a house party early Sunday morning, police said. Vallejo police Lt. Steve Cheatham said police received a call at 12:15 a.m. about the shooting at in the 100 block of Calhoun Street, near Benson Avenue, where a large group of teenagers were gathered for a party.According to Cheatham, some of the partygoers were outside the house when someone inside a vehicle across the street opened fire at the crowd. Four people suffered gunshot wounds and five others suffered other injuries. There were all taken to a local hospital with minor to serious injuries, Cheatham said.The suspect vehicle fled the scene and is described as a four-door vehicle, possibly carrying two suspects inside, Cheatham said. The incident is currently under investigation. Further details were not immediately available.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersThe explosive snaps of gunfire and wailing police sirens awoke 63-year-old Birgitt Archer in the early hours of Easter.She and her son-in-law emerged from an East 18th Ave. apartment in South Linden at 3:20 a.m. Sunday and found a chaotic scene: a man on the ground, bleeding, surrounded by a crowd of people, police and medics."There were 15 to 20 people, screaming and yelling," Archer recalled."It was very tense. I was concerned for the officers' safety."The injured man was one of nine people wounded by gunshots early Sunday at J&R Party Hall at 1714 Cleveland Ave. Columbus police say an argument at the rental facility escalated into a shooting involving at least two suspects with dozens of shots fired.Most witnesses fled the party hall before police arrived, leaving behind shoes, hats, driver's licenses and more, police said.When the commotion settled, those involved said nothing."The only way we're going to solve these crimes is if people come forward with what they saw," said Columbus police spokeswoman Denise Alex-Bouzounis, who called the lack of cooperation frustrating.All nine who were shot — five women, four men — are expected to survive. Nobody, including the victims, has provided any information about potential suspects.The female victims are Sharda Hall, 25; Brooklyn Bradley, 20; Diamond Harris, 33; Corneicia M. Pruitt, 25; and Kaadijah Travis, 23. The males are Ja'Voughn Henderson, 22; Keante McGrew, 31; William Boswell, 27; and Jawaun McCrae, 20.Eight of the nine were in stable condition as of Sunday afternoon and have already been interviewed by investigators.One victim, a woman, is in serious condition with a gunshot wound to her torso, Alex-Bouzounis said. She couldn't specify which victim.Seven of the victims were taken to OhioHealth Grant Medical Center, and two were taken to Ohio State University's Wexner Medical Center. Police didn't specify which hospitals treated each victim. Some were not transported by medics and arranged for their own transportation from the scene, police said.Police still aren't sure what people were arguing about before shots were fired or why the party hall had been rented out. They believed alcohol was involved. They're also looking into what sort of security, if any, is provided at the facility.The shooting does not appear to be "terror-related," Alex-Bouzounis said.She said witness cooperation is crucial to getting the culprits off the streets. Anyone with information can provide tips anonymously to police, she said."You want justice for the victims," she said. "You want justice for the community because they shouldn't have to live in fear that a shooter's out there. But people have to cooperate."Christine Archer, 41, Birgitt Archer's daughter, said she's saddened by the lack of help from witnesses, but also isn't surprised."The code around here is 'don't talk,' she said.Christine moved into the South Linden neighborhood about four months ago. Many people don't trust police and fear retaliation for assisting investigations, she said.Investigators were at the scene until about 10 a.m. Sunday.A man walking into J&R Party Hall shortly after that said his family owned the building but declined to comment further.The South Linden shooting came less than a month after gunfire at the Cameo club in Cincinnati resulted in two dead and 15 injured. It also escalated from an argument and involved multiple shooters, but that facility wasn't an after-hours club.A shooting at a party hall on the Near East Side, also last month, left one teen dead and two others injured. Witnesses said the party was to celebrate a "Sweet 16" birthday.Anyone with information about Sunday's shooting is asked to call Columbus Police Detective Ronald Lemmon Jr. at 614-645-4141 or email ralemmon@columbuspolice.org. They can also call Central Ohio Crime Stoppers at 614-461-TIPS.The explosive snaps of gunfire and wailing police sirens awoke 63-year-old Birgitt Archer in the early hours of Easter.She and her son-in-law emerged from an East 18th Ave. apartment in South Linden at 3:20 a.m. Sunday and found a chaotic scene: a man on the ground, bleeding, surrounded by a crowd of people, police and medics."There were 15 to 20 people, screaming and yelling," Archer recalled."It was very tense. I was concerned for the officers' safety."The injured man was one of nine people wounded by gunshots early Sunday at J&R Party Hall at 1714 Cleveland Ave. Columbus police say an argument at the rental facility escalated into a shooting involving at least two suspects with dozens of shots fired.Most witnesses fled the party hall before police arrived, leaving behind shoes, hats, driver's licenses and more, police said.When the commotion settled, those involved said nothing."The only way we're going to solve these crimes is if people come forward with what they saw," said Columbus police spokeswoman Denise Alex-Bouzounis, who called the lack of cooperation frustrating.All nine who were shot — five women, four men — are expected to survive. Nobody, including the victims, has provided any information about potential suspects.The female victims are Sharda Hall, 25; Brooklyn Bradley, 20; Diamond Harris, 33; Corneicia M. Pruitt, 25; and Kaadijah Travis, 23. The males are Ja'Voughn Henderson, 22; Keante McGrew, 31; William Boswell, 27; and Jawaun McCrae, 20.Eight of the nine were in stable condition as of Sunday afternoon and have already been interviewed by investigators.One victim, a woman, is in serious condition with a gunshot wound to her torso, Alex-Bouzounis said. She couldn't specify which victim.Seven of the victims were taken to OhioHealth Grant Medical Center, and two were taken to Ohio State University's Wexner Medical Center. Police didn't specify which hospitals treated each victim. Some were not transported by medics and arranged for their own transportation from the scene, police said.Police still aren't sure what people were arguing about before shots were fired or why the party hall had been rented out. They believed alcohol was involved. They're also looking into what sort of security, if any, is provided at the facility.The shooting does not appear to be "terror-related," Alex-Bouzounis said.She said witness cooperation is crucial to getting the culprits off the streets. Anyone with information can provide tips anonymously to police, she said."You want justice for the victims," she said. "You want justice for the community because they shouldn't have to live in fear that a shooter's out there. But people have to cooperate."Christine Archer, 41, Birgitt Archer's daughter, said she's saddened by the lack of help from witnesses, but also isn't surprised."The code around here is 'don't talk,' she said.Christine moved into the South Linden neighborhood about four months ago. Many people don't trust police and fear retaliation for assisting investigations, she said.Investigators were at the scene until about 10 a.m. Sunday.A man walking into J&R Party Hall shortly after that said his family owned the building but declined to comment further.The South Linden shooting came less than a month after gunfire at the Cameo club in Cincinnati resulted in two dead and 15 injured. It also escalated from an argument and involved multiple shooters, but that facility wasn't an after-hours club.A shooting at a party hall on the Near East Side, also last month, left one teen dead and two others injured. Witnesses said the party was to celebrate a "Sweet 16" birthday.Anyone with information about Sunday's shooting is asked to call Columbus Police Detective Ronald Lemmon Jr. at 614-645-4141 or email ralemmon@columbuspolice.org. They can also call Central Ohio Crime Stoppers at 614-461-TIPS.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Columbus Dispatch  ~ 62 E. Broad St. Columbus OH 43215~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.ROCK FALLS, Illinois --  A tip from South Carolina led police to arrest a man suspected of shooting four people at a bar called "The Cooler" downtown Rock Falls."We are pleased to announce today that we have the suspect in custody that is responsible for the shooting that happened Saturday night (April 15)," said Rock Falls Police Chief Tammy Nelson at a press conference about the investigation.Rock Falls police had distributed images of the man they suspected was involved in the weekend shooting.Nelson said that on Monday, police got a tip from law enforcement in South Carolina.Nelson said 32-year-old Seth Thomas Wallace, who is a distant cousin of the bar's owners, had been identified as the person responsible for the shooting. An arrest warrant for four counts of aggravated battery was issued for Wallace, who turned himself in Tuesday night.Wallace was being held at the Dillon County Detention Center awaiting extradition to Illinois, Nelson said."Wallace has made admissions to specific details of the crime in connection to the Sauk Valley area and The Cooler," Nelson said.The investigation is ongoing, but no other arrests are expected in the case.Related:Police identify the four people shot in a Rock Falls barNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.WATCHVIDEOS4 teens shot and wounded in OlneySee video from the scene of shooting incident that left four teenagers injured in the Olney section of Philadelphia.Police have arrested a 25-year-old Indianapolis man as a suspect in the shooting of four people inside a Downtown parking garage Saturday morning.Christopher Ruffin was arrested on preliminary charges of aggravated battery, carrying a handgun without a license and invasion of privacy violations, according to an IMPD news release. The shooting occurred along the 300 block of South Meridian Street.Just after 3 a.m. Saturday morning, off-duty officers heard several gunshots coming from the Union Station parking garage. When officers arrived on the second floor of the structure, they found three people suffering from gunshot wounds. Police also were able to connect fourth person, who arrived at Community Hospital , with the shooting. None of the injuries are believed to be life-threatening.Officers found and detained Ruffin after they obtained a suspect description. They also found a handgun inside a trash can on the second floor of the parking structure. After being questioned, Ruffin was transported and processed at the the Arrestee Processing Center.Follow IndyStar reporter Kara Berg on Twitter:@karaberg95CENTER POINT, AL (WBRC) - A 17-year-old is under arrest for a weekend shooting at a carnival in Center Point.Laeric Bailey of Birmingham is charged with 2nd degree assault and additional charges are expected according to the Jefferson County Sheriff's Office. Bailey is being charged as an adult.Six people including a one-year-old child were injured. One person also suffered minor injuries when she was knocked down by people running from the gunfire. None of the injuries were life threatening.Copyright 2017WBRC. All rights reserved.1720 Valley View DriveBirmingham, AL 35209(205) 322-6666A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Filed under:Four people were shot late Saturday in front of a home in south suburban Harvey.Officers responded to a call of shots fired in the 14600 block of Myrtle Avenue about 11:30 p.m., said Sean Howard, spokesman for the city of Harvey.Four victims, all males ranging in age from juvenile to 20 years old, were shot and taken to hospitals, Howard said. All four are in serious but “stable” condition, and their wounds are not thought to be life-threatening.A suspicious vehicle circled the block before the shooting, then multiple people walked up and began shooting at the house, Howard said.“We don’t believe this was a random act,” Howard said.Police are talking to neighbors, and there are several surveillance cameras in the neighborhood, he added.“We’re hopeful that we can make an arrest,” Howard said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Trending:Banning police are asking for the public’s help with an investigation intoa shooting that wounded four peopleSaturday, April 15, noting that they’ve gotten few details about what happened from the victims or witnesses.Shots were reported in the 900 block of North Allen Street about 9:50 p.m., according to a police news release issued Wednesday. Officers found one victim at the scene whose head had been grazed by a bullet; he was treated at the scene by paramedics.Three other people — one shot in the leg, another in the back, the third in the abdomen — had gone to San Gorgonio Memorial Hospital before police arrived. The victim with an abdomen wound was transferred to Riverside University Health System Medical Center for surgery.The release said all of the victims were males but did not specify whether they were adults or juveniles.None of the victims told police what prompted the shooting, the release said. “Many people were on scene” when the shooting happened, but they all told police they didn’t know what happened.Banning police are asking anyone with information to call them at 951-922-3170.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Fulton County authorities on Friday morning identified theman accused in a brazen shootingthat killed one MARTA train rider and injured three others.Chauncey Lee Daniels faces murder and assault charges in the Thursday shooting at the West Lake station, which killed Zachariah Hunnicutt, 38.Police haven’t revealed why Daniels would target anyone.MARTA Police Chief Wanda Dunham said officers would be an increased presence at all stations Friday.She called the shooting “targeted” but “isolated.”“Our officers acted swiftly in apprehending the suspect at the West Lake station,” she said in a statement. “Those injured passengers were treated by EMS and transported to Grady Memorial Hospital with non-life-threatening injuries.”The shooting was the fifth murder investigation MARTA police have had to undertake this fiscal year.But in a recent presentation to media Dunham and other officials touted a27 percent decrease in serious crime on the system. She attributed higher police visibility, 10,000 cameras installed on the system and the suspensions of problem riders.Still, she acknowledgedthe spate of killings, which is highly unusual, considering that in the previous four fiscal years there were zero.Murder charges and arrests also came in the other cases.Video: 1 killed, 3 injured in shooting at MARTA stationHICKORY, NC (WBTV) - A third person has died from the shooting in the parking lot outside of J. McCroskey's Irish Pub and Grill from Friday morning.According to the Hickory Police Department, 21-year-old Quajuae Alexus Kennedy succumbed to her injuries at the Baptist Hospital in Winston-Salem Saturday night.PREVIOUS:Pair charged in Hickory shooting that left two dead, multiple injuredGreydon Keith Hansen and Dontray Cumberlander, both 23 of Hickory, have been charged in the case.Police say they were called around 2:15 a.m. to a shooting at J. McCroskey's Irish Pub & Grill, located in the 1400 block of 29th Ave Drive NE.Keith and Cumberland got into an argument with five people in the parking lot, located adjacent to the pub, before shooting at them while they were inside a car, police say. They had all been patrons at the pub prior to the shooting.Justin Aiken and Cody Bouphavong, both 21, were killed. Cole Ervin, 20, was treated for gunshot wounds at Frye Regional Medical Center. The driver of the vehicle was not injured.According to Hickory Police, Hansen and Cumberlander have both been charged with two counts of murder and one count of assault with a deadly weapon inflicting serious injury with intent to kill. Police say a third murder charge is forthcoming.Police say there is no connection between the suspects and the victims.J. McCroskey's Irish Pub and Grill released the following statement Friday:Anyone with additional information is asked to call the Hickory Police Department at 828-261-2617.Copyright 2017 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Dekitta Holmes was identified among the dead in a triple murder-suicide.People gather behind the crime scene tape as Houston Police officers investigate the scene where two people were found fatally shot on the 3800 block of Mount Pleasant Street Friday, April 7, 2017, in Houston. ( Godofredo A. Vasquez / Houston Chronicle )Houston Police officers investigate the scene where two people were found fatally shot on the 3800 block of Mount Pleasant Street Friday, April 7, 2017, in Houston. ( Godofredo A. Vasquez / Houston Chronicle )A mother of three has been identified as the apparent shooter in Friday's bizarre triple murder-suicide.Dekitta Holmes, 29, was recently divorced and had been out of work for about a year when she apparently went on a shooting spree that spanned three scenes in two counties, family said Sunday.Houston police had a gruesome discovery when they showed up for a welfare check just after 7 a.m. Friday at a modest home on Mount Pleasant. Holmes and her stepfather were both found shot to death, and Holmes' mother was critically wounded.A few doors down, police found another shooting victim at a home where neighbors said the suspected shooter had been living for about a month.BAYTOWN:Home where grisly League City murder took place sells 4 months after crimeThen, just before 10 a.m., Fort Bend County deputies found the body of Carolyn Jean Holmes, 48, in a Fresno home.On Sunday, the Harris County medical examiner confirmed Dekitta Holmes' death.As news of the slayings spread online, friends and family mourned the deaths."I never would've thought this could've happened, she seemed like such a sweetheart," one Facebook user said of Holmes.ICYMI:The last hours of the Montrose vet accused in a murder-for-hire plot"Never saw this at all," said a woman who worked with her.On Sunday, her surviving family put up aGoFundMepage to support the daughter and two sons she left behind."They will need the help of the community to make sure they are not scarred by this event," the page notes."Also, Dekitta did not have life insurance, and the children deserve to see their mother with pride. I know we can all come together in this time of need."Keri Blakinger covered breaking news, prisons and the death penalty. She was hired at the Houston Chronicle through the Hearst Fellows program. She graduated from Cornell University and covered county and town government at the Ithaca Times before moving to breaking news at the New York Daily News. After three years at the Chronicle, she moved to The Marshall Project.MINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)— Police are continuing to search for answers after a family was killed in St. Paul early Friday morning.The victims in the shooting have been identified as 47-year-old Wade McIntosh and his two teenage daughters: 19-year-old Maria and 17-year-old Olivia.It all started at about 1 a.m. in the city’s east side at the corner of English Street and Larpenteur Avenue.Wade McIntosh, Maria (R) and Olivia (L) (credit: Facebook)Police discovered the three family members dead and another woman injured.Two hours later, officers found a toddler with a suspected kidnapper.Soon after that, they discovered a second suspect who was dead.Pastor Paul Marzahn was a friend of Wade’s and said he loved spending time with his family.“I was just devastated. I was surprised, I mean, as anybody would be,” Marzahn said. “It’s one thing to have a custody battle and argue about a child. It’s another thing to be that vindictive to take out a whole family.”Wade McIntosh, Maria (L) and Olivia (R) (credit: Facebook)Police said Maria and Olivia’s mother was the other victim that was shot, and she remains in critical condition at Regions Hospital.Maria had a little girl with the shooting suspect in this case — 20-year-old Jeffrey Jemaile Taylor. It’s believed he fled with the 18-month-old after shooting the family. But he was later found dead near the scene on the Bruce Vento Trail.Police said the toddler was found safe in a shed nearby, with Taylor’s half-brother with a similar name — 19-year-old Jeffrey Arkis Taylor. He was taken into custody.“Maria and Olivia were like the apple of [Wade’s] eye. He just loved them,” Marzahn said.Wade McIntosh, Maria (R) and Olivia (L) (credit: Facebook)He says Wade was reconnecting with his daughters after going through recovery for chemical abuse. He found God, joined Crossroad Church in Lakeville and even went on mission trips to help people in need.“He went with us and he helped us build a deck for a woman who was basically living in a trailer house in the middle of nowhere,” Marzahn said. “I worked out with him sometimes at Lifetime Fitness in Lakeville. He’s come in and high five everyone. Everyone knew who he was. He was definitely not one to make a quiet entrance.”Marzahn says Wade had been sober for five years.Jeffrey Arkis Taylor could face kidnapping and other charges on Monday.It’s still unclear how the alleged shooter died.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A shooting in Austin killed one and wounded five people on Friday afternoon, police said.At 1:38 p.m., the six victims were in the 5600 block of West Lake Street when a gray-colored SUV drove up and someone inside fired shots, police said.One victim, who was 24 years old, was taken to Loyola Hospital and pronounced dead, police said. The man was identified as Byron McKinney Jr., of the 500 block of North Pine Avenue, according to the Cook County Medical Examiner's Office.The other five victims were in good condition at West Suburban Hospital.Police shut down portions of Lake Street, blocking it off with cars and yellow crime tape, after the shooting. The shooting happened near Austin Town Hall Park.The surviving victims include:• a 20-year-old man shot in his foot• a 46-year-old man was shot in his buttocks• a 17-year-old was shot in his leg• a 24-year-old man was shot in his thigh• a 29-year-old man was shot in his thighNo one was in custody.Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.WATCHVIDEOS$70K reward in deadly shooting$70K reward in deadly shooting near N. Philadelphia school. Dann Cuellar reports during Action News at 11 p.m. on April 4.Raw video: Multiple people shot in North Philadelphia$70K reward in deadly shooting near N. Philadelphia school. Vernon Odom reports during Action News at 5 p.m. on April 4.2 killed, 2 injured in North Philadelphia shooting. Dann Cuellar reports during Action News at 11 p.m. on April 3.Police: 2 killed, 2 wounded in North Philadelphia shooting. Dann Cuellar reports during Action News at 6 p.m. on April 3, 2017.Filed under:A burst of daytime gunfire on the city’s West Side claimed two lives Sunday, left four others wounded and left frustrated residents shaking their heads.At 4:33 p.m., the men were standing in a group in the 3500 block of West Van Buren when a white, four-door car pulled up and multiple people got out and started shooting, according to Chicago Police. The vehicle may have been a Chevrolet Impala, police said.Two of the men, 23-year-old Deonta Turner and 27-year-old Lemont Davis, were shot in the chest and were taken to Stroger Hospital, where they were pronounced dead just after 5 p.m., according to police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office.Autopsies Monday found Turner, of the Uptown neighborhood, died of a gunshot wound to the back; and Davis, of Oak Park, died of multiple gunshot wounds. Their deaths were ruled homicides.An 18-year-old man was shot in the chest; a 23-year-old man was shot in the back; and a 24-year-old man was shot in the chest, back and leg, police said. They were all taken in critical condition to Stroger Hospital.The sixth man, 26, suffered a gunshot wound to the right leg and was taken in good condition to Mount Sinai Hospital, police said.Residents say the block, just off the Eisenhower Expressway, has become a hotspot for drug trafficking. Dealers have had success hiding their drugs in the area whenever cops are called, the residents said.A group of about 30 people was seen on the block in the hours before the shooting, with some running up and down the street. The residents said it looked like an argument had broken out.The shooting happened in the Chicago Police Department’s Beat No. 1133, the most violent beat in the city last year. It saw 61 shootings in 2016 — 16 of them fatal — according to records kept by the Chicago Sun-Times. Numbers there had fallen dramatically in the first three months of 2017, with only two nonfatal shootings and not one homicide on the beat. Until Sunday.Residents of the block, just off the Eisenhower Expressway, say drug traffickers who have taken over the area have so far managed to thwart police called to investigate suspicious activity.RELATED:THE WATCHDOGS: The most violent police beat in Chicago7 dead in 3 separate shootings in South Shore neighborhoodAld. Jason Ervin (28th) said he confronted people on the block just Saturday — non-residents who “just show up over here as if they’re coming to work” to sell marijuana. He complained about a lack of economic opportunity and that police are not being allowed to properly do their job.The fatal shooting in East Garfield Park happened about four hours after a shooting in the South Side Auburn Gresham neighborhood left one man dead and another wounded. That shooting was in the 8200 block of South Ada at 12:30 p.m. A 19-year-old man was shot once in the back and a 20-year-old man was shot twice in the back. Both were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn. The older man was pronounced dead, police said. The younger man was listed in critical condition.Contributing:Sam Charles, Jordan OwenKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.The state has suspended a metro pizza restaurant’s liquor license following an early-morning shooting.Five people were injured early Sunday in a shooting at J & J Pizza Pub at 2500 MLK Parkway. Police say more than 50 shots were fired during the incident.The City of Des Moines filed an emergency request listing several violations by the restaurant on the night of the shooting, including after-hours alcohol consumption, allowing illegal drugs on the premises and allowing underage persons in the bar after 9 p.m.A police report filed with the request indicates the shooting occurred during an “after hours birthday party.”Des Moines police recovered marijuana at the restaurant during their investigation of the shooting, according to the police report. The police report also said the restaurant’s food and liquor licenses were expired.City officials told KCCI on Monday that J & J Pizza Pub does not follow liquor license rules and that for the surrounding neighborhood to grow in a positive way, the restaurant needs to go.A hearing to revoke the license could come later this month.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Five people in Pittsburg were injured Saturday night when a man opened fire during a birthday party, police said.Shots were fired just before 11 p.m. at a residence located on the 100 block of Madoline Street after a man was asked to leave the party, according to Pittsburg Police Department Cap. Raman.The shooting suspect, who was identified as a 23-year-old Oakley resident, and the group of people he came to the party with did not take kindly to being booted from the house, according to Raman. A fight proceeded to break out before before the shooting suspect reached for a gun and opened fire.In total, five adult men sustained gunshot wounds, Raman said. They were transported to nearby hospitals and listed in stable condition.Partygoers managed to detain the shooting suspect until police arrived, Raman said. That's when the shooter was arrested and taken to county jail. He was charged with a number of felony counts, including assault with a deadly weapon.An investigation into the shooting in ongoing, according to Raman. Several witnesses at the party were interviewed.One man died and four others, including one woman, were injured in the early morning shooting, Tampa police said.TAMPA – A man has been charged with murder after an early morning (April 1) shooting at a Tampa nightspot, police said.Mike Franck, 34, of Tallahassee, died at the scene. Four others – Heaven Mayo, 24; Justin King, 24; Donald Jocelin, 25; and Tobiasz Cudnik, 32 – were wounded. One was treated at the scene. Three were taken to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.Gary Omar Rivera Montanez, 22, of Tampa, was charged with one count of first degree murder and four counts of attempted first degree murder. Tampa police officials said Montanez admitted being in an altercation at the Palace Hookah Lounge on south Howard Avenue and to firing into the crowd. Police said Montanez claimed he did so in self defense.Montanez was a patron at the Palace Hookah Lounge, where he aggressively flirted with several female patrons, officers said. When the lounge closed, several patrons congregated in a parking lot on the north side of the building, where Montanez focused his aggressive flirting on a particular woman named Heaven Mayo. Police said she asked a man named Schneider Simplice for help. Montanez said he’d done nothing wrong. Simplice, a former bouncer at the Palace, joined the on-duty bouncer, Khaled Ghoneim, in asking Montanez to leave.As Montanez left, officers said he was heard to say “Don’t try me like this. I’ve got a gun.” A witness told police Montanez said he would remember their faces and would be back.At approximately 4:35 a.m., police said that Montanez, who was in his car, turned north onto Howard Avenue from W Platt Street and opened fire through his driver’s side window. He fired several shots into the crowd gathered around the lounge and in the parking lot.One projectile struck Mr. Franck in the chest. He died at the scene. Police said there are no indications that Mr. Franck was involved in the earlier altercation. At least four other victims were also hit.Montanez traveled north on Howard Avenue. Police sent out a notice asking other officers to be on the lookout for the vehicle and for Montanez. About 4:42 a.m., a Tampa police officer pulled over a car matching the description of the car Montanez was driving at N Armenia Avenue and Dr. Martin Luther King Boulevard. The driver matched the description and a handgun and shell casings were in plain sight in the car. Police said witnesses later identified him as the shooter.For information about the Tampa police, go totampagov.net.#TampaPolice #DriveByShooting #Murder #PalaceHookahLounge #MikeFranck #Crime #Arrests #TBReporterHaines City police say he denied any intentional touching, but told investigators and family membersRead MoreHe was not the student’s teacher but they met each other at the school, HillsboroughRead MoreEnter your email address to subscribe and receive notifications of news and events by email.Join 5,209 other subscribersEmail AddressSubscribeA second victim in a weekend shooting at a northwest Oklahoma City residence has died.Wendy Cortez-Paiz, 22, died of gunshot injuries, police said Tuesday.Monica Valdez, 33, was dead at the scene of the shooting about 5:25 a.m. Saturday at 1212 N Woodward Ave.Jessica Madbull, 28, was arrested on a murder complaint. She told investigators during an interview that she admitted grabbing a gun from her brother and shooting the victims, according to a probable cause affidavit.Treated and released from a hospital were Marcus Rodriguez, 25; Maria Rodriguez, 27, and Eduardo Madbull, 27.Police said officers who responded to an altercation found that all of those involved in the shooting had been at the residence when the gun was fired.The incident remains under investigation, and anyone who has information is asked to call the homicide tip line at 297-1000.Filed under:Maurice Harris, now 22, was charged in the 2017 fatal shooting four people at Nadia Fish and Chicken at 75th and Coles. The charges against Harris were dropped at a hearing Wednesday.Cook County prosecutors Wednesday dropped murder charges against a man who was accused of carrying out one of the deadliest shootings in Chicago in recent years.Maurice Harris, now 22, was charged in April 2017 with fatally shooting four people at a restaurant in South Shore. He’d been held without bail at the Cook County Jail since his arrest three years ago.Court records show that the charges against Harris — more than two dozen counts of murder, attempted murder and aggravated discharge of a firearm — were dropped at a hearing Wednesday.Killings of four or more people in a single instance are relatively rare in Chicago, though the quadruple murder at Nadia Fish and Chicken occurred during a particularly violent day in South Shore that saw seven people killed in the neighborhood.Related“There was a sense, I think, in the city and the CPD that things were getting really out of hand and they had to do something,” said Ian Barney, one of Harris’ attorneys. “I’m not going to second-guess what they did, because at the end of the day, they had individuals who identified our client in a photo array. But when you take a step back and you look at those identifications, they didn’t make any sense.”Tandra Simonton, a spokeswoman for the state’s attorney’s office, also said in a statement that eyewitness accounts were not found to be reliable.“After a thorough review, which included an additional investigation that was conducted after the charges were filed, we concluded that the totality of the evidence, including eyewitness accounts, was insufficient to meet our burden of proof and we are unable to move forward with the prosecution of this case,” Simonton said. “Today, in the interest of justice, the court granted our motion and all charges related to Harris were dismissed.”Around 3:30 p.m. on March 30, 2017, a gunman walked into the restaurant at 75thStreet and Coles Avenue and opened fire, killing Emmanuel C. Stokes, 28, and 32-year-old Edwin Davis, police said.Dillon Jackson and Raheem Jackson, ages 20 and 19, were visiting their mother while she was working at the restaurant when the gunfire broke out. Both tried to flee but were also fatally shot in nearby parking lots.The Jacksons’ grandmother, Georgia Jackson, told reporters that another grandson of hers, 16-year-old Jawan Ross, was shot and killed at a Church’s Chicken in Englewood in 2011.Harris was arrested and charged less than a week after the shooting.Police at the time said Harris carried out the shooting to avenge his father, Jerry Jacobs, who was shot and killed the day before.Brendan Deenihan, who was then the commander of Area Central detectives and is now the CPD’s chief of detectives, said Jacobs was killed in the 7900 block of South Phillips Avenue on March 29. He was on the sidewalk when four males got out of a dark-colored van and opened fire.“I think a reasonable motive would be that his father got killed and subsequently he shoots and kills these four people,” Deenihan said in 2017. “Does he do that randomly? Only he can answer that question. I wouldn’t suspect he just picked four random people on the street. That wouldn’t make sense to me.”Though Harris did not provide a confession, several eyewitnesses told police Harris was the only shooter, Deenihan said.Barney said that since Harris was charged, he and other defense attorneys uncovered more and more evidence to show that Harris could not have been the shooter and that the witness identifications weren’t credible.“We started building this case for a defense at trial and as we went further down the road, we started accumulating more and more evidence that established that, not only could we win at trial, not only was there reasonable doubt here, but we thought we could prove his innocence,” Barney said.Since he was jailed on the murder charges, Harris was also charged with mob action and public indecency, court records show. With the murder charges dropped, Barney said he expects Harris to be released from jail “relatively soon.”Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Daniel Dahm, Digital Content ManagerDaniel Dahm, Digital Content ManagerSANFORD, Fla.– A man was taken into custody Monday morning after a woman was killed and five others, including two children and a Winter Springs High School student, were critically injured in two shooting incidents described by police as "horrific."Sanford police said Allen D. Cashe was arrested in connection with the shootings, which were reported around 6:20 a.m. on Hays Drive and West 24th Street, a few blocks south of Goldsboro Elementary School.Sanford police said Cashe, who had a relationship with the woman, opened fire at her home, killing her and wounding her father and her boys, ages 7 and 8."I can't stress enough that this scene is one of the worst that our officers and investigators have ever responded to," Sanford spokeswoman Bianca Gillett said. "It's horrific."Family members said the slain mother is Latina Herring, 35, and the two boys are Brendan and Branden Christian. The boys were opening their eyes as of 7:30 p.m., the family said.The children were airlifted to Arnold Palmer Hospital in Orlando and remain in critical condition. Their grandfather, Bertis Gerard Herring Jr., 56,  was taken to Central Florida Regional Hospital with critical injuries, police said.Neighbor Arlene Bush said she heard about 12 gunshots, which made her think the shooter was going from room to room firing the gun.[WEB EXTRA:Florida Coalition Against Domestic Violence]"Excessive amount of blood everywhere," Bush said. "I can't even believe (the grandfather) made it out of the house as bad as he was."Other neighbors were shocked to hear news of the shooting.Police said officers were called to a Wawa gas station in Sanford at 3:20 a.m. because Cashe and Herring were arguing over a set of keys. Sanford Police Chief Cecil E. Smith said Cashe was searched and at the time had no weapons on him or in his vehicle.Cashe and Herring said the argument had not been physical. Officers calmed them down, separated them and left the scene, Smith said.At 3:37 a.m., police received another 911 call, this time from a third party who said a woman was being battered while walking down West 25th Street. While trying to find the victim, later identified as Herring, police received another 911 call saying that the man had a gun, according to a news release.Officials determined that Herring and Cashe were once again involved in a dispute, so they went to the home at 209 Hays Drive and found the pair in the yard arguing about the keys once again, police said.Cashe was searched for a second time and officers determined he had no weapons on him, Smith said.Herring gave the officer a red bag of Cashe's belongings that included a 9 mm Glock handgun, police said. The Glock was not used in the shootings and at no time did Cashe possess or handle it, Smith said.Officials said Cashe was not arrested because the disputes were civil and police had no evidence that any crime had taken place. Smith supported his officer's actions."There is no way for us to predict what was going to take place. We did everything that we believe was possible. We searched him, we searched his vehicle, we searched his surroundings around him as well and no firearm was found," Smith said.Cashe left the area after the second dispute and returned about three hours later with an AK-47 and shot the family, according to a news release.Friends and family said Herring was a loving person who got along with everyone."Basically, just outgoing. Very, very friendly. She'll give you the shirt off her back. It's just, I don't understand. Like everybody else here, I don't understand," Latoya Bedford said.After the first shooting, Cashe then drove to West 24th Street near Marshall Avenue and shot two innocent bystanders, Lazaro Paredesquelite, 43, and Rakeya Jackson, 18, police said.Both were taken to Central Florida Regional Hospital. They are in stable condition, police said.Rayeka attends Winter Springs High School and was waiting for the bus when she was shot, police said.Dominique Smith, another student who was at the bus stop, said the gunman stopped and said, "I'm sorry, but y'all are gonna die," before he fired about 10 shots.Smith said she ran to a nearby house and a neighbor let her inside."I was scared. I was panicking. I was crying. I just didn't know what to do. I just wanted my momma and my dad at the time," she said."I am saddened to hear of the domestic violence-related shooting that took place in Sanford. It appears that three of the victims attend Seminole County Schools and we are working with both the Sanford Police Department and Seminole County Sheriff’s Office to determine the students’ names and schools," said Walt Griffin, superintendent of Seminole County Public Schools. "Grief counselors will be available at all affected schools on Tuesday. Our hearts go out to the families of these young and innocent children."Police said an officer who happened to be in the area heard the gunshots and spotted a man driving from the scene. The man, later identified as Cashe, was taken into custody at the Seminole Garden Apartments, and a firearm was recovered, police said."It's horrific. We are just thankful that we immediately came into contact with this person and took him off the streets before anyone else was injured or possibly lost their life this morning," Gillet said.[PHOTOS:Sanford shooting scenes]Cashe is charged with first degree homicide, four counts of attempted first degree premeditated homicide, one count of second degree attempted homicide, one count of felon with a firearm, and one count of violation of parole - felon with a firearm.Cashe has faced several violent charges in the past, including domestic violence, records show.In one incident in 2013, the victim said Cashe punched her in the face several times and slammed her into a car, according to a report.Four women in Seminole County have filed domestic violence injunctions against Cashe since 2005, court records show.He's also been accused, all in separate incidents within the past seven years, of backhanding a woman, punching a man, smashing the windows of a car with a baseball bat, and pointing a gun at two people while telling them, "If I weren't on county GPS I would pull the trigger and kill both of you," records show.A police investigation into Monday's shootings is ongoing.Copyright 2017 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Daniel started with WKMG-TV in 2000 and became the digital content manager in 2009. When he's not working on ClickOrlando.com, Daniel likes to head to the beach or find a sporting event nearby.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.CLEVELAND, Ohio -- A teenage boy and a man are dead Sunday evening after aquadruple shooting in the city's Kinsman neighborhood, police said.A 17-year-old boy and a 19-year-old man died at University Hospitals, Cleveland police spokesman Det. Reginald Lanton said. The duo was taken by paramedics to the hospital from the shooting scene on the 3000 block of Charles Carr Place, just south of Kinsman Road.The deceased victims' identities have not been released, pending family notifications. The conditions of the other two victims have not been released.The shooting took place about 4:30 p.m., and police cordoned off three separate shooting scenes within a few short blocks of each other. Six shell casings were marked at the intersection of East 75th Street and Kinsman Road.Crime scene investigators collected evidence near a damaged, abandoned black sedan with doors ajar on Charles Carr Avenue, and a pile of clothing and sneakers soaked by the pouring rain was picked up by detectives on a third shooting scene on Bell Avenue, near East 73rd Street.No details about the circumstances surrounding the shooting have been released as of 7 p.m. Sunday. This post will be updated if more information becomes available Sunday night.If you'd like to comment on this post, please visit the cleveland.comcrime and courts comments section.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWATCHVIDEOSHaverstock Hills shooting suspect arrested in Fla..CINCINNATI, OH (FOX19) - The surviving suspect in the Cameo nightclub shooting that killed two men and wounded 15 other people was sentenced to 19 years in prison Friday.In a deal with prosecutors, Cornell Beckley, 28, pleaded not guilty last month to charges of involuntary manslaughter, felonious assault, having weapons under disability, illegal possession of a firearm in a liquor establishment, tampering with evidence, bribery, obstructing justice.Hamilton County Common Pleas Court Judge Steven gave him credit for time already served, 617 days, just over 1 1/2 years.Beckley’s lawyer said he appears to be the only person who is taking responsibility for what happened, noting that one of the men who died was his best friend.“There are many other people who were involved who are at large who are not before the court. ...There are many other people who were involved in this," he told the judge.“Mr. Beckley, do you have any remorse about this?” the judge asked.“Yes, sir,” he responded.“What remorse do you have?”“I am remorseful that I lost my little brother in this situation. I understand what I did," Beckley said.His case took longer than anticipated after prosecutors revealed he tried to bribe witnesses not to testify against him.To date, Beckley is the only surviving suspect charged in the March 26, 2017 shootout at the East End nightclub.About 800 people were inside when a gunfight broke out during a dispute among several people in two feuding groups from Madisonville and Price Hill, authorities have said.Two men were fatally shot: O’Bryan Spikes, 27, and Deondre Davis, 29.Davis and Beckley were charged with murder in Spikes' death.Spikes died at the club; Davis died days later at University of Cincinnati Medical Center.Police also have said they are searching for a third, unidentified suspect.Investigators believe Beckley fired the first shots after he was punched in a fight.He stood on the club stage and fired least four shots from a .25 caliber revolver into the crowd, according to Hamilton County Prosecutor Joe Deters.Davis then fired a .40 caliber Glock at least eight times.Beckley and Davis were not legally allowed to carry firearms, according to Deters.Police recovered both guns along with a 9 mm weapon believed to belong to the unidentified third suspect.The club was supposed to be checking patrons for weapons, but at least three different guns made it inside, Cincinnati police have said.MORE |Court docs: Cameo nightclub shooting suspect tried to pay off witnesses|Second lawsuit filed over Cameo nightclub shootingA gross negligence lawsuit filed last year by Spikes' family accuses club manager Julian Rodgers of created a secretly unsafe atmosphere for patrons by permitting some to bypass security protocols at the entrance and enter without being screened for weapons.Rodgers extracted an additional cover charge from clubgoers to enter through an alternate side entrance where they were permitted in without weapons, according to the suit.The suit also alleges the four off-duty Cincinnati police officers who were working security details outside the club and the city also were negligent, accusing the officers of "turning a blind eye" to the side entrance and patrons paying more to get in with weapons.Cameo Night Cub has a history of gun violence including a shooting inside the club on New Years Day 2015 and a shooting in the parking lot in September of the same year.Police also were called to the club upwards of 100 times since the beginning of 2016, city documents show.Rodgers turned his liquor permit over to authorities the day after the shooting.The club permanently shut down March 31.It was not clear at the time of the shooting why the liquor license was permitted to remain active at the club, given the high number of calls for service and history of violenceThe landlord, The Kellogg Group LLC, failed to terminate its lease with JRODG and/or Cameo despite knowing of repetitive and criminal activity occurring on the premises, or take any reasonable measures to prevent it, the suit alleges.After the shooting, Rodgers released astatement rejecting claimsthat people paid to get into the club without being checked.He remains a prominent Cincinnati nightclub operator and concert promoter, including Migos Jingle Jam concert at U.S. Bank Arena Saturday night.Copyright 2018 WXIX. All rights reserved.635 West Seventh StreetCincinnati, Ohio 45203Main phone: (513) 421-1919Newsroom: (513) 421-0119Newsroom email: desk@fox19now.comA Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.The bullet wasn't meant for Xavier Shell, but it's lodged in his chest, and he may carry it with him for life.The doctors "don't want to take it out because it will do more damage, and it's too close to my heart," the 15-year-old said Thursday, five days after a shootout in Lonsdale Homes killed one man, 28-year-old Dwayne Goines, and sent four others, including Xavier, to hospitals.Xavier's father, Darryl Shell, gave the USA TODAY NETWORK - Tennessee permission to quote his son in this report.Police have saidthey believe the shooting broke out between members of the same gang around 7:15 p.m. Saturday on Minnesota Avenue near Pascal Drive. After the last shot rang out, investigators found more than 80 shell casings on the ground. Authorities haven't released information on the identities or motives of the suspected shooters.► Related:Lonsdale on edge after fatal gang-related shootingXavier, who lives in East Knoxville, was visiting two friends at a home on Pascal Drive. The boys were "laughing and just having fun" playing video games and searching online for videos of Call of Duty — a popular first-person shooting game — when the sound of gunfire erupted outside.More news:Police investigating shooting in East KnoxvilleThe father of one of Xavier's friends yelled at the boys to run upstairs. His friend's mother, gazing out the window, wouldn't look away."She wouldn’t come so I just ran up the steps and I turned left and I hit the floor," Xavier said. "My friends went in the bathroom, so when I got up again, the bullet came through the window and hit me in the arm. But I didn't feel it."Xavier made it into the bathroom before collapsing on the floor.One of his friends held his head while the other applied towels to the wound on his right shoulder.Once the gunfire subsided and Xavier arrived at the University of Tennessee Medical Center with his aunt, Kristi Hodge, he learned the bullet had ricocheted around inside his chest, breaking his third rib on the right side of his body.Xavier said while he felt no pain during the shooting, it now hurts to breathe and move around."This whole thing still hasn’t hit me yet," he said. "I know I got shot and all, but it’s weird."Hodge started aGoFundMe pageto raise $2,500 to cover Xavier's "unforeseen medical expenses, hospital stays and continued therapy."Derick HutchinsonDerick HutchinsonDETROIT– A 19-year-old man was arrested Monday in connection with a quadruple shooting that left three teenagers injured and a 16-year-old boy dead on Detroit's west side.Orlando Grier is accused of fatally shooting the grandson of a former Detroit police captain last  month and injuring three others. He was taken into custody on Monday.Police saidthe shooting was reported March 26 after an argument turned violentnear the old Steve's Soul Food building on Grand River Drive.A 17-year-old girl and two 18-year-old boys were injured after two groups shot at one another from separate vehicles, police said.The 16-year-old victim's grandfather recently retired from the police force.Stay with ClickOnDetroit.com for updates.Copyright 2017 by WDIV ClickOnDetroit - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (313) 222-0566.MenuThree men have been charged for the weekend drive-by shooting that claimed the life of a Cleveland State University professor and one juvenile.Terrell Gray, 25, Charles Walker, 26, and Kassius Williams, 18, are charged with two counts of aggravated murder, two counts of murder committed as a result of discharging a firearm on a public roadway, two counts of murder as a result of felonious assault, two counts of discharging a firearm on a roadway, four counts of assault and one count of improper handling of a firearm in a vehicle.RELATED: Three charged in slaying of Cleveland State University professor after violent weekendThe three men were in a black Volkswagen shooting at three others, including Tywain Johnson, 15, at East 79th and Woodland Avenue on Saturday, March 25 as they were in a maroon Saturn.A stray bullet hit Wilder, 61, in the head while he was in his car. Johnson also died from multiple gunshot wounds.Their arraignment is scheduled for Friday at 8:30 a.m.St. Louis police investigate in the alley behind the 5100 block of Palm St. after a fatal shooting on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comSt. Louis police investigate after a fatal shooting on the 5100 block of Palm St. on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comSt. Louis police investigate in the alley behind the 5100 block of Palm St. after a fatal shooting on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comPolice officers swarmedthe section of Palm Street between Geraldine and Norwood avenueswhere several people were reported to be wounded in a shooting Friday evening. (Photo by Nassim Benchaabane)ST. LOUIS •A 15-year-old boy was killed and six other people, including an 8-year-old boy, were critically wounded in a shooting Friday evening in north St. Louis, police said.Police Lt. John Green said the 8-year-old was shot in the face and was in critical and unstable condition. The other survivors were in critical but stable condition. Those five victims are from 17 to 40 years old, and all are male.The gunfire started about 6:30 p.m. “We don’t know what caused the shooting,” Green said in a briefing at the scene about two hours later. “There was no argument according to witnesses, what little they told us.”He said special operations and district officers who happened to be in the area heard the gunfire and rushed to the scene, which is in the 5100 block of Palm Street between Geraldine and Norwood avenues. The block of apartment buildings is just south of Natural Bridge Avenue near North Kingshighway.Green said several people were outside a building sitting or standing on a porch or on the lawn when the gunfire erupted. Some witnesses said there were three suspects, but Green said that number hadn’t been confirmed. He also said some of the victims were not being cooperative.“When we interviewed some of the victims they didn’t want to say anything,” Green said. Dozens of residents watched as police investigated.One witness said the shooters came out of an apartment building on the block, opened fire at people across the street and then ran through a gangway, into an alley and west on Geraldine Avenue.Green said police needed the public’s help to solve the crime. “We’ll visit the witnesses and victims later on and hopefully they’ll come forward with some information,” he said.In the meantime, he encouraged anyone with information about the shooting to call CrimeStoppers at 1-866-371-8477.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Reporter covering breaking news and crime by night. Born in Algeria but grew up in St. Louis. Previously reported for The Associated Press in Jackson, Mississippi and at the Wichita Eagle in Wichita, Kansas.Christine Byers is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.St. Louis police investigate in the alley behind the 5100 block of Palm St. after a fatal shooting on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comSt. Louis police investigate after a fatal shooting on the 5100 block of Palm St. on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comSt. Louis police investigate in the alley behind the 5100 block of Palm St. after a fatal shooting on Friday, March 24, 2017, in St. Louis, Mo. Photo by Chris Lee,clee@post-dispatch.comPolice officers swarmedthe section of Palm Street between Geraldine and Norwood avenueswhere several people were reported to be wounded in a shooting Friday evening. (Photo by Nassim Benchaabane)Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WESTON - Nengmy Vang told officers surrounding his apartment that he knew murdering four people was wrong, but he also blamed his wife and his victims in a series of profanity-laced tirades before police stormed the building and killed him in a hail of gunfire.During three hours of negotiations, Vang also demanded to talk with television news crews to share his side of the story. His demand was never met.Those were among new details the state Department of Justice released Tuesday about the March 22 shooting spree that left two of Vang's wife's coworkers dead, as well as her divorce attorney and an Everest Metro police detective responding to the call.RELATED:Police justified in killing gunman after March shooting spree, state saysRELATED:Wife details troubles before her husband gunned down 4 peopleRELATED:Laid to rest: Honoring Detective Jason WeilandThe documents, which cleared Marathon County Sheriff's Deputy Matthew Bell and Everest Metro Detective Sgt. Dan Goff of any wrongdoing in firing at Vang, detailed what happened before and during the shootings, including the standoff at the Aspen Street Apartments in Weston. The state released written investigation reports, as well as audio from the negotiations, photo evidence from the crime scene and various video clips including footage from the bank.Everest Metro Police Chief Wally Sparks said the release of the investigative findings may bring mixed emotions for surviving officers, who continue to "put themselves in harm's way" each day to serve the community.Vang, 45, shot and killed Dianne Look and Karen Barclay where they worked at Marathon Savings Bank in Rothschild as others hid his wife, bank teller Naly Vang, in a next-door Subway restaurant, according to police. Nengmy Vang then drove to Schofield and shot and killed his wife's lawyer, Sara Quirt Sann, at her office.Vang retreated to his apartment building in Weston, where he shot Everest Metro Detective Jason Weiland before a three-hour standoff. After police shot Vang, he was treated at Aspirus Wausau Hospital until he died from his wounds early in the morning of April 1.Among the key details released in the report:According to the documents:Rothschild Police officers responded to the bank after Naly Vang called to report that her husband had called at 12:24 p.m., wanting her to sign divorce papers within 24 hours, or he would kill her. Naly Vang asked the officers not to contact Nengmy Vang, as it might anger him further. The officers discussed how to keep Naly Vang safe, and agreed to keep an eye out for Nengmy.The officers then left the bank for their lunch break.At 1 p.m., a 911 dispatcher answered a call from the Subway restaurant, where Naly Vang had run for cover. Naly told the dispatcher that her husband had come to the bank and asked her to sign papers right away.He then asked her if she wanted to die and left to go to his car, she said.Nengmy Vang returned with a black bag that he set on a chair. He pulled out a handgun, appeared to chamber a round, and then began firing, based on bank surveillance video.At that point, dispatchers answered a second 911 call from the bank and heard gunshots and a woman's screams, followed by soft moans and labored breathing. Rothschild Police Officer Trevor Ostrowski responded to River Valley Bank, near where he was eating lunch, but after seeing no disturbance he returned to Marathon Savings Bank where Rothschild Sgt. Jeff Zwicky was already responding. The officers found Look and Barclay critically injured from gunshots, and both later died from their wounds.In an interview on Tuesday, Rothschild Police Chief Jeremy Hunt said the first responding officers took adequate actions that day. He said that things can sometimes get chaotic for officers on a call, especially through communication by radio, which is likely why Ostrowski responded to the wrong scene.Shortly after the 911 calls from the bank, dispatchers took calls made from the law offices of Tlusty, Kennedy & Dirks at 115 Grand Ave. in Schofield, according to the state's release. Nengmy Vang entered the building armed with a handgun and demanded that he be shown to Quirt Sann's office. An employee escorted Vang upstairs, and he followed closely behind with a gun pointed at her back. She showed Vang the office, and she heard Quirt Sann scream, followed by two gunshots.Nengmy Vang fled the law offices in his black Honda Civic, heading for the Aspen Apartments in Weston, where he lived. Sgt. Goff spotted and followed the car. Vang then parked on the grass and sidewalk, close to an entrance door at 4911 Aspen St.The documents say that Detective Weilandarrived in an unmarked car at the scene, where numerous other officers were setting a perimeter. Weiland and another unnamed officer began to put on gear, both directly in the line of fire. As the female officer reached down into the car for equipment, the bullet flew over her and hit Weiland. Sgt. Goff returned fire into a lower-level window of Vang's apartment.The shots started a standoff that lasted three hours, during which Vang called 911 twice. During those calls, the audio from which was released by the Wisconsin Department of Justice, he expressed remorse, saying, "I'm really sorry ... I killed innocent people."But he also cursed about his wife's refusal to grant him an immediate divorce, said he shot her coworkers because they were going to call the police on him, and swore about Quirt Sann's involvement in their dispute.Vang also asked that reporters from Channels 7 and 9 be brought to him, so that he could explain his reasons for committing the murders.Officers and a dispatcher asked Vang multiple times to come out of the apartment but he refused, according to the reports. He became angrier over time and demanded that officers get away from his building. The power was cut off to his apartment, and he demanded it be reconnected or he might shoot again. When a police negotiator told him power would remain disconnected, Vang said, "Too bad for the cop" and made further threats to kill officers, the release said.In an effort to end the standoff, officers used armored cars to pull down parts of an exterior wall. Vang responded with a warning shot into the air, which he said was meant to show he was serious. However, some officers said they heard the shot go over their heads.Police continued to talk through a loudspeaker, which Vang ignored. Officers said they saw Vang in the apartment with a long gun, at which point Bell fired more than two dozen rounds from his AR-15 rifle. Officers went into the apartment and provided first aid and placed Vang in custody, the report said.As Vang was loaded onto a gurney for transport to Aspirus Wausau Hospital, a handgun containing three unfired bullets fell from his pocket.A hospital examination determined that Nengmy Vang was not under the influence of any drugs or alcohol, the report said.Sparks, the Everest Metro chief, said in a Tuesday interview that Sgt. Goff returned to work shortly after the week that the department was given off for Weiland's funeral. He was placed on light duty at first but returned to full duty quickly, as he is the head of the detectives for the department.Sparks said that although the release of the final investigative report will help Police Department employees put the shooting behind them, it will likely conjure up memories of the events of March 22 and especially of Detective Weiland. But, the chief said, it will not keep them from doing their jobs as usual."They're still going to go out, act professionally, and put themselves in harm's way to make sure this community is safe," he said.LOUISVILLE, KY (WAVE) - The coroner has identified a UofL student killed in a shooting at a concert in the Portland neighborhood. She was one of six people shot at the Tim Faulkner Gallery shortly after 1 a.m. on Sunday.Savannah Walker, 20, was one of the hundreds who attended a concert at the venue.LMPD Homicide Commander Lt. Emily McKinley said at a press conference, at this point in the investigation there are more questions than answers. They are looking for whoever is responsible for the shooting that killed Walker.>> PREVIOUS STORY: UofL student killed at Tim Faulkner Art Gallery identified"About 30 days ago she lost her mother, so her father has lost his wife and his daughter within a month time span of each other," Lt. McKinley said.Tim Faulkner, the owner, did not want to talk on camera but posted a statement on the Tim Faulkner Gallery Facebook page.The statement says in part "The tragedy last night came as a shock and we are devastated," and "Our thoughts and prayers go out to the victims and their families."Lt. McKinley said there were five others sent to University Hospital, they are all expected to survive.MORE FROM WAVE3.COM+Identity of victim found in burned car released+LMPD officer arrested on charge of domestic violence+What to expect for President Trump's visit to LouisvilleOne of those injured was woman Quinisha Dishay. Her mother Tawanda Smith said on Sunday her daughter was still in the hospital after being shot in the jaw.The large group was at the gallery for a concert featuring a rap artist, "A Boogie with the Hoodie"F.A.O Entertainment promoted the event, the organization also did not want to talk on camera.WATCH: Andreina Centlivre's report here.Lt. McKinley said they have interviewed dozens of people, but there are many more at the concert that they would like to hear from and they are asking you call 574-LMPD.Copyright 2017WAVE 3 News. All rights reserved.Andreina Centlivre joined the WAVE 3 News team in December 2016 and is excited to be living and working in Louisville.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MenuThe man arrested in connection to the shooting deaths of three people inside a Detroit home has been charged with murder.According to Wayne County Prosecutor Kym Worthy, Demaro Horne, 23, from Southgate, is charged with three counts of open murder, two counts of assault with intent to murder, one count of first degree home invasion, one count of felon in possession of a firearm and one count of felony firearm.It is believed that Horne walked into a home in the 16600 block of Rutherford around 6:10 a.m. Saturday. He allegedly walked into the home, shooting and killing a 60-year-old man, 43-year-old woman and 23-year-old man. A 27-year-old man was also shot in an exchange of gunfire outside of the home.Family members tell us the victims are all relatives. Latisha Davis said her mother, Michelle Davis, grandfather, Robert Pittman and cousin, Darrian Jones were killed.Horne was arraigned on those charges Monday afternoon.NewsFiled under:Four people were wounded Tuesday night in an Auburn Gresham neighborhood drive-by shooting on the South Side.The victims were outside at 7:22 p.m. in the 7600 block of South May when a white vehicle approached and someone inside fired shots, Chicago Police said.A 56-year-old woman was shot in the leg and a 40-year-old man who sustained a graze wound to the head were both taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn where their conditions stabilized, police said.A 36-year-old man was shot in the buttocks and taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition. The fourth victim, a 24-year-old man, was shot in the hand and declined treatment.Early Tuesday, two men were killed in separate shootings in the same neighborhood. Those attacks happened at1:19 a.m.and3:11 a.m.Police have not said if the attacks were related.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.COLUMBUS, GA (WTVM) – Columbus police are searching for the person responsible for a shooting that took place on 32nd Avenue.According to a police report, police were called to Midtown Medical Center regarding a shooting that injured four people on Sunday, March 5 around 3 a.m.This case remains under investigation.Copyright 2017 WTVM. All rights reserved.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.TOPEKA, Kan. (WIBW) - A 19-year-old man has been arrested in a 2017 cold case homicide in Topeka, authorities announced Thursday morning.The arrested man was identified as Javon A. Smith, of Topeka.According to Topeka police, Smith was arrested in connection with the shooting death of Kianna C. Hodge, 18, of Topeka.The incident in which Hodge was killed occurred around 11:45 p.m. on Saturday, March 4, 2017, near S.E. 23rd Street and Bellview Avenue.In all, five adults were injured as a result of the shooting.Hodge was located in a vehicle near S.E. 6th Avenue and Deer Creek Trafficway. She was pronounced dead by medical personnel at the scene.The four other victims sustained injuries that weren’t life-threatening, police said.“Since 2017, investigators have worked diligently to bring justice to Hodge, the four other shooting victims and their families," Topeka Police Chief Bill Cochran said in a news release. "I am pleased that today we can announce we have made an arrest in this case.“Topekans should be very proud of all of the hard work investigators put into this case.”Smith was arrested Thursday and booked into the Shawnee County Jail in connection with first-degree murder and four counts of aggravated battery.Topeka recorded 29 homicides in 2017.The investigation into the incident in which Hodge was killed is ongoing, police said.Anyone with information may call Shawnee County Crime Stoppers at 785-234-0007.Copyright 2020 WIBW. All rights reserved.Police: Victims stepped outside of party when they were shotSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Police: Victims stepped outside of party when they were shotFour men were injured Saturday night in a drive-by shooting outside of a quinceañera, the Sacramento Police Department said.The men were taken to the hospital for treatment and are expected to survive, police said.The shooting happened around 7:30 p.m. in the 2500 block of 33rd Street.The men stepped outside of the birthday party at the Immaculate Conception Pastoral Center to smoke when they were shot, police said.No arrests have been made yet. A suspect and vehicle description were not released.The investigation into the shooting is ongoing.No other details were released.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.WATCHVIDEOS4 people shot outside bar in East Mt. Airy4 people shot outside bar in East Mount Airy after argument turned physical. One victim was a bartender trying to calm everyone down.This car crashed 6 blocks from quadruple shooting in East Mt Airy. 26 yr old man in critical condition in backseat.pic.twitter.com/djAaiWZ5PtTrending:Five people were shot after a fight at a party in Riverside’s Arlanza neighborhood on Friday evening, March 3, a police official confirmed.Officer Ryan Railsback said all five people were at hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries.He said the shooting was reported shortly before 10:30 p.m. at a home in the 8300 block of Trey Avenue and that several people were reported fleeing the scene.As officers arrived and began securing the area, they received a call that four people had been brought to a hospital for gunshot wounds. A fifth person was at another hospital, he said.He said a suspect has not yet been identified.Railsback encouraged anyone with information about the shooting to contact the Riverside Police Department at 951-826-5700.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Police say all injuries are non-life-threateningPolice say all injuries are non-life-threateningSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Police say all injuries are non-life-threateningPolice said six people were shot Tuesday night in Northside.Cincinnati police responded around 10 p.m. to the 1700 of Casey Drive for reports of a shooting.According to authorities, the shooter shot multiple rounds into a residence, mostly into the second floor.Four of the victims, three men ages 16, 21 and 22 and an 18-year-old woman, were transported from the scene to UC Medical Center with non-life-threatening injuries, police said. Another victim showed up to the hospital later and is also expected to survive.A sixth victim, male, went to Mercy West with three gunshot wounds. His injuries were also non-life-threatening.Police said they do not have any information on a suspect.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.MenuNEWPORT NEWS, Va. - Four people were shot at the City Center of Oyster Point in Newport News, just outside of the Paragon Theaters.Police say the call for a drive-by shooting came in just before 1 a.m. Monday morning at the 11800 block of Fountain Way.Police and EMS surrounded the area where a black car was parked in the middle of the street. Another area marked off with crime scene tape was directly across from the location of the shooting where movie-goers park.When police arrived at the scene they found two females and a male with gunshot wounds to the leg areas. A third female showed up at the hospital by private vehicle.Police say the female victims are 16-, 19-, and 22-years-old. The male victim is 21-years-old.Authorities say none of the injuries of the four are considered life-threatening. Also all four victims are not cooperating with police.Police believe the shooting was not a random incident. A statement from Police Chief Richard Myers says the four were in the presence of the likely target of the assault.Starting Monday night Newport News police announced they were adding a foot patrol to the area in addition to ongoing vehicle patrols. The foot patrols will be out during the evening to early-morning hours every day.Police say the only violent acts to hit City Center in 2016 happened outside of the busy retail area.Police are continuing to investigate, but there is no suspect information at this time. Anyone with information is asked to call the Crime Line at 1-800-LOCK-U-UP.Report a typoChauncey HackettCROWN POINT — An East Chicago man was sentenced Tuesday to three years in a work-release program followed by probation for his role in a shootout that left one man dead and wounded him and three others.Chauncey L. Hackett Jr., 28, admitted he shot at a Gary police officer Feb. 26, 2017, outside the Top Shelf nightclub at West 17th Avenue and Grant Street, records show.The police officer returned fire, striking Hackett in the neck, according to a plea agreement. Hackett, who has a felony conviction from 2014, was found lying on top of his gun.Dvontai Wright, 25, of Griffith, was killed in the shootout at the club, which also has been known as Hustle and Joe's. Investigators recovered more than 80 spent shell casings from the scene, defense attorney John Cantrell said.It could not be determined who shot Wright, but it was undisputed that Hackett was not legally entitled to possess a gun because he was a felon, Lake County Supervisory Deputy Prosecutor Michelle Jatkiewicz said.A total of two Gary officers discharged their weapons, but neither of them was wounded, police said.Cantrell asked Lake Criminal Judge Samuel Cappas to show his client leniency because Hackett's wounds were life-threatening and he's unlikely to come before the court again.Two bullets remain lodged in Hackett's spine and could cause paralysis if Hackett "turns the wrong way," Cantrell said.Hackett pleaded guilty in November to a level 3 felony count of attempted aggravated battery and a level 5 felony count of carrying a handgun without a license.Jatkiewicz said Sgt. Tommie Tatum, the officer at whom Hackett shot, accepted the plea agreement largely because of Hackett's medical status."There is no doubt as (Hackett) sits here today he is a different man than he was when he was shooting at police," she said.Cantrell downplayed Hackett's previous felony conviction for assisting a criminal in an East Chicago homicide case and said he lost Wright, his best friend, in the Gary shootout.The doctors aren't going to remove the bullets in Hackett's spine, he said."Essentially, what he has is a life sentence," Cantrell said.Hackett initially declined to make a statement, but changed his mind after Cappas made a comment about remorse.Cantrell said Hackett has been depressed about his medical status and the loss of Wright.Hackett said he was celebrating his birthday the night of the shootout and didn't go to the bar looking for a fight."I didn't take a gun to the bar," he said.Cappas asked if the gun magically appeared in his hand.Hackett said it was "already on the ground."Cappas sentenced Hackett to nine years for aggravated battery and three years for the handgun count. He ordered Hackett be placed in the Lake County Community Corrections work-release program in Crown Point for three years, with an option for home detention at a later date. Hackett is to serve the remainder of his sentence on probation.After the hearing, Cantrell said Cappas showed leniency and he thought it was a fair sentence.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Lake County Courts and Social Justice ReporterSarah covers crime, courts and public safety. She began her career at The Times in 2004. Contact her at sarah.reese@nwi.com or 219-933-3351.CROWN POINT — An East Chicago man faces up to 10 years in prison after pleading guilty to a reduced charge in a shootout with police outside a…GARY — A 26-year-old man is accused of shooting at a police officer trying to break up a large crowd outside a nightclub earlier this year as …CROWN POINT | An East Chicago man was sentenced Tuesday to eight years in prison for his role in a brawl that left a man dead.A father who allegedly was high on heroin when his two young sons drowned in the Kankakee River in may be considering a plea offer.A father who allegedly was high on heroin when his two young sons drowned in the Kankakee River in may be considering a plea offer.The 14-year-old had no shoes on in the cold when he flagged down police and said his mother was "drunk and mad," court records allege.The 14-year-old had no shoes on in the cold when he flagged down police and said his mother was "drunk and mad," court records allege.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WYTVby:Brendan O'haraWARREN, Ohio (WYTV) – The Howland man accused ofkilling two people and injuring three othersduring a shooting at his property in February was back in a Trumbull County Courtroom Wednesday afternoon.Nasser Hamad was joined by two additional attorneys at the defense table — Robert Dixon and David Doughten, both criminal defense attorneys from Cleveland.His new trial date was set for October 10.Hamad’s attorneys were also given a deadline of June 30 to file any additional motions in the case.Hamad is facing two counts of capital murder and three counts of attempted murder stemming from the shooting at his property off Route 46.Joshua Williams, 20, and Josh Harber, 19, were killed. Three others were injured.Prosecutors have said Hamad challenged the group to a fight before the shooting.After the initial confrontation ended, prosecutors say Hamad went back into his house, got his gun and came back outside shooting at their vehicle.His family said, however, thatHamad was acting in self defense.“Five people jumped one guy. Luckily, he’s still alive. He goes and… defends himself. Unfortunately, two people got shot and died,” said Hamad’s brother, Mike Hamad. “What would you do?”Hamad will be back in court on July 21 for a hearing on the motions.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.YOUNGSTOWN, Ohio (WKBN) — A man found on a north side street Friday evening with gunshot wounds is in stable condition at St. Elizabeth Health Center.Lt. Ramon Cox of the Detective Bureau said investigators do not know where the man was shot, but he was found about 9 p.m. after officers received a call of a shooting in the 700 block of Broadway Avenue.SALEM, Ohio (WKBN) - Salem Regional Medical Center is holding a COVID-19 vaccine clinic on Wednesday, April 14.The clinic, which begins at 8 a.m., is by appointment only. The Moderna vaccine will be given to those who have registered and who are 18 and older.YOUNGSTOWN, Ohio (WKBN) - Friday was the first night Utopia has been open since a shooting last Friday that killed one man and wounded two others.About a dozen family members and friends of Charles Allen, Jr., the man killed in the shooting, gathered in the front parking lot of Utopia from about 8-10 p.m.Destiny McKeiverDestiny McKeiverJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– A man was killed and four other people injured early Saturday afternoon when shots were fired as rap musicians were beginning to record a music video near the intersection where Moncrief Road, Myrtle Avenue and West 26th Street meet, according to the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.Police said ane person was found dead about 1 p.m. in front of Holley's Bar-B-Q. Family has identified the man as Kyree Corley, 22. Two others were taken to UF Health Jacksonville by rescue personnel and two more by personal vehicles. Police said three of those injured had minor injuries, but one was taken into surgery.Police did not know how many shots were fired, how many shooters were involved, the type of weapon used or even if the gunfire came from someone at the event or driving by.A man told News4Jax his brother was dropped off to watch the video being made. He then got a phone call to say he was dead."I heard screaming and people was running once I got out of the store," said one man who did not want to be identified.Police blocked off about a four-block scene as a crime scene, much of which remains closed to traffic through late Saturday night.About 30 people gathered at the time and many of those were shooting video on their phones, police said. Homicide investigators are asking people to provide those videos to police to help them find out who did the shooting.Police did not know the names of the rap artists involved, or if anyone was targeted.News4Jax learned that a music video shoot featuring Boosie Badazz and Baby Soulja was scheduled to take place in the area at the time of the shooting.Boosie was also scheduled to perform Saturday night at Pure Nightclub. News4Jax was asked to leave the property. Management said the concert was to go on despite the shooting earlier in the day.Police ask anyone with information or a video shot at the scene to contact the JSO at 904-630-0500 or CrimeStoppers at 866-845-TIPS.Copyright 2017 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.An eruption of violence that left nine injured across Rochester this week raised the specter of one of the city's more brazen and deadly mass shootings, and shattered a period of relative calm."Your heart is broken," Mayor Lovely Warren said Thursday. "We have worked so hard, as a city and a community, to reduce gun violence, reduce violence across the board."The series of incidents during a nine-hour stretch on Wednesday was punctuated byan apparent drive-by shootingon Genesee Street in southwest Rochester that left four injured. Among them was a man who, two years ago and a half mile away, allegedly was caught on video shooting back at suspects in the Boys & Girls Club drive-by that leftthree dead and four injured."At this point, we do not have any evidence to link the mass shooting from 2015 to the shooting that occurred last night," police Investigator Jacqueline Shuman said in an emailed statement Thursday.Quartermaine D. Titus, 33, was shot in the lower body at 8 p.m. Wednesday, near the intersection of Kirkland Road, police said. He is not accused of injuring anyone back in 2015 but is awaiting sentencing in the case, having pleaded guilty to a  felony weapons charge, according to the Monroe County District Attorney's Office.Other incidents Wednesday included a man dropped off near Strong Memorial Hospital with multiple gunshot wounds, an apparent robbery-turned-shooting on the city's northeast side and, separately, a fight that resulted in a double stabbing and ended with two women hit by a car. None of the injuries of the combined nine victims are considered life threatening, and police do not think the incidents are related."It doesn't seem to end," said City Council President Loretta Scott.Yet Rochester was seeing a decline in shootings and homicides thus far in 2017, Warren said, having recorded one homicide as of Thursday compared to seven by this time in 2016. There were 42 reported homicides in the city in all of last year, the highest rate in six years and and a 27 percent jump from 2015's homicide tally of 33.Seeking to quell the violence, police have focused on getting ahead of disputes, on the street and on social media. That didn't work on Wednesday."I specifically asked a question to the chief yesterday, 'Did we hear chatter about this? Was there anything that we could have known to try and prevent this?'" the mayor said. "And his answer to me was, 'No,' from what he had been able to ascertain at that point."For neighbors and other city residents, the violence — while concerning in such concentration — was taken in context, and not alarming."There's no more violence here than say in parts of the suburbs," said Lonnie Pollocks, who has operated an auto shop on Genesee Street for three decades. "We just get a bad name."When Sonia Ramirez moved to Rochester six years ago, she and her husband settled into a house just off Genesee Street, near Wilson Foundation Academy. But then her husband was caught in the crosshairs of a drive-by shooting while entering a convenience store on Genesee."He was fine but that was it," she said. "We moved after that."They didn't move that far, settling in some blocks north. When she heard of the spate of incidents Wednesday, Ramirez said she became concerned for her former neighbors and friends in the area. She said she'd love to see more officers patrolling. While others pointed to the disheartening choices of those involved, as Keisha Colbert of Rochester said some let small spats fester into bigger disagreements and violent irreversible acts."I call it the matrix," Colbert said. People need to "pay attention to what's real and what's not."Colbert, a mother of six, said she typically keeps to her own circle of friends and family. But each morning, she rises before dawn to walk in her neighborhood off Genesee Street. While walking, she will often burn sage or flash a smile at a passer-by or hug a stranger. Her goal? Help spread a calmness in the community."I'm the person who gives out the extra love," she said. "Some people don't get it otherwise."Police have identified many of those injured:►India Roberts, 19, and Marzel Miller, 17, both of Rochester,were shot on Fourth Streetin northeast Rochester. Police responded to the scene around 2 p.m. after it was reported multiple shots were fired in the area. Roberts was shot in the upper body and taken by ambulance to Strong Memorial Hospital for treatment. Miller was shot in the lower body and dropped off at Rochester General Hospital by a private vehicle.Warren referred to the matter as a possible robbery. Police on Thursday said they had no suspects in custody.►Michael Cooper, 26, of Rochester, was shot multiple times before he was dropped off around 3:30 p.m. on Norfolk Street, which is justsouth of Strong Memorial Hospital. The case remains under investigation,but police do not believe he was shot on Fourth Street (or Norfolk Street).  Cooper was taken to Strong for treatment.3 people shot in 2 incidents in RochesterFour people shot on Genesee Street in Rochester►Along with Titus, police identified the other four people shot on Genesee Street as Samuel Maxwell, 27, shot in the upper body, and Russell Brown, 32, and Jarvis Porter, 34, both shot in the lower body. All are from Rochester. All four were taken to Strong for treatment.►Shavorie Nesmith and Shakqueen Nesmith, both 21 and from Rochester, allegedly were involved in a fight near Carter Street and Roycroft Drive, and were each stabbed at least once in the upper body. They got into a car and drove away from the fight but struck several uninvolved cars, two pedestrians and a tree, police said. They allegedly left the scene before police arrived and went by private vehicle to Rochester General Hospital.►Jasmine Ellis, 24, and Airionna Corbit, 20, both of Rochester, were the two pedestrians injured. Both sustained minor injuries and were treated at Strong. Police said they were not involved in the earlier fight.Rochester police continue to investigate each of the incidents. No charges have been filed in connection with any of the shootings or stabbings.Includes reporting by staff writer Will Cleveland.BDSHARP@Gannett.comVFREILE@Gannett.comTravis PryorCLEVELAND, Ohio -- Four people were shot after a fight broke out at a bar in Cleveland's Kamm's Corners neighborhood, police said.Travis Pryor, 27, of Euclid, is charged with felonious assault in the shooting. He is expected to make his first court appearance Wednesday.Pryor, a concealed carry permit holder, told police he fired the shots in self-defense after he was punched at Red Bar on Lorain Avenue near Rocky River Drive.The fight broke out about 1:30 a.m., police reports say. Pryor told police he got into a fight with a 28-year-old man wearing a Pittsburgh Pirates shirt. He said the man punched him in the face during the argument, according to police reports.Pryor said was afraid for his safety, pulled out his .40-caliber handgun and fired several shots, according to police reports. He dropped his gun in the parking lot and drove off with three others, police reports say.The 28-year-old man was shot in the stomach and left wrist. Bullets also hit a 25-year-old Lakewood woman in the right foot, a 25-year-old Cleveland woman in the right calf and a 24-year-old Cleveland woman in the right shin, according to police.Several people told police they went to break up the fight when they were hit by the bullets.A witness told police that the man who fired the shots left in a sedan. Shortly after, the witness alerted police at the scene that the car drove by the bar as they stood in the parking lot.Officers jumped into their cruisers and chased after the car, but lost sight of it, police reports say. Not long after, another officer spotted the car at the Sunoco gas station on Warren and Greenway roads.Police interviewed the Pryor and took gunshot-residue tests from him and a 42-year-old man driving the car, police reports say.Officers reported finding heroin and cocaine and a digital scale inside the 42-year-old man's car. He admitted the drugs were his, according to police reports. He was arrested but has not been formally charged.Police found several bullet casings outside the bar, but were unable to find Pryor's gun, police reports say.If you'd like to comment on this story, visit Tuesday'scrime and courts comments section.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFox 8 Cleveland WJWby:fox8webcentralCLEVELAND, Ohio — Police now say five people were shot in an incident on Cleveland’s east side Monday night.It happened in the East 105th Street and Ostend Avenue area at just after 8 p.m. Monday.Police were originally called to reports of one juvenile who had been shot. They then learned there were multiple victims.Police believe the victims were leaving a supermarket at 1082 East 105th Street when an unknown person began shooting from a vehicle.Police report that the bullets came from inside a silver, mid-sized car with dark, tinted windows.A 14-year-old female was shot in the leg, a 16-year-old male was shot in the foot, and a 15-year-old female and 17-year-old female were shot in the legs.A 30-year-old man was also shot in the knee.In a separate incident just before 8 p.m., a 16-year-old boy was shot in the stomach in the 3800 block of East 149th Street. Witnesses say he was with a group of other males in Glendale Park when it happened.Police provided medical attention until an ambulance arrived, and he was taken to the hospital. The boy’s condition is not known.Read more here.SubmitCOLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.MenuNORFOLK, Va. - Norfolk Police are investigating a Sunday evening shooting that killed one man and sent three other people to the hospital with injuries.Police have identified the male victim as 28-year-old Thomas Leroy Hicks of Norfolk.According to police, 911 calls for the shooting came in around 7:45 p.m. Sunday evening. Eyewitness told News 3's Merris Badcock there were so many gunshots, it sounded like a machine gun outside."We were enjoying Sunday dinner at my mother’s house, when I had to slam and lock the door, tell everybody to drop," said Queen Sheena, who lives nearby. "I thought we were being bombed."Police say gunshots were fired from several cars traveling on Church Street on Sunday evening. Police say Hicks was driving a vehicle, and was hit with at least one bullet.According to eyewitnesses, Hicks drove a couple blocks before crashing into an apartment complex on the corner of East Princess Anne Road and Church Street.Evidence left over from the quadruple shooting/car crash in Norfolk.https://t.co/PvdsPGy70L@WTKR3pic.twitter.com/JE8Ga0OixM— Merris Badcock (@MerrisBadcock)February 20, 2017Medics pronounced Hicks dead at the scene.Sheena was one of the first witnesses to the scene, and found Hicks inside his vehicle."Me and my cousin ran over. She is an R.N. She was like, 'I can help,' but once we saw him, we could not do anything but back away," said Sheena.While investigating the area, officers found three females who had been shot during the incident. Police believe all of the female victims were inside vehicles exchanging gunfire and were not bystanders.Police say one woman is still in critical condition, but another woman and a 17-year-old girl have been released from the hospital.Police say they believe this is an isolated incident and there is no ongoing threat to the public.The incident has Sheena and a few other neighbors taking to the streets to preach a message of peace."It is devastating, because our children were just outside riding bikes where the shooting actually occurred, where the shells were found," said Sheena, who also owns a nonprofit called Queens Helping Queens Supported by The King.She calls the shooting senseless. "If you do not know how to talk out your issues, you need to go see someone and help work it out,' she said, holding a megaphone in her hand. "We need to put the guns down."Anyone with information that can help police identify the suspect(s), is asked to call the Crime Line at 1-888-LOCK-U-UP.Report a typoWATCHVIDEOS4 teen boys shot in West PhiladelphiaSt. Joseph County Metro Homicide investigates a fatal shooting on Yukon Street, near Riverside Drive, Saturday, Feb. 18, 2017, in South Bend. Tribune Photo/ROBERT FRANKLINSt. Joseph County Metro Homicide investigates a fatal shooting on Yukon Street, near Riverside Drive, Saturday, Feb. 18, 2017, in South Bend. Tribune Photo/ROBERT FRANKLINSt. Joseph County Metro Homicide investigates a fatal shooting on Yukon Street, near Riverside Drive, Saturday, Feb. 18, 2017, in South Bend. Tribune Photo/ROBERT FRANKLINSt. Joseph County Metro Homicide investigates a fatal shooting on Yukon Street, near Riverside Drive, Saturday, Feb. 18, 2017, in South Bend. Tribune Photo/ROBERT FRANKLINSOUTH BEND — A man was killed and two men and a woman were injured in a shooting early Saturday morning on the city's near northwest side, and the suspects remain at large.The shooting, detected by gunfire sensors at 1:53 a.m. on the 1000 block of Yukon Street, led to the death of Michael Willie Briggs, 24, of South Bend, according to a press release from the St. Joseph County Metro Homicide Unit, which is handling the investigation. Briggs was pronounced dead after being transported to Memorial Hospital.The three other victims, who received gunshot wounds, were transported to the hospital for treatment. The male victims, both 24, are Jermaine Todd, of South Bend, and Stacie Langford, of Benton Harbor. Monice Teasley, 34, of South Bend, is the other victim.Todd and Langford were initially listed as being in critical condition with life-threatening injuries, but their condition was upgraded to stable. Teasley was treated for injuries and released from the hospital.The homicide unit, which interviewed several witnesses, collected evidence for much of the day at the two-block crime scene along Yukon Street from Portage Avenue to Riverside Drive. Several roads in the normally quiet neighborhood were blocked off.The crime scene attracted the attention of neighbors and passersby who speculated on what happened. One neighbor heard shots being fired and saw two men carrying another man down Yukon. However, they dropped him when they heard police converging on the scene.An autopsy will be done on Monday morning in Kalamazoo.Those with information about the incident are encouraged to contact St. Joseph County Metro Homicide at (574) 235-5009 or Michiana Crime Stoppers at (574) 288-STOP.Tribune staff writer Ed Semmler contributed to this report.Success!An email has been sent with a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.The news you need to start your day, sent weekday mornings.The day's top 5 news headlines, sent weekday evenings.Noe Chavez, 20, was arrested on Friday, Feb. 24, as a suspect in a multiple shooting on Feb. 15 in Salinas Chinatown.On Feb. 15, officers responded to a ShotSpotter activation and found four victims, including a 60-year-old woman, suffering from non-life threatening wounds.The shooting investigation identified Chavez as one of the shooters, according to the Salinas Police Department.The Salinas Police Mobile Command Center was parked at the intersection of Lake and Soledad streets due to the recent violence in the area. Officers working in the command center recognized Chavez walking in the area and placed him into custody.On Friday evening, Noe Chavez was being charged with four counts of attempted homicide, according to a police press release.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.COOK COUNTY CRIMINAL COURTHOUSE — An Englewood man has been charged in the Brighton Park shootout thatkilled three men and left two woundedFeb. 15.Torrence Reese, 18, was denied bail Tuesday on charges of first-degree murder, attempted first-degree murder and armed robbery.According to prosecutors, Reese and 19-year-old Julian Miller went to an apartment in the 3900 block of South Albany Avenue about 2:45 p.m. Feb. 15 hoping to buy two ounces of marijuana for $400.At the apartment lived brothers Emmanuel Camacho, 18, and Filogonio Rivera, 20, who were known to have guns and occasionally sell marijuana, Assistant State's Attorney Holly Grosshans said during a bond hearing Tuesday.Reese had reached out to a witness — a friend from high school — who arranged a deal for Reese, Miller, Camacho and Rivera, prosecutors said.On Feb 15, Reese, Miller and the witness began smoking marijuana inside a bedroom at Camacho and Rivera's apartment as the brothers played video games, Grosshans said. The group reportedly discussed the purchase of marijuana.At some point, the witness felt nauseous and left the bedroom to get a glass of water, prosecutors said.That's when multiple shots rang out from inside the bedroom.As the witness tried to flee the apartment, prosecutors said, Reese ran out of the bedroom with a gun and fired multiple shots toward the witness, who was struck in his hip and left leg.According to Grosshans, the witness was able to hide in the building's basement, where he heard additional shots and a "physical scuffle" coming from Camacho and Rivera's apartment.UPDATE: 5 people shot, 3 dead, 2 in critical in Brighton Park homepic.twitter.com/tnmmYwTNzVReese soon fled the building, got into his car and circled the block — apparently waiting for Miller to run outside and get in the car, prosecutors said.When that didn't happen, Reese drove himself to a nearby Dunkin' Donuts, handed his car keys to an employee and said his sister would be back for the vehicle, Grosshans said. The employee called 911; Reese had been shot in his buttocks and right arm. In court Tuesday, Reese said he spent nine days in a hospital following the shooting.Neighbors soon found Miller laying dead on a porch next to a bag of marijuana, prosecutors said. Camacho and Rivera were discovered dead inside their apartment, where each man had been shot multiple times.According to Grosshans, police recovered a bloody 9mm handgun and a bag of marijuana inside Reese's car.Officers on the scene found five 9mm shell casings and one live round, authorities said. The surviving witness, who'd been taken to a hospital in critical condition for his gunshot wounds, later identified Reese as the shooter.Reese, of the 900 block of West 68th Street, has no criminal history as an adult, prosecutors said.Defense attorney Mitchell Kreiter in court Tuesday described the shooting as mutual combat — telling Cook County Judge Peggy Chiampas that officers found another gun on the scene.Miller and Reese were close friends, Kreiter said. Miller's mother was among 15 people who wrote letters to Judge Chiampas praising Reese's character and asking for a lenient bond.Kreiter also argued for a low bond, and began to suggest police officers charged with murder receive more lenient bonds than civilians."I don't want to be a smart aleck," Kreiter said, "but people come in here in uniforms —"The judge cut him off."I am offended by that comment because in this courtroom, in front of me, that's irrelevant," Chiampas said. "Everybody in my courtroom is treated equally."After taking a brief recess to read the 15 letters, Chiampas told Reese he was "one lucky man" for having so many friends and relatives write "very heartfelt letters" on his behalf.Chiampas denied Reese bail, noting, "There are three people that died, and one of them is your friend."Next inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkNext inBack of the Yards & Brighton ParkCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.Choose your cartChoose your cartFios offers the fastest, most reliable internet with bandwidth for multiple devices and 4K-
    compatible TV picture quality.Fast upload speeds that are a close match to its download speeds. This means you can stream with virtually no
    buffering.Try our most powerful internet, great for virtually lag-free gaming and tech-forward household, or if you just want
    the best.Get more while paying less. Save up to $30/mo when you combine your wireless plan with a Fios Internet plan.Hurry. Offer ends 4.14.21.Stream and download movies, shows and photos.$39.99Per month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.discovery+:Get 3 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios 200/200 Mbps internet plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 3-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 3-month subscription of PS Plus and one 3-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 3-month PS Plus and PS Now subscriptions auto-renew separately every 3 months for $24.99+tax each. See play.st/PSPlus3M and play.st/PSNow3M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new res. custs. $15/mo. router charge applies. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing required. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. Fios avail. in select areas. Wired speeds advertised. Wireless speeds may vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Great for multiple users, binge streaming and sharing large files.$59.99Per month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.discovery+:Get 6 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios 400/400 Mbps internet plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 6-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 3-month subscription of PS Plus and one 3-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 3-month PS Plus and PS Now subscriptions auto-renew separately every 3 months for $24.99+tax each. See play.st/PSPlus3M and play.st/PSNow3M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new custs. $15/mo. router charge applies. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing required. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. Fios avail. in select areas. Wired speeds advertised. Wireless speeds may vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Ideal for a virtually seamless entertainment experience. Up to 940/880 Mbps.$79.99$74.99$79.99Limited time offer:$5 off for 24 monthsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes.discovery+:Get 12 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios Gigabit Connection plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 12-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.Verizon Gift Card:Must install & maintain eligible Fios services in good standing for 65 days & register for the card w/in 60 days thereafter, or by no later than 10.12.21, whichever is first. Card mailed within 30 days of registration. We reserve the right to chargeback the amount of the Card if eligible service is canceled w/in 180 days. Other card terms and conditions apply. Offer ends 5.12.21.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 12-month subscription of PS Plus and one 12-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 12-month PS Plus and PS Now subscription will auto-renew separately every 12-months for $59.99+tax/yr. each. See play.st/PSPlus12M and play.st/PSNow12M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Stream TV:Limited-time offer via the Fios accessories website. Customer will receive a redemption email once installation is complete and must redeem the offer w/in 60 days of receipt of email.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new custs. Availability varies. Gigabit network connection to your home. Wired speeds up to 940/880 Mbps with avg. speeds betw. 750-940 Mbps download / 750-880 Mbps upload. Wired & wireless speeds vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing req’d. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Stream and download movies, shows and photos.$39.99Per month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.discovery+:Get 3 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios 200/200 Mbps internet plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 3-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 3-month subscription of PS Plus and one 3-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 3-month PS Plus and PS Now subscriptions auto-renew separately every 3 months for $24.99+tax each. See play.st/PSPlus3M and play.st/PSNow3M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new res. custs. $15/mo. router charge applies. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing required. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. Fios avail. in select areas. Wired speeds advertised. Wireless speeds may vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Great for multiple users, binge streaming and sharing large files.$59.99Per month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes & equip. charges.discovery+:Get 6 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios 400/400 Mbps internet plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 6-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 3-month subscription of PS Plus and one 3-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 3-month PS Plus and PS Now subscriptions auto-renew separately every 3 months for $24.99+tax each. See play.st/PSPlus3M and play.st/PSNow3M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new custs. $15/mo. router charge applies. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing required. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. Fios avail. in select areas. Wired speeds advertised. Wireless speeds may vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Ideal for a virtually seamless entertainment experience. Up to 940/880 Mbps.$79.99$74.99$79.99Limited time offer:$5 off for 24 monthsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes.Offer detailsPer month w/ Auto Pay + taxes.discovery+:Get 12 mos. of discovery+ (Ad-Free) service w/ purchase and installation of new Fios Gigabit Connection plan. Must purchase Fios plan by 5.12.21 and complete offer redemption with discovery+ w/in 60 days of Fios installation or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Must be 18 yrs. of age or older. After 12-month promo period ends, your discovery+ (Ad-Free) subscription will auto-renew at $6.99+ tax/mo. unless you cancel w/ Verizon. Cancel any time. One offer per eligible Verizon account. discovery+ service is subject to the discovery+ (ad-free) Visitor Agreement. Offer valid 1.4.21 – 5.12.21. © 2021 Discovery or its subsidiaries and affiliates.Verizon Gift Card:Must install & maintain eligible Fios services in good standing for 65 days & register for the card w/in 60 days thereafter, or by no later than 10.12.21, whichever is first. Card mailed within 30 days of registration. We reserve the right to chargeback the amount of the Card if eligible service is canceled w/in 180 days. Other card terms and conditions apply. Offer ends 5.12.21.PlayStation:Must install qualifying Fios services to redeem. One 12-month subscription of PS Plus and one 12-month subscription of PS Now available via voucher code (instructions sent by Verizon after installation is complete); code must be redeemed w/in 60 days of email delivery or by no later than 8.12.21, whichever is first. Unless canceled, 12-month PS Plus and PS Now subscription will auto-renew separately every 12-months for $59.99+tax/yr. each. See play.st/PSPlus12M and play.st/PSNow12M for details. Limit one offer per eligible Verizon account. Offer valid 3.18.21 – 5.12.21. “PlayStation”, “PlayStation Family Mark”, “PS5”, “PS4”, “PS3”, and “PS2” are registered trademarks, and “PSN” is a service mark of Sony Interactive Entertainment Inc. All rights reserved. Sony Interactive Entertainment LLC is not a sponsor of this promotion.Stream TV:Limited-time offer via the Fios accessories website. Customer will receive a redemption email once installation is complete and must redeem the offer w/in 60 days of receipt of email.Fios:Offer valid thru 5.12.21 for eligible new custs. Availability varies. Gigabit network connection to your home. Wired speeds up to 940/880 Mbps with avg. speeds betw. 750-940 Mbps download / 750-880 Mbps upload. Wired & wireless speeds vary due to device limits, multiple users, network & other factors. SeeVerizon.com/yourspeedfor more info. $99 setup and taxes & terms may apply. Auto Pay & paper-free billing req’d. Subj. to credit approval & may require a deposit. © 2021 Verizon.Setup charge:Waived for online orders.Get great entertainment and more savings with Fios.Play more with two streaming services packed with games. Get PlayStation Plus and PlayStation Now on us for 12 months. Then, each $59.99/yr after.Check availabilityGet a $100 Verizon Gift card with Fios Gigabit Connection. Shop online or in-store for the best deals on the
        latest tech gadgets and hottest gaming accessories.Check availabilitySave up to $20/mo with select plans when you enroll in Mobile + Home Rewards through Verizon Up.Check availabilityGet great entertainment and more savings with Fios.Play more with two streaming services packed with games. Get PlayStation Plus and PlayStation Now on us for 12 months. Then, each $59.99/yr after.Check availabilityGet a $100 Verizon Gift card with Fios Gigabit Connection. Shop online or in-store for the best
                        deals on the
                        latest tech gadgets and hottest gaming accessories.Check availabilitySave up to $20/mo with select plans when you enroll in Mobile + Home Rewards through Verizon UpCheck availabilityStart choosing your package
    today.March 21, 2017GREENVILLE, Fla. (WCTV) -- The Madison County Sheriff's Office has charged two suspects in a drive-by shooting last month in Greenville that sent five people to the hospital.The shooting occurred around 8 p.m. on February 12th on Church Avenue and Obadiah Street.Suspects Ronterious Rashad Arnold, 19, and Cedrick Terrell Brown, 23, were arrested in Greenville on Tuesday following an investigation.During the suspects' arrests, deputies also observed marijuana, 'Spice,' and packaging materials commonly used for illegal drug distribution in plain view at the residence, resulting in the arrest of two additional suspects, Tikeosha Qashe Arnold, 18, and Roosevelt Arnold Jr., 31.Ronterious Arnold and Cedrick Brown are both charged with five counts of attempted murder, five counts of aggravated battery causing great bodily harm, and discharging a firearm from a vehicle.Ronterious Arnold, Roosevelt Arnold Jr., and Tikeosha Qashe Arnold are charged with possession of marijuana and spice with intent to sell within 1,000 feet of a church, and possession of drug paraphernalia.Ronterious Arnold is also charged with child abuse.All suspects were taken into custody and booked into the Madison County Jail.February 12, 2017GREENVILLE, Fla. (WCTV) -- Madison County deputies are searching for answers after two drive-by shootings injure five people.MCSO says the first shots rang out around 8:00 Sunday night near the intersection of Church Avenue and Obadiah Street in Greenville. Deputies located two victims suffering from gunshot wounds.MCSO says as deputies were trying to render aid and secure the scene, more gunshots rang out less than a block away on Obadiah Street near the intersection of Cook Avenue. Deputies responded to the scene and found three additional victims suffering from gunshot wounds.All five victims were taken to the hospital.Many in the close-knit neighborhood were shocked to hear gunfire. One couple was at home, getting ready for bed, when bullets came flying through their living room window. Monday, the window is still intact, but the holes still remain.Other people in the neighborhood says they heard so many shots, they thought the gunfire was never going to stop. They say that violence has no place in their community."People need to stop the foolishness, that's what I'm thinking today," says a woman who lives in the area, but did not want to be identified. "They really do, because this is ridiculous. You grew up with the same people, and then you shoot them?"Madison County Sheriff's Office investigators say they do not believe people in the community are in danger, but advise everyone to be alert nonetheless.On Monday, there were very few details MCSO could release because of the ongoing investigation.The extent of the five victims' injuries and their current conditions are still unknown. We do know that some had to undergo surgery Monday.If you have any information on this case, you are urged to call the Madison County Sheriff’s Office Criminal Investigative Division at (850) 973-4152.February 12, 2017GREENVILLE, Fla. (WCTV) -- The Madison County Sheriff’s Office is now investigating a drive-by shooting that left multiple people injured in Greenville Sunday evening.The shooting happened around 8 p.m. Sunday in Greenville. Authorities say the first shots were fired at the corner of Obadiah Street and Church Avenue.The second shooting incident happened at the corner of Obadiah Street and Cook Avenue. So far, five victims have been taken to the hospital.No word yet on the extent of their injuries. The Madison Co. Sheriff’s Office is asking that anyone with information give them a call at (850) 973-4151.WCTV will update this story as more information becomes available.The DNAinfo archives brought to you by WNYC.Read the press release here.CHICAGO — A shooting in Austin killed Tenisha Mallet, 21, and wounded three Saturday night, officials said.At 8:26 p.m., the four were outside in the 100 block of North Mayfield Avenue when a dark-colored SUV drove up and two people got out and fired shots at them, police said.A woman was shot in her neck and pronounced dead at the scene, police said.Mallet, of the 100 block of North Leamington Avenue, was pronounced dead at 8:40 p.m., according to the Cook County Medical Examiner's Office.Another 25-year-old woman was shot in her face and taken to Stroger Hospital. A 25-year-old man was hit in his arm and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital and an 18-year-old man was hit in his leg and taken to West Suburban Hospital. Their conditions were not available but they were listed as "stable," police said.No one was in custody.Next inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginNext inAustin & Belmont CraginCopyright © 2009-2018, New York Public Radio.All Rights Reserved.Copyright © 2009-2018, DNAinfo.All Rights Reserved.SectionsFeaturesWBBJ-TVSAVANNAH, Tenn. — Bullets broke up a party at the Hardin County Fairgrounds Saturday in Savannah, leaving several people injured.“Everything was going good, they were playing music and everyone was having a good time,” Savannah resident Charles Ross said.But the party quickly took a turn for the worse.The TBI said just before midnight, Savannah police officers responded to a report of a shooting on the fairground property.“When officers arrived at the scene,  they did find several individuals that had gunshot injuries,” Susan Niland, public information officer for the TBI said. “Two victims were transported to a local hospital and two more to a hospital in Memphis.”There is no word on the condition of the victims, but Niland said more information will be released when available.People in the area said it’s not uncommon for someone to rent out a building at the fairgrounds for a gathering or party. The TBI said at least 100 people were at the party Saturday night when shots were fired.Charles Ross said he wasn’t at the party, but his daughter was the host.He said although no suspects have been identified at this time, he believes whoever is responsible for opening fire wasn’t from the area.“I don’t think anybody involved in the shooting was from here,” he said. “They come from different places like McNaiy county and Jackson.”He says the shooting has residents on edge and hopes to see the whoever responsible in custody soon.“When people come to visit, I tell them its a retirement town because it’s usually so quiet,” he said.”But then this other stuff started going on.”The TBI said this is still an active investigation and asks anyone with information about this shooting to call them.© 2021 WBBJ TV.East Cleveland policeA judge on Monday signed an order shuttering Club Dew Drop in East Cleveland, after a request by the Cuyahoga County Prosecutor's Office and East Cleveland police. A Feb. 8 shooting at the bar left one men dead and four other people wounded, and was part of a string of disturbances at the bar dating back to October, prosecutors said.(File photo)CLEVELAND, Ohio -- A Cuyahoga County judge has temporarily shuttered the East Cleveland bar wherea man was gunned down earlier this month, after prosecutors said the establishment is a "haven for illicit activity."East Cleveland police have received 26 calls for service since theFeb. 8 killing of 20-year-old Eric Howardat Club Dew Drop on Euclid Avenue at Ivanhoe Road, the Cuyahoga County Prosecutor's Office said in a news release.A preliminary injunction hearing is scheduled for March 10.Video the shooting showed bartenders serving alcohol to eight people, including Howard and the three men police have accused of killing him. Two of the suspects were also under the legal age to buy and consume alcohol, before the shooting, prosecutors said.Marvin C. Bryant, 19, turned himself the day of the shooting. DeAundre Smith, 19, and Tony Ricks, 21, were also named as suspects.Bryant and Marcus Rice are being held on $5 million bond on charges filed earlier this month in East Cleveland Municipal Court.A grand jury has not returned an indictment in the case.The shooting apparently stemmed from an October gang-related shooting outside the bar, prosecutors said.Police have since responded to multiple reports of gang activity, fights, large crowds, drug dealing and shootings at the bar, prosecutors said.To comment on this story, please visitMonday's crime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - An 18-year-old is in custody accused of shootingthree people at a Memphis bowling alley.Memphis Police Department said officers arrestedJustin JohnsonFriday.The shooting at Billy Hardwick's All Star Lanes happened on January 31.According to police reports, an argument erupted inside the bowling alley. Johnson was part of the argument before he went out to his vehicle, got a rifle, and fired it through the front doors of the bowling alley just as the business was closing.Moments after MPD announced the arrest, a planned rally at Billy Hardwick's celebrated. The group came together to support the local business, and while they were there they learned that an arrest had been made."This says to Memphis, look at our community, look at how we support each other," Sandi McNeely said.McNeely has been bowling for 50 years. She said she's going to keep supporting her favorite bowling alley."I got up the next morning, after they had the shooting last week, and it just came to me. I said we need to do something to support them so people aren't scared to come here," Sandi Rogers said.Rogers said Billy Hardwick's has been family owned for 35 years."Everyone that has contacted us has said, 'We're not staying at home. We're coming, and we're going to support,'" Kelly Frasure, whose family owns Billy Hardwick's, said."That's exactly what this community is telling Memphis," McNeely said. "We won't stand for this, we won't stand for this violence."Copyright 2017 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SHREVEPORT, LA (KSLA) - A Shreveport man is behind bars after he was charged in connection with a shooting that left one person dead and three others wounded.Click here to watch KSLA News 12 Now at 4 streaming live online for the latest on this story.Mobile users, click here.Police say 21-year-old Jacory J. Wesley, of the 7000 block of Penny Street in Shreveport, is reportedly responsible for the shooting in a County Market parking lot in the 6300 block of Hearne Avenue.The shooting happened just after 2:00 a.m. on January 29, 2017. Dispatchers say they were called to the scene for reports that a man had been shot in the head.When officers arrived, they found 25-year-old Rolandreon Marquis Fischer suffering from at least one gunshot wound to the upper body.Fischer was taken to University Health by the Shreveport Fire Department where he was later pronounced deceased.Police say 3 others who were wounded in the shooting showed up at local hospitals. They are all expected to recover.Based on their investigation, police believe the deceased victim had been involved in an ongoing dispute with at least two other known male subjects which resulted in gunfire in the parking lot on Hearne Avenue.As a result of the shooting, Wesley has been charged with one count of second-degree murder.Wesley, who was also injured in the shooting. was booked into the Shreveport City Jail on Thursday afternoon, according to booking records.Authorities are asking anyone with additional information about this case to contact Shreveport-Caddo Parish Crime Stoppers at 318-673-7373 or www.lockemup.org.Copyright 2017KSLA.All rights reserved.1812 Fairfield Ave.Shreveport, LA 71101(318) 222-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Filed under:Four people were shot outside a convenience store Sunday afternoon in the West Englewood neighborhood on the South Side.About 12:15 p.m., all four victims were inside a convenience store in the 1800 block of West 63rd Street when they heard several gunshots, according to Chicago Police. They ran outside, where they were met by four armed males who opened fire.A 26-year-old man was shot in the right eye and driven by a family member to St. Bernard Hospital, then was transferred to Stroger Hospital in critical condition, police said.Another 26-year-old man was shot in the buttocks and left foot and taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where his condition stabilized, police said.A 56-year-old woman was shot multiple times in the left leg and also taken to Christ, where her condition stabilized, police said.A 48-year-old woman was shot in the right hip and also taken to Christ, where her condition stabilized.After the shooting, the four suspects got into a white car and fled the scene, police said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.In a tragic incident, three men in their 20s were killed in a shooting outside a drive-thru restaurant in Atlanta.Local news outlets reported that "the Fulton County Medical Examiner's Office says 27-year-old Ahmad Johnson of East Point and 28-year-old Rickie Burke of Atlanta died at the scene of the shooting outside the Checkers restaurant near Greenbriar Mall early Sunday morning."Twenty-two-year-old David Worrell was in critical condition after being shot and later died at a hospital.A fourth man shot was also hospitalized to a nearby hospital. Police say "drugs were discovered at the scene. Officials have not released any other details."More Details are awaited...Shooting in San Antonio Shopping Mall, 1 Killed & Many InjuredBY M. DIVYA SRIIn a tragic incident, three men in their 20s were killed in a shooting outside a drive-thru restaurant in Atlanta.Local news outlets reported that "the Fulton County Medical Examiner's Office says 27-year-old Ahmad Johnson of East Point and 28-year-old Rickie Burke of Atlanta died at the scene of the shooting outside the Checkers restaurant near Greenbriar Mall early Sunday morning."Twenty-two-year-old David Worrell was in critical condition after being shot and later died at a hospital.A fourth man shot was also hospitalized to a nearby hospital. Police say "drugs were discovered at the scene. Officials have not released any other details."More Details are awaited...Shooting in San Antonio Shopping Mall, 1 Killed & Many InjuredBY M. DIVYA SRI(And get daily dose of political, entertainment news straight to your inbox)Special tips to fix Puffy Eyes:- The biggest challenge for any woman is all about puffy eyes. The skin around…Psychosocial stress is a risk to the heart in women:- Psychosocial stress is indeed a huge threat for human beings.…Vakeel Saab reports big numbers on Day One:- Powerstar Pawan Kalyan has been balancing his film and political career. The…2765 new coronavirus cases reported in Andhra Pradesh:- The new cases of coronavirus are slowly increasing in Andhra Pradesh and…Google Phone app to allow call recordings from all numbers:- Google Phone app will allow you to record the calls…2021-04-093.5out of 5(3.5/5)Read Review2021-04-022.75out of 5(2.75/5)Read Review2021-03-262.75out of 5(2.75/5)Read ReviewHome|About us|Terms of use|Privacy Policy|Liability Disclaimer|Sitemap|RssPlease note that this is aBETA versionof theAndhrawisheshwebsite which is still undergoing final testing before its official release.© 2019 All Rights ReservedAndhrawiseshPowered byWishesh Digital MediaMEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Four people were shot and two are dead after a drive-by shooting in Memphis.Police said the four men were shot by multiple men inside a car on Delta Road before 2:30 p.m. Saturday.One victim was taken to the hospital in critical condition and later died. A second victim was pronounced dead at the scene. Memphis Police Department later identified the victims as 32-year-old Charles Coleman and 31-year-old Joe Lobbins.The other two victims were taken to the hospital. One is in critical condition; the other is in non-critical condition.Neighbors said dozens of shots were fired from automatic weapons while children were outside running from the bullets."The passenger had like a long shotgun, looked like to me, it was so long," one neighbor said. "And was just shooting out and started shooting. And I told my husband, 'get down,' and we just hit the floor and the shots kept ringing."Neighbors also said the victims had just returned from a funeral when the shots were fired."All of a sudden the folks started shooting and we started running," Antonio Benson said.Family members said Coleman had a one-year-old baby and another on the way. Family said Lobbins was a cousin."I can't believe that stuff," Benson said. "Stuff happens so fast. You just got to be careful out here."Kelan Sherrod is a close friend of Coleman and said he called him family."It's sad, man," Kelan Sherrod said. "Just...what I heard was bullets. They was riding up and down the streets shooting at each other, but there's so many innocent people out here man. I just don't know what to say."Police believe the victims knew the suspects."And now they got two more funerals to go to," a neighbor said. "All I can do is pray for the family and pray for Memphis and pray for everyone who's carrying a gun. It's not worth it."Police said the four suspects were in a black Chevy Impala with tinted windows. No one is in custody at this time.Copyright 2017 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WREG.comby:Kristen HollowayCOMO, Miss. — One person killed, four others injured and a house riddled with bullets in Panola County.Police told WREG’s Kristen Holloway the killers are still on the run.The shooting happened on Smart Road near Como, Mississippi late Friday night.“All I could do was cry because I could see the puddle of blood where people got shot,” said LaTonya Eason.Crime tape, shattered glass and tons of bullet holes. That was the scene on Smart Road after the shootingOn the other side of the road, family and friend came together to pray.“Lord, I thank you for protecting the kids. Lord, dear God protecting the one that didn’t get hit by the stray bullets,” said Eason.Leola Petty said both her sons, Ricky and Ronnie Petty, were shot. Ronnie died at the hospital.“He was a good little boy. He didn’t bother nobody,” said Leola Petty.According to deputies, the suspects were using assault rifles and nine millimeter guns. Several bullets went into a house nearby. No one inside that home was hit but nine people were inside at the time.LaTonya Eason said her cousin, Rod Birge, was hit while standing outside and now he’s in critical condition.“He’s a truck driver he was doing good for himself, he’s the type that didn’t bother anybody whatever you asked him for he gave it to you and I just hate he got caught in the cross fire,” said Eason. “I just pray that this community will really get themselves together and I hope this will be a wake up call for everybody.”No arrest have made for this crime.  It’s still unclear what led up to the shooting.Police have not released the names of the other victims injured.A vigil is scheduled for Tuesday at 6:30 p.m. on Abrams Road.Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.Ali Brown was killed in a quintuple shooting in Kansas City. (Credit: Family photo)ST. CHARLES COUNTY, Mo. (KMOV.com) – A young mother from St. Peters was killed in a triple homicide in Kansas City on Thursday night.According to police, three men entered the Trails at the Ridge apartment complex and shot five people inside. Three people were killed, including 20-year-old Ali Brown. Brown’s two year old son Karson was seriously injured along with another adult.Brown is the daughter of former St. Peters mayor Shawn Brown. She was living in Kansas City with her son.“They both just had those brilliant blue eyes and those long eye lashes,” said Carissa Figgins. Figgins is the executive director of Sparrow’s Nest in St. Charles, a home for pregnant teenagers. Brown lived at Sparrow’s Nest and became like family to Figgins. “For this to happen, it’s just unreal,” said Figgins.Brown’s brother Trent Brown who also lives in Kansas City said they have heard very little from police.Investigators released a vague description of the suspects on Saturday, but no further information on the quintuple shooting.“It’s terrible that she’s gone, it hurts,” said Brown over the phone. He is heading to St. Louis for his sister’s funeral.Brown said his nephew Karson is miraculously expected to survive after being shot five times in the incident.“He’s going to be in the hospital for a great deal of time, a lot of things to recover from,” said Figgins.Figgins said Karson was Ali’s whole world.“Any teaching moment we gave her she just took it in and tried to be the best mom that she could for Karson,” said Figgins. “She was very vivacious, very energetic, very happy and trying to make everyone happy around her.”Both Figgins and Brown’s family said they will do everything they can to help the two-year-old get through this tragic time.“As a community, whether it’s in St. Charles or Kansas City we can’t allow Karson’s life to be a tragedy, for all the love, for all the attention that Ali poured into her son, we can’t let his life be for naught.”The family has set up aGoFundMepage to help with funeral expenses and future needs for Karson.Copyright 2016 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Salinas police have identified the two men killed in the Thursday double homicide on Sunrise Street as Jose Luis Flores-Vargas, 27, and Alejandro Ramirez, 25.Around 9 p.m., Salinas police officers were on patrol in the area of Garner Avenue and North Sanborn Road when they heard gunshots. Less than a minute later, police have said, Salinas police received an alert from the ShotSpotter gunshot location system, and that helped them greatly narrow down the shots came from the 500 block of Sunrise Street. Shortly after that, authorities received a call from family members of one of the shooting victims.Two killed, two injured in Sunrise Street shootingResponding officers located four shooting victims, and Flores-Vargas and Ramirez died at the scene. The others had non-life threatening gunshot wounds, and were transported to a local hospital.It appears the men had been hanging out in the front yard of the home when the shooting occurred.After a short pursuit involving a van seen leaving the area, three people were detained as people of interest in the shooting.However, all three people detained as a result of the initial investigation have been released, and at this time, they have not been charged related to this investigation, which is still on-going, according to Salinas police on Tuesday afternoon.Gallery: Homicide in Newark's East WardNEWARK-- A Newark man was arrested in Georgia Tuesday on charges he shot four people earlier this year ata troubled public housing complexin the city's East Ward - killing one, a 16-year-old high school student.Raheem Rudd, police photoMembers of an FBI task force captured 24-year-old Raheem Rudd in Atlanta, Acting Essex County Prosecutor Robert D. Laurino and Newark Public Safety Director Anthony Ambrose announced.Rudd is charged with murder, conspiracy to commit murder and weapons offenses in the Jan. 11 shooting at the John Hyatt Court Complex, a Newark Housing Authority-run complex on Hawkins Street.Rudd is accused of killing Kevin Barber, 16, and shooting three other males from Newark, ages 15, 16 and 19, officials said.Barber, who attended East Side High School, died at the scene of the 5 p.m. shooting. The other 16-year-old boy suffered serious injuries in the shooting.Officials said Rudd remained held at the Fulton County Jail in Atlanta Tuesday ahead of extradition proceedings to return him to Essex County.Prosecutors also charged Rudd with eluding law enforcement for allegedly fleeing the shooting and heroin distribution, but did not reveal details of those charges. Newark police chased a car that sped away from the housing project crime scene, multiple witnesses and police sources said at the time.The slain boy's grandfather, Herbert Waldron, told NJ Advance Media in an interview earlier this year that hisfamily was previously targeted in a shootinglast summer at another city housing complex.A prosecutor's office spokeswoman declined to comment on a possible motive for the murder.The deadly shooting was Newark's first reported murder of the year and led to calls for increased security at the NHA-run residences. Part-time armed special police officers, who have limited law enforcement powers and work security in varying shifts for the NHA, were pulled from the property about a week before the shooting in a cost-saving move, law enforcement sources told NJ Advance Media at the time.Officials at the housing authority, which is autonomous from city hall, said they had limited federal funds for policing. Community activists and area residents told NJ Advance Media in January that security was minimal at the complex.Ambrose, the city's public safety director, called for better coordination between NHA executives and his agency after the shooting. A majority of violent crime in Newark's East Ward, which is one of the city's lowest crime areas, is tied to the housing project, officials previously said.Noah Cohen may be reached atncohen@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter @noahycandon Facebook. Find NJ.com on Facebook.Have a tip?Tell us.nj.com/tipsNote to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesGallery: Saturday evening shooting on the 2500 block of Churchill Ave.FLINT, MI -- An 18-year-old man is dead and three others injured --including two in critical condition -- after a quadrupleshootingSaturday, Jan. 7 in Flint.Police were called around 4:30 p.m. Jan. 7 to the 2500 block of Churchill Avenue, near Dort Highway, for a shooting and two people with gunshot wounds at the scene.Kevonte O'Neal Washington and the other victim were located at the scene and taken via ambulance to Hurley Medical Center. Washington was later pronounced dead at the hospital.A neighbor told MLive-Flint Journal she applied CPR to the victims that she identified as brothers."I'd say they were both between 17 and 20," said Stephanie Anderson. "I heard shots and we called police. I started (CPR) on the one, but I noticed blood was coming out of his mouth, so I turned his head to the side."Two additional victims were later found and transported to Hurley for treatment. One of the victims is in good condition, police said, while two additional victims were listed in critical condition.A suspect has been taken into custody in connection with the shooting, police said.Anyone with information on the fatal shooting has been asked to contact Detective Tpr. Beardslee at 810-237-6900 or report anonymously to Crime Stoppers at 1-800-422-JAIL (5245).Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesJune 14, 2017, 1:42 p.m.Jan. 12, 2017, 1:22 p.m.Jan. 12, 2017, 1:32 p.m.Jan. 9, 2017, 2:52 p.m.June 14, 2017, 1:42 p.m.Pasadena police on Tuesday announced the arrests of eight suspects following a months-long investigation into a series of deadly shootings that authorities believe were part of a gang feud."Between December 2016 and February 2017, Pasadena was plagued with a series of apparent gang shootings resulting in three homicides and two attempted homicides," Pasadena Police Chief Phillip L. Sanchez told reporters."This morning, I'm proud to announce as a result of some brilliant police work, eight suspects responsible for the shootings are in police custody," Sanchez said.The suspects were identified as Anthony Deon Edwards, 25; Marquis Duran Turner, 28; Isaiah Jack Daniels, 24; Pernell Barnes, 20; Charod Robinson, 28; Derion Davon Lee, 34; Andrew Vasquez, 27; and John Wesley Robinson, 47.The men were booked on suspicion of a variety of crimes, including murder, attempted murder, conspiracy to commit murder and gang allegations, according to Pasadena police.The arrests follow a six-month investigation into an alleged gang feud between Pasadena and Duarte street gangs, according to Pasadena police. The eight arrested are all believed to be members of the Duarte street gang, police say."I cannot emphasize enough just how difficult this particular case was and how proud I am of the work this team accomplished in apprehending the suspects responsible for the shootings," Sanchez said.Authorities say the men were tied to the following three shootings:On Dec. 22, 2016, at approximately 9:47 p.m., Brandon Douglas, 25, was shot and killed in the 1200 block of North Fair Oaks Avenue. Lee is being charged with murder in Douglas' slaying.On Jan. 6 at approximately 11:51 p.m., Antoine Sutphen, 24, and Ormani Duncan, 24, were shot and killed in the 100 block of West Claremont Street. A female adult, 37, was also shot but survived. Daniels, Barnes, Robinson, Lee and Vasquez were booked in connection with those deaths.On Jan. 16 at 2:24 a.m., several people were gathered in the 800 block of North Garfield Avenue when suspects opened fire and struck an 18-year-old female bystander who survived.Contactthe Homicide Report. Follow@latimeshomicideon Twitter.June 14, 2017, 1:42 p.m.Jan. 12, 2017, 1:22 p.m.Jan. 12, 2017, 1:32 p.m.Jan. 9, 2017, 2:52 p.m.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:I don't know weather 2 give 2 thumbs up that these punks were caught, guess i'll wait to see if justice is truly served. While I wish they all suffer the same pain n suffering the victims suffered what's more disturbing is our society as a whole is caught up in the mayhem of the streets. just look at the Box office # of violent movies, T,V programs , being broadcast, n the people who get rich of the shame these shows portray do they ever drop by 2 offer any condolences, me thinks not .America is falling slowly but surely because this nation condones the same sinister dog eat dog mentality some of it's citizens display daily. We all r responsible weather black  white,hispanic,asian or native american. I's just a matter of x  when we will see the error of our way's as a nation. 1 way or another, so yes this is tragic, but no race or group of people r immune to the devils plan 2 destroy n capture as many souls he can, hope u don't become his next prospect.Real talk.MIAMI (WSVN) - MIAMI (WSVN) – A South Florida community is still reeling after, police said, four adults and three teenagers were shot outside a home in Northwest Miami-Dade.All of them survived but several remain hospitalized, two days after the shooting occurred.Miami-Dade Police and Fire Rescue responded to the scene of the drive-by shooting, near the corner of Northwest 81st Street and 14th Avenue, Sunday evening.According to investigators, the victims, including a 15-year-old and two 17-year-olds, were standing outside of a residence when a dark blue, newer model sedan approached them and stopped, just before 6 p.m. “We’re presuming they were outside celebrating. They were standing outside of the home,” said Miami-Dade Police Detective Robin Pinkard.The victims were identified Monday morning by Miami-Dade Police as 15-year-old Ramont Gage, 17-year-old Tamyra Milfort, 17-year-old Aaliyah Barr, 18-year-old Dewayne Leon, 20-year-old Shaquanna Ross, 30-year-old Alfredo Hudson and 43-year-old Tekeiki Taylor.Tuesday afternoon, Milfort remains in the ICU. She was last listed in serious condition. The hospital has not released details on Taylor, Gage and Hudson, but their last known condition, on Monday, was that they were stable and are expected to be OK.Leon and Ross were released Tuesday afternoon. Barr was the first victim released, Monday evening.Barr is the daughter of Taylor, a Miami-Dade Corrections officer. They live in the home right next door to where the shooting happened.She spoke to 7News, as she left Jackson Memorial Hospital. “I’m doing fine, just in a little pain,” she said as she broke down in tears.A neighbor, Miss Thomas, said she heard the shots. “It was like, ‘Pop, pop, pop, pop, pop, pop.'”“I thought it was firecrackers,” said neighbor Shannon McGowan. “I did see some young people running into the house, the pink house.”Paramedics transported the victims to area hospitals. Officials said three of the victims, including two of the teens, were transported as trauma alerts to Jackson Memorial Hospital.7News cameras captured a large crowd of concerned friends and family members outside Jackson Memorial, Sunday night. A young woman was seen breaking down in tears.At the crime scene, evidence markers in the street revealed where the bullet casings landed.“Bullets don’t have eyes,” said Leon’s mother, who asked not to be named or show her face on camera.She added that her son is home from the hospital after having sustained a bullet wound to the inner thigh. “It’s just sad, and it’s hurtful. It’s very hurtful to see these kids have to suffer with death,” she said.The concerned mother said she’s thankful she does not have to bury her son. “We had just gotten into 2017, and here it is already,” she said. “I never would have imagined that my kids would have been caught in gunfire.”“Children don’t know any other way to correct a situation besides violence,” said the mother of one of the victims, who identified herself as Mrs. Thompson.“Something needs to be done. We’re not going to have a generation, because they’re all being killed,” said Scott.The driver and occupants inside the vehicle remain at large.Police believe four or five men were inside the vehicle at the time of the shooting.The motive behind the shooting remains under investigation.If you have any information on this shooting, call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS. Remember, you can always remain anonymous, and you may be eligible for a $3,000 reward.Copyright 2021 Sunbeam Television Corp. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Three people were killed and two others were hurt in a shooting that happened during a New Year's Eve party at a Cleveland apartment building, located above a pizzeria on Denison Avenue near Fulton Road, police said.CLEVELAND, Ohio— The brother of Olympic gold medalist Simone Biles is charged in a New Year’s Eve shooting that left three dead at an Airbnb party.Tevin Biles-Thomas, 24, is charged with murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault and perjury.Biles-Thomas was arrested and is being held in the Liberty County, Georgia Jail awaiting his arraignment Sept. 13 in Cuyahoga County Common Pleas Court.“The relentless persistence of Cleveland police homicide detectives helped secure an indictment in this case,” Cuyahoga County Prosecutor O’Malley said in a statement. “It is through their hard work that we can begin to seek justice for these victims.”Biles-Thomas went to high school in Cleveland and is in the U.S. Army. He is so far the only person to be charged in connection with the shooting that killed three and injured two others shortly before midnight on New Year’s Eve.Simone Biles representatives did not return messages seeking comment.The shooting happened at a party at an Airbnb rental above a pizzeria on Denison Avenue near Fulton Road, according to police.Devaughn Gibson, 23, DelVaunte Johnson, 19, Toshon Banks, 21, all died in the incident, according to the Cuyahoga County Medical Examiner. Johnson was a student, Gibson a barber and Banks a laborer, according to medical examiner records.All died of multiple gunshot wounds.A 21-year-old man who was shot in the back of the head and a 23-year-old woman shot in the arm survived the shooting.Police at the time said a fight broke out after a group of men showed up to the party uninvited and were asked to leave. Gunfire ensued and the three men were found dead.“The investigators within the Cleveland Police Homicide Unit remained committed to securing an arrest in this tragic case,” Cleveland Division of Police Chief Calvin Williams said in a statement. “We appreciate our partnership with the Cuyahoga County Prosecutor’s Office and are confident that their efforts will bring justice for the families affected by this terrible incident.”To comment on this story,please visit our crime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesBy J Swygart - jswygart@limanews.comMcNealLIMA — A Pickerington man pleaded not guilty Friday to charges of murder in the shooting death of of Anthony Bankston, whose lifeless body was found outside an after-hours establishment on South Main Street in Lima in late December.Jemonte McNeal, 24, entered the pleas during his arraignment hearing Friday in Allen County Common Pleas Court. McNeal was the target of a secret indictment handed down by the recent session of the grand jury. The indictment charged McNeal with two counts of murder with three-year firearm specifications, both unclassified felonies, and one count of felonious assault with a three-year firearm specification, a felony of the second degree.The indictment alleges that McNeal purposely caused the death of Bankston, 25, of Lima, who was found dead Dec. 29 on the sidewalk outside a known after-hours establishment at 904 S. Main St. that at one time housed a bar known as The Alamo. Three other persons were injured in that shooting.A man taken into custody last month as an initial suspect in the shooting death of Bankston was arraigned in Allen County Common Pleas Court in late February. Rasheign Tisdale, 23, of Lima, entered pleas of not guilty to four counts of felonious assault with firearm specifications, second-degree felonies; one count of carrying a concealed weapon, a felony of the fourth degree; and one count of theft, a fifth-degree felony.The felonious assault and weapons charges stem from the state’s allegation that Tisdale “did knowingly cause or attempt to cause physical harm … to Anthony Bankston by means of a deadly weapon.”Assistant Allen County Prosecuting Attorney Anthony Miller at that time said the circumstances surrounding Bankston’s death were still under investigation and that additional charges were anticipated.“There were a series of events that ultimately led to the death of Anthony Bankston,” Miller said, “and we believe Rasheign Tisdale was involved in those series of events.”By J Swygartjswygart@limanews.comPost navigationView Print Ads419-223-1010419-229-29263515 Elida Road,Lima OH, 45807We appreciate you sharing our content on social media.Please consider following us by clicking below.Send this to a friendJermaine Lewis Jr.Tyquan WilliamsA Christmas Eve shooting in Lutcher left two men dead and one wounded, though he later recovered, the St. James Parish sheriff said.  The shooting took place at a party outside the Neighborhood Lounge about 11:30 p.m. Dec. 24. Deputies originally though a four person, a 15-year-old, was shot and injured in the incident but have since determined those injuries were not related.Jermaine Lewis Jr. (left) and Tyquan Williams (right)Jermaine Lewis Jr.Tyquan WilliamsA Christmas Eve shooting in Lutcher left two men dead and one wounded, though he later recovered, the St. James Parish sheriff said.  The shooting took place at a party outside the Neighborhood Lounge about 11:30 p.m. Dec. 24. Deputies originally though a four person, a 15-year-old, was shot and injured in the incident but have since determined those injuries were not related.Jermaine Lewis Jr. (left) and Tyquan Williams (right)A federal fugitive task force on Tuesday captured the second suspect in a fatal Christmas Eve shooting in St. James Parish who has been on the run from authorities for more than a month.The U.S. Marshals Service’s Middle Louisiana Fugitive Task Force found Jermaine Lee Lewis Jr., 22, of Lutcher, about 7 a.m. in Baton Rouge and arrested him without incident, St. James Parish sheriff's deputies said.Col. Sid Berthelot, the St. James Parish sheriff's chief deputy, said Lewis and another man who is already in custody are, at this time, the only two believed to be have been involved in the late night shootings that killed two and injured another. The slayings happened during a block party after the annual Christmas Eve bonfires on the Mississippi River levee.Sheriff deputies said in a statement the shootings remain under investigation and detectives are seeking more information from the public.LUTCHER — A Christmas Eve shooting outside a bar in Lutcher left two men dead and two wounded, one of them a 15-year-old boy, the St. James Pa…Sheriff’s deputies arrived 11:30 p.m. Dec. 24 to what Sheriff Willy Martin Jr. has described as a chaotic scene at the Neighborhood Lounge — a popular post-bonfire hangout on West Main Street in Lutcher — with bodies on the ground and the sound of gunshots still echoing down a side street.Detectives believe the shootings occurred over a disagreement among young men from Lutcher and Convent, the sheriff has said.Thaddeus Watis Jr., 20, and Dedrick Paul Green, Jr., 23, both of Convent, and Jerrell Moody, 25, of Vacherie, were shot in the incident.Watis and Green died of their wounds. Moody was released from an area hospital several days after the shooting, the Sheriff's Office has said.The Neighborhood Lounge was also the scene of a shooting on Christmas Day in 2008 when five people were injured.CONVENT — St. James Parish sheriff's deputies have arrested one man and are looking for another in the Christmas Eve shootings in Lutcher that…After Lewis' capture Tuesday, he was taken to East Baton Rouge Parish Prison but is expected to be booked on a second-degree murder count once he is returned to the St. James Parish Prison in Convent, deputies said in a statement.Sheriff's deputies arrested the first accused shooter, Tyquan Twendell Williams, 24, also of Lutcher, on Jan. 9 and have booked him with a count of second-degree murder.Deputies said Tuesday that Williams, who has been given bail of $375,000, remains incarcerated at St. Charles Parish jail.Those with information about the shootings in Lutcher are asked to call CrimeStoppers at (877) 903-STOP or the St. James Parish Sheriff’s Office at (225) 562-2200.Follow David J. Mitchell on Twitter, @NewsieDave.One of the suspects in the Christmas Eve shootings in Lutcher that killed two and injured another is now free from jail after a judge set bail…Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?FOX 2by:Associated PressShot of a police at a crime sceneSPRINGFIELD, Mo. –  A man who hosted a drug-filled Missouri party where an Arkansas woman was killed and seven others were wounded has been charged with being a felon in possession of a firearm.The Springfield News-Leader reports that the charge was filed Wednesday against 36-year-old Roy Norey. Federal prosecutors say Norey operated a music studio out of a Springfield building where gunfire erupted early on Dec. 23. One of the victims, 42-year-old Delmarie Bailey of West Memphis, Arkansas, died weeks later at a hospital.After the shooting, police searched Norey’s home. The criminal complaint says police found a loaded 9 mm pistol in his bedroom nightstand. He was prohibited from having it because of previous drug and firearm convictions.No other arrests have been made in the case. The investigation is ongoing.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.The shooting was reported to the Metropolitan Police Department shortly after 1 a.m. at Rex Center, 3528 S. Maryland Parkway, according to Lt. Isaac Auten.Four people were injured in a shooting early Saturday during a party at a game center inside the Boulevard Mall, Las Vegas police said.The shooting was reported to the Metropolitan Police Department shortly after 1 a.m. at Rex Center, 3528 S. Maryland Parkway, according to Lt. Isaac Auten. The victims were taken to Sunrise Hospital and Medical Center for treatment of injuries that did not appear to be life-threatening, he said.It was not clear as of 2 p.m., according to Auten, how many suspects police were looking for.Anyone with information may call Crime Stoppers at 702-385-5555.Contact Rio Lacanlale atrlacanlale@reviewjournal.comor 702-383-0381. Follow@riolacanlaleon Twitter.Las Vegas police have arrested a 30-year-old man on suspicion of murder after a woman was dropped off at a hospital with a fatal gunshot wound early Friday.Henderson police are investigating after a man was shot Friday morning in the south Las Vegas Valley.Las Vegas police are investigating the firing of gunshots on the Las Vegas Strip early Friday, but police said they did not locate anyone who was injured.A public fact-finding review for the 2020 fatal police shooting of Las Vegas resident Jorge Gomez has been set for April 16.The man was taken to Sunrise Hospital and Medical Center, Las Vegas police said.A Texas couple arrested this week in a shooting on Las Vegas Boulevard that left three people injured came to town with a “bag of guns,” police said Thursday.The man was wanted on a murder charge in connection with the March 17 shooting of his nephew during an argument over money.The Clark County district attorney’s office is not pursuing criminal charges against an undercover sergeant who shot and killed a man during an April traffic stop.Las Vegas police are investigating the shooting up of a house with five people inside late Monday.Three people were shot — one critically injured — outside of a 7-Eleven in the Arts District on Monday afternoon.Copyright ©2019Las Vegas Review-Journal, Inc.|Privacy Policy|Terms of ServicePowered byWordPress.com VIPsublogSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Baltimore police have arrested a man in connection with aquintuple shooting outside of a deli in northwest Baltimorein December.Police said on Dec. 18, they responded to the 3900 block of Park Heights Avenue for a reported shooting. Five victims were either transported to or walked into an area hospital, officials said. All the victims suffered non-fatal gunshot wounds.Shooting detectives interviewed all five victims and witnesses. They also reviewed video footage of the scene.Detectives determined that one of the victims was the primary suspect in this incident.Police said they obtained an arrest warrant for Daniel Mitchell, 29, of Baltimore. He was arrested one block from his home Thursday morning. During his arrest, police recovered a loaded handgun.Mitchell was taken to central booking, where he is charged with four counts of first-degree attempted murder and handgun violations.Get WBAL-TV 11 News On The Go​Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Police announced two arrests on Monday for a deadly shooting that happened Friday in Colorado Springs.The victim who died was identified as 28-year-old Brandon Coffin of Peyton.Tony Larson, 49, was arrested for first-degree murder. Zachary Lawson, 18, was arrested for felony menacing. The shooting happened early Saturday morning in the 700 block of Geiger Court near E. Platte and N. Powers Boulevard.Anyone with information on this crime is asked to call 719-634-7867.A GoFundMe account was set up to help the victim's family.to donate._____________Spring police were investigating a shooting Friday night that left one man dead and three others injured.It happened near the 700 block of Geiger Court around 11 p.m.When they arrived, officers say they found four victims in a parking lot suffering from gunshot wounds.All of them were taken to local hospitals. Two men and one juvenile were in serious condition. One man died of his injuries.Police say the death is being investigated as a homicide.If you have any information on this case, you are encouraged to contact Colorado Springs Police Department at (719)-444-7000.A masked gunman shot four men inside a barbershop in Philadelphia Thursday night, killing one of them.The suspect walked inside a barbershop on the 4500 block of North Broad Street at 7:06 p.m. and fired at least 22 shots.A 28-year-old man was shot several times in the chest, a 42-year-old man was shot once in the leg and once in the chest, a 46-year-old man was shot once in the right arm and once in the chest and a 45-year-old man was grazed on his left shoulder.All four victims were taken to area hospitals. The 28-year-old man died of his injuries, police said. The 42-year-old man is in critical condition. The other two victims are stable.No arrests have been made and police have not released information on any suspects.It was one of two reported shootings in Philadelphia Thursday night. A 25-year-old man was shot in the head inside the Magic Wok Chinese restaurant on the 6900 block of Torresdale Avenue at 7 p.m.The victim was taken to Jefferson Torresdale Hospital and is in critical condition. No arrests have been made and a weapon has not been recovered.Four people have been shot, one fatally, in Natchitoches, according to police.Natchitoches Police Department officers responded to the shooting just before midnight Tuesday at the dead-end of Caspari Street, which is off University Parkway. One victim had suffered a gunshot wound to his head and was pronounced dead at the scene by the Natchitoches Parish Coroner's Office.That victim has been identified as 57-year-old Ronald G. Green, according to a release.The other three had been taken to Natchitoches Regional Medical Center in a private vehicle. Two had been shot in the abdomen, while the third had been shot in the back of the neck, it reads.All the victims were male. Their current conditions are not known, according to the release."In addition, the names of all three victims are being withheld at this time due to the nature of the investigation," it reads.The shootings remain under investigation. The department asks anyone with information to contact it at 318-352-8101 or Detective Sgt. William Connell at 318-238-3911.SectionsExtrasWatch NowMADISON, Wis. —Another man has been arrested in connection with the shooting at a Madison strip club that injured four people this weekend.Madison police said Spencer Jackson IV, 29, of Madison, was arrested Thursday on suspicion of disorderly conduct while armed.According to the report, detectives believe Jackson produced a gun during the disturbance at Visions but did not fire the weapon.Cole W. Foster, 35, was accused of firing a gun inside the club and was arrested on suspicion of first-degree recklessly endangering safety and appeared in court Tuesday on the charge. Foster’s attorney argued that he didn’t fire every shot inside the night club and that the actions he took were in self defense.Police said the investigation is ongoing.Get your weather forecast from people who actually live in your community. We update with short, easy-to-use video forecasts you can watch on your phone every day. Download theiOSorAndroidapp here.COPYRIGHT 2021 BY CHANNEL 3000. ALL RIGHTS RESERVED. THIS MATERIAL MAY NOT BE PUBLISHED, BROADCAST, REWRITTEN OR REDISTRIBUTED.© 2021 Channel3000.com.Watch NowView ArchiveKTLAby:Kristina BravoFive people, including at least two boys, were hospitalized after a car-to-car shooting in the Inglewood area, officials said Sunday.The incident happened around 9 p.m. Saturday near 801 S. Inglewood Ave., according to the Los Angeles Sheriff’s Department. Footage shows several deputies investigating the area of Lennox Boulevard and Inglewood Avenue.The driver of an SUV said he pulled over into a parking lot after noticing that another SUV was following him, the agency told KTLA. That individual said at least one of the other SUV’s occupants opened fire, hitting the front and backseat passengers in his car.Two bystanders, a woman and a boy, were also caught in the gunfire, the Sheriff’s Department said. A total of five victims were taken to the hospital, the agency added.The L.A. County Fire Department said a female adult victim was transported to the hospital in critical condition. The Fire Department also confirmed two boys were hospitalized but could not provide their condition.The Sheriff’s Department said three perpetrators, who were only described as Hispanic men about 25 to 30 years old, fled in a silver or gray newer model SUV.Authorities provided no further information.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByRebecca RosenbergSubmitFebruary 10, 2021|3:54pm|UpdatedFebruary 10, 2021 | 3:54pmA gun-loving convict who led cops on a high-speed car chase while out on bail for a multiple shooting now faces federal charges, prosecutors announced Wednesday.Danari Aiken, 28, an alleged member of the street gang Mac Ballers, was indicted last week in Brooklyn federal court on two counts of being a felon in possession of a firearm for which he faces up to 20 years in prison.Aiken allegedly boasted about his gang connections on social media and even posed with what appears to be a fake assault rifle in a photo taken while he was out on bail for the 2018 shootout that injured five.In the snap, Aiken is shown flashing a gang sign as he stands with three pals, who are also clutching weapons, inside what appears to be a room outfitted to look like a bank vault, court papers allege.During the Dec. 8, 2018, gunfight outside the Rose Lounge in Queens, Aiken allegedly aimed his Glock 19 pistol at a rival from two feet away and squeezed off multiple shots — missing his target. His foe returned fire with equal imprecision —  and five bystanders were struck and injured. Aiken was on probation at the time for a 2015firearms conviction.He was eventually arrested for the shootout and charged with 20 counts of attempted murder, assault, criminal possession of a weapon and other raps. In August 2020, he was sprung on a $125,000 bond but was back in cuffs three months later.Aiken was in a 2009 Infiniti sedan when he allegedly blew through a stop sign in Bed-Stuy, and cops tried to pull him over. In response, he sped off.At one point Aiken allegedly stopped — but not for long.“The defendant began driving in reverse, nearly hitting a number of pedestrians and smashing into a sanitation truck,” the federal filing alleges. The pursuit came to an end when Aiken’s car was trapped by a traffic jam, according to the Brooklyn criminal complaint.  Cops allegedly found a loaded pistol under the driver’s seat.He was arrested and held without bail on multiple charges — including unlawful fleeing of a police officer, excessive speed and criminal possession of a firearm.While locked up on Rikers, Aiken allegedly still couldn’t keep his nose clean. In one incident “the defendant and other gang members slashed a fellow inmate, leaving a ten-centimeter laceration on the back of his head,” the federal filing alleges. He’s also accused of assaulting a guard and stashing fentanyl in his cell.It wasn’t immediately clear why federal prosecutors have decided to charge Aiken when he’s already facing two separate cases in state court for the same underlying crimes.A spokesman for the US Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of New York declined to comment.An attorney for Aiken couldn’t immediately be reached.Read NextMTA IG supports harsher punishments for attacks on transit...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 116,010 times.116,010This story has been shared 115,161 times.115,161This story has been shared 68,186 times.68,186© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationTim SwiftTim SwiftMIAMI– Five people were shot Saturday evening in the Overtown neighborhood of Miami, police said.The shooting happened around 9:30 p.m. near Northwest Fifth Avenue and Northwest Eighth Street.“When they arrived, they found four adults, male, several with gunshot wounds," said Ignatius Carroll, a spokesman for Miami Fire Department.Police said numerous shots were fired at the intersection.Paramedics transported four of the victims to Jackson Memorial Hospital. A fifth victim drove himself to the hospital. Their conditions were not disclosed.Rescue crews were in the right place at the right time."It just so happens that one of our rescues from the nearby station was responding to another call in this area when they were flagged down and tended to the gunshot victims," Carroll said.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact the Miami Police Department at 305-471-2085 or Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.Copyright 2018 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.WATE 6 On Your Sideby:WATE 6 On Your Side staffA second suspect has been arrested in connection with a Monday shooting incident involving four juveniles in Powell.The shooting took place around 5:30 Monday on Tammy Drive in Powell. Four juveniles were injured.James Isaiah Bell, 18, was arrested and taken into custody Wednesday in Halls without incident. Bell was found in a residence on Crippen Road.The 18-year-old has been charged with four counts of attempted second-degree murder, one count of possessing a firearm during the commission or attempt to commit a dangerous felony.He is being held in KCSO custody with bond set at $175,000.On Thursday, Knox County Sheriff’s Office detectives and S.W.A.T. team members took a second suspect into custody without incident. Desmond Goines, 18, was arrested and charged with the same charges as Bell in addition to a parole violation charge.Goines’ bond has also been set at $175,000.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NORRIS, Tenn. (WATE) — Government leaders in the area surrounding Norris Lake are hoping a new trail system will have visitors hiking through the area.The Norris Lake project team cut the ribbon on the trail system Friday. The team says they hope the word gets out about where people can go to hike and bike and about the connecting trails in the area.KNOXVILLE, Tenn. (WATE) -- One person was transported to the hospital with burn injuries after trying to stop flames from spreading through a North Knox County home early Saturday morning.Rural Metro Fire responded to a fire around 4:40 a.m. in the 4800 block of Garfield Terrace Drive. When crews arrived they found the roof completely engulfed in flames and spreading in all directions.KNOXVILLE, Tenn. (WATE) -- A volunteer is sharing his experience with the ongoing cleanup efforts in Scott County following two tornadoes."The road department, they were out in force clearing trees, PEC electric was out repairing powerlines, putting poles up," Steve Biedinger said.A man and a woman are dead and two other men were hospitalized after shots were fired Sunday morning at an intersection in Demopolis, according to Demopolis Police.Officers initially responded to a report of shooting on Floyd Street shortly after 9 a.m.They found Laderrus Gilbert, 27, and Jasmine Washington, 24, in a vehicle that had crashed into several parked vehicles near the intersection of Floyd and Field Streets. Gilbert and Washington had been shot, police said.The two were taken by ambulance to Bryan Whitfield Hospital and were later pronounced dead.Anthony Collier, 21, and Tramaine Irby, 26, also suffered gunshot wounds. They were taken by private vehicle to the hospital where they are in stable condition. Officers have been assigned to the ICU for security precautions throughout the night, police said.Demopolis police are interviewing possible witnesses and the investigation is ongoing.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesTrending:OAKLAND — Four people attending a vigil in West Oakland Sunday night were wounded in a drive-by shooting, authorities said Monday.The four victims, a 54-year-old woman and three men, ages 29, 36 and 41, are expected to recover from their wounds.The shooting happened about 11:05 p.m. Sunday at the intersection of  24th and Chestnut streets.Authorities said Monday the four were among a group attending a vigil for a neighborhood resident who died from natural causes earlier in the week.While the people stood on the street a vehicle drove by and at least one occupant began shooting at them, wounding the four. The vehicle took off before police arrived.Two of the victims got their own transportation to a hospital while the other two were taken by ambulance to a hospital. All were in stable condition Monday.Police are trying to determine a motive for the shooting and who may have been an intended target.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $20,000 in reward money for information leading to the arrest of the shooter. Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3426 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Check back for updates.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersWATCHVIDEOSYoung mother shields children from shooter with assault rifleTim SwiftLiane Morejon, ReporterTim SwiftLiane Morejon, ReporterMIAMI-DADE COUNTY, Fla.– Police are searching for two gunmen who opened fire into a crowd gathered outside a northwest Miami-Dade County convenience store.Miami-Dade County police said the crowd was outside the Heat Food Market in the 5800 block of Northwest 27th Avenue around 9 p.m. Friday when the shooting started.Corey Davis Jr., 26, and Vickie Boggs, 56, were killed while Vandella Davis, 34, Latresha Knight, 35, Romario Louider, 29, and Tyrone Smith, 56, were also hurt in the confusion after the shooting, police said.A 11-year-old girl, who was not identified, was also injured when she was grazed by a stray bullet.Shaniqua Boggs -- whose mother was killed in the shooting -- said neighborhood residents would often hang out outside the Heat Food Market on weekends. The shooting has left her and herfamily grief stricken."I actually saw her body on the floor covered in blood with the yellow tarp over her and I knew it was her because I knew what she had on," Shaniqua Boggs said.Davis' sister Lucy Butler-Sands said the man was visiting the area for Thanksgiving."He was only here for two days," she said.The victims' families said they want justice for their loved ones."We just want you you to do the right thing and turn yourself in, for her and for the other victims shot, as well," Shaniqua Boggs said.Meanwhile,a makeshift memorial has been set up outside the market. Someone placed flowers and a sign reading "RIP Vickie" on a folding chair in front of the store."We just hope the cops can do their job to find the person responsible," Butler-Sands said.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call the Miami-Dade County Police Department at 305-471-2400 or Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS.Copyright 2018 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Liane Morejon is an Emmy-winning reporter who joined the Local 10 News family in January 2010. Born and raised in Coral Gables, Liane has a unique perspective on covering news in her own backyard.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Four people were wounded in a shooting in the 4200 block of Shreve Avenue on Nov. 21, 2018. Photo by Rachel Rice for the St. Louis Post-DispatchST. LOUIS• A shooting in thePenrose neighborhoodin north St. Louis on Wednesday evening left four people injured, police said.None of the shooting victims were reported to have life-threatening injuries.The shooting call came in at about 5:11 p.m. in the 4800 block of Shreve Avenue.Three people were listed as being in stable condition following the shooting, including one person with a superficial wound, police said. One person was listed as being in serious condition and in surgery at a hospital.Nell Jones came home to find police tape tied to her front porch and blocking off the rest of her street. She's seen a lot of shootings in the area, she said."I'm scared to take my babies out," Jones said. "I'm scared to walk outside my door in the morning ... this always happens on this street."Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.DENVER (CBS4)– The man killed in a shootout last week in downtown Denver has been identified. The Denver Coroner identified Terrance Wardlow, 59, as the innocent victim in the shooting that also left four others injured.(credit: CBS)The shooting happened Nov. 19 near 21st and Lawrence Street, close to Coors Field. Police arrested Josh Hayward, 24, the next morning on first-degree murder charges and Dashae Eugene Armstrong on federal weapons charges. Armstrong was shot in the leg.Joshua Hayward (credit: Denver Police)It is CBS4’s policy not to report the names of gangs involved in crimes, but federal authorities announced in a news release Wednesday that Armstrong, 23, is a member of a gang and that the “other shooter” was a member of a rival gang. They said Armstrong has a criminal record that includes drug dealing charges that dates back to 2007. He appeared in federal court last week where he is being prosecuted on federal weapons charges.(credit: CBS)The day after the shooting, Denver police praised those who helped them track down the suspects and emphasized that theshooting was not random.Hayward was formally charged with 28 criminal counts on Tuesday, including first-degree murder, first-degree assault, possession of a weapon by a previous offender and crime of violence. Hayward is scheduled to appear in court on Thursday.New York woman sentenced to 22 years for sexually exploiting 2-year-old, officials say(Just One Film/The Image Bank/Getty Images)PHILADELPHIA — Two men have been sentenced to decades in prison in the shootings deaths of four people gunned down in the basement of a west Philadelphia home over a drug stash almost two years ago.Jahlil Porter, 34, was sentenced Friday to spend at least 50 years in prison and Keith Garner, 35, was sentenced to at least 40 years, The Philadelphia Inquirer reported.If you want to receive Pennsylvania news alerts, please download ourWPXI News App. You can also follow WPXI onFacebookandTwitter.Authorities said two stepbrothers, 31-year-old William Taylor and 28-year-old Akeem Mattox, found the drugs while renovating homes. But authorities say an attempt to sell the drugs in November 2018 led to their deaths and those of two sisters, 20-year-old Tiyaniah Hopkins and 17-year-old Yaleah Hall.Testimony at the four-hour sentencing hearing indicated that the defendants had been friends with the two men, and days after the shooting Garner texted Porter a message thanking him “for bringing the beast back out of me.”Common Pleas Court Judge Barbara McDermott expressed surprise that the victims weren’t strangers but were people with whom the defendants “hung out.”“It is very, very rare that this court sees a case that cannot be described as anything other than an execution,” she told Porter.Garner acknowledged Friday that the two female victims had nothing to do with the drug stash and simply happened to be in the house at the time.“I know it seemed like everybody was supposed to die, but it was just supposed to be a robbery, and it went bad,” Garner said. “I’m sorry for what happened. I’m not going to sit here and put the blame on nobody.”Porter, who could be seen crying at times, also apologized, telling the victims’ friends and relatives “I know I owe all of you so much more than words, and I’m sorry.”Relatives and friends of the victims said the crime had left them traumatized and frightened.“My children are scared to enter the basement thinking something’s going to happen to them,” the girls’ mother said in a statement read by prosecutor Danielle Burkavage.The prosecutor had sought 80-year prison terms, but the judge said the defendants should have the opportunity to appear before a parole board decades from now.A third man was sentenced earlier to at least 25 years in prison but is seeking reconsideration of that term.TRENDING NOW:BATON ROUGE - Three people have died following a quadruple shooting that occurred late Wednesday night.According to the Baton Rouge Police Department, 42-year-old Johnell Davis and 39-year-old Berman Hudson were found deceased in the 4800 block of Gus Young Avenue near Ragusa's Deli around 9:30 p.m.Two other male victims were transported to a local hospital with injuries. The East Baton Rouge Parish Coroner's office says 38-year-old Willie Kinchen died from his injuries Thursday. The condition of the fourth person is unknown.Authorities say all four victims were shot multiple times, and found inside or near a vehicle in the deli parking lot.Hudson was alsoshot last yearafter an altercation with his ex-girlfriend led to his arrest.Police are searching for a motive and suspects in the case.Select PagePosted byDonovan Quintero|Nov 14, 2018|News|WINDOW ROCKThe man who took the lives of three people and critically injuring a woman is identified as Anthony Bahe, according to an anonymous source familiar with the incident.While the investigation into the shooting continued, the family of the three victims who were shot and killed early Tuesday morning in Tsayatoh, New Mexico, during a domestic violence dispute have requested the public to respect their privacy during their time of devastating grief.Navajo Nation police were dispatched to the disturbance. When they arrived, they found four people all fatally shot inside the home. One of the deceased, they said, was Bahe, who committed suicide after gunning down the three adults.A fifth person, a woman, was critically injured from multiple gunshot wounds. She was flown to the UNM Hospital in Albuquerque where she is in critical condition.On Tuesday afternoon, Navajo Nation leadership offered condolences to the families of the victims.“Today, our thoughts and prayers go out to the community of Tsayatoh and to the families of the loved ones who lost their lives in the shooting that occurred on the Navajo Nation early this morning,” President-elect Jonathan Nez wrote Tuesday evening.“Let’s come together in prayer on behalf of these families and respect their privacy in this time of great loss,” said President Russell Begaye.According to Navajo Nation Police Chief Phillip Francisco, there was a boyfriend-girlfriend type relationship and the incident occurred at the girlfriend’s residence.The small community’s chapter house, which is located west of Gallup, was closed on Tuesday.Law enforcement officials said the shooting was being treated “an act of domestic violence.”Navajo Nation Council Delegate Seth Damon, who represents the community, wrote in a short statement asking the Navajo Nation to keep the victims in their prayers and thoughts.“On behalf of the Council and our communities, I offer my condolences to everyone who lost a loved one today,” he said.New Mexico Attorney General Hector Balderas said he was “saddened” about the shooting.“Our Native American communities are among the most beautiful in New Mexico, and they deserve safety and security,” he wrote.The names of the victims were not released as police continue with their investigations.To read the full article, pick up
	your copy of the Navajo Times at your nearest newsstand Thursday mornings!Are you a digital subscriber?Read the most recent three weeks of stories by logging in to your online account.Find newsstand locations at this link.Or,subscribe via mail or online here.Share:Rate:ADVERTISEMENTMore weather »Highway 264,Window RockI-40, WB @ WinslowI-40, WB @ ButlerSR-77 SB @ HolbrookADVERTISEMENTDownload the July 2 Print EditionDownload the June 25 Print EditionDesigned byElegant Themes| Powered byWordPressIf you previously used a social network to login to WRAL.com, click the “Forgot your password” link to reset your password.Mask dispute at Fayetteville sports bar prompts fight that ends with security guard shotSlain woman, murder suspect had been friends since middle schoolCOVID-19 vaccine clinics put J&J vaccine on hold after adverse reactions; CDC finds no safety issue with vaccineAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyDuke to require proof of vaccination before students can enroll for Fall semesterNo region in the world spared as virus cases, deaths surgeIsolated showers and thunderstorms on tap again for SaturdayHail, flooding throughout central NC as more severe weather awaits on SaturdayAverage number of Atlantic hurricanes grows, 2021 could be another active seasonTriangle reels in profit, exposure when MLF comes to townPro fishing returns to Triangle with events at 3 area lakesBring back the roars: The patrons return to the MastersAmazon warehouse workers reject union bid in AlabamaBusiness owners struggling to fill open positionsJobs remain unfilled as unemployment benefits outpace wagesEditorial: Find ways to ease voting, not restrict itPATRICIA MURPHY: Fighting business, baseball and future to defend lie about the pastEditorial: Ignoring their own warnings about the N.C. LotteryExpect refund, maybe apology if you find something weird in your foodIs that a firecracker in her bag of kale from Target?Wondering about your tax refund? 5 On Your Side looks into delaysNorth Carolina families united by shared slave history connectAs J&J shots resume, doctors explain side effects, and one woman shares her scary storyWoman who coughed on cancer patient gets 30 days in jailFoodie News: Union Special bakery is expandingVirtual Fun Roundup: Observe the moon, T. rex bites, storytimeWeekend best bets: Southern Ideal Home Show, shrimp boil and drive-in moviesWRAL WeatherCenter ForecastDaytime Pick 3 and Pick 4 DrawingEvening Pick 3 Pick 4 and Cash 5Published: 2018-11-21 17:16:00Updated: 2018-11-21 17:27:15Posted November 21, 2018 5:16 p.m. ESTUpdated November 21, 2018 5:27 p.m. ESTBy     Amanda Lamb, WRAL reporterDunn, N.C.— Tina Martinez says there was nothing unusual about the night of Nov. 12, which is when her family was sitting in the den of their Johnston County home and chatting before her husband of six years, Armando Martinez, looked at her with a strange look in his eye."He just got a wild look in his face," she says. "Something we've never seen."The man argued briefly with her daughter before the gunfire began a few minutes later, Tina and law enforcement authorities say.Armando Martinez, 40, opened fire on his family while they were inside their home on Woods Crossroads Road in Dunn about 9 p.m. on Nov. 12, authorities and relatives say. Before it was over, two of Tina Martinez's daughters and one of the girl's fiance, were dead."He just came out of the room with two guns and started shooting," Tina Martinez said. "I just hollered at him, 'stop honey, stop, stop shooting! Stop honey please!"Armando Martinez is charged with three counts of first-degree murder, one count of attempted first-degree murder and one count of felony larceny of a motor vehicle. Authorities have said three people were pronounced dead at the scene and one other was taken to WakeMed for treatment.Tina Martinez's daughter, Pamela Ramos, 32, and her fiancee, died on the floor in the den, which is now marked by small shrines that show where the killings occurred.Tina Martinez's other daughter, Jessica Agular, 26, was shot before she and ran outside, which is where she died with her critically wounded husband by her side.Said Tina Martinez: "She died protecting me. She threw her arms up and she protected me."Deputies said Martinez fled from the scene in a red 1996 Chevrolet S10, which belonged to one of the victims, officials have said. Martinez was arrested after wrecking the vehicle in Harnett County.The shooting left neighbors confused and stunned.Armando Martinez remains in the Johnston County Jail as of Wednesday."I can't judge him," Tina Martinez said. "Only God can do that."She said she cannot reconcile this man with the loving husband who has cared for her through kidney failure for the past decade and was never violent.Martinez said she recently discovered someone with no connection to the family had posted a GoFund me page in her daughter's memory, a fraud that only adds to her pain."She didn't die for somebody to try and make money off of her," Tina Martinez said.Copyright 2018 by Capitol Broadcasting Company. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.©2021  Capitol Broadcasting Company, Inc.Please log in, or sign up for a new account and purchase a subscription to continue reading.Please purchase a subscription to continue reading.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Sunny. High 76F. Winds WSW at 10 to 15 mph..Clear skies. Low 47F. Winds N at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 11:12 amEditorSterling Randall HuntA man who opened fire in a Globe bar in 2018, killing three and injuring another, was sentenced to three life sentences, according to the Gila County Attorney’s Office.Sterling Hunt opened fire at Jammerz Bar in Globe on Nov. 11, 2018, after reportedly getting upset about his bar tab. Hunt pleaded guilty to all charges in exchange for the GCSO withdrawing the death penalty. Hunt is not eligible for parole.Hunt arrived at the bar alone that night. He spent several hours socializing with others in the bar, who he had just met, according to Chief Deputy County Attorney Brad Soos.“At some point he got into a minor dispute with the bartender over the status of the bar tab,” according to a press release from the GCAO. “He then went out to his car, retrieved a handgun, returned to the bar and began shooting the victims in the back patio area of the bar. After emptying his gun, he disassembled and ditched the gun behind the bar, and ran along the railroad tracks, eventually making his way back to his vehicle.”Three people were killed and the bartender was severely injured. The bartender escaped through a rear entrance.Officers arrested Hunt hours later in the hospital parking lot. He was severely intoxicated, Soos said.“He claimed at sentencing that he did not recall much of that night and apologized to all of the victims. Most of the events were captured on video surveillance. Hunt had no prior criminal record and briefly served as a Marine reserve.”The state was prepared to go to trial, but the court granted the defendant’s request for a continuance over the objection of the state. Shortly thereafter, the victims and their families unanimously requested that the GCAO offer a plea agreement so that there could be finality and closure after the case had been pending for over two years.Hunt received three life terms for the murders and an additional 37 years for injuring others in the bar.Contact the editor atabechman@payson.comSterling Randall HuntEditorCovers breaking news, cops, fire and outdoor recreation.Log InKeep it Clean.Avoid obscene, hateful, vulgar,
lewd, racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Be Nice.No name-calling, racism, sexism or any
sort of -ism degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article. Real names only!Click 'Letters to the Editor' section headline above for full selection of latest letters to the editorClick 'Guest Comment' section headline above for full selection of latest guest commentsClick on 'Latest Photo Gallery' section header to see more photo galleriesClick 'Latest Video' section headline to see more videosKTLAby:CNN Wire,Christina PascucciInvestigators work at the scene of a mass shooting at the Borderline Bar & Grill in Thousand Oaks,on Nov. 8, 2018.    (Credit: Robyn Beck/AFP/Getty Images)The gunman in the mass shooting at a bar in Thousand Oaks entered the building and opened fire, tossed multiple smoke grenades to sow chaos and then sat in wait to ambush responding law enforcement officers, officials said on Tuesday.Ian David Long, a Marine veteran who served in Afghanistan, fired a total of more than 50 rounds in the shooting at Borderline Bar & Grill on the evening of Nov. 7, Ventura County Sheriff Bill Ayub said.Ayub’s comments Tuesday provide more details on how the gunman carried out the shooting that left 12 people dead — not including Long, who died of an apparent self-inflicted gunshot wound.But officials said they still do not know his motive for the attack.“We are no closer to determining that today as we were at the onset of the incident,” said Ayub.The gunman used a Glock .45-caliber semi-automatic pistol, which he legally purchased in August 2016 in Simi Valley, Ayub said. He also had a folding knife in his possession.The gunman brought seven high-capacity magazines to the bar, and five were still loaded when he took his own life at the end of the mass shooting, Ayub said. High-capacity magazines are illegal in California, although they are available for purchase in neighboring states.Long had a flashlight with a laser sight attached to his handgun, and he threw multiple smoke grenades into the bar to create chaos and confusion inside, Ayub said.After the initial shooting, he positioned himself in anticipation of the police response, Ayub said. When officers entered, he ambushed them immediately from a position of tactical advantage. The officers returned fire but did not strike him, and then retreated from the scene and waited for SWAT and other negotiating experts, Ayub said.In all, he struck 13 people with gunfire in the shooting, includingVentura County Sgt. Ron Helus, and only one of those survived.All of the 12 victims of the Borderline Bar & Grill shooting died rapidly from one or more gunshot wounds, according to Ventura County Medical Examiner Dr. Christopher Young. He said they were shot in vital areas, at close proximity and had no chance of survival. One victim had a stab wound to the neck in addition to the gunshot wound.Ayub also provided further details on an April 2018 incident in which law enforcement responded to Long’s home in nearby Newbury Park. Sheriff’s deputies responded after neighbors called about a disturbance.They heard loud noises and believed Long suffered a mental breakdown. Deputies contacted Long, who said he was upset over a financial dispute with his mother. She confirmed the dispute was related to money.Deputies and a mental health crisis team evaluated Long and decided he did not meet the criteria for a welfare and institution hold. During this incident, no gun was displayed, no one was threatened with a gun, no one mentioned a gun, therefore a gun violence restraining order was not considered relevant.SubmitTrademark and Copyright 2021The Associated Press. All rights reserved.A New York man is facing hate crime charges after police said he made threats and anti-Asian American remarks — to an undercover officer assigned to a hate crimes task force.Juvian Rodriguez, 35, was arrested Friday afternoon after the alleged confrontation near Penn Station.As governors loosen long-lasting coronavirus restrictions, state lawmakers across the U.S. are taking actions to significantly limit the power they could wield in future emergencies.The legislative measures are aimed not simply at undoing mask mandates and capacity limits that have been common during the pandemic. Many proposals seek to fundamentally shift power away from governors and toward lawmakers the next time there is a virus outbreak, terrorist attack or natural disaster.Britain's Prince Charles offered a heartfelt tribute to his “dear Papa,'' on Saturday as Buckingham Palace offered the broad outlines of a royal funeral that will be attended by the family and broadcast to the world.As Queen Elizabeth II and other relatives mourned, Charles offered a deeply personal video message saying the royal family was “deeply grateful’’ for the outpouring of support they’ve received following the death Friday of his 99-year-old father, Prince Philip. The heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared his family’s loss and sorrow.Trending:LONG BEACH — Four people were wounded in a shooting in North Long Beach, authorities said Saturday.The shooting was reported just after 10 p.m. Friday in the 5800 block of Brayton Avenue, Long Beach Police Department spokeswoman Arantxa Chavarria said.One man and three male juveniles were found at the scene with non-life threatening gunshot wounds, Chavarria said. They were taken to hospitals.No suspect information was available, she said. Detectives from the Gang Detail were investigating the shooting as gang-related.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.The Tallahassee Police Department identified all seven victims in a Friday night shooting at Hot Yoga Tallahassee.A gunman walked into the studio at Thomasville and Bradford roads at about 5:30 p.m. and posed as a customer. He shot and killed two people and injured five others before killing himself.The victims are:AGoFundMe has been createdto support the victims and the owner of the studio. It was started by Susan Valesky Wasserman, the director of the Florida Yoga Teachers Association. By Saturday afternoon more than $4,000 was raised. It can be found athttps://www.gofundme.com/ryfnm-hot-yoga-tallahassee.Two vigils will be held Sunday. Florida State University is hosting one at 5 p.m. at Langford Green, at the corner of Varsity Drive and West Gaines Street. Thesecond will be held at 6 p.m at Winthrop Park,1623 Mitchell Ave. It is hosted by Moms Demand Action for Gunsense in America.MINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)— Police say five people were hurt in a shooting Thursday afternoon in Minneapolis.Officers responded to several reports of gunfire on the 3400 block of Girard Avenue North at about 4:43 p.m.When officers arrived, they found five victims who had suffered from gunshot wounds. Police say four of the victims were taken to a hospital by ambulance, and one was self-transported. Their conditions are unclear as of Thursday night.An investigation shows the incident began as an argument between several people in the street. Police have not released any suspect information at this time.Click through to see violent crimes reported by Bay Area cities in 2016, starting with the cities that reported the highest incidents of violent crime. Statistics from the FBI Uniform Crime Report for 2016.Population: 114,521Violent crime:476Population: 129,903Violent crime: 447Population: 122,651Violent crime:602Population: 161,122Violent crime:631Population: 176,383Violent crime:658Population: 112,090Violent crime:760Population: 122,293Violent crime:1,053Population: 1,041,844Violent crime:3,887Population: 424,998Violent crime:6,059Population: 871,155Violent crime:6,190Population: 19,585Violent crime: 10Population: 14,491Violent crime: 9Population:7,218Violent crime: 3Population: 11,575Violent crime: 9Population: 31,000Violent crime: 13Population: 8,495Violent crime: 6Population: 5,364Violent crime: 3Population: 2,131Violent crime: 1Population: 3,591Violent crime: 0Population: 2,492Violent crime: 1Authorities released the identities of two men who were shot to death Tuesday night in unincorporated Vallejo in an incident that left a third person in critical condition at a local hospital.Bobby Beasley, 32, and De’Angelo Quinn, 26, were found dead after police responded to calls about shots fired near the intersection of Woodrow and Reis avenues at around 9:30 p.m. There, they found one man with a gunshot would. Two more victims were found four blocks away around the intersection of Steffan Street and Benicia Road near Interstate 780.The Solano County Sheriff’s Office did not offer any additional details about a suspect or a motive for the shooting, and officials did not immediately respond to requests for comment.Anyone with information about the shooting can contact Detective Sean Mattson at 707-784-7050. Anonymous callers may call the Crime Stoppers line at 707-644-7864.Chronicle Staff Writer Lauren Hernandez contributed to this report.Gwendolyn Wu is a San Francisco Chronicle staff writer. Email:gwendolyn.wu@sfchronicle.comTwitter:@gwendolynawuGwendolyn Wu is a business reporter at the Houston Chronicle, focusing on the healthcare and biotech sectors. Prior to moving to Texas, she was a metro reporter for the San Francisco Chronicle, where she was part of the award-winning breaking news team that covered the deadly Camp Fire.Originally from the San Fernando Valley in Los Angeles, Gwendolyn graduated from the University of California, Santa Barbara with degrees in history and sociology. She's an active member of the Asian American Journalists Association. In her spare time, she likes testing new recipes, exploring used bookstores and eating her way through new cities.Five people were injured in a drive-by shooting in South Los Angeles on Tuesday night, the Los Angeles Police Department said.Around 6:30 p.m., multiple rounds were fired from a black vehicle near 65th Place and Vermont Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood, said LAPD Officer Mike Lopez.Four men and one woman were shot, and all were taken to hospitals in stable condition, he said.No further details about the vehicle or the suspect were known, Lopez said. What motivated the shooting was unclear.hailey.branson@latimes.comTwitter:@haileybransonThe perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsHailey Branson-Potts is a Metro reporter for the Los Angeles Times who joined the newspaper in 2011. She grew up in the small town of Perry, Okla., and graduated from the University of Oklahoma.Subscribers Are ReadingCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoverageTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.PoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.CaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeCaliforniaIrvine doctor back home with family, after moving out for a year to keep everyone safeWhen Bobby Sasson moved out, she thought she’d be able to return home to her husband and three children quickly. That didn’t work out.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsATTEMPT MURDER INVESTIGATION AT SEVILLA’S NIGHTCLUBOn Monday, October 29, 2018, at approximately 12:04 a.m., the Riverside Police and Fire Dispatch Center received a call regarding a shooting occurring inside and outside the Sevilla Nightclub, located at 3252 Mission Inn Avenue.  Officers arrived and located two victims suffering from gunshot wounds.  The victims were transported to a local hospital to receive medical treatment.  An additional five victims later arrived at local hospitals to receive medical treatment for gunshot injuries suffered during the shooting at the nightclub.Detectives from the Robbery – Homicide Unit, Gang Intelligence Unit, and Technicians from the Forensics Unit responded to assume the investigation.The investigation is ongoing and there are no other details available at this time.  If anyone has information about this incident, please contact Detective Trevor Childers at (951) 353-7130 or Detective Karla Corbett at (951) 353-7134. Those wishing to remain anonymous can email rpdtips@riversideca.gov or utilize the Riverside Police Department’s mobile app “Submit a Tip” feature while referencing incident number P18204848.FACES OF 9-1-1⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣Public Safety Dispatchers (PSD’s) for the City of Riverside answer emergency and non-emergency calls for police and fire. Our dispatchers are some of the very best out there and we would like to highlight them by putting a face to the voice. ⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣Marnita has been a PSD for 16 years and loves the diversity and daily challenges of her job. No two days are ever the same and it keeps her on her toes.  Even though the job is fast paced, Marnita always takes the time to make a difference in someone’s life. Whether it’s by just being there when a person needs guidance, advice, or by being able to provide immediate help leaves her feeling fulfilled. ⁣⁣⁣⁣In all of her time as a PSD there is one call she will always remember. Marnita answered a 9-1-1 call with the sounds of a mother screaming because she just witnessed her child fall through a window. High stress calls such as this one are never easy. Marnita was able to keep the mom calm and walk her through life saving instructions as he not only had injuries from the fall, but he also had injuries from the glass.  She will never forget the sounds of the mom crying and screaming her son’s name over and over. This call was too close to home for Marnita..... her son shares the same name.⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣She will never forget.⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣#iam911⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣#heardnotseen⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣⁣#firstresponders⁣TRAFFIC STOP LEADS TO LARGE DRUG SEIZUREOn Thursday, April 8, 2021, shortly after 11:00 p.m., Watch A officers were providing extra patrol in the Magnolia Avenue corridor when they stopped a car in the area of Skofstad Street and Cochran Avenue. During their stop, K9 “Link”, who is assigned to the Riverside Police Department’s Narcotics unit, arrived and picked up a scent of drugs in the car. Officers searched the car and found 25 pounds of methamphetaminein the trunk.Adolfo Gonzalez, 22-years-old of Riverside, was arrested and booked into the Robert Presley Detention Center for possession and transportation of drugs for sales. He is currently being held on $500,000 bail.Great job Link!!!GRAND JURY FIELD TRIPEarlier today, members of the Riverside County Grand Jury toured our Air Support and METRO Team hangar facility.  They were given presentations on the various specialized equipment, vehicles, and aircraft used to keep our community safe.  This tour was actually scheduled for last year but delayed due to COVID-19, and we were happy we could finally have them out today.NOTE: According to court records, the charges stemming from this incident have been disposed. Malik Graham is no longer charged related to this shooting.Memphis police arrested another teenager in connection with a shooting at a Halloween party.RELATED: Teens charged with attempted murder after 5 people shot during Halloween party at Memphis homeAccording to police, the shooting happened on the 4200 block of Lady Slipper Lane on October 27, 2018.Five people were hit and all of them were taken to Regional One in critical condition.Download the FOX13 Memphis app to receive alerts from breaking news in your neighborhood.[CLICK HERE TO DOWNLOAD]Trending stories:A witness was able to identify Malik Graham, 19, as one of the three people responsible for the shooting.He is charged with five counts of Attempted First Degree Murder and Employment of a Firearm during the Commission of a Dangerous Felony.Roman Gaddy, 19, and Sadarius Hall, 19, were also arrested for the shooting.Pittsburgh police officers saw gunfire exploding through shattered glass and ran toward it.They were heading into the Tree of Life Synagogue in Squirrel Hill, a peaceful place of worship that on Saturday morning became a crime scene in the deadliest attack on Jews in the U.S."We're under fire! We're under fire! He's got an automatic weapon and firing at us from the synagogue."It was one of several radio dispatches from officers that gave a raw look at the chaotic and harrowing mass shooting."Every unit in the city needs to get here now!"As police entered the synagogue, they found victims who were already dead. They got wounded survivors to safety, even as they were still being fired upon, according to emergency dispatches and police reports.More:What we know now: Authorities identify 11 killed in Pittsburgh synagogue massacreMore:Hate in Pa.: Pittsburgh shooting part of 'white terrorism,' state civil rights watchdog saysThe tree-lined streets were soon filled with police vehicles, and tactically trained doctors also responded to treat victims at the scene. Six survivors were wounded, including four officers.One of the officers had a severed artery, according to Pittsburgh Mayor Bill Peduto. "It could've been much worse, but his partner placed a tourniquet."In active-shooter drills, city police officers and SWAT officers are trained to put the safety of others before themselves, and they continued to move toward the shooter, determined to keep him inside the building.Robert Bowers, a 46-year-old Baldwin resident who wrote anti-Semitic posts on a social media site popular among white nationalists, is charged in the shooting deaths of 11 people ranging in age from 54 to 97. He was carrying an AR-15 assault rifle and three Glock .357 handguns, according to police reports.He screamed "All these Jews need to die" and said "I just want to kill Jews," according to police reports.But he also took aim at responding SWAT officers, and they returned fire, according to dispatches. Two SWAT officers were hit multiple times, including one who was critically wounded, as they worked to take the alleged shooter into custody."They're all heroes," Pittsburgh Police Chief Scott Shubert said. "Who knows what would've happened if he got out in the streets."Listen to audio from the police scanner as officers responded (story continues below):After visiting with one of the injured officers, Peduto said that man was in good spirits. He was planning to meet with the rest of the injured officers Sunday.Gov. Tom Wolf also spent time with the injured officers.“I have spent today with first responders, with local leaders, and I am in awe of the bravery of displayed by law enforcement, those folks who help to keep people safe, to aid victims, and to prevent further tragedy," he said.Officials have not formally released the identities of the four officers injured, but confirmed the wounded were two city policemen and two SWAT officers.One of the city policemen was Officer Michael Smidga, according to thePittsburgh Post-Gazette.A GoFundMe account is set up for SWAT Officer Timothy Watson,who was shot multiple times and critically injured, according to fellow Officer Anthony Seretti.Cmdr. Jason Lando told thePost-Gazettethat Watson was cracking jokes in his hospital room Sunday.“When bullets are flying and people’s lives are in danger, Tim Matson is the guy you want going through the door,” Lando told thePost-Gazette. “He’s the guy who goes in and calmly gets the job done."More:Find coverage on The Incline, "elevating the news in Pittsburgh"UPMC, which owns many hospitals in Pittsburgh and throughout Pennsylvania, said the four officers were treated at its facilities. One officer, whose age is not immediately known, was already released. Three others are at two hospitals:Because of patient privacy laws, hospitals can't give specific information on injuries.Dispatch reports indicate an officer was shot in the hand, and another was cut on the face by flying shrapnel.Bowers also was wounded. He is in stable condition and under police protection at a local hospital.Law enforcement continues to investigate and could be at the crime scene for a week, authorities said. Bowers is set for arraignment in federal court at 1:30 p.m. Monday.The alleged shooter's motive seems "very clear," as he sought out the synagogue that worked with refugees and immigrants, Peduto said.Some of Bowers' social media posts on Gab before the shooting accused Jewish people of supporting and enabling mass migration."There was a clear message of hate against the Jewish community," Peduto said.Despite the numerous social media posts, there was nothing that alerted legal authorities to any illegal activity or a mass shooting so "horrific," Peduto said."The police response was tremendous. The shooter was armed at a very high level with a lot of ammunition, indicating there could have been a lot more damage," Allegheny County Executive Rich Fitzgerald said. "City and county police stopped what could've been worse. I give our police and first responders unbelievable gratitude and credit."Gallery: Jade Saunders, 17, shot dead in Jersey City on Oct. 26, 2018JERSEY CITY-- The Hudson County Prosecutor's Office has released the names of two men charged with murdering a 17-year-old Jersey City resident gunned down in front of her friends in a Brinkerhoff Street building last month.Jersey City residents Alterik Ellis, 25, and Travis Defoe, 28, have been charged with the Oct. 26, murder of Jade Saunders, Hudson County Prosecutor Esther Suarez announced Tuesday.Ellis and Defoe were arrested Monday on Lexington Avenue and are charged with murder, conspiracy to commit murder, three counts of aggravated assault, weapons offense and theft, Suarez said.Officers responding the Brinkerhoff Street building at about 11:35 p.m. on the night of the shooting found Saunders with a gunshot wound to her upper body. She was pronounced dead at the scene.Her death was ruled a homicide after an autopsy conducted at the state Regional Medical Examiner's Office, Suarez said.A 26-year-old Jersey City man was found at the scene suffering from a gunshot his leg. During the investigation by the Prosecutor's Office Homicide Unit, it was determined that two 19-year-olds also suffered gunshot wounds during the incident, but did not remain at the scene, Suarez said.One of the 19-year-olds suffered a graze wound to his torso and the other suffered a wound to his arm, Suarez said.After being processed, Ellis and DeFoe were remanded to the Hudson County jail in Kearny where they await hearings.Saunders was enrolled at Lincoln High School but was studying at the Renaissance Institute. Residents of the Brinkerhoff Street building told The Jersey Journal that Saunders was hanging out with friends in a hallway when someone came in and started shooting.Family members said Saunders was in her senior year and after graduation she wanted to be a hair stylist. They said she was in thewrong place at the wrong timethe night she was killed.Her funeral was Monday.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Five men were wounded in a single shooting Wednesday evening near the King Drive Green Line station on the South Side.They were standing on a sidewalk shortly before 9 p.m. in the 6200 block of South King Drive when several gunmen approached on foot and fired shots, according to Chicago police. The shooters then drove away in a white car.Two were critically wounded, and the conditions of the other three men had stabilized, police said.A 43-year-old and a 48-year-old were shot multiple times in their backs and were in critical condition at the University of Chicago Medical Center, police said.A 22-year-old suffered a gunshot wound to his chin, and a 42-year-old suffered a gunshot wound to his left leg, according to police. Their conditions had both stabilized at the University of Chicago.The fifth man, 49, was shot multiple times in his back, and was taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition was stabilized, police said. No one was in custody.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Colette DuChanois, Web producerColette DuChanois, Web producerJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– One of six people shot last month on the city's Eastside has died, according to the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.The Sheriff's Office now lists Robert Lee Williams, 76, as a murder victim in theOct. 21 mass shooting a half-mile from the Jaguars' stadium.Four other men and one woman were wounded in the drive-by shooting about 12:30 p.m. near a laundromat on A. Philip Randolph Boulevard at Pippin Street, not far from TIAA Bank Field where a Jaguars game was about to begin.Police said they believe the shooter opened fire from the passenger side of a vehicle and there could be more than one shooter. Sheriff's Office Director of Investigations and Homeland Security Ron Lendvay said they were believed to be traveling in a silver or gray four-door sedan, possibly a Nissan Altima or Maxima.The Sheriff's Office continues to investigate. Anyone with information is asked to call JSO at 904-630-0500 or emailJSOCrimeTips@jaxsheriff.org. To remain anonymous, contact Crime Stoppers at 1-866-845-TIPS (8477).Copyright 2018 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.Jacksonville native and proud University of Florida graduate who joined News4Jax in March 2016.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.Credit: JOHN SPINK / JSPINK@AJC.COMCredit: JOHN SPINK / JSPINK@AJC.COMPolice responded to call after call of gunfire during a violent night in Atlanta.No one was killed, but several were injured in three separate incidents in neighborhoods across the city.In the first call on Osborne Street in southwest Atlanta, two undercover officers asked for backup after someone with a rifle opened fire on their unmarked patrol car.MORE:Search continues for gunman after shots fired at cop car, SWAT standoffThe officers’ car was hit twice when the shooting started about 9:30 p.m. Monday, but no one was injured. A neighbor told Channel 2 Action News he heard as many as 40 gunshots as the officers were forced to drive away for their safety.Police were still on scene Tuesday morning searching for the gunman after an overnight SWAT standoff at a home in the 1100 block of Osborne Street. Six people left the residence on their own, police spokesman Officer Jarius Daugherty told AJC.com.“We are in the process of determining the appropriate charges for all individuals involved,” he said.When SWAT finally entered the home about 3 a.m. Tuesday, they found it unoccupied and recovered a number of guns and suspected drugs, according to Channel 2.Early Tuesday, police in southeast Atlanta were called to the Trestletree Village Apartments in the 900 block of Confederate Court. Three people said they were hit by gunfire on the railroad tracks behind the apartments about 12:45 a.m., police told Channel 2.Two men were found with gunshot wounds. One of the victims, 21-year-old Shyheim Weddle,  had outstanding warrants and was taken into custody  at Grady Memorial Hospital, where he was treated for a chest wound.The other man’s foot was grazed by a bullet and he refused to go to the hospital. Both are expected to recover, police said.A third man thought he was shot but was actually injured while trying to run away from the hail of bullets, Daugherty said.None have  cooperated with the investigation, he said.Investigators think the shooter fired toward the tracks from a distance.Less than an hour later, four people were shot  on Broad Street in downtown Atlanta. One person was taken to a hospital when authorities arrived, and three others showed up at the Grady emergency room,  Daugherty said.The four victims, who were all in stable condition Tuesday, told police someone fired shots from a passing vehicle just after 1:40 a.m. Some described it as a white vehicle, while one said it was a silver SUV.One man said he was sitting on a sidewalk in the 90 block of Broad Street when he was shot in his arm. He stayed on scene until police arrived, Daugherty said.A woman took herself to Grady after she was shot in her leg and wrist while walking down the street. Two other men were walking together to a nearby bus stop when the gunfire erupted. They were both hit in the arm, and one took a bullet to his leg.Both sides of Broad Street were shut down while investigators were on the scene, which was cleared quickly. Thirteen shell casings were collected along with some playing cards, police told Channel 2.Investigations into all three overnight incidents continue.“At this time, it does not appear that any of these shootings are related,” Daugherty said.WKRN News 2by:WKRN Web StaffWARNING: The details in this story may be disturbing to some.COLUMBIA, Tenn. (WKRN) – An autopsy report has revealed horrific, new detailsin a murder-suicide that claimed the lives of four children and their mother.Cynthia Collier, and her children ranging in age from 14 to17, were found dead inside their Carters Creek Pike home in Columbia on October 15. The autopsy report indicates the children were killed with multiple guns.According to the report, 17-year-old Kaileigh Lin was found dead on the bathroom floor with 13 gunshot wounds.Lia Lin, 15, was found dead in her bed with nine gunshot wounds. Bo and Meigan Li, both 14, were also found dead in their beds with four and eight gunshot wounds respectively.The autopsy listed the children’s causes of death as homicide. It was previously reported that all four were adopted.The report indicated that there were no drugs or alcohol in any of their systems, including their mother’s, and that a shotgun and another firearm were used.The autopsy indicates Collier died from a gunshot wound to the head and her death was ruled a suicide. The report indicates a suicide note was found at the home. Details of the note have not been revealed.The report also included ZzzQuil and melatonin were found in the home’s kitchen. Both are commonly used as sleep aids.  It was also noted that detectives on the scene spoke to an adult child who also lived at the home and discovered the bodies. He could not tell officers when the five were last seen alive.Authorities previously said there were not any previous calls from the home, which was described as immaculate.Collier was a stay-at-home mom and the four teens were home-schooled, according to Sheriff Bucky Rowland.Maury County Mayor Andy Ogles previously told News 2 the tragedy impacted the entire community.“There’s a lot of angst and uncertainty and trying to figure out why and how this could happen,” Ogles said. “How could four children be taken all at once in such a violent fashion.”He continued, “We’ll never fully understand what happened, but maybe we can learn from it, bringing awareness to mental illness.”A motive for the murder-suicide has not been revealed.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NASHVILLE, Tenn. (WKRN) - So far this afternoon, the instability of the atmosphere has been low in our eastern and northeastern counties that have been in the Marginal Risk category (1 of 5) for severe weather.Odds are at this point, we have escaped strong storms there.DEATH VALLEY NATIONAL PARK, Calif. (AP) — An Arizona tourist has died and his wife has been rescued after their vehicle got two flat tires and they went missing in Death Valley National Park in California.The Inyo County Sheriff's Office says searchers on Friday reached 32-year-old Alexander Lofgren and 27-year-old Emily Henkel on a steep ledge in the California desert park.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY/AP) — A second lieutenant in the U.S. Army is suing two Town of Windsor police officers over a traffic stop during which the officers drew their guns, pointed them at him and used a slang term to suggest he was facing execution.Body camera footage shows 2nd Lt. Caron Nazario had his hands held in the air outside the driver’s side window as he told the armed officers, “I’m honestly afraid to get out.” One of the officers told Nazario, “Yeah, you should be!”newsCrimeByClaire Z. Cardona6:31 PM on Oct 14, 2018 CDTFour people, including two preschoolers, were injured Sunday evening in a drive-by shooting in Fort Worth, police say.A man opened fire about 5:30 p.m. outside Smokey's Paradise Food Mart in the 5300 block of East Rosedale Street, near Rosedale Plaza Park. He fired from a gray Nissan Altima and left the area going west, police said.The two children, both 3-year-olds, were transported in serious condition to Cook Children's Medical Center. One child was shot in the leg and the other was shot in the arm, police said.The two men, a 19-year-old and a 20-year-old, were both shot in the leg, police said.1/2Fort Worth police officers investigate the scene of a shooting at Smokey's Paradise Food Mart in Fort Worth on Sunday.(Carly Geraci / Staff Photographer)2/2Fort Worth police officers investigate the scene of a shooting at Smokey's Paradise Food Mart in Fort Worth on Sunday.(Carly Geraci / Staff Photographer)Both adults were transported to John Peter Smith Hospital. One was in serious condition and the other had minor injuries, according to MedStar.None of the injuries were thought to be life-threatening.Police did not provide a detailed description of the suspected shooter. He was not in custody Sunday night.Claire Z. Cardona, Breaking News Producer. Claire joined The Dallas Morning News as an intern in 2012. She now writes about crime, other breaking news and the Dallas Zoo. She grew up in New Orleans and graduated with a journalism degree from the University of Texas at Austin.Stay up-to-date with the crime and public safety news your neighbors are talking about.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasTrending:EAST PALO ALTO — In this city’s first public homicides in more than two years, two people were killed and two others critically injured in a shooting outside a private Halloween party, authorities said.Police are seeking a suspect who fled the scene.In a statement, police said they responded just before 2:45 a.m. Sunday to reports of a ShotSpotter activation in the 2500 block of Pulgas Avenue in the city’s Ravenswood neighborhood just north of Bay Road.Officers arrived in less than two minutes, and found four people suffering from gunshot wounds. Two of the four were pronounced dead at the scene. Police named one victim, Eduardo Sandoval, 22, of Stockton. The San Mateo County Coroner’s Office on Tuesday identified the second victim as Mario Vidales Mendez, 23, of Redwood City.Menlo Park Fire Protection District fire and AMR ambulance crews also responded to the scene, taking two other victims suffering from life-threatening injuries to an area hospital. No update on their conditions was immediately available Sunday evening.Police said they believe the shooting happened after a dispute erupted into physical confrontation outside a privately held adult Halloween party outside the rear of a business complex.The deaths are thecity’s first public homicidessince June 10, 2016, police said. ADecember 2017 murder-suicideinside a Tuscany Court home was not listed as public by police.Anyone with information should call East Palo Alto police Detective. Lydia Cardoza at 650-853-7249, send an anonymous e-mail to epa@tipnow.org or an anonymous text or voicemail to 650-409-6792.Contact George Kelly at 408-859-5180.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersFOX 2by:Chris SmithST. LOUIS COUNTY, MO – The St. Louis County Police Department is investigating a quadruple shooting that occurred overnight early Saturday morning. The shooting happened in the 400 block of Midlothian Road near Glasgow Village.Police say around 2:15 am officers were summoned to the neighborhood for a report of a shooting. Upon arrival officers found 4 victims suffering from gunshot wounds, a 27-year-old male, 33-year-old female, 25-year-old male, and a 33-year-old male.  All were transported to the hospital for treatment of non-life-threatening injuries.It’s believed that a suspect or suspects fired into a residence that the victims occupied.If you have any information about the shooting, your urged to call the St. Louis County Police at 636-529-8210 or you can call CrimeStoppers at 1-866-371-TIPS (8477).SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.Police in have one suspect in custody and are looking for two others following a shooting outside the Cook Out fast food restaurant in Spartanburg, South Carolina over the weekend that sent six people to the hospital.Here’s what you need to know:Spartanburg Police Department officersresponded to reports of shots firedat the Cook Out on John B. White Sr. Boulevard not too long after 11:30 p.m. last Saturday night (Oct. 13). According to the responding officers, the suspect(s) never entered the fast food joint and shooting happened in the parking lot.A total of six people were shot: two males and one female victim were taken to Spartanburg Regional via ambulance, and the four others with gunshot wounds were taken to the hospital by personal vehicle.The shooting victims’ ages range from 16 to 24-years-old, and fortunately, none of them suffered any life-threatening injuries and were expected to recover, police said.The majority of the victims in the shooting were innocent bystanders, police said, adding that some of them were students from either Dorman High School or Spartanburg High School.Three vehicles in the parking lot were hit by gunfire, police said.One of the shooting victims, a Dorman High School senior,spoke to Fox Carolinaabout the incident. He said he was struck in the ankle and his arm was grazed in the shooting.“We heard shots and I remember getting hit,” Kaden Vaughn said. It felt like a rock hit me. Like, I didn’t want to believe I got shot, at first, and then I got grazed in the arm and it went straight through my cup.”Vaughn said he and another Dorman student, who was also injured, were about to leave the restaurant when the shooting broke out. He said they went to the restaurant to eat after the Byrnes vs. Dorman football game—which is something most high schoolers do after sporting events.“Before I could even get down to the parking lot, we just heard shots and everyone started running,” Vaughn said. “I kind of went down at first to like, feel my leg. I was like, this is going to be a nasty bruise when I wake up. I ran to my truck. All of a sudden, I look down and there was a hole in my pant leg and I pulled my pants up and there was blood everywhere.”The teen added: “There was still shots going off when I got in the truck so I didn’t want to stay. I wasn’t about to wait for nobody so I just tried to drive myself home. I remember, my right foot kind of gave out on me halfway home so I had to drive home left-footed then I got home and my parents rushed me to the ER.”Vaughn said when he arrived at the Emergency Room, doctors found “two big holes” in his ankle. “It went clean through and left some holes, but thankfully it didn’t hit the bone or tear anything major,” he said.On Thursday (Oct. 18), nearly one week after the shooting, police have finally released the names of the three suspects accused of opening fire and they finally have information about the shooting.Police said the shooting was the result of a fight that broke out in the parking lot of the Cook Out restaurant. The suspects are 16 and 18 years old, police said.18-year-old Frederick Lee Smith Jackson was arrested and charged with unlawful carrying of a pistol, possession of a weapon during a violent crime, possession of a weapon underage, and six counts of assault/attempted murder.Police said warrants have also been issued for 18-year-old Trevor Lamont Gist and 16-year-old Jarcoby Tramon Geter—who were both still wanted as of Thursday.Geter was charged with possession of a weapon underage, possession of a stolen weapon, possession of a weapon during a violent crime, and assault/attempted murder.Police are asking anyone with any information about the incident to contact the Spartanburg Police Dept. at 864-596-2065 or Crime Stoppers at 1-888-CRIMESC.Cook Out is a popular fast food restaurant chain that is located in the following Southern states: Alabama, Georgia, Kentucky, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, Mississippi and Maryland.The menu features grilled hamburgers and hot dogs, chicken sandwiches, BBQ and milkshakes.The food has a distinct “Outdoors Style” taste (i.e. it tastes like it was cooked at a “cookout,” hence the name) and the restaurant is popular with young people as a hang-out spot because it stays open past midnight (up to 3 or 4 a.m. at some locations).The restaurant received national attention after Olympic sprinter Tyson Gay’s 15-year-old daughter Trinity wasshot and killedat a location in Lexington, Kentucky in October 2016.The four men responsible for that shooting werefound guiltyon Monday (Oct. 15), almost exactly two years to the day of the incident.Home|About Us|Contact Us|Privacy Policy© 2020 Gossip On This LLC. All Rights Reserved. A member ofSheKnows Media – EntertainmentLas Vegas gang detectives are investigating a shooting that sent four people to the hospital early Friday morning.Las Vegas police gang unit detectives are investigating a shooting that sent four people to the hospital early Friday morning.Police responded about 1:30 a.m. to reports of shots fired in the 6500 block of West Charleston Boulevard, near Torrey Pines Drive, Metropolitan Police Department Lt. Jason Johansson said.Officers found four people suffering gunshot wounds at the scene. They were all hospitalized, but their conditions were unknown as of 4 a.m.This is a developing story. Check back for updates.Contact Max Michor atmmichor@reviewjournal.comor 702-383-0365. Follow@MaxMichoron Twitter.Las Vegas police have arrested a 30-year-old man on suspicion of murder after a woman was dropped off at a hospital with a fatal gunshot wound early Friday.Henderson police are investigating after a man was shot Friday morning in the south Las Vegas Valley.Las Vegas police are investigating the firing of gunshots on the Las Vegas Strip early Friday, but police said they did not locate anyone who was injured.A public fact-finding review for the 2020 fatal police shooting of Las Vegas resident Jorge Gomez has been set for April 16.The man was taken to Sunrise Hospital and Medical Center, Las Vegas police said.A Texas couple arrested this week in a shooting on Las Vegas Boulevard that left three people injured came to town with a “bag of guns,” police said Thursday.The man was wanted on a murder charge in connection with the March 17 shooting of his nephew during an argument over money.The Clark County district attorney’s office is not pursuing criminal charges against an undercover sergeant who shot and killed a man during an April traffic stop.Las Vegas police are investigating the shooting up of a house with five people inside late Monday.Three people were shot — one critically injured — outside of a 7-Eleven in the Arts District on Monday afternoon.Copyright ©2019Las Vegas Review-Journal, Inc.|Privacy Policy|Terms of ServicePowered byWordPress.com VIPsublogFour people are recovering tonight from gunshot and shrapnel wounds after an early morning shooting. TPD says they handled a number of shots fired calls last night but this one was the most volatile.Police say a man fired into a crowd, during a fight outside a bar. It happened in a corner shopping center at 31st and Mingo.The front windows of Club Calle Ocho show signs of the gunfire. Officers say just after 2 a.m. on Saturday morning as the club was closing down a fight broke out in the parking lot.During the fight police say a young man pulled a handgun and fired 7 or 8 shots in the crowd. Two people outside were hit and two inside the club with shrapnel. All of the victim’s injuries are considered not life-threatening, but other people in the crowd were hurt as well."You have people who are scared, with shots being fired and people being hit and of course people are going to try and get away from that they're going to hide and run," said TPD Cpl. Greg Smith.The police say they've responded before to problems in and outside the club. Other tenants in the shopping center say they're afraid they'll be caught up in the problems created by patrons of the club.In this case, police say one man fired shots into the crowd another fired shots trying to stop the fight."They decided they would break the fight up by getting a pistol and firing a couple of rounds into the air to disperse people and to discourage them from fighting. While the intent was good it's not a good idea," said Cpl. Smith.Tulsa Police have a good video of the shooting and the suspects. Now the case goes to detectives who have more than 20 witness statements to go through to figure out who fired those shots.Officers say the victims were taken by EMSA with what were described as non-life threatening wounds.Four people are taken to the hospital early Saturday following a shooting outside a Tulsa nightclub, according to police.Four people are taken to the hospital early Saturday following a shooting outside a Tulsa nightclub, according to police.Four people are taken to the hospital early Saturday following a shooting outside a Tulsa nightclub, according to police.HOUSTON– A person was killed and others were injured in a gang-related shootout Saturday afternoon, police said.Houston police responded to two reported shootings in south Houston.The first shooting was reported at 2:33 p.m. at Pappadeaux restaurant in the 2000 block of South Loop West. Houston police said there were no injuries reported. Police said three men in a red Lincoln Navigator, possibly with chrome rims and a chrome strip on the side of the vehicle, got out the vehicle and started shooting at another person in the parking lot.The second shooting, a drive-by, was reported at 3:05 p.m. at a gas station in the 6000 block of Cullen Boulevard. Police said the same red Lincoln Navigator drove up, and suspects inside started shooting at four people standing in the parking lot. Police said one man was struck and killed while sitting inside a vehicle, and three others were injured.Police are searching for the red Lincoln Navigator connected to the gang-related shootings, officials said.Copyright 2018 by KPRC Click2Houston - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (713) 778-4745.Trending:OAKLAND — Six men were wounded early Saturday in a shooting in the Uptown district, authorities said.Two of the wounded men, who police believe were in a dispute that resulted in the gunfire, were later arrested.The shooting happened about 12:10 a.m. Saturday near the intersection of Williams Street and Telegraph Avenue.That is part of the First Friday event area which had ended a few hours earlier but where many people were still hanging out.Authorities said that a 20-year-old Vallejo man and an 18-year-old Vallejo man were in different groups with other people who got into a dispute that ended with gunfire. They were both wounded and taken to a hospital where they were listed in critical but stable condition and placed under arrest.Two guns were recovered at the scene, police said.The gunfire also wounded another 18-year-old man, a 32-year-old Redwood City man and a 46-year-old Brentwood man, authorities said. They were all hospitalized Saturday but their conditions were not available. A 27-year-old who was wounded managed to walk a few blocks away before he was found on Franklin Street.Authorities said the Brentwood and Redwood City men had attended First Friday. It was not immediately known if the other men wounded had attended the event.Police are still investigating what started the dispute that resulted in the gunfire and other suspects are being sought. Officers were in the area at the time of the gunfire and bullets broke out a passenger and rear window of a parked patrol car, police spokeswoman Officer Johnna Watson said.The Oakland Police Officers’ Association posted pictures on Facebook of the patrol car’s shattered windows.“In the wake of yet more serious violence downtown associated with First Friday, placing Oakland residents and police officers in danger, city leaders need to rethink this event,” police union president Sgt. Barry Donelan said in a text message. “Gun battles on crowded Oakland city streets are unacceptable and that is what we saw last night.”Organizers of First Friday did not respond to an email seeking comment.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call police at 510-238-3426.Staff writer David DeBolt contributed to this report.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersA descanso for Cameron Martinez in Española on Thursday.A descanso for Cameron Martinez in Española on Thursday.Urban Martinez, father of Cameron Martinez, watches in October 2018 as Mark Hice, one of the suspects in the shooting death of his son, walks into District Court. Hearings for Hice and several co-defendants have drawn crowds of Martinez’s loved ones, surviving victims, their supporters and members of the press — far more people than can socially distance in the courtroom during Hice’s trial this week.Cameron Martinez’s sister, Rebecca Martinez, who attended a jersey retirement ceremony at Española Valley High in her late brother’s honor, will not be able to sit inside the courtroom during Hice’s trial.Cameron MartinezMark Hice, right, speaks with his attorney, Sheri Raphaelson, during a pretrial hearing last year. Jury selection in his murder trial is scheduled Monday and Tuesday. Testimony is expected to start Wednesday and could last two weeks.Courts ReporterA descanso for Cameron Martinez in Española on Thursday.A descanso for Cameron Martinez in Española on Thursday.Urban Martinez, father of Cameron Martinez, watches in October 2018 as Mark Hice, one of the suspects in the shooting death of his son, walks into District Court. Hearings for Hice and several co-defendants have drawn crowds of Martinez’s loved ones, surviving victims, their supporters and members of the press — far more people than can socially distance in the courtroom during Hice’s trial this week.Cameron Martinez’s sister, Rebecca Martinez, who attended a jersey retirement ceremony at Española Valley High in her late brother’s honor, will not be able to sit inside the courtroom during Hice’s trial.Cameron MartinezMark Hice, right, speaks with his attorney, Sheri Raphaelson, during a pretrial hearing last year. Jury selection in his murder trial is scheduled Monday and Tuesday. Testimony is expected to start Wednesday and could last two weeks.It’s a logistical nightmare: a high-profile murder trial with multiple victims in a small courtroom where viewers must adhere to stringent social-distancing rules.Mark Hice, accused in the fatal shooting of a Rio Arriba County teen, will face a jury this week in the village of Tierra Amarilla, the remote county seat, in what is proving to be a tough test for the First Judicial District.It is the district’s first public trial since mid-March, when the state Supreme Court suspended such proceedings amid health risks posed by the COVID-19 pandemic.Hice, 24, of Ojo Caliente is accused of organizing and arming a group of youth police say opened fire on a moving vehicle on N.M. 68, north of Española, in October 2018. Cameron Martinez, 18, of Alcalde, a well-known graduate of Española Valley High School, was killed and three of his friends injured in an attack authorities believe was a case of mistaken identity.Hearings for Hice, who is charged with 22 counts, and several co-defendants have drawn crowds of Martinez’s loved ones, surviving victims, their supporters and members of the press — far more people than the Tierra Amarilla courtroom can accommodate under the state’s public health restrictions.The court must ensure there is at least 6 feet of space between every person in the room — even more imperative as Rio Arriba County, like the rest of the state, is seeing a rise in COVID-19 cases.There will be seats in the courtroom for Martinez’s parents and a handful of other people. But there are no chairs for his brother, his former girlfriend or his sister, Rebecca Martinez.“As a family, we definitely understand the importance of caution and following social-distancing guidelines, Rebecca Martinez said Thursday. “But we’ve been able to attend all the past hearings together, and for us it’s very disheartening not to be able to do that.”The shooting that killed her brother left the community shaken and prompted public conversations on a rash of violence that had erupted, including many events involving youth.According to reports of the shooting, Hice told police he and two friends had fired on the vehicle carrying Cameron Martinez because they mistook its occupants for people who had threatened Hice’s life.“The victims are not believed to have been related to any prior involvement with the suspects and were targeted as a mistake,” New Mexico State Police said in a news release following the incident.Reports said Hice told police he’d had a falling out with an Española man. Lucas Martinez — no relation to Cameron Martinez — had threatened to kill him and mocked him on social media while posing with guns, he said.On Oct. 4, 2018, the day of the shooting, Hice told police, he and his girlfriend were driving around Española when Lucas Martinez’s friends began following them. Hice said he fired three “warning” shots toward the vehicle but didn’t strike anyone.Hice’s mother told investigators her son became “paranoid” that afternoon “because he believed every car was out to get him.”Hice told officers he had bought ammunition and met up with six friends that evening, according to reports. They drank liquor, he said, and he gave guns to two of the friends.Hice and his six co-defendants — a few of them teenagers and none over 23 — then got into two vehicles and went for a drive.They were headed north on N.M. 68 near the Ohkay Hotel Casino when, Hice later told police, a blue Subaru pulled up behind them, driving aggressively before it started to pass.“I got scared and thought it was them [Lucas Martinez or his friends] because I saw one of their windows down,” Hice said. “That’s when I thought it was them — so all of us, it just, you know, we were in that thing, and we wanted to defend ourselves.”Hice is accused of firing nine bullets into the vehicle. Prosecutors say one of them struck and killed Cameron Martinez.The trial has been a long time coming for the family of Cameron Martinez, whose sister described him as the kind of young man who chopped wood for his grandparents in the winter without being asked.Rebecca Martinez said the family is hoping the trial — and Hice’s sentencing, if he is found guilty — will bring some closure to their grief, prolonged by the slow pace of justice.If Hice is convicted all charges against him, she said, her family would like to see him receive the maximum sentence.Hice’s attorney, Sheri Raphaelson, said he faces a maximum sentence of life in prison plus 42 years if he is convicted on all counts.“Once this is over … we will be able as a family to breathe better and move forward in building a life that Cameron would have been proud of for all of us,” Rebecca Martinez said.First, they will have to get through the trial.Jury selection is scheduled Monday and Tuesday. Testimony is expected to start Wednesday and could last two weeks.But Raphaelson said Friday she plans to formally object to the public’s lack of access to the trial. “The Constitution mandates a public trial,” which means members of the public can attend, she said.“There are no chairs available for the press. There are no chairs available for the public. There is not even a chair available for my client’s mother,” Raphaelson said. “That’s not the public being able to come in and watch the trial.”According to recent motions filed in the case, court officials initially determined there was space in the Tierra Amarilla courtroom to accommodate five people who are not participating in the trial — including victims, the public and the press — while following social-distancing requirements.Prosecutors objected to the arrangement last week, saying it violated the rights of the nine victims: the four people Hice is accused of firing at earlier in the day, Cameron Martinez’s parents and the three wounded friends who survived. They all have a legal right to attend the proceedings, prosecutors said.Presiding District Judge Maria Sanchez-Gagne has since announced the court will seat all nine victims.But there are no seats for other members of the public, including the media.Sanchez-Gagne said the trial will be shown on TV screens in an overflow room that has capacity for six people and on a TV in a hallway outside the courtroom.Cameron Martinez’s family and supporters have packed the courtroom for nearly every hearing since his death. With seven defendants in the case, there have been many hearings.Rebecca Martinez said the family never imagined they would not be together during the trial.“This has made it very surreal,” she said. “When we started this 21 months ago, this isn’t how we envisioned we’d be at the end of this.“But it is what it is,” she added. “And I don’t think it’s going to change the outcome.”Seven young people were criminally charged in connection to the Oct. 4, 2018, shooting that killed 18-year-old Cameron Martinez and wounded three of his friends.Seven young people were criminally charged in connection to the Oct. 4, 2018, shooting that killed 18-year-old Cameron Martinez and wounded three of his friends.Courts ReporterMy heart goes out to all the families of this tragedy. But even if the circumstances aren't perfect for this it is time to get it over with.My heart goes out to all the families of this tragedy. But even if the circumstances aren't perfect for this it is time to get it over with.Log InThank you for joining the conversation on Santafenewmexican.com.
Please familiarize yourself with the community guidelines. Avoid
personal attacks: Lively, vigorous conversation is welcomed and
encouraged, insults, name-calling and other personal attacks are
not. No commercial peddling: Promotions of commercial goods and
services are inappropriate to the purposes of this forum and can be
removed. Respect copyrights: Post citations to sources appropriate
to support your arguments, but refrain from posting entire
copyrighted pieces. Be yourself: Accounts suspected of using fake
identities can be removed from the forum.AdvertisementSorry, there are no recent results for popular videos.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.A drive-by shooting outside this Dollar General store left one man dead and four others wounded Wednesday afternoon. (screen shot/FOX29 Philly)One moment, it was business as usual outside a Dollar General bargain store in Philadelphia's Germantown section. The next moment, there were gunshots and chaos, witnesses tell the Philly media:"Gunshots and everyone started running in different directions," a local store ownertold FOX29 in Philly.The peace was shattered around 2:30 p.m. Wednesday, as five young men ages 19-23 were sitting on a wall outside the Dollar General, FOX29 writes, adding:Suddenly, a white Chevy Impala appeared and gunshots rang out. All five men were shot in the hail of bullets.A total of 18 shell casings were found in the bloody aftermath.The drive-by shooting left one of those men dead and wounded the other four.No names of the victims were immediately released by police.Later, police impounded a stolen white Chevy Impala, which had been carjacked earlier. A loaded gun was also recovered at the shooting scene, tucked inside a hoodie, FOX29 reports, adding:Graffiti on the scene included the words 'Gunplay' and '30 Shotz'. But police won't say if this was gang-related.However, police did say the drive-by could be retaliation for a shooting Tuesday night on Wayne Avenue where a young man was critically wounded and another suffered a graze wound.The investigation continues.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:A Brainerd neighborhood man with no criminal history has been charged with killing two men and wounding two others in a shooting early Monday in the Loop.Marquis Watkins, 39, faces two counts of first-degree murder and two counts of attempted murder, according to the Cook County states attorney’s office.Watkins appeared for a hearing on the charges Wednesday afternoon at the Leighton Criminal Court Building before Judge Michael Clancy, who ordered Watkins held without bail. Dressed in light blue medical pants and a brown T-shirt, Watkins hung his head during the hearing.The shooting happened just after midnightas Watkins and the four other men were traveling south in a 2015 Chrysler 300 in the 500 block of South Michigan Avenue, according to authorities.“Something happened inside the vehicle — we’re not sure what yet — causing shots to be fired inside the vehicle,” Chicago police spokesman Al Stinites said shortly after the shooting.The men were out to celebrate the birthday of 29-year-old Bruce Miller and were driving around when Watkins began firing, Assistant State’s Attorney Jamie Santini said in court Wednesday.A motive for the shooting was not given.One of the men who was wounded but survived told investigators that he was sitting in the right-rear passenger seat and looking at his phone when he heard a gunshot, Santini said. He then turned to see muzzle flashes and Watkins holding a gun. That passenger and the driver of the Chrysler, both 29, are the half-brothers of Watkins. Each suffered a gunshot wound to the shoulder and both were treated at a hospital.The Chrysler crashed into a planter box after jumping a curb and came to rest upside down, Santini said. The right-rear seat passenger and Watkins crawled from the car and the passenger ran to the nearby Congress Hotel for help.Miller had been sitting in the front passenger seat and was shot twice in the head, Santini said. Steve Nixon, 31,  had been sitting beside Watkins in the rear-center passenger seat when a bullet entered his left cheek and exited the right side of his head. Both were taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital and pronounced dead, authorities said.Watkins was the only man in the car not to suffer a gunshot wound, Santini said. Surveillance video in the area showed no one firing from another vehicle or from the street, and the vehicle sustained no exterior bullet damage.A .9mm Glock 17 handgun was found by responding officers on the street near the car, Santini said. Watkins also allegedly made a videotaped statement to investigators that he had fired a gun inside the vehicle.Watkins, who is married, has three children and owns his home on the South Side, has never been convicted of a crime, his defense attorney said in court.Judge Clancy said he found Watkins to be a danger to the community and ordered him held without bail. His next court date was set for Oct. 22.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.ByJeanette MarantosOct. 4, 2018Chloe Jane Hunter, a 17-year-old black girl, was fatally shot on Sunday, Sept. 30, in the 200 block of North Long Beach Avenue in Compton, according to Los Angeles County coroner’s records.Chloe was one of four people shot outside a school carnival at the Optimal Child Development Center at 1300 E. Palmer St. around 5 p.m. The school’s blacktop, where the carnival was being held, is behind the large parking lot for DND Mart Liquor, at 217 N. Long Beach Ave., where Chloe and others had parked to attend the carnival, according to Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Lt. Scott Hoglund.The other three shooting victims, a 14-year-old girl, a 19-year-old man and a 40-year-old man, all had non-life-threatening gunshot wounds and are expected to survive their injuries, Hoglund said.The gunfire struck Chloe in the torso, however, as she was getting out of her car to go watch a friend dance at the carnival, according to her mother, Janel Hunter.“She barely got out of the car,” Hunter said, “She thought she could drive herself from the scene to the hospital, but she ended up sideswiping two cars and landed in someone’s driveway. They called 911, and stayed with her till the ambulance came, but she lost too much blood.”Chloe was taken to the hospital where she was pronounced dead at 7:30 p.m., according to coroner’s records. The cause of death was listed as gunshot wounds to the chest.Hoglund said investigators don’t know if the shooters were in a car or on foot. They are trying to find surveillance video to see if they can pinpoint where the shooting came from, and develop a motive, he said.Chloe and the two men were in the parking lot but the 14-year-old was at the carnival, Hoglund said. All that separated the parking lot and carnival is a narrow street, North Crane Avenue, and a chain-link fence, he said.“We don’t think the shooting had anything to do with the event at the school, but a stray round went into that area and struck the 14-year-old in the hand,” Hoglund said.Trying to drive herself to the hospital was in character for Chloe, an independent young woman who graduated from high school early and was working three jobs while also taking classes at Cerritos College, according to her mother.Her goal was to be a doctor, Hunter said, “but she said she wasn’t sure she wanted to go to school that long,” so she settled on pursuing a nursing degree before deciding whether to take the next step.“She said, ‘I just want to help people get better,’” Hunter said, “and she swore she was going to find the cure for cancer because my mother died from cancer. Her heart was bigger than her little body. She loved everybody and everything — kids, music, shopping…. She loved life and she wanted to be somebody.”Chloe graduated early from Somerset Continuation High School in Bellflower so she could work more hours, Hunter said, and proudly bought herself a car with the money she had saved. She worked as a cashier at Little Ceasars Pizza at Lakewood Plaza and a clerk at the Tommy Hilfiger store at the Citadel Outlet mall and just two weeks ago, started working as a hostess at TGI Fridays in Bellflower.“She was just a good person, really sweet and really determined,” said her friend, Zylan Stanley, a supervisor at Little Caesars who also worked with her at TGI Fridays. “When I walked into Little Ceasars or Fridays and I saw that she was working, I’d always think, ‘This is going to be a good shift, a good day,’ because of her.”Little Caesars manager Mariah Estrada said the crew had planned a surprise birthday party for Chloe when she came to work on Oct. 4, the day after her birthday, because they knew how excited she was to turn 18. Now, instead, they are asking for donations at each of their area stores to raise money for Chloe’s family. Relatives have also started anonline fundraiserto help with burial and other expenses.“She was always happy with the customers, and exceeding our expectations. It was just a different work environment when she was there,” Estrada said. “She was the hardest working girl I’ve ever seen and her smile was contagious; that’s what we’re all going to remember most about her. Our store will never be the same without her, because we won’t have that touch of Chloe any longer.”Det. Philip Guzman said investigators still haven’t determined a motive for the shooting, but Hunter says friends at the carnival believe the shooting involved local gang members who were upset about strangers coming into their neighborhood because of the carnival.“It’s just sickening. I don’t understand how you can open fire where children as young as 2 years old are at a carnival. This was at a school, next to a fire station. Yes this area is heavily gang related, but you’d think some of these idiots would have some compassion….who’s coming to a carnival to threaten your gang? People were just trying to enjoy themselves and have fun at the festival.”Hunter said the shooting is especially painful because she grew up in Compton, as did her parents.“I love my city. My grandparents have been here since 1952 and it just saddens me that my daughter, who didn’t even live in Compton, couldn’t come to the community where her family grew up and go to a friend’s performance without being murdered,” Hunter said. “If there’s no peace in the city, it’s not thriving. Who wants to come to Compton to do anything if you’re scared to be shot?”Anyone with information is asked to call the sheriff’s Homicide Bureau at (323) 890-5500. Those wishing to remain anonymous should callCrime Stoppersat (800) 222-8477.Photo: Chloe Hunter, 17, graduated early from Somerset High School in Bellflower so she could work more hours and achieve her goal of becoming a nurse. "She just wanted to help people," her mother, Janel Hunter, remembered, after Chloe was fatally shot outside a school carnival in Compton on Sept. 30.Contactthe Homicide Report. Follow@latimeshomicideon Twitter.Do you have information to share about the life of 
                    Chloe Jane Hunter
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:Far too many of our children are dying senselessy for no reason at. May she Rest in Eternal Peace and may justice prevail.This young Lady attended the school I work at I remember her being very friendly and liked very much by the students and staff. My hearts ache with the family I lost my 17 year old to a senseless crime. May your hearts be embraced by God as you continue this journey called life. RIP well ChloeThis is so sad that this happ happened it's so sad that things happen like this I from Northern California Fairfield California and I had a son his name was Matt Garcia he was the youngest city councilman who was murdered in a drive-by it's a shame that these things happen and why I don't understand this this caught my attention because my son was involved in sinceless murder     it's hard on me just to here this story God bless your familyOh my heart feels for the family? I have a 17 year old,,, this really hurts.🙏😭This is really sad.a precious young child gone too soon. really messed up.R.I.P. Chloe..I just watched U graduate with my Son..Ur Friend from Somerset High School..God Bless Ur Family..I give my deepest condolences🙏💜I didn't know this young lady but it saddens me to no extent. I pray for her family and I pray that we can one day move beyond this sort of cowardly behavior.It's always the good ones that get there lives taken my condolences to all her family friends everyone who knew and loved her just so sad. Lord how Mercy on us all please bring her killer to justice.Im from LA and im sorry for your lost i know how the family feels my 19 year old Nephew was shot and killed November 2 2017 Just turning 19 years old 2 weeks before being killed we have to stop killing our own people black people and stick together she was so young only 17 this is sadWhat cowards.So sad. She sounded like a lady who was doing great at her age.My condolences to her family.Hope her killer is located.This is very sad. My condolences to her family and friends. Her parents gave her a decent name, and she had goals. Such a shame she had to go like this.I'm so very sad that my friends daughter was taken from such senseless violence when she had so much to give to the world. Continue to Rest in Paradise Chloe.Cowards who ever did this to such a beautiful child. They will get their 10 times fold.A very beautiful young lady who life was taking by some senseless cowards R.I.HRuby Steplight — the 83-year-old grandmother shot and killed in the kitchen of her Orlando home Saturday — was the “glue” that held her family together, loved ones said.Steplight’s family gathered at the woman’s home Monday. Being together has helped them cope with the loss of the family’s matriarch, they said.“We just know she’s in a better place, but we didn’t want her to go this way,” said Nekesha Lee, Steplight’s goddaughter.At the vigil Monday night, tealights were arranged to spell “Ruby” and was surrounded by pink balloons and flowers at the base of a tree. They tried to light the candles, but the wind was too strong and they kept blowing out.“That’s her spirit,” someone said.Friends and family sang “We Shall Overcome” and other songs. She will be missed, they said.Orange County deputies were called to Steplight’s home on the 1700 block of 24th Street to reports of gunfire just before 3 p.m. Saturday. They foundRuby Steplight dead inside her home.Four other people — including her 14-year-oldgranddaughter— had also been shot.Authorities later arrested Billy Desrosiers, 29, on charges of first degree murder and attempted first-degree murder.According to an arrest affidavit, Desrosiers told investigators that moments before he killed Steplight, he thought about executinghergranddaughter — but “decided she was too young to die.”A beloved woman who reared three generations, Steplight was religious and selfless, said Wanda Jackson, Steplight’s ex-daughter-in-law. She was the “glue” that held their family together.“She always kept her doors open for anybody. She’d welcome anybody,” Jackson said. “She wasn’t a judgmental person or anything like that. She just loved them.”Jackson said she and Steplight enjoyed shopping together and spoke frequently. Even though her marriage to Steplight’s youngest son ended in 2002, the woman remained like a mother to Jackson, especially after her own mother died.“When I had a problem, she’d come over and she’d listen and she’d just look at me and say, ‘It’s going to be all right,’” Jackson said. “I’m going to miss that. They took something away that hurts.”Desrosiers, who lives on 24th Street, was taken into custody about 11 p.m. Saturday. He told deputies in an interview he fired shots intoSteplight’s home from the outside — then entered the house to kill her, the affidavit shows.Desrosiers had recently moved into a house two doors down from Steplight’s, where she lived for about 14 years, according to Jackson. Hearing Steplight was targeted by him shocked the family.“She was in the kitchen cleaning out her refrigerator when the man came into her house,” Jackson said. “And that’s just like— it just got us in awe… how could this happen?”After he shot the woman, Desrosiers told deputies he walked back to his home and hid the gun in his attic. The caliber of the casings found at the scene of the shooting matched the caliber of the firearm found in Desrosiers’ attic, deputies said.He told deputies he was angry because his girlfriend was injured in a fightwith one of Steplight’s family members.Steplight’s granddaughter was taken to Winnie Palmer Hospital for Women & Babies after being shot in the leg. It’s unclear how the three other people found with gunshot wounds were injured.Authorities said Saturday they believed a black car pulled up to a group of people standing on the sidewalk outside Steplight’s home and shots were exchanged between the car’s occupants and the group.Those details are still believed to be true, but are part of an ongoing investigation, according to Sheriff’s Office spokesman Jeff Williamson.Desrosiers remains held at the Orange County Jail without bail.The shooting came as a stark reminder for Jackson about the reality of gun violence. She said Steplight’s grandchildren are devastated bytheir sudden loss.“Now as adults, we have to comfort them and get them to understand this is not the way. Because she didn’t deserve this,” Jackson said.“That was my girl. That was my girl.”Staff writer David Harris contributed to this report.Tess Sheets can be reached attsheets@orlandosentinel.comor 407-420-5020. Twitter:@sheets_tessCrimeRecommendedMenuBAKERSFIELD, Calif. - UPDATE (September 25, 2018 7 a.m.):Officials have identified 20-year-old Jeremy Charles Littlejohn as the victim who died from wounds sustained during a shooting at Chandler Court near Wilson Road early Sunday morning.The Wendale Davis Foundation will be holding a candlelight service for Littlejohn on Wednesday, Sept. 25, at 5:30 p.m. at the Rising Star Church on Wilson Road.==============================================================================Bakersfield Police confirm that a man was killed and multiple others were wounded in a shooting on Chandler Court near Wilson Road shortly before 1 a.m. Sunday.The identities of the victims are unknown, but officials say four males and one female were wounded in the shooting. The woman is said to be in critical condition. The three men suffered non-life threatening injuries, according to BPD.Witnesses say the victims were at a gathering at an apartment on the 2600 block of Chandler Court. According to witnesses at least 15 people were in the garage of the apartment when the suspect(s) opened fire.There is no suspect information at this time. Anyone with information is encouraged to call the Bakersfield Police Department at 661-327-7111.==============================================================================BAKERSFIELD, Calif. - One person is dead and at least four others were wounded in a shooting in southwest Bakersfield on Chandler Court near Wilson Road.Bakersfield Police responded to shots fired just after 12:30 a.m.When they arrived they found one victim on scene and witnesses reported more victims had gone to hospital.In total five people were reportedly wounded in the shooting, including one who succumbed to their injuries.BPD in investigating the shooting as a homicide.We will continue to update information as it enters the newsroom.Trending:An argument after a Baldwin Park house party led to a shooting early Sunday that left one person in critical condition and three others with minor injuries.Neighbors said they heard the gathering at a home on the northwest side of the cul-de-sac on Loma Lane late on Saturday, and saw 15 to 20 teenagers hanging out in the driveway, with more headed there from the direction of Francisquito Avenue.By just after midnight, the party was still going, with loud music blaring and a group of people still in the driveway. That’s when shots rang out, according to both neighbors and Baldwin Park police.Police received the call about the shooting at 12:30 a.m. When they arrived, officials said the officers learned four people had been shot, with some taken to a local hospital. Three of the victims had wounds that were not life threatening, while one other was injured critically.In a written statement, Sgt. Darryl Kosaka said investigators did not believe the shooting was gang related. He said the gunfire followed a “confrontation of two groups of party goers.”Police activity rarely comes to the quiet neighborhood filled with families just north of the intersection of Francisquito Avenue and Frasier Street. David Gaither, who has lived with his wife on southeast side of Loma Lane for 37 years, said loud parties are also uncommon, though residents often let each other know when they’re hosting a large gathering.Gaither said a teenager living at the home where the shooting occurred came to his door last week to let him know that he’d be hosting a “flyer” party soon. When he and his wife returned home on Saturday night at around 11:15 p.m., he said they saw the teenagers gathered at the home with music playing.The couple went to bed and didn’t hear any of the commotion on their street. But when they woke up the next morning, they turned on the local news and heard about the shooting on Loma Lane. When they peeked outside, they saw their street crowded with police vehicles.Usually, “it’s just a quiet little neighborhood,” Gaither said.Another neighbor, who asked only to be named as M. Morales, said she woke up to the sound of loud explosions outside her home early on Sunday.“I got real nervous,” Morales said. But she went back to sleep, hoping what she’d heard were the fireworks that kids set off on nearby streets frequently.But after seeing a text from her nephew in law enforcement about the shooting on her street, she went outside and saw six or seven small, yellow evidence markers on the street.She also saw blood on the driveway of the home across from hers, with a few bottles and cans of beer also strewn in the street.Morales said the last time something like this happened in the neighborhood was at least 10 years, when another shooting killed one person on a nearby street.“We’re a very low-key neighborhood,” Morales said. “Nothing very crazy ever happens here.”The investigation continued into Sunday afternoon. No arrests were immediately announced.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Four people were shot while at a party in the yard of a home in Hempstead on Saturday night.According to police, the four people were at a party in the rear yard of an apartment on Dolan Street. At 11:14 p.m., gunfire from an unknown person came from a yard on Burnett Street and went through the PVC fence between the two yards, hitting four people.Two men, ages 38 and 43, were taken to Nassau University Medical Center. Two women, ages 41 and 42, were taken to Winthrop hospital.Police say the investigation is ongoing. Anyone with information about this shooting is asked to call Nassau County Crime Stoppers at 1-800-244-TIPS. All callers will remain anonymous, and you could receive a reward if your information leads to an arrest.Photo: ShutterstockTo request removal of your name from an arrest report, submitthese required itemstoarrestreports@patch.com.D.C. police on Friday arrested a second man sought in a shooting last week that left four people wounded on Benning Road in Northeast Washington, according to authorities.Anthony Farmer, 27, was arrested Friday and charged with assault with intent to kill. Earlier this week, police charged Michael Ross, 26, with assault with intent to kill in the same case.Police said the shootings occurred about 11:10 p.m. on Sept. 21 in the 1800 block of Benning Road NE. None of the injuries was described as life-threatening. Police said in court documents the motive may have been retaliation for an earlier attack.On Monday, police said a 25-year-old man was shot and killed on the same block. Policearrested a suspectin the killing and said it was not related to the Sept. 21 shootings.The most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy PolicyThe most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy Policy“Everybody was in shock and worried about their co-workers,” Carre told the Post. “It was horrific. I never saw anything like that in my life.”The three victims who were hospitalized are recovering from wounds that are not believed to be life-threatening.Troi Coley, who has been friends with Moseley since high school, told the Baltimore Sun that Moseley sometimes felt at odds with the world, but was not an angry person.Coley was shocked to learn that Moseley was identified as the suspect.Shaunise McGowan, a neighbor of Moseley’s, told the Post that Moseley was “quiet” and “a nice girl.”“Why would she go and do something like that?” McGowan asked.That is the question that authorities are still trying to unwrap, with Gahler noting that they were “still trying to work on any kind of motive for [the shooting].”ESSENCE.com is part of ESSENCE Communications, Inc.Essence may receive compensation for some links to products and services on this website.  Offers may be subject to change without notice.©2021 ESSENCE Communications Inc.  All Rights Reserved.  |Privacy Policy|Terms of Use|Essence.com Advertising TermsBy clicking Sign Up, you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy Policy.WSYRby:StaffSyracuse Police continue to investigate a shooting on Midland Avenue that sent five people to the hospital with gunshot wounds.On Sept. 20, an 8-year-old, three 35-year-olds and a 29-year-old were all sent to the hospital after one or multiple shooters opened fire on a family gathering outside 1317 Midland Avenue.The victims are listed in “stable” condition and are expected to recover from their injuries.The injured victims are: a 35-year-old man with gunshot wounds to torso, arm and leg areas, a 35-year-old woman with a gunshot wound to her abdomen, a 35-year-old woman with a gunshot wound to her hand, a 29-year-old man with a gunshot wound to his chest and an 8-year-old girl with a gunshot wound to her hip.Syracuse Police say they have received multiple tips on a suspect and are working to confirm them.They say they have not positively identified a suspect at this time.However, the District Attorney’s Office says it’s believed two shooters are involved, but that number could change.The investigation is continuing.Anyone with information is asked to contact the Syracuse Police Department Criminal Investigations Division at (315) 442-5222.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.SYRACUSE, N.Y. (WSYR-TV) -No. 3 Syracuse returned home Saturday afternoon after a two-game road trip to face No. 7 Virginia in the Carrier Dome. After a slow start, the Orange battled back to beat the Cavaliers 15-12. The Orange remain unbeaten at home this season. at 5-0. This is the best start for Syracuse at the Dome since winning six straight home games to open the 2017 campaign.SYRACUSE, N.Y. (WSYR-TV) -- A two-vehicle collision in the 300 block of North Salina Street Saturday afternoon.Officials say a sedan made an unsafe u-turn and a motorcycle crashed into the car.SYRACUSE, N.Y. (WSYR-TV) -- Hannaford Supermarkets is recalling Hannaford In-Store Fried Chicken Tenders, sold as a cold item in select stores’ deli departments because the label did not list a potential allergen, soy, as an ingredient.Information on the affected item is as follows:A man who shot co-workers at a Middleton software company had his concealed carry permit revoked in 2004 after being placed on a mental health hold in South Dakota., according to a document obtained by Action 2 News.Anthony Y. Tong, 43, went to work at WTS Paradigm in a suburb of Madison on Wednesday morning and opened fire on co-workers. Tong was killed when law enforcement stormed the building and fired on him.An affidavit obtained by Action 2 News details an encounter between Tong and Sioux Falls police on Aug. 11, 2004. Police responded to Tong's apartment after he had disabled a fire alarm horn. Officers found that Tong had also dismantled his ceiling fan, smoke detectors and other electrically powered devices attached to walls or ceilings.Tong told the officers that he believed people in the downstairs apartment were eavesdropping on him. The officers said they felt Tong "was acting paranoid and that the defendant was delusional."Police handcuffed Tong and found he had a handgun on his belt. It was fully loaded with a round in the chamber, police said. Tong was also carrying pepper spray and two knives on him.Inside Tong's bedroom was an AR-15 rifle and a "large amount of ammunition."Tong told the officers that he believed people at his work were "talking bad about him." He did not elaborate.Tong was placed on a 24-hour mental hold at a hospital in South Dakota.On Nov. 1, 2004, a Minnehaha County circuit court judge signed an order revoking Tong's concealed carry permit.The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms is tracing the 9mm pistol Tong used in Wednesday's shooting at WTS Paradigm, 1800 Deming Way. The gun was not purchased by Tong."It seems as though with some loophole he was able to get in contact with and get possession of that firearm, and he should not have been able to do that," said Middleton Police Chief Charles Foulke.The Dane County Medical Examiner’s Office said preliminary autopsy results confirm Tong died from firearm-related trauma. Additional tests are underway.Police say Tong was shot by officers and deputies after he wounded four of his coworkers at the software company. Tong was pronounced dead shortly after arrival at a local hospital.Two Middleton officers and two Dane County deputies fired at Tong. Their names will be released Friday afternoon.A search warrant obtained by our Madison partner station WMTV details the items taken out of Tong's Madison home on Gilded Cider Blvd.The search warrant lists 47 items removed from Tong's home. Items include guns, boxes of ammo, magazines, scopes, multiple computers, pellet guns, gun parts, and phones.Tong moved to Wisconsin in March of 2017 and started working at WTS Paradigm in April of 2017.Tong's motive remains under investigation.The three people who were seriously wounded in the shooting and remain in the hospital have requested privacy. Police are not releasing their names.The search warrant reveals that one of the victims was shot 10 times.Foulke says they are expected to survive."We know that two of them are doing quite well, and the third has a long road to haul," Foulke said.A fourth person suffered a grazing wound.FacebookPatrick Shaun Dowdell.A man scheduled for a hearing in a domestic violence case at a Pennsylvania courthouse shot his wife and three other people before he was killed by police in a shootout Wednesday afternoon. Patrick Shaun Dowdell has been identified as the gunman in the shooting at the Masontown magistrate’s office,WTAE-TV reports.The four victims, including Masontown Police Sergeant Scott Miller and Dowdell’s wife, two other men and a woman, are expected to survive, police said at a press conference. The shooting happened about 2:30 p.m.,according to the Observer-Reporter, a local newspaper.The 61-year-old Dowdell, who went by Shaun Dowdell, was arrested in August on charges of aggravated assault, strangulation, terroristic threats, simple assault and harassment, Fayette County court records show. He was scheduled to appear at the courthouse at 1 p.m. on September 19 for a preliminary hearing before Magisterial District Judge Daniel C. Shimshock. The victim in that case was his 39-year-old wife.Here’s what you need to know about Patrick Shaun Dowdell and the shooting:Witness describes shooting at district court in Masontown, Fayette CountyDr. Joyce Royster says she was among a large crowd of people inside the courtroom when someone opened fire at district court in Masontown, Fayette County. Subscribe to WTAE on YouTube now for more: bit.ly/1emyOjP Get more Pittsburgh news: wtae.com Like us: facebook.com/wtae4 Follow us: twitter.com/WTAE Instagram: instagram.com/wtaetv/2018-09-19T22:54:06.000ZThe “chaotic” scene began Wednesday afternoon with the suspect, identified as Patrick Shaun Dowdell, chasing a blond woman into the courthouse building at 1 East Church Street,according to the Observer-Reporter.Witnesses and police said it appeared the gunman was targeting the woman. Photos and videos from the scene show the shattered glass front door of the building.I'm at the Masontown Borough Building where there is a heavy police presence after multiple people have been shot. Police told me there is no immediate danger to the community right now.pic.twitter.com/gmQ8y0NLvM— Mike Jones/O~R ?? (@MikeJonesOR)September 19, 2018A witness, who gave his name only as Todd, told the newspaper he was sitting in the waiting room when he heard gunshots. He ended up in a clerk’s office with the woman who had been chased into the building. Todd told the newspaper the woman had been shot in the arm and he used his belt as a tourniquet to stop the bleeding. “He (the gunman) was targeting her but got other people,” Todd told the Observer-Reporter.“He was shooting at everyone,” another witness, Rosa Goff told the newspaper. “He looked scary. I thought I was… The bullet just missed me.”A police officer, Sergeant Scott Miller, of the Masontown Police Department, engaged the shooter and was shot in the hand during the exchange, police said at a press conference. Miller is expected to survive. The three other victims also suffered non-life-threatening injuries, according to authorities.Other officers responded and Dowdell was shot and killed. The unidentified officer who shot him is an officer with the German Township Police Department, authorities said.According to WPXI-TV,the courthouse was packed with attorneys, staff and people waiting for hearings. There were 41 scheduled to be held in Judge Daniel Shimshock’s courtroom on September 19, the newspaper reports.“People scrambling and crawling on top of each other to get to an open room for safety, while others were trying to close the door,” Linda Endsley told the newspaper.  Eric Randolph, an attorney,told WTAE-TV, “It was the most intense, frightening sensation I’ve ever had in my life.”Police said at a press conference Dowdell was armed with a handgun and fired six to eight shots.Read More From HeavyKyle Thomas: Man Fired by Mississippi Hospital After Racist Donut Shop RantRead More From HeavyKyle Thomas: Man Fired by Mississippi Hospital After Racist Donut Shop RantPatrick Shaun Dowdell.Patrick Shaun Dowdell.Shaun Dowdell was arrested on August 25, 2018, on domestic violence charges, including aggravated assault, strangulation and terroristic threats, all felonies, and simple assault and harassment, both misdemeanors.According to WPXI-TV,Dowdell was accused of strangling his 39-year-old wife during the incident.On August 27, theUniontown Herald-Standard reportedthat Dowdell had choked his wife and threatened to kill her after she told him she was going to divorce him.Dowdell had been arrested in Masontown, but not by the police officer who was shot during the courthouse incident, the news station reports. He had applied for a public defender, court records show.Shaun Dowdell.Shaun Dowdell.Dowdell was unable to post bail and remained in jail until August 28, when he was released after posting $10,000 bond. Court records show that a protective order was issued requiring that Dowdell stay away from his wife, who was the victim in the domestic incident.Court records show his first court hearing, a preliminary arraignment, was scheduled for August 28 before Judge Jennifer Jeffries. A second hearing was set for September 5, but the preliminary hearing was continued until September 19, when he was scheduled to appear at 1 p.m. before Judge Daniel Shimshock.Police said at a press conference that they do not believe Dowdell was targeting the judge or police officers.Read More From Heavy3D-Printed Gunmaker Cody Wilson Accused of Sexually Assaulting Teen GirlRead More From Heavy3D-Printed Gunmaker Cody Wilson Accused of Sexually Assaulting Teen GirlFacebookPatrick Shaun Dowdell.FacebookPatrick Shaun Dowdell.Dowdell does not appear to have a criminal record other than traffic citations, according to a public records search conducted by Heavy. He worked as an auto mechanic,WTAE-TV reports.According to his wife’s Facebook page, Dowdell had been married to her since at least 2013. She owns a tanning salon and pet grooming business in Masontown, according to WTAE. His wife posted on Facebook on Wednesday after the shooting, “Just want everyone to know I am ok…the cops have my phone so if you’re trying to contact me I’m sorry. … My husband shot me and 3 others at a court hearing.”Dowdell had previously lived in Uniontown and Leckrone, Pennsylvania, and had lived on Poplar Street in Masontown since 2013. He went to Laurel Highlands High School in Uniontown, graduating in 1974.At the scene at the Masontown Borough building where a shooting had taken place today@TribLIVEpic.twitter.com/Ie4zNDjwqv— Shane Dunlap (@shanedunlap)September 19, 2018Officials said the German Township police officer who fatally shot Dowdell saved 30 to 40 other people by rushing into the danger and killing the gunman. “It’s unfortunate that someone lost their life, but I’m proud of my officers, and everyone did what they were trained to do,” German Township Police Chief Dave Hromada said at a news conference. He added, “Obviously there are a lot of mixed emotions when you’re in that.”Fayette County District Attorney Richard Bower said at a press conference, “In this case, as is so often the case, the German Township police officer ran toward the danger, not away. He protected over 30 to 40 people from injury or death. These police officers and these emergency management people risk their lives every day … and today they all were a shining light to our community.”Pennsylvania Governor Tom Wolf said in a statement, Our police put their lives on the line every day to keep us safe. These senseless acts must stop.”The incident remains under investigation and any witnesses or people with information are asked to call the Pennsylvania State Police at 724-439-7111.READ NEXT:Reality Star Surgeon & His Girlfriend Accused of Raping ‘Many’ WomenStay ConnectedSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A chaotic scene in Algiers broke out when four people were shot, including a young child, in a drive-by shooting around 10:15 p.m.The New Orleans Police Department confirmed a gray sedan was in the 1100 block of Diana Street when individuals inside the car rolled down the windows and opened fire on a group of people sitting outside a home near Sumner and Diana streets.A man was shot in the head and is in stable condition, police said. Two women were shot -- one in the arm, the other grazed by a bullet -- and are in stable condition.The fourth victim was a 9-year-old child, who police said was treated at the scene and did not need to be taken to the hospital. Investigators have not determined if his injury was caused by the gunfire.Police couldn't say whether the victims were specifically targeted.  The gray sedan in question fled the scene and has not been found. There's no word on how many individuals were inside the vehicle.Additional details were not released.Anyone with information is asked to call Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Keep up with local news, weather and current events withthe WDSU app here. Sign up for our email newsletters to get breaking news right in your inbox.Click here to sign up!Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.SILVER SPRING, Md. (AP) — Police in Maryland say an 11-year-old girl has become the fourth member of her family to die from a shooting rampage by her father, who also killed himself.The Washington Postreportsthat Mina Kim died Thursday after being gravely wounded in the shooting Monday at the family’s Montgomery County home.The girl’s death leaves only one survivor, a 22-year-old woman who is still hospitalized.Police say the woman called 911 just after midnight Monday. They said 57-year-old Yong Mun Kim, shot his wife, Sang Yeon Kim, and their two children, Mina and 10-year-old Andy.Police said he also shot the 22-year-old woman, his stepdaughter, then used his gun to kill himself.___Information from: The Washington Post,http://www.washingtonpost.comSunshine to start, then a few afternoon clouds. High 78F. Winds WNW at 10 to 15 mph..Clear to partly cloudy. Low 54F. Winds ENE at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 11:53 amAn image posted on the Go Fund Me page set up by the family of shooter Javier Casarez and his ex-wife Petra Maribel Bolanos de Casarez.In a court filing made 12 days before last week's deadly shooting rampage, the ex-wife of the shooter asked for child and spousal support from her former husband, and control of the family home they shared.The filings said Javier Casarez constantly threatened his wife of 28 years, Petra Maribel Bolanos de Casarez, with divorce and verbally abused and degraded her. He filed for divorce in late 2017 and told her she wouldn't get anything in the divorce and kicked her out of their home in May, according to court documents. Prior to that he had intercepted mail coming to their home about upcoming divorce hearings and the marriage was dissolved by default, the filing said."It also took me some time to get over my fear and get the courage to ask for help," Bolanos de Casarez said in her request to the court. "Please do not punish me for my ignorance."Casarez brought his ex-wife to a trucking company in the early evening of Sept. 12, where he shot her, and two male employees, Manuel Contreras, 50 and Antonio Valdez, 50. He then went to a house on Breckenridge road and shot dead Laura Garcia, 31, and her father Eliseo Garcia Cazares before carjacking a vehicle. He shot himself after being confronted by a deputy at a business he'd pulled into on Edison Highway.The handgun used in the shooting spree was legally obtained in 2004 in Fresno, according to Kern County Sheriff's officials.Casarez used a Smith & Wesson Model 500 handgun in the shootings. The gun is a .50-caliber revolver and is one of the largest caliber handguns on the market, the sheriff had previously said.The new information seems to indicate the gun — which Smith & Wesson's website describes as the "most powerful production revolver in the world" — was not purchased with the sole intent to carry out the killings. And while court documents indicate a sordid divorce was playing out between the couple, little else remains known about what prompted Casarez to carry out the killing rampage.The coroner's office said exams of the victims and the killer were scheduled to take place this week but couldn't immediately say if they had happened or whether the bodies are still in their custody.A GoFundMe Page set up by the oldest of the couple's six children the couple had raised $5,500 out its $20,000 goal in five days as of Wednesdayevening.Beneath photos of the couple it said: "The Casarez family is asking for help, even though it's unfortunate what has occurred any donations would be greatly appreciated. All proceeds will be towards funeral expenses. Aside from what the media has portrayed they were loving and caring parents."Comments left on the page hint at a family situation that may have been outwardly loving but troubled below the surface."Maribel lived in fear of her life and finally got the courage to get help to leave this monster who was sick with jealousy and was a psychopath," a commenter named Cyn wrote."I feel bad for Javier, only god know's what he found out! a man can go crazy!" a commenter named Janet posted.Some commenters were outraged that funds were being requested for a man who murdered five people."Very sad Javier kills 5 people, one being his EX wife, and you still want to burry them together, that has control issues all over it!!! Sad that people are still willing to fund a killer," a poster named Dannie wrote."So jealousy makes murder ok?!!" Dannie said in another post. No it doesn't, Murder is NEVER ok, people are so ignorant.Californian staffers Jason Kotowski and Stacey Shepard contributed to this report.Javier Casarez shot and killed five people Wednesday before shooting himself, according to Kern County sheriff's officials.Positive Cases Among Kern Residents: 107,172Deaths: 1,304Recovered Residents: 38,252Number of Negative Tests: 362,612Number of Pending Tests*: 626Updated: 4/10/2021. Source:Kern County Public Health Services Department*As reported by community healthcare providers.More Coronavirus coverageFiled under:A boy was in critical condition Tuesday evening after he and three others were shot Tuesday evening in the Trumbull Park neighborhood on the Far South Side.At 7:12 p.m., he was walking down a sidewalk with another 16-year-old boy, a 19-year-old man and a 21-year-old woman when they were struck by gunfire in the 10600 block of South Bensley Avenue, according to Chicago police. The shooter was heading east on 106th Street.One 16-year-old boy suffered multiple gunshot wounds and was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in critical condition, police said.The other boy was taken to the same hospital in serious-to-critical condition, according to Chicago police and the Chicago Fire Department. His condition has stabilized after he was shot in the lower right leg.The adults were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, one in fair-to-serious condition and one in serious-to-critical condition, police and the fire department said. Both of their conditions have stabilized.The 21-year-old woman was shot in the right hip and the 19-year-old was shot in the left elbow.Area South detectives were investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Memphis Police Department confirms Jeremy Beck, theman wanted in a shooting that injured nine people at Purple Hazeearly Monday morning, has been arrested.Beck, 32, was wanted for criminal attempt-second-degree murder, possessing a firearm during a dangerous felony, aggravated assault, and being a convicted felon in possession of a handgun.He was previously charged with four counts of aggravated assault and one count of reckless endangerment.Copyright 2018 WMC. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Jarvis Nichols, 20, sits in Judge Christopher Hughes’ courtroom Tuesday and faces murder charges after a shooting incident in September 2018.An Opelika man was convicted of murder Wednesday after he shot and killed a 20-year-old Tuskegee man in downtown Auburn in 2018, District Attorney Pro Tem Jessica Ventiere said.Jarvis Nichols, 20, of Opelika, could face up to life in prison after a Lee County jury found him guilty of murder-intentional, a Class A felony, in connection to the shooting that claimed the life of Evan Mikale Wilson and injured four others. The trial lasted two days, and jury deliberation lasted for less than an hour.“I want to express my gratitude for the jurors’ attentive service,” Ventiere said in a statement. “The senseless and violent nature of this crime endangered so many people and ended a young life. It is my hope that Evan’s family will find some sense of justice from today’s verdict.”Wilson died in 2018 near the West Magnolia Avenue McDonald’s after prosecutors say he was shot “again, and again, and again” by Nichols, a then-17-year-old, in the early morning hours of Sept. 9, 2018. An Auburn University student and three Opelika teenagers were injured in the same incident.What to do for a tornado watch versus tornado warning.Assistant District Attorney Kacey Cooper said the incident began after Wilson and a group of his friends left Skybar that morning after the Auburn football game and Nichols saw and recognized Wilson.Cooper said Nichols walked up to Wilson and pointed a gun at his head, and while Wilson tried to walk away Nichols shot Wilson. After Wilson tried to get away and fled to the Lambda Chi Fraternity house’s courtyard, Nichols followed and shot him multiple times until Wilson was dead.“A young, 20-year-old man lost his life,” Cooper said during her opening statement. “This is about a loss of life. This is about a brother losing his friend, a mother losing her son because Jarvis Nichols made a choice because he brought that gun, he fired that gun, he kept firing that gun and he killed Evan.”Nichols, who pleaded not guilty to the charges, is being held at the Lee County Jail without bond pending a sentencing hearing scheduled for May this year, court documents show.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.An Auburn man is facing a second-degree rape charge and sodomy charge with a juvenile under the age of 16 and over the age of 12 after he was …Details emerged Wednesday in the case of an Auburn City Schools assistant football and track coach whom investigators say had sexual relations…The Lee County District Attorney’s Office has taken action to ensure that the stimulus checks given to inmates serving prison sentences in Ala…Auburn police arrested and charged a man with attempted kidnapping after an unsuccessful attempt was made to restrain a victim and force them …An Auburn man is on trial for murder after prosecutors say he took part in shooting a victim “again and again and again” until he was dead in …Seven new vehicles are missing from the King Ford Auto Dealership on Fob James Drive in Valley after police learned Monday that the business w…The human remains found April 1 near Alabama Avenue and Avenue B in Tuskegee have been identified as belonging to Marquez Duncan, 23, of Tuske…An Opelika man is facing multiple counts of possession and production of child pornography after he was arrested by investigators with the Lee…Updated: Friday, April 2, at 10:42 a.m.Lee County Circuit Judge Jacob Walker sentenced an Opelika man to 25 years in prison Wednesday after a Lee County jury convicted him of attemp…Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.JACKSONVILLE, Fla. -- The Jacksonville Sheriff's Office is investigating after four men showed up to a Westside hospital with gunshot wounds overnight.JSO said the men drove themselves to the Park West Emergency room on 103rd Street.At this time, no other information was released.If you know anything, you're asked to call JSO at 904-630-0500.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.MINNEAPOLIS (WCCO)– A 47-year-old Brooklyn Center man is accused of murder in the shooting death of a man on Sept. 7 outside a Minneapolis bar.Anthony Cannady was charged with second-degree murder in the shooting death of 42-year-old Steven Fields of Richfield. Cannady was also charged with three counts of second-degree assault after three others were shot in the incident.Minneapolis police were called at about 11:45 p.m. on Sept. 7 to a report of a shooting in the parking lot of Cliff and Norm’s Bar at 2024 Washington Ave. N. Officers at the scene recovered multiple discharged cartridge casings.According to charges filed in the case, Cannady got into a fight with another patron at the bar, and a bouncer had to break it up. But Cannady became angry at the bouncer after being sprayed with mace, and threatened the bouncer as he left the bar.Authorities say Cannady returned and fired into a crowd in the parking lot, hitting Fields in the head and hurting three others. None of the four was the bouncer Cannady had threatened.Fox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Associated PressCINCINNATI– A woman who survived at least 12 gunshots in a downtown Cincinnati attack was back home Wednesday and helped get her two children ready for school, kissing them as she sent them off, a spokeswoman said.Whitney Austin, 37, was discharged Tuesday evening from UC Medical Center, five days after a man opened fire inside the Fifth Third Bancorp headquarters, killing three people and wounding two.Austin, a Fifth Third vice president, got home to Louisville, Kentucky, in time to put her children to bed, according to Fifth Third spokeswoman Laura Trujillo, who quoted Austin as saying she was grateful to be home.“I got to see my motivation for living,” Austin said in a statement. “I’m thankful to be alive, for all the good wishes for everyone who helped.”She said she has been reading and learning more about the three people killed and urged people to help their families any way they can.She was initially in critical condition and faces what her husband calls “a long road” in recovering physically and mentally.Brian Sarver, 45, a Fifth Third contractor, was released Monday. The Lebanon, Ohio, resident offered his thanks to God, prayers for other victims and families, and thanks for all the expressions of support in a statement Tuesday.“I look forward to getting back on my feet and return to work as soon as practical,” Sarver said. “Thank you, again, to everyone who has treated me and my family with such kindness and affection.”Police are still trying to determine why 29-year-old Omar Enrique Santa Perez opened fire Sept. 6 inside the bank building. Officers responded quickly and killed him in a hail of gunfire.Continuing coverage on this story hereSubmitTrademark and Copyright 2021The Associated Press. All rights reserved.COLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.Thunderstorms likely. High 74F. Winds SSW at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 100%..Mostly cloudy skies this evening will become partly cloudy after midnight. A stray shower or thunderstorm is possible. Low 62F. Winds SSW at 10 to 15 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:55 pmCapt. Eddie Jones of the Albany Police Department was booked at the Dougherty County Jail and released on bond for simple battery, battery and cruelty to a child in the third degree. (Special Photo)Brandon Malone was charged with aggravated assault in the shooting of Caderrious Davis and Zyqueria Taylor. (Special Photo)From Staff Reportsnews@albanyherald.comCapt. Eddie Jones of the Albany Police Department was booked at the Dougherty County Jail and released on bond for simple battery, battery and cruelty to a child in the third degree. (Special Photo)Brandon Malone was charged with aggravated assault in the shooting of Caderrious Davis and Zyqueria Taylor. (Special Photo)ALBANY — Two arrests were made in separate, notable Albany Police Department cases earlier this week. The first was the arrest of Brandon Malone on aggravated assault charges, and the second was the arrest of APD Capt. Eddie Jones.In the first incident, Malone is charged with shooting two victims on the 1200 block of Towering Pines Lane Monday night at 9:03 p.m. The victims, Caderrious Davis and Zyqueria Taylor, both told police that Malone approached them, drew his handgun and started firing. The victims told police that neither one of them had any “beef” with Malone or knew why he shot them. Davis was shot in the left ankle, and Taylor was shot in the thigh while fleeing.Friends of the victims on the scene took care of the two before APD officers arrived. Both victims were transported to Phoebe Putney Memorial Hospital. A witness reported seeing a black male without a shirt and blue denim shorts holding a handgun. The witness told police that the suspect looked scared when he saw her and tried to hide the gun. Malone was charged in the incident.APD responded to a family dispute involving Jones on Monday. Warrants were issued for simple battery, battery and cruelty to a child in the third degree. Jones turned himself in to the Dougherty County Jail on Tuesday. He was booked and later released on bond. Jones is currently on paid administrative leave pending the outcome of an investigation.Sundae took a look at the nation’s top 10 cities with the most properties at risk of flooding, using 2020 data from the First Street Foundation’s First National Flood Risk Assessment.Click for more.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Get news alerts and breaking news stories from the Albany Herald delivered to your email.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.NewsroomSportsPhone: 229-888-9300306 West Broad Ave.
Albany, GA 31701306 West Broad Ave.
Albany, GA 31701306 West Broad Ave.
Albany, GA 31701Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.San Antonio Police say there were four victims in a shooting about 4 p.m. Sunday Sept. 2, 2018 in the 600 Block of Morningview Street.San Antonio Police say there were four victims in a shooting about 4  p.m. Sunday Sept. 2, 2018 in the 600 Block of Morningview Street.San Antonio Police say there were four victims in a shooting about 4 p.m. Sunday Sept. 2, 2018 in the 600 Block of Morningview Street.San Antonio Police say there were four victims in a shooting about 4 p.m. Sunday Sept. 2, 2018 in the 600 Block of Morningview Street.San Antonio Police say there were four victims in a shooting about 4 p.m. Sunday Sept. 2, 2018 in the 600 Block of Morningview Street.San Antonio police are searching for two suspects in an East Side drive-by shooting that injured four people, including a mother and her 2-year-old, Sunday afternoon.At around 4:15 p.m., police responded to a shooting in which multiple rounds were fired in the driveway of an apartment complex in the 600 block of Morningview Street.SAPD Chief William McManus said none of the wounds sustained by the victims were life-threatening.RELATED:Woman found slain on North Side roadAccording to police, the child and a 12-year-old were shot in the leg. Police did not reveal where the mother and an adult male were wounded.McManus said police have obtained surveillance footage of the incident from an undisclosed source and plan to review it.He did not provide any details on the suspects but did add that the vehicle used in the shooting was found nearby by officers.McManus said witnesses and those related to the incident have been uncooperative with police.No motive for the shooting was provided, but police say the incident was not gang-related.aluna@express-news.netaluna@express-news.netPATERSON — Authorities are looking for a 31-year-old Paterson man accused of fatally shooting two people and wounding two others — including his former girlfriend — while they were sitting in parked car in the city’s 4th Ward in September.The suspect, Jonathan Hernandez, should be considered “armed and dangerous,” said a press release issued Tuesday by Passaic County Prosecutor Camelia M. Valdes and Paterson Police Chief Troy Oswald.Hernandez previously was convicted of aggravated assault, weapons possession and drug dealing and was released from state prison in July 2017 after serving about 30 months behind bars, according to state Corrections Department records. He had not been publicly identified as the suspected killer until Tuesday.Authorities say that in the hours before the Sept. 2 shooting, Hernandez used a baseball to damage the vehicle owned by his former girlfriend, 32-year-old Latoya Lesane. Then he confronted Lesane and the three other victims outside the Elks Lodge on Ellison Street and started a fight, authorities said.An hour after the fight, Hernandez allegedly walked up to a parked car in which Lesane and the three others were seated and opened fire. The victims then drove from the shooting scene, but damage from the gunfire brought the vehicle to a stop about six blocks away, at the corner of Broadway and East 18th Street, authorities said.More:Paterson teams with labor unions on jobs programMore:Paterson’s Bangladeshi women bond in a ‘pitha’ baking contestKilled in the incident were Daryl Tann, 48, and Nykeema Kersey, 33, both from Paterson, authorities said. Lesane was critically wounded and the fourth person, Jason Parker, 30, of Paterson, suffered non-life-threatening gunshot wounds, authorities said.Tann was pronounced deceased upon his arrival at St. Joseph’s University Medical Center; Lesane was critically injured, and Kersey was pronounced deceased at the scene.Hernandez has been charged as a fugitive with two counts of murder, two counts of attempted murder, and various weapons crimes, authorities said. Authorities are asking anyone with information on his whereabouts to call 973-321-1120.Email:editor@patersonpress.comBIRMINGHAM, AL (WBRC) - Birmingham police say one of eight people injured after a teen party outside of Workplay late Sunday night is in custody.The shooting happened as the party was ending in the 2300 block of 5th Ave. South. Seven people were shot and one person has a knee injury.Initially one of the victims’ injury was believed to be life-threatening, but that victim’s condition was upgraded and all victims are expected to recover from their injuries.Seven of the injured persons are in their teens and one is 20-years-old.Birmingham Mayor Randall Woodfin released a statement Monday afternoon:"This past weekend, Birmingham was stricken by violence against young people.The death of William Edwards in North East Lake and the seven young people injured by violence at WorkPlay are a devastating blow to our community.Our law enforcement officers have been dedicated in their response, but as a city we must realize that this goes deeper than arrests.We as a city must wrap our arms around our children.We must double down on conflict resolution efforts for our youth. If they won’t come to us, we must go to them. Relationships matter.We must all take responsibility for being the source of wisdom, guidance, restraint and compassion that our children need. Accountability is what will heal our city.Lives were changed this past weekend, and those lives are too valuable – too precious – to be labeled as statistics.No longer can we grieve and then go about our days – not when the lives of our neighbors have been changed forever. Know that your mayor and law enforcement are working fervently for a safer Birmingham, but we cannot do it alone. I ask that you – parents, family members, mentors, community leaders and friends – connect with the young people in your lives.Listen to them. Help them. Let them know that their life matters."Police say formal charges are pending against the suspect.This case is still under investigation.Copyright 2018WBRC. All rights reserved.1720 Valley View DriveBirmingham, AL 35209(205) 322-6666A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.FORT SMITH -- Fort Smith police have released new details about a shooting outside Rooster's Blues Bar on Garrison Ave. Sunday (Sep. 2) morning.The shooting sent three people to the hospital, and police are still searching for two suspects they believe could be responsible.Officers told 5NEWS they were in the area working an off-duty job that Sunday morning when they heard gunshots coming from Roosters on Garrison Ave.When authorities got there, they say three bystanders were hurt during the shooting.Police have not released details about their injuries since it's an ongoing investigation, they do say that all three have been treated and released from the hospital.Since that night, a fourth person has come forward saying they were grazed by a bullet.Fort Smith police are now actively looking for the two suspects wanted for questioning."The male subject in those pictures we believe we need to talk to him about his involvement in the shooting. The female, we believe is simply a witness," Fort Smith police told 5NEWS.Anyone with information about the suspects is asked to contact the Fort Smith Police Department at 479-709-5100.Or call Crimestoppers at 78-CRIME. A cash reward of up to $1,000 is offered for information that leads to an arrest.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Trending:Investigators continue to search for cooperative witnesses to theSunday night shootout that left eight people wounded, two of them critically including a 17-year-old boy, San Bernardino police officials said Tuesday.“We really need someone to come forward so we can continue to move on the investigation,” Eileen Hards, spokeswoman for the San Bernardino Police Department, said Tuesday morning.The two most critical victims, including the teen, were shot in the head, police said. Tuesday morning, both remained in the hospital.Residents said what sounded like dozens of shots erupted around 10:45 p.m. Sunday during a dice game at the apartment complex at 1277 E. Lynwood Drive, north of the 210 Freeway and east of Waterman Avenue.Officers in the area heard the shots ring out and responded while numerous calls were coming in. Arriving police officers found multiple victims with gunshot wounds, including some who were unresponsive.The victims were taken to three hospitals. It wasn’t immediately clear if any of the victims had been released as of Tuesday morning.Neighbors said there was some sort of fight Sunday afternoon over an earlier dice game which resulted in someone ramming a vehicle into the front gates of the apartment.Police confirmed someone did run their vehicle into the security gates, but couldn’t say if it was due to a fight over an earlier game or if the afternoon incident was related to the shooting.Mystica Alcocer heard shots and saw two bodies on the sidewalk along her apartment complex at 1227 E. Lynwood Dr. in San Bernardino, Calif. on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. Eight people were shot and two are in critical condition. From day one, she has seen violence at this complex. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Residents couldn’t leave their apartment at 1227 E. Lynwood Dr. in San Bernardino, Calif. on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. Below her window, eight people were shot the night before during a dice game that left two in extremely critical condition. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Witnesses and victims do not want to give information about a dice game and subsequent shooting at this apartment complex at 1277 E. Lynwood Drive in San Bernardino, Calif. north of the 210 Freeway and east of Waterman Ave, officials said. Eight people were shot and two are in critical condition. Photographed on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Eight people were shot Sunday night during a dice game that left two- one 17 years old-  in extremely critical condition. San Bernardino police detectives gather evidence Monday morning at San Bernardino, Calif. apartment complex at 1227 E. Lynwood Dr. on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)This broken front gate is not from the fallout of Sunday night’s shooting that left eight shot and two in extremely critical condition. It’s the result of a car crash. San Bernardino police detectives gather evidence Monday morning at San Bernardino, Calif. apartment complex at 1227 E. Lynwood Dr. on Saturday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)A woman blows a kiss to residents wishing them well. She leaves the scene where eight people were shot the night before during a dice game that left two in extremely critical condition. San Bernardino police detectives gather evidence Monday morning at San Bernardino, Calif. apartment complex at 1227 E. Lynwood Dr. on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)This resident, who preferred not to give name, agrees that it’s alway been violent at this San Bernardino, Calif. apartment complex at 1227 E. Lynwood Drive on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. Eight people were shot Sunday night during a dice game that left two in critical condition. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Gloria Heard’s two of nine sisters live at the San Bernardino apartments, 1277 E. Lynwood where 8 were shot Sunday night. The Moreno Valley resident says regardless of color, we need to stop killing each other on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Some younger residents at this San Bernardino, Calif. apartment complex wanted their picture taken, but no one who witnessed the shooting was talking to police. Eight people were shot Sunday night during a dice game that left two in critical condition at 1227 E. Lynwood Drive on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)Eight people were shot and two are in critical condition after a Sunday night shooting. Photographed on Monday, Sept. 3, 2018. (Photo by Cindy Yamanaka, The Press-Enterprise/SCNG)A woman walks past the apartment complex, where eight people were shot Saturday night, in the 1200 block of East Lynwood Drive in San Bernardino on Tuesday, September 4, 2018. Investigators continue to search for cooperative witnesses to the Sunday night shootout that left eight people wounded, two of them critically including a 17-year-old boy, San Bernardino police officials said Tuesday. (Photo by Jennifer Cappuccio Maher, Inland Valley Daily Bulletin/SCNG)“We know people are scared, but we need someone to come forward,” Capt. Richard Lawhead said Monday morning outside the complex. “We did get a number of things here at the scene that take a lot of time to put together, however without that person who saw something, without that person who’s willing to come forward and cooperate, the good people that live in this neighborhood remain captive.”Investigators believe several people opened fire during the shooting, but no weapons were recovered.Police asked anyone with information to call 909-384-5655 or to send text messages anonymously to 909-953-4673.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.@penny_ray on TwitterTrenton police invesitgate a shooting on Ardmore Avenue Friday, Oct. 19, 2012.TRENTON — Gunfire ravaged the capital city Sunday night, leaving seven people hospitalized.“These appear to be gang-related,” Capt. Mark Kieffer Jr. said Monday morning. “They were not random acts.”Officials say three separate shootings occured within a two-hour span, sending city cops into overdrive.The first incident happened around 8:55 p.m. near the intersection of Stuyvesant and Bryn Mawr avenues. Police found a 22-year-old male victim at the scene and later learned that three other victims had arrived at the hospital by private means: a 29-year-old female, a 16-year-old male and a 25-year-old male. The juvenile remains in critical condition, according to police who say the other three victims are in stable condition.A few minutes after police arrived to investigate that first incident, Shotspotter technology detected another shooting in the 1400 block of West State Street. When police arrived at that crime scene, they found 25 shell casings that had been fired from a rifle. Officials say no one was injured in the second shooting, but detectives managed to chase and arrest a suspect for gun possession. A police spokesperson did not immediately have the arrest details available for release due to the holiday.The third shooting happened around 10:30 p.m. in the 400 block of North Montgomery Street. Police say three males were struck by gunfire in that incident, ages 22, 29 and 24. One victim was shot in the stomach, another was struck in the wrist, and the third suffered gunshot wounds to both legs. Cops say they all have been stabilized and are expected to survive.Officials say it’s too early in the investigation to know whether the shootings areconnected to each other, or to previousshootings that occurredover the weekend.@penny_ray on TwitterPenny Ray is an award-winning journalist with more than 17 years experience in print, digital and broadcast media. Prior to working in New Jersey, he served as editor of Homicide Watch D.C.A man is dead, three people remain hospitalized, and no one has been arrested after gunfire erupted fewer than two blocks apart within 24 hours early last weekend, Lauderhill police said.Arguments sparked the violence in each incident -- one on Friday night at an apartment complex and another Saturday evening in the street about 1 1/2 blocks away, immediately west of Florida’s Turnpike and south of West Oakland Park Boulevard, police said.“There is nothing to suggest that the two [shootings] are related at this time,” said Lt. Michael Santiago, spokesman for the Lauderhill Police Department.The Friday shootinghappened about 8:40 p.m. at 2601 NW 52nd Ave. When police got to the scene, a woman with a gunshot wound was lying in front of apartment No. 8 and a man who also had been shot was in apartment No. 10, according to police.Man dies, three wounded after second shooting in 24 hours in Lauderhill“A physical altercation between many subjects erupted and subsequently ended with two people being shot,” Santiago said. “Detectives continue to collect evidence and interview witnesses of the fight and the shooting to determine motive as well as identify the shooter.”The wounded man and woman are each in stable condition at Broward Health Medical Center in Fort Lauderdale, he said. Their identities were not disclosed.The next shooting, in the 5300 block of Northwest 24th Court, happened at 5:09 p.m. Saturday.There, police found Dwayne Smith, 44, on the south side of the road suffering from a gunshot. Bystanders were attempting CPR. A wounded woman, Vanessa Jasme, was on the other side of the road, Santiago said.Smith and Jasme also were taken to the hospital in Fort Lauderdale, where Smith died. Jasme is in stable condition, Santiago said.Another victim, a man with a gunshot wound, showed up at University Hospital in Tamarac. Police say he was involved in the Saturday shooting and has since been discharged from the hospital. Police declined to release his identity, saying that doing so would compromise “the active criminal investigation.”Investigators urge anyone with information about either shooting to contact Lauderhill police at 954-497-4700. Anonymous tips can be submitted to Broward Crime Stoppers at 954-493-8477.Like us on FacebookFox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Jen SteerCLEVELAND– The woman who was killed in a shooting outside a club on Cleveland’s east side was identified Monday morning.The Cuyahoga County Medical Examiner’s office said the victim is 29-year-old Theresa Goldwin, of Cleveland.Officers responded to Club X, located at Lakeside Avenue East and East 33rd Street, at about 1:13 a.m. Saturday for shots fired.Police said they found three victims behind the bar. Others later arrived at MetroHealth Medical Center and University Hospitals. A total of eight people were shot.Investigators said it started with a fight between patrons inside the club.SubmitCOLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.BRUNSWICK, Ohio (WJW) — One brave Brunswick boy received a superhero-themed parade today in honor of his birthday.Anthony, who is 5, was diagnosed with cancer when he was just 9-months-old, has undergone multiple brain surgeries and, according to his mother Brook Mace, has nearly died more than once.MenuAURORA, Colo. (AP) — A Colorado man has been charged with multiple counts of first-degree murder and the attempted murder of a police officer ina shooting that killed two peopleand injured an officer.Adams County District Attorney Dave Young said Tuesday that 28-year-old Demarcus Dlaurence Brown-Jones faces 22 separate counts.Aurora Police were investigating a reported fight on Aug. 31 near the University of Colorado Anschutz Medical Campus. Police have said officers found several hurt people and then someone fired, hitting the officer in the vest.The officer, whose name has not been released, survived.According to the county coroner,19-year-old Wayne Carter and 25-year-old Anthoni Readus died.Brown-Jones was taken to a hospital, but it's not clear whether he has been released or has an attorney to comment on the charges.As Darren Crews lay wounded on the floor of a Jacksonville pizza restaurant, the video game competitor had a decision to make: continue hiding beneath a table from a gunman who killed two gamers and wounded nine others, or run through a door held open by the body of one of the dead.Crews, 31, of Pembroke Pines had made it through the first round of a Madden NFL 19 Xbox competition for a $5,000 prize on Sunday afternoon. He was watching the “main event game” between the two best players of the round to see what he could learn.“And I just heard a loud noise, I wasn’t quite sure what it was at first,” said Crews. “I didn’t think it was a gun at first until I actually saw it. I just seen a silhouette, a white guy with a hoodie on. And then I see the fire and the laser beam.”A bullet tore through his left bicep.“Once I seen it, I felt my arm get hit and that’s when I took off,” Crews said. “I ran, and I tried to get cover. I ended up actually laying down behind a couple of people. There was a bunch of people piled up.”He said during the chaos, he saw “people tumbling over everybody, trampling over people. It was crazy.”On Sunday, there was a crowd, a “64-man playoff” happening until around 1 p.m., when the gunfire began, Crews said.Crews said he didn’t believe he was targeted by the gunman,David Bennett Katz, who he had seen play but had never spoken with or competed against.“I don’t know if he was shooting at me or what the case was,” Crews said. “I’m not sure. He was just shooting. I don’t think he said anything.”Crews said in past competitions, he had played against the two men who were killed Sunday, and had lost to both of them: Taylor Robertson, 28, of Giles, West Virginia, and Elijah Clayton, 22, of Woodland, Calif.He said they were friends, both good men who didn’t deserve to die.While huddling behind a table with other terrified gamers, Crews estimated that the gunman was about 10 feet away.“I can’t say how many times he fired,” Crews said. “I couldn’t see his feet. I had my eyes closed, so I couldn’t see him.”After laying there for a few seconds that seemed much longer, daylight and safety beckoned from the open back door. Crews and and others ran through it while bullets were still flying.He said he couldn’t believe he was shot, or that he experienced a mass shooting.“I just never thought something like that would happen,” Crews said. “I never thought I’d be a part of something like that.”And he said a gaming competition, which welcomes all kinds of people and players with varying skills, is not a place for bloodshed, “especially when you’re trying to do something you love to do. It’s traumatic. Nobody should have to go through it. We came to compete and have a good time.”Once outside the restaurant, he reunited with four buddies who had driven north with him from Broward County and had escaped injury by hiding in a bathroom.After talking with a police officer, Crews’ friend drove him to a hospital for treatment of his gunshot wound.Surveillance video from inside the Chicago Pizza & Sports Grille restaurant at the Jacksonville Landing mall in downtown Jacksonville showed Katz, 24, was the lone shooter who killed himself after taking aim at other competitors.Katz, of Baltimore, carried two handguns and extra ammunition into the restaurant. Investigators believe he fired only one weapon, Jacksonville Sheriff Mike Williams said.“The suspect clearly targeted other gamers who were in a back room of Chicago Pizza participating in this gaming tournament,” Williams said Monday. “The suspect walked past patrons who were in other parts of the business and focused his attention on the gamers.”Katz was treated for mental illness when he was an adolescent,according to the Associated Press.The handguns, a .45 and 9 mm, were legally purchased within the past month from a licensed dealer in Baltimore, Williams said. One had a laser sight attached to it.“There is no indication this was something that he planned,” Williams said. “We have yet to have a concrete motive.”Meanwhile, Crews has hired lawyers to investigate possible legal action. He is represented by Steven Swickle of Steven Swickle, P.A. and Chris Royer of Krupnick and Campbell in Fort Lauderdale, where he spoke about surviving the mass shooting.Crews said he grew up in Miami Gardens and attended Miami Norland Senior High School. He has a 3-year-old son, his namesake. He aspires to be a professional video gamer, and said he has traveled to competitions around the country since he was 17.“It depends on your skill set,” Crews said. “If you’re good enough, you can make a living.”He recently worked at a warehouse to supplement his income.And though he feels he was a better player when he was younger and had fewer responsibilities, “I still compete because I like to play still. That’s why I do it. I love it.”Doctors have told him his left arm and hand should function normally. For now, his arm is in a sling. The wound hurts, and he will need physical therapy.As for his heart and head, Crews said, “[That’s] not OK. It’s hard to deal with. Sleeping, sometimes you think you’re seeing lasers or things like that. It’s no good.”He’s had nightmares since Sunday, whenever he tries to sleep.“You hear the same sound, like a gun being shot and you wake up,” Crews said. Though he once played Madden games every day and can hold and press a console, he hasn’t picked one up since last weekend.“I’ll eventually play again, yes,” Crews said. “I don’t know [when I’ll be ready.] I guess whenever I can get my mind together and be ready for it. I’m not sure how long [it will take].”Like us on FacebookMenuRICHMOND, Va. -- Five people were shot and a sixth person suffered injuries during an early Saturday morning armed robbery inside a Shockoe Bottom business. None of the injuries were considered life threatening, according to Richmond Police.Officers were called to Liquid Café -- located at 4 N 18th Street in Shockoe Bottom -- at about 5:12 a.m."After [police] arrived, they located six people who had been inside the establishment at the time of the robbery who were injured; five by gunfire, one by other means. All of them were taken to a local hospital with non-life threatening injuries," a Richmond Police spokesperson said. "Although it is early in the investigation, Richmond Police detectives have determined that two armed individuals with their faces covered entered the establishment and announced a robbery. Shots were fired. An inventory of what they took is still being conducted."No descriptions of the gunmen have been released."I am certain that we can all agree that this increasing gun violence in Shockoe Bottom is unacceptable – this cannot be the norm," Richmond Police Chief Alfred Durham said in a statement following the shooting. "Someone knows the perpetrators of this crime and we need the public’s help. We need people to call us when they hear or see something. We are already working with several stakeholders in the Shockoe Bottom community and we will continue to develop public safety strategies to reduce violence and bring a sense of calm to the area."Earlier this week, a Chesterfield man was arrested in connection to another Shockoe Bottom shooting. Darroll G. Allen, 25, of Chesterfield, was charged with malicious wounding and use of a firearm in the commission of a felony. Additional charges are pending, police said.In that case, two men and one woman were shot early Wednesday morning near Plush Nightclub -- along the 1700 block of East Main Street -- just after 2 a.m. All three shooting victims were taken to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.This is a developing story. Witnesses cansend news tips, photos, or video here.Anyone with information about this armed robbery is asked to call Major Crimes Detective Nathan Reese at 804-510-4183 or contact Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000 or athttp://www.7801000.com. The P3 Tips Crime Stoppers app for smartphones may also be used. All three Crime Stoppers methods are anonymous.Police are looking for two suspects in connection to a Saturday night shooting in North Nashville that killed one man and left four others injured.Mansfield Rutherford, who would have turned 23 years old on Monday, was killed while celebrating his birthday with friends outside his home in the Cheatham Place public housing development.Police say two gunmen reportedly approached the group and opened fire around 10:50 p.m.Mansfield, who was shot in the chest, was transported to Vanderbilt University Medical Center, where he died.Police say four other men, which include two 18-year-olds, one 24-year-old, and one 32-year-old, sustained non-life threatening injuries.Metro police said the two suspects are African-American males in their early 20s. One of the suspects is about 6'4'' with a heavy build and shoulder-length dreads, while the other is 5'10'' with a thin build and light complexion. Both men were wearing black clothing at the time of the shooting.Anyone with information about Saturday's shooting is encouraged to contact Nashville Crime Stoppers at 615-742-7463. Callers to Crime Stoppers can remain anonymous and qualify for a cash reward.PHILADELPHIA (WTXF)-Philadelphia police are investigating a quadruple shooting on the 5800 block of Oakland Street in Oxford Circle.It happened around 9 p.m. Thursday.Police say two 17-year-old males were shot in the hip. They are both in stable condition. According to police, a 23-year-old man was shot five times in the lower extremities and one time in the lower back. He was taken to Jefferson Frankford Hospital. His condition is unknown at this time. A 21-year-old was shot one time in the left forearm, one time in right thigh and one time in right foot. He is listed in stable condition.So far, no arrests have been made and no weapons have been recovered.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsOsiris Williams, aka YK Osiris, posted a photo on social media of his tour van after it was shot up on Highway 40 late Aug. 22, 2018. Photo via Twitter (@ykOsiris.)Osiris Williams, aka YK Osiris, posted a video on social media of his tour van after it was shot up on Highway 40 late on Wednesday, Aug. 22, 2018. Screenshot via Instagram.ST. LOUIS •The tour van of a rapper who opened a concert at the Pageant Wednesday night came under fire on Highway 40 (Interstate 64) after the show, leaving four men with gunshot wounds.Osiris Williams, 19, a Florida rapper and singer who goes byYK Osiris, was in town to open asold-out Lil Baby concert at the Pageant. After the show, someone shot at the act’s white Sprinter van after it left the venue to go to a hotel, according to St. Louis police andsocial media posts from Williams. Four of the six men inside the van were injured by gunfire.Police say the shooting happened about 11:05 p.m. Wednesday in an eastbound lane of the highway near the Jefferson Avenue exit. The shots came from a gray sedan that pulled alongside the van, but no suspects had been identified, according to police.The driver drove the van to a hospital, where four men were treated for gunshot wounds to their limbs, police said. Their conditions were not available, but police said they were stable.It was not clear if Williams was among those injured or if he was in the vehicle during the shooting, but he posted video of the van on social media early Thursday showing its sides riddled with bullet holes.“I can’t believe I almost died,” he posted. “So glad I got a praying mother.”A video of Williams’ song”Valentine”has more than 19 million views on YouTube since it was published in March.WHEN U A CHILD OF GOD 🙏 AND PROTECTED BY THE BLOOD OF JESUS 💯 THERE IS NO WAY THE DEVIL CAN KILL YOU ‼️‼️ THE DEVIL IS A LIE 🗣🗣 U CANT STOP ME ‼️‼️‼️#THANKU JESUS🙏🙏pic.twitter.com/K5aLfqxsMeShake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Erin Heffernan is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Osiris Williams, aka YK Osiris, posted a photo on social media of his tour van after it was shot up on Highway 40 late Aug. 22, 2018. Photo via Twitter (@ykOsiris.)Osiris Williams, aka YK Osiris, posted a video on social media of his tour van after it was shot up on Highway 40 late on Wednesday, Aug. 22, 2018. Screenshot via Instagram.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.MEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - A Memphis man has been charged in connection toa shooting that injured multiple peoplelast week at an apartment complex.The shooting happened on East Hillview Drive, off East Alcy Road near the intersection of Airways Boulevard and I-240.Police said 27-year-old Brandon Perry is charged with five counts of criminal attempt of first-degree murder, aggravated assault, being a convicted felon in possession of a handgun, and possessing a firearm during a dangerous felony.Witnesses said on Aug. 21, Perry opened fire on a crowd of unarmed people while several women fought.While driving to the scene, the first victim flagged down the officers and told them he had been shot. He told police he walked up to a large group of people in Hillview when shots were suddenly fired.The victim told police he didn't know who shot him, and he didn't see the suspect. He was hospitalized in critical condition.A second victim was found nearby and had been shot in the chest. The second victim told police the group of people was arguing, and someone started shooting. He told police he didn't see who shot him; he was hospitalized in critical condition.A third victim was shot in the upper thigh and hospitalized in non-critical condition.Police said a fourth victim was also shot inside the Hillview during the fight. The fourth victim was shot in the shoulder and hospitalized in non-critical condition.Police said two were inside their apartment at Hillview when a round of gunfire went through their apartment window. The fifth victim was struck by a piece of glass across her chest. She was treated on the scene and refused to be hospitalized.Police said Perry admitted to the shooting and also pleaded guilty to aggravated burglary on April 8, 2013.Copyright 2018 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SectionsFeaturesWBBJ-TVJACKSON, Tenn. — A man injured in a shooting early Monday morning at a Jackson bar has died.Braxton Watkins, 20, of Jackson was pronounced dead at 10:15 a.m. Monday, according to the Jackson Police Department.Police are asking for the public’s assistance as they investigate the shooting that took place around 2 a.m. Monday at Cody’s on Heritage Square.Five people were injured in the shooting, including Watkins.“There was around 200 people in here. This happened about 10 minutes before closing, which is at 3:00,” Jackson Police Department Capt. Jeff Shepard said.Police are now asking anyone who was in the bar or may know what happened at the time of the shooting to call Jackson police or Crime Stoppers.“Just anybody that was here that saw what happened, you know, contact us, and we’ll be glad to take a statement from you,” Shepard said.Cody’s released a statement Monday afternoon on their Facebook page.“At this point in time, we are not commenting on the tragedy that happened at Cody’s last night. All the workers are okay. We are deeply saddened by this horrific tragedy. We are praying hard for those who were hurt and their families.”Jackson police have not confirmed a motive for the shooting or released any suspect information.Jackson police are urging anyone who witnessed the shooting to contact the Jackson Police Department at 731-425-8400 or Crime Stoppers at 731-424-TIPS (8477).Watkins’ body has been transported to Nashville for an autopsy. Police say the autopsy should be complete Tuesday.Police have not confirmed the extent of the injuries for the four other victims.© 2021 WBBJ TV.One man is dead and three others injured in a shooting in Cleveland.  (File photo)CLEVELAND, Ohio -- A 26-year-old man is dead and three others injured in a shooting in the city's Kinsman neighborhood.The shooting happened about 11:30 p.m. Monday on East 94th Street, north of Kinsman Road near the police department's Fourth District Headquarters.A fight over drugs led to the gunfire, Cleveland police said. No other information regarding the shooting was released.Jaylin Glanton of Maple Heights died from a gunshot wound to his shoulder. He was found dead at the scene.A 27-year-old man was shot in the neck and is in critical condition at MetroHealth. A 25-year-old man suffered a superficial gunshot wound to the chest and a 32-year-old man was shot in the leg during the incident, police said.No arrests have been made in the case.It's the city's 78th homicide of the year. There were 72 at the same point in 2017.To comment on this story,please visit our crime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Five people were shot and wounded Sunday night in the Grand Crossing neighborhood on the South Side.About 10:55 p.m., the group was gathered outside in the 7400 block of South Dante Avenue after some had taken part in a weekly softball game, according to Chicago police. Someone in a black van pulled up and opened fire into the crowd.One man was shot multiple times in his chest and back, police said. He was taken to University of Chicago Medical Center in serious condition.A 40-year-old woman was struck in her calf and was in good condition at the same hospital, police said. A 30-year-old man was struck in his ankle and a 42-year-old man was hit in his arm. Their conditions had stabilized at University of Chicago.A 26-year-old man was shot in his leg and was taken to Jackson Park Hospital, where his condition stabilized, according to police.Area Central detectives were investigating the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.NEW YORK (CBSNewYork)— Three people were rushed to the hospital after an early morning drive-by shooting in the Bronx.It happened outside Bruxelles Lounge on Radcliffe Avenue in the Allerton section around 4:30 a.m.Investigators say three people were rushed to NYC Health + Hospitals/Jacobi, two of whom were in critical condition.At least 20 evidence markers placed by#NYPDCrime Scene Unit on Radcliffe Avenue outside Bruxelles Lounge#Bronxshots were fired from a car at a group of people around 4AM@CBSNewYorkpic.twitter.com/6q9LKkMkHV— Lisa Rozner (@LisaRoznerTV)August 18, 2018Police say they had three people were in custody as investigators worked to determine if the shooting was gang-related.It’s possible more people were injured in the melee, according to police.Anyone with information in regards to this incident is asked to call the NYPD’s Crime Stoppers Hotline at 1-800-577-TIPS (8477) or for Spanish, 1-888-57-PISTA (74682).The public can also submit their tips by logging onto the Crime stoppers website atWWW.NYPDCRIMESTOPPERS.COMor by texting their tips to 274637 (CRIMES) then enter TIP577.Filed under:A 3-year-old boy was one of seven people shot Friday evening in the South Side Englewood neighborhood.Most of the group was on a sidewalk about 8 p.m. when shots rang out in the 1600 block of West 65th Street, according to Chicago police.The boy was shot in the left shin and taken to Comer Children’s Hospital, where his condition stabilized.A 30-year-old man who was shot in the back showed up at Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was in serious condition, police said.Paramedics took two other men, ages 27 and 30, to University of Chicago Medical Center and St. Bernard Hospital, respectively. The younger man was shot in the torso and the older man was shot in the left leg. Their conditions stabilized.Two more men, ages 26 and 29, showed up at St. Bernard Hospital, where their conditions stabilized. The older man was shot in the left calf, and the younger man in the left hand and leg.A seventh person, a 38-year-old woman, was standing in a nearby backyard when a stray bullet grazed her in the left arm, police said. She was treated on the scene and released.More details weren’t immediately available.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Variable clouds with scattered thunderstorms. Storms may contain strong gusty winds. High 73F. Winds S at 10 to 20 mph. Chance of rain 50%..Scattered thunderstorms. Low 58F. Winds SSW at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 50%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:48 pmThis bullet hole in an air-conditioning unit is proof of the shooting Wednesday night that terrorized a grieving family on Mimosa Court.Five adults and one child were injured in an overnight shooting on Mimosa Court, the evidence of which still lingers in bullet holes in furniture and other items.This bullet hole in an air-conditioning unit is proof of the shooting Wednesday night that terrorized a grieving family on Mimosa Court.Five adults and one child were injured in an overnight shooting on Mimosa Court, the evidence of which still lingers in bullet holes in furniture and other items.Deputies are still working to identify a suspect in the shooting that disturbed one family’s grief Wednesday night.Bessie Patterson said she was with her family Wednesday night at 104 Mimosa Court, where they gathered to mourn her son’s death. She was inside the house with some of the family’s children when the shots rang out.“All we heard was the shots — boom, boom, boom — and we all hit the floor,” she said.An unidentified shooter came up to the grieving family and opened fire multiple times, leaving five adults shot and one baby otherwise injured, said Sgt. Jeff Graham with the Greenwood County Sheriff’s Office. None of the injuries were life-threatening.According a report, the child had apparently been grazed by a bullet, while one of the injured adults had a gunshot wound to the back of their upper left arm and another had a cut on their right forearm. Witnesses told deputies they sought cover as soon as the shots rang out, and didn’t see the shooter or where the shots came from.In the backyard of the house, a tent that once offered the grieving family shade had bullet holes ripped through the tarp. What appeared to be a bullet hole punched straight through the center of an air-conditioning unit, while another appeared to shatter the corner of a lawn chair.“We had all these kids together too. You expect peace; we want peace,” Patterson said. “It’s just so disrespectful when I’m trying to bury my son.”Her son, 29-year-old Quartez Bryant, died Sunday at Self Regional Medical Center 23 days after he got into a wreck along Center Street on July 20.“I come down here to grieve and bury my son and be with family and then someone does this,” Patterson said.Deputies were dispatched at 11:03 p.m. Wednesday and arrived about 10 minutes later, with the office’s bloodhound tracking team joining investigators at the scene.Sheriff Dennis Kelly said deputies recovered rounds from a handgun, but are still working to develop a suspect. No arrests have been made.The report noted there were several spent shell casings and one live round under the tent in the family’s backyard. Deputies also found casings near 103 Amity Court, and bullet holes in the eaves of 105 Amity Court — apparently from someone at 104 Mimosa Court returning fire at the shooter.He said someone at the gathering returned fire at the initial shooter, but that deputies had no further information on that part of the shooting.Patterson said she wanted the shooter to know how destructive their choice had been.“I want him to just stop, all he’s doing is hurting people,” she said. “That goes for all shooters, they all need to just put down the guns.”Self Regional Medical Center spokesman Mark Hyatt said the hospital was on lockdown from 11:15 p.m. Wednesday to 1:11 a.m. Thursday. He said five people were treated for injuries from gunshots and were released, though the sheriff’s office said only four had been released.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call the sheriff’s office at 864-942-8632 or Crime Stoppers at 888-CRIMESC (888-274-6372).Contact staff writer Damian Dominguez at 864-634-7548 or follow on twitter @IJDDOMINGUEZ.NEWSPAPER ROUTES available in Greenwood and Ninety Six areas!WATCHVIDEOSCheltenham Walmart shooting suspect apologizes, bail set at $1MKeenan JonesAction Cam Video: Walmart shooting suspect says 'I'm sorry' as he's taken into custody on August 14, 2018.Chopper 6 captures multiple scenes from a police investigation into a shooting inside a Cheltenham Township Walmart on August 14, 2018.Suspect apologizes after Walmart shooting. Jeannette Reyes reports during Action News Mornings on August 15, 2018.<p>Stacey Gibson is in custody after she turned herself into authorities.</p>PITTSBURGH — A woman is in custody in connection withthe street fight that ended with four people shot in East Libertyon Sunday.Stacey Gibson, 23, of Homewood, turned herself in to authorities Tuesday afternoon.[FOR BREAKING NEWS AND ALERTS DOWNLOAD THE WPXI NEWS APP]Three females and a male were shot after a fight that occurred in the 5600 block of Broad Street around 9 p.m., police said.TRENDING NOW:A Zone 5 police officer applied a tourniquet to the leg of one of the shooting victims on the scene.All four victims are in stable condition. Gibson is facing four counts of aggravated assault.[PHOTOS: Allegheny County's Most Wanted]2017 SF crime statsSan Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)San Francisco Police Dept. year-end crime statistics for 2017. (Uniform Crime Reports — UCR)A 19-year-old man was shot dead in a quintuple shooting over the weekend in San Francisco’s Crocker-Amazon neighborhood, police said Monday.The victim, identified by the city medical examiner’s officer as Gerson Romero, was pronounced dead at the scene near Geneva and Mission Streets after the gunfire erupted around 2 a.m. Saturday.Four other victims — young men ages 19, 20 and 23, as well as a 19-year-old woman — were also wounded in the attack. They were not identified and their conditions were not released.Police have not arrested any suspects but said they are looking for five men in their early 20s. Investigators were working to determine a motive and circumstances of the shooting.Evan Sernoffsky is a San Francisco Chronicle staff writer. Email:esernoffsky@sfchronicle.comTwitter:@EvanSernoffskyEvan Sernoffsky is a reporter for the San Francisco Chronicle specializing in criminal justice, crime and breaking news. He's covered some of the biggest Bay Area news stories in recent memory, including wildfires, mass shootings and criminal justice reform efforts in San Francisco. He has given a voice to victims in some of the region's biggest tragedies, carefully putting himself in challenging situations to make sure their stories are told. He works out of San Francisco's Hall of Justice where he keeps watch on the city's courts and hits the streets to expose the darker side of a city undergoing rapid change. He moved to the Bay Area from Oregon where he grew up and worked as a journalist for several years.Trending:A man suspected of opening fire early Saturday after being kicked out of a Thornton sports bar now faces multiple murder charges in the death of a bartender there.Staff at the Extra Point Bar on West 100th Avenue kicked Gary Wideman, 36, out of the establishment after multiple fights had broken out, according to a news release from the district attorney’s office for the 17th Judicial District. Wideman returned with a handgun at about 1:30 a.m. and started shooting, the release states.A bartender, Brenda Martinez, was killed. Several others were injured, including three who were shot and another who was stabbed.Wideman faces two counts of first-degree murder, four counts of attempted first-degree murder, two counts of first-degree assault, one count of second-degree assault and six counts of crime of violence, which could make any sentences more severe if he is convicted.Prosecutors read Wideman the charges against him Wednesday in Adams County District Court. His next court appearance is scheduled for 11 a.m. Oct. 26.People were fleeing the bar when police arrived early Saturday morning. A trail of blood splatters remained on the pavement outside on Saturday afternoon, but police couldn’t confirm whether the blood was related to the incident the night before.An employee at a nearby gas station who knew Martinezpreviously told The Denver Postthat the bartender was a single mother and “the nicest person in the world.”The Extra Point Bar will be closed until further notice,according to its Facebook page.Sign up for Newsletters and AlertsCOLUMBUS, Ohio – Police say two men are in custody on federal firearms charges in connection with an August shootout at a central Ohio park that injured one of the suspects, another man and two children.Columbus police say they believe the shootout during an Aug. 11 party was gang-related. A 5-year-old girl and a 10-year-old girl were injured.Police say scores of people were there, but only three provided witness statements. Investigators say DNA on guns recovered in connection with the shooting was linked to the suspects in custody.Police say one of the injured men, 26-year-old Keveante Smoot, was arrested last week. His public defender declined to comment.WBNS-TV reports a second suspect, 38-year-old Cornelius Allen, turned himself in Friday. A message was left Saturday for his appointed attorney.Share this articleA man has been arrested in a quadruple shooting at a St. Louis gas station that left one man in critical condition and three others injured.The victims, two men and two women, were outside Salama's Mobile Mart at 1515 North 13th Street whenthey were shot just before 10:30 p.m. Friday.Police released few details Friday, but in an update Monday said one man, 33, was in critical and unstable condition after the shooting. He had been found at the scene with gunshot wounds to his face, shoulder and side.Three other victims showed up later at hospitals with gunshot wounds. It's not clear how they arrived there. A woman, 25, had been hit in the thigh. Another woman, 29, was injured in the back and hip. The fourth victim, a 33-year-old man, was hit in the arm. Their conditions were not available, but police said they were stable.Police say they were shot by a man, 28, who fired from a Dodge Ram pickup. The suspect was later arrested but had not yet been charged.The gas station is part of a strip of shops in theSt. Louis Place neighborhood, north of downtown and near the foot of the Stan Musial Veterans Memorial Bridge. The same strip was the site ofa deadly shootout on July 5.•St. Louis city crime trackerShake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Denise Hollinshed is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-DispatchKaren L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.MenuDetroit police say a suspect is in custody in a quadruple shooting on Detroit's west side.The shooting is in the 6300 block of Vinewood, near W. Grand Boulevard and McGraw.One victim, a 34-year-old man, was shot multiple times and is in critical condition.Three other men, aged 21 to 23-years-old were also shot. One was hit in the shin, one was hit in the back and the third was hit in the face.A 17-year-old has been taken into custody.NewsPassaic County Prosecutor Camelia M. Valdes and Paterson Police Chief Troy Oswald announce that at approximately 11:40 p.m. on August 8th members of the Paterson Police Department responded to the area of Mercer Street for a report of shots fired.Officials say a short time later, police were notified that a 17-year-old juvenile, 20-year-old male Paterson resident, a 14-year-old juvenile, and 20-year-old female Paterson resident had arrived at Saint Joseph’s Regional Medical Center in Paterson for treatment of non-fatal gunshot wounds.Based on the initial investigation a crime scene was located in the area of Mercer and Franklin Street Paterson.The investigation remains active and ongoing.The Passaic County Prosecutor’s Office asks anyone with additional information about this incident to contact us on our tips line at 1-877-370-PCPO or tips@passaiccountynj.org or contact the Paterson Police Ceasefire Unit at 973-321-1342.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.NewsBy Associated PressSubmitAugust 9, 2018|2:09amPHILADELPHIA — Philadelphia police are investigating a drive-by shooting that left two people dead and four others injured.Police say the shooting happened around 10 p.m. Wednesday. Authorities say a minivan stopped and fired at a crowd of people standing on a corner.Police Commissioner Richard Ross says a man and a woman who were both in their 30s were killed. Ross says the other victims range in age from 27 to 49.Ross says one of the firearms used was an assault weapon.An investigation continues.Read NextArmy stops discharges of immigrant recruits — for nowShare SelectionThis story has been shared 132,813 times.132,813This story has been shared 81,121 times.81,121This story has been shared 65,453 times.65,453This story has been shared 64,137 times.64,137This story has been shared 56,347 times.56,347© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationFiled under:A man was shot to death and four other people were wounded Sunday morning in an Austin neighborhood attack on the West Side, police said.The shooting happened about 6:50 a.m. in the first block of North Leclaire, according to Chicago police.Charles Green, 32, suffered gunshot wounds to his body and neck and was taken to Stroger Hospital where he was pronounced dead, according to police and the Cook County Medical Examiner’s Office. He lived in the same neighborhood as the shooting.A 30-year-old man was shot in the back of his head, while a 27-year-old woman was struck in the arm and wrist, police said. Their conditions were stabilized at Stroger.A 34-year-old woman suffered a gunshot wound to her left leg, police said. She took herself to Stroger and was listed in good condition.A 21-year-old woman was taken to West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Park with a graze wound to her left knee, police said. She was treated and released.Area North detectives were conducting a homicide investigation.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.DonateSUPPORT TRUTH AND DEMOCRACYInvest in the next generation of journalists and artistsDonateSUPPORT TRUTH AND DEMOCRACYInvest in the next generation of journalists and artistsSaturday, August 4, was a restless night for 40 Chicago families. In less than seven hours, 40 people were shot on the city’s West and South sides in gang related shootings, 15 of whom were teenagers, according totheChicago Tribune.At a block party, a 14-year-old boy and an 11-year-old boy were both shot in their legs and are now reportedly stable. But 17-year-old Jahnae Patterson was shot and killed during the same attack, in which every person wounded was 21 or younger.“My baby just left the house. Twenty minutes later, I get a call saying my baby got shot,” Patterson’s mother, Tanika Humphries, told theTribuneat a Sunday evening vigil held at the family’s home.Patterson and a friend at the block party were walking to use a bathroom when two young men started a shootout. Patterson was shot in the face and pronounced dead at the scene. According toABC7, as of Monday morning, no one is in custody yet, and Area Central detectives are still investigating.Patterson was a senior at Manley Career Academy High School, the first girl born in her family, and the fifth of nine children. She dreamed of becoming a lawyer.Her mother describes her as a hardworking student who always did what she was supposed to. “My baby did not deserve this,” Humphries said. “My baby wasn’t the type to hang out. She was in school. She worked. She did everything she was supposed to do as a teenager. And then coward (expletive) took it all away from us.”Born with health problems, Patterson was growing up to be a strong young woman, her family says.Dozens of her relatives attended the vigil and hung up pictures and posters of Patterson on a fence outside her family’s home.“I’m trying to be strong, but I can’t,” Humphries said.Many, including one of Patterson’s friends who was with her in her final moments, posted their condolences on social media.Alice kisses a picture of her 17-year-old niece, Jahnae Patterson, during a vigil for Patterson who was shot in the face and killed early Sunday morning. In a 7-hour period 40 people were shot and four were killed in#Chicago, including Jahnae.https://t.co/miTdWtWEEVpic.twitter.com/4RjDE9PAEo— armando l sanchez (@mandophotos)August 6, 2018Relatives of HS senior Jahnae Patterson say goodbye after a rash of overnight shootings left about more than 30 wounded and at least 4 dead.pic.twitter.com/aZ5bUmCmqx— Will Lee (@MidnoirCowboy)August 6, 201817-year-d Jahnae Patterson among the 5 killed and 34 shot this last this weekend. Her family is gathered for a vigil now.@cbschicagopic.twitter.com/lPd1QgKP4E— Charlie De Mar (@CharlieDeMar)August 6, 2018Nearly 60 people were shot — 11 fatally — between Friday night and Monday morning in Chicago, which led to chaos outside of Stroger Hospital as many families waited to find out about their relatives who had been shot, according toNBC 5.YR Media © 2020A shooting early Sunday wounded eight people, including four teenage girls, in the Gresham neighborhood on the South Side.The eight people were standing in a courtyard about 12:40 a.m. in the 1300 block of West 76th Street when several males approached them and opened fire, according to Chicago Police.The victims, ranging from 14 to 35 years old, had their conditions stabilized at various hospitals, police said.A 14-year-old girl was shot in her hand, police said; a 17-year-old girl was struck in her knee and was taken to Little Company of Mary Hospital; another 17-year-old girl was shot in her leg and was taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn; a 19-year-old girl was struck in her hand and was taken to Holy Cross Hospital.An 18-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to his buttocks and a 21-year-old woman was struck in her leg, police said. They were both taken to University of Chicago Medical Center. A 19-year-old man was shot in his leg and was taken to Saint Bernard Hospital; and a 35-year-old man had a graze wound to his head.Area South detectives were investigating the shooting.Filed under:Four people were wounded in a shootout early Sunday in the West Humboldt Park neighborhood.About 12:50 a.m., a black Cadillac approached a group of people in the 900 block of South Karlov Avenue and two people within the vehicle opened fire, according to Chicago Police.Three people in the crowd were struck by bullets, and they returned fire and caused the Cadillac to crash, police said. The people in the vehicle fled.A 30-year-old woman was shot in her calf, a 29-year-old man was grazed in his chest and a 30-year-old man was struck in his ankle and calf, police said. They were taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition.A fourth person was walking down the street and was caught in the crossfire, according to police. The 43-year-old man was struck in his thigh and was also taken to Stroger in good condition.Area North detectives were investigating the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:A single shooting at a block party early Sunday left three teens and one adult wounded in the Lawndale neighborhood on the Southwest Side.The victims were at a block party shortly after midnight in the 1600 block of South Avers Avenue when a two males exited a white Chevy Impala and opened fire in a crowd, according to Chicago Police.A 13-year-old boy was shot twice in his arm, a 16-year-old boy was struck in his buttocks and a 17-year-old girl was grazed in her arm and knee, police said. They were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where their conditions stabilized.A 25-year-old man was shot in his leg and was taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition also stabilized, police said.No one was in custody early Sunday as Area Central detectives investigated the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Office of Public InformationShooting InvestigationNorth Las Vegas, Nevada– Six people are in stable condition after being shot at a house party last night in North Las Vegas.On Saturday, August 4, 2018, at about 10:00 p.m., officers responded to the 3400 block of Coran Lane in regards to a shooting. Arriving officers located a large number of people attending a party. Officers learned that six people were hit by gunfire and transported to UMC Hospital with non-life threatening injuries.The preliminary investigation indicates a male suspect shot into a group of people, striking a 20-year-old male, an18-year-old male, a 15-year-old male, an 18-year-old female, an 11-year-old female, and an unidentified male.The suspect was gone on police arrival. Detectives do not believe this was a random act of violence.Anyone with information in this case is urged to call the North Las Vegas Police Department at 702-633-9111 or, to remain anonymous, call Crime Stoppers at 702-385-5555.###Follow us onUpdate your subscriptions, modify your password or email address, or stop subscriptions at any time on yourSubscriber Preferences Page. You will need to use your email address to log in. If you have questions or problems with the subscription service, please contactsubscriberhelp.govdelivery.com.This service is provided to you at no charge by theCity of North Las Vegas.FOX 4 Kansas City WDAF-TV | News, Weather, Sportsby:Brian DulleKANSAS CITY, Mo. — A 25-year-old man has been charged for a string of shootings that left six people injured in the Jazz District earlier this year.Devonte Grimes has been charged with six counts of first degree or attempted assault and six counts of armed criminal action.According to court documents, on Aug. 4, 2018, Kansas City police working in the Jazz District heard several gunshots just before 11 p.m. from the area of 18th and Highland. When officers responded to the scene they found six victims suffering from gunshot wounds. The victims were reported to be three men and three women ranging in age from early twenties to early forties.One victim told detectives he was in the area when his brother became involved in a fight with several men unknown to him. The victim said he attempted to break up the fight and put one of the men, identified as Grimes, in a headlock to stop him from fighting. The victim said after releasing him, Grimes pulled out a black handgun and pointed it at him. The victim said the fight continued between multiple parties when Grimes fired several shots, one of which struck him in the neck and another on his side.A Facebook video discovered by detectives shows the altercation described by the victim. Grimes is seen removing a gun from his waistband after being let go from the victim in which the camera pans left just as gunshots are heard.Grimes was taken into custody on Sept. 17. According to the Platte County Jail, Grimes bonded out on Sept. 27.SubmitOLATHE, Kan. -- The Olathe Police Department is asking the public help finding 14-year-old, Kimberlinn Max Chadwick.  Kimberlinn is approximately five feet and seven inches tall, she weighs 140 pounds, with brown hair, and brown eyes.She was last seen in Kansas City, Missouri on Saturday morning about 7 a.m.  She was wearing a dark colored hooded shirt, black pants, and black and clear slide style sandals.KANSAS CITY, Mo. -- A standoff with police ended just before 1:30 p.m. when the suspect surrendered to police without further incident.  The kids that were in the house with the shooting suspect were rescued by police.  After the kids were rescued the suspect remained in the house and continued to fire shots at officers."The officers and commanders involved in this incident showed tremendous bravery and professionalism.  The suspect was taken into custody without further violence," Police spokesman David  Jackson said.HARRISONVILLE, Mo. -- Day 6 of the Kylr Yust trial is expected to continue with testimony.On day 5, prosecutors moved into the timeline after Jessica Runions was last seen through witnesses' testimony and evidence. Jessep Carter's wife, Crystal Taylor, testified that Yust summoned her husband up to Raytown in early September 2016 and recounted the hours up until Kylr Yust was arrested.Filed under:A man was killed and three people were wounded in a shooting early Sunday in the Austin neighborhood on the Northwest Side, police said.About 4:15 a.m., the group was in the 1600 block of North Leclaire when multiple people fired shots, according to Chicago police.Donald Norris, 19, was shot in his head and neck and pronounced dead at the scene, police and the Cook County Medical Examiner’s Office said. He was a resident of the Lawndale neighborhood.A 37-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the calf, while a 21-year-old man was struck in his thigh, police said. Their conditions were stabilized at West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Park.A 27-year-old man suffered a graze wound to the chest. He was taken to Stroger Hospital where his condition stabilized, police said.Area North detectives were conducting a homicide investigation.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Shooting at Washington ParkMILWAUKEE -- Milwaukee police are investigating a shooting that happened Saturday afternoon, Aug. 4 on the basketball courts at Washington Park -- located near 40th and Vliet that left four people injured.Police said three 18-year-old men and a 20-year-old man suffered injuries not believed to be life-threatening after the shooting that happened shortly after 3 p.m. The motive is under investigation.People who were at the park told FOX6 News a group of young men and teenagers were playing basketball, while several church members were sitting at picnic tables, grilling out. That's when a witness said a vehicle pulled up and the window was rolled down and someone inside started shooting at those on the court."And the next thing you know, gunshots just happened, and then when the shooting was over with, the car turned and went that way," said a man who only wanted to be identified by his initials, KJ.Washington Park shootingWitnesses said one victim was shot in the neck, and another in the leg. They said a third victim was grazed by a bullet."He was still moving, talking, and some lady who I'm thankful basically put pressure on him because if she didn't put pressure, he would have died, from what I was told," KJ said of his friend, who was shot in the neck.AdvertisementIt was a terrifying scene, as church members, including some children were present. Everyone was shaken up, and many said they're angry this happened at a park where people were outside simply enjoying a summer day with family and friends."I came, brought my daughter, brought my friends, and thought it was going to be a good time, and then it turned into a nightmare. A slaughterhouse," said KJ.FOX6 spoke with the mother of the young man shot in the leg, who said he was taken to Froedtert Hospital and is expected to be OK.Friends of the young man shot in the neck said he remained conscious after the shooting. His condition is unknown."The person who did this, you was wrong. You was out of order for that.  Anger can't even describe how I'm feeling. It seems like I'm calm but deep down, I'm pissed -- because this is a friend that I call my brother," said KJ.Shooting at Washington ParkShooting at Washington ParkThis material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsA 25-year-old felon accused of opening fire at a gathering of friends in Gardena, killing a woman and injuring two other people before carjacking a married couple and fatally shooting the husband in Lynwood, pleaded not guilty Monday to capital murder and other charges.Selvin Fabian Salazar appeared before a judge in Torrance to enter his plea to two counts of murder, three counts of attempted murder and one count each of carjacking, kidnapping, dissuading a witness by force or threat and possession of a firearm by a felon. He was ordered to return to court Oct. 22, when a date is expected to be set for a preliminary hearing to determine whether there is sufficient evidence to proceed to trial.The murder charges include the special circumstance allegation of multiple murders. Prosecutors have yet to decide whether to seek the death penalty against Salazar.Top news of the dayThe criminal complaint includes allegations that he personally used and discharged a handgun, inflicted great bodily injury and death, committed the crime in association with a criminal street gang and had a prior felony conviction from 2011 for assault with a firearm.The violence began around 4 a.m. July 31 at a mobile home park in the 1200 block of West 135th Street, near Normandie Avenue, where a group of friends had gathered.Salazar became upset for unknown reasons during the gathering, according to a sheriff's lieutenant who spoke to reporters shortly after the shooting.Salazar allegedly fired at a vehicle, striking and killing Dolores Sanchez and injuring a second person inside, along with a third person outside the vehicle, according to the Los Angeles County District Attorney's Office.After the shooting, the gunman allegedly forced a married couple to drive him from the scene in their black Kia Soul.When they reached Lynwood, Salazar allegedly shot Francisco Montes, 28, of Gardena and dragged him out of the vehicle on the Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard onramp to the southbound Long Beach (710) Freeway.The gunman also tried to shoot the dead man's wife, but his gun apparently jammed and he left the two on the side of the road and drove off, sheriff's investigators allege.A weapon believed to have been used in the shootings was recovered at the freeway onramp.The shooter knew his targets, but his motive was unclear, according to a sheriff's lieutenant, who added that Salazar and Montes both belonged to the same gang.Salazar has been jailed without bail since his arrest in Inglewood the day after the shooting.WSAV-TVby:WSAV StaffA shooting on Savannah’s Southside sent five people to the hospital. It happened just after 12:30 a.m. Monday at Southside Seafood on Largo Drive.Savannah Police reported they were called to the Windsor Arms Apartment complex on Largo Drive.After an investigation, officers determined the shooting actually took place outside Southside Seafood which is located across the street.According to a police report, the incident is believed to have started as a fight between co-workers who work at another restaurant. During the fight, someone fired a gun.Police report they discovered Rashod Jackson and Tekiera Holmes at their apartment in the Windsor Arms Apartments on Largo Drive.Jackson was found with a gunshot wound to his right ankle. He was transported to a nearby hospital.Holmes’ right hand was injured. She told police she injured it while punching a window out in the apartment. Holmes refused transport to the hospital.According to a police report, Jackson and Holmes retreated to their apartment after the incident outside of Southside Seafood. They said they left the scene when they heard gunfire.Two other victims were transported to a hospital by private vehicle, and several hours later a fifth victim arrived at the hospital with a non-life threatening gunshot wound.All of their injuries are considered non-life threatening.The shooting suspect has not been identified at this time.This story is developing. News 3 will continue to bring you further updates._________NOTE: This article has been updated with the correct location of shooting and number of victims. Earlier it was reported that the shooting took place at Windsor Arms apartments and four people were injured.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.COLUMBIA, S.C. (AP) — The brain of Phillip Adams — the former NFL player who killed a South Carolina physician, three family members and a repairman before fatally shooting himself — will be tested for a degenerative disease that has affected a number of pro athletes and has been shown to cause violent mood swings and other cognitive disorders, according to the local coroner.York County Coroner Sabrina Gast said in a statement issued on Friday that she had gotten approval from Adams' family for the procedure to be included as part of his autopsy, which will be performed at the Medical University of South Carolina. The hospital will be working with Boston University, whose chronic traumatic encephalopathy center conducts research on the long-term effects of repetitive brain trauma in athletes and military personnel, according to its website.SAVANNAH, Ga. (WSAV) – The family of a man who died in the custody of the Savannah Police Department seeks answers as they mourn his death.Standing outside police headquarters Friday, where William Harvey died last weekend, family members said the department hasn't been forthcoming with information.MINNEAPOLIS (AP) — The chief medical examiner who ruled George Floyd’s death a homicide testified Friday that the way police held him down and compressed his neck “was just more than Mr. Floyd could take,” given the condition of his heart.Dr. Andrew Baker, the Hennepin County medical examiner, took the stand at the murder trial of former Officer Derek Chauvin for pressing his knee on or close to Floyd’s neck for what prosecutors said was as much as 9 1/2 minutes as the 46-year-old Black man lay on the pavement last May.Filed under:Four men were wounded in a drive-by shooting Monday evening in the Lawndale neighborhood on the Southwest Side.The men were standing on a corner at 7:11 p.m. in the 1200 block of South Avers when people inside a passing dark-colored vehicle opened fire, according to Chicago Police.A 24-year-old suffered a gunshot wound to his left hip, while a 30-year-old was struck in the left leg, police said. They were both taken by ambulance to Stroger Hospital, where their conditions were stabilized.Two 25-year-olds took themselves to the same hospital after being shot in the right shoulder and right leg, respectively, police said. Their conditions were also stabilized.Area Central detectives were investigating the shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Three adults and a juvenile were taken to York Hospital early Sunday morning after suffering gunshot wounds in the same incident, according to a news release from York City Police.Police say the victims were targeted in the incidentand have been uncooperative during the investigation.About 12:13 a.m. Sunday, York City Police were sent to the first block of East Maple Street, where they found a 16-year-old, suffering from gunshot wounds to the hand and abdomen. Officers also found Infinite Corbetts, 18, with a gunshot wound to the chest.READ:York City Police investigate shooting early Saturday morningWhile at York Hospital, officers discovered two additional victims from the same incident: Anthony Lopez, 23, who suffered a gunshot wound to the chest and arm and Fernando Maysonet, 22, who was shot in his hand.The shooting is classified as a Group Violence Initiative incident, according to the news release.If anyone has any information related to this incident, they are encouraged to call the York City Police Department at 717-846-1234 or text tips to 847-411 or download the York City PD App. Texting in tips is the best method of conveying information about this incident and it is anonymous.Instructions for using text tip line:1 Enter number 847-4112 start message with – yorktips3 text your messageREAD:York City youth need programs to help prevent violence (column)MenuPolice are investigating after five people were shot in central Phoenix Sunday evening.The shooting happened at the Airport Inn near 24th and Van Buren streets shortly before 8 p.m. Witnesses said they heard a verbal argument before shots were fired.Officials said Monday morning that one man, identified as 37-year-old Jessuh Williams, died from his injuries at the hospital. Three women were also found with gunshot wounds, but are said to have non-life-threatening injuries.A fifth victim, a woman, contacted police later and said she had also been injured, but had left the scene before officers arrived.MAP: Where, when mass shootings have occurred around the country in 2018Police say the suspect is still outstanding and they're looking for information on the incident. If you know anything, call police or Silent Witness at 480-WITNESS.Report a typoFour people were shot south of downtown Lansing over the weekend, police said.Officers were called to the intersection of Elm Street and River Street, just south of Interstate 496 off Cedar Street, for a report of shots fired at about 3 a.m. Sunday, said Lansing Police Public Information Director Robert Merritt.Once they arrived, they found a 29-year-old Lansing man with a gunshot wound to the leg, Merritt said.Several people were having a get together nearby, and a fight broke out, which led to shots being fired, Merritt said. Officers found shell casings in the area.As police investigated, two men arrived at a local hospital with gunshot wounds to the legs. The two men, who were 30 and 44 and both from Lansing, said they were at the get together when the fight broke out. Someone started shooting, and they ran.Neither knew who the shooter was.A few hours later, a 47-year-old Lansing man arrived at the hospital with a gunshot wound, Merritt said. He had been grazed by a bullet and didn't realize he had been struck until much later, Merritt said.The 29-year-old would not tell police how he got shot or who shot him, Merritt said. The other men did not see the shooter. None of their injuries were life threatening.No arrests have been made.Anyone with information on the shooting can call Lansing Detective Sgt. Chris Baldwin at 517-483-6846 or Lansing Police at 517-483-4600.Contact Kara Berg at 517-377-1113 or kberg@lsj.com. Follow her on Twitter @karaberg95.Taiesha Watkins, 27, the mother of a 5-year-old girl from Houston, Texas, was one of three people killed in a mass shooting on South Claiborne Avenue on Saturday, July 28, 2018. (Courtesy of Cedell Watkins)Taiesha Watkins, 27, was one of three people killed in a mass shooting on South Claiborne Avenue Saturday, July 28, 2018. (Courtesy of Cedell Watkins)Taiesha Watkins, 27, the mother of a 5-year-old girl from Houston, Texas, was one of three people killed in a mass shooting on South Claiborne Avenue on Saturday, July 28, 2018. (Courtesy of Cedell Watkins)Taiesha Watkins, 27, was one of three people killed in a mass shooting on South Claiborne Avenue Saturday, July 28, 2018. (Courtesy of Cedell Watkins)Taiesha Watkins' parents woke up in Texas Sunday morning (July 29) unaware their daughter, who had gone to New Orleans for the weekend, had been pronounced dead several hours earlier at the scene of amass shooting.Cedell Watkins, the father of the 27-year-old Houston-area mother and hospital worker, said his daughter's friend called Watkins' wife Saturday night, after three people were killed and seven others were wounded in the shooting on South Claiborne Avenue. But his wife missed the call. The next morning when his wife returned the call to her daughter's friend, Cedell Watkins, a truck driver, was already on the road for work, he said.Their daughter's friend, who had traveled with her from Houston to New Orleans, told Taiesha Watkins' mother that Taiesha had been shot, Cedell Watkins said. One of the other friends in their group had also been shot, Taiesha Watkins' mother was told, and they were separated from Taiesha in the chaos. On Sunday morning, the friend hadn't yet been able to find out where Taisha Watkins was or how she was doing, Cedell Watkins said.The call the Watkins family received later that morning delivered the news that has prompted continuous visits and calls of condolence from their daughter's coworkers, friends, old teachers and fellow cheerleading coaches."Someone from the morgue called and said they had my daughter there," Cedell Watkins said Thursday, recalling the Sunday morning they learned their firstborn and only daughter had been killed.Watkins was one of three people who died in the shooting in the 3400 block of South Claiborne, after New Orleans police say two shooters chased a man they were targeting to a crowded area outside a strip mall.The shooters opened fire, shooting "indiscriminately," NOPD Superintendent Michael Harrison said, and struck a total of 10 people. Watkins and 38-year-old Central City father-of-twoKurshaw Jackson, who both happened to be in the area, were fatally wounded.Jeremiah Lee,28, who police said was the shooter's intended target, was also killed. A business owner who reviewed surveillance footage said it showed two shooters chasing a man, later identified as Lee, then standing over him and repeatedly firing into his body as he lay on the ground outside the strip mall. Lee left behind three children, the oldest about 7.All five wounded in their 30sCedell Watkins said his daughter and two friends took the girls' trip to New Orleans to cheer up one of the friends whose mother had just died. It was not clear if that friend, who he said has family in New Orleans, was one of the gunshot survivors, or if it was the third friend who accompanied them from the Houston area who was struck by gunfire.Police said the wounded survivors were all in their 30s, including two women, ages 33 and 37; and five men, ages 31, 33, and three who were 30 years old. By Tuesday afternoon,all of the wounded had been released from the hospital, according to the NOPD, but the department did not release details on the extent of their injuries.At a vigil Tuesday night organized by Jackson's family at the scene of the mass shooting, a security guard for Jazz Daiquiris pointed out that two of the wounded survivors were among the attendees. Toward Louisiana Avenue was a man on crutches. Across the strip mall parking lot was a man with a large wound on his cheek, where a bullet had ripped part of his face Saturday night, the security guard said.Police believe the shooting was likelygang-related, Harrison said. A law enforcement source said investigators believe Lee was possibly affiliated with 3NG, a Central City gang that operated out of Third and Galvez streets and has been the subject of racketeering indictments and convictions. Lee's brother Jahmil Hill, however, said his brother was not a violent gang member and worked in a downtown restaurant to support his family.Cedell Watkins said he hoped the shooters would be found and justice served."If you would just stop and think instead of just reacting all the time, think about the families that are hurting from it, maybe, just maybe...," said Cedell Watkins, trailing off. "The senseless killing that's going on in America right now, I am not the first dad and I know I won't be the last."Police to search cellphone found in Jeremiah Lee's handAmong the evidence police gathered from the 3400 block of South Claiborne in the aftermath of the shooting was a black iPhone in the left hand of Lee, as he lay dead on the ground, according to a search warrant.The warrant to search the cellphone was one of seven search warrants filed by three different homicide detectives in the South Claiborne mass shooting case between July 28 and Aug. 1, providing a glimpse into some of the evidence detectives have to investigate.A magistrate commissioner granted NOPD Homicide Detective Michael Poluikis an off-site search of the cellphone to include contact lists, call logs, read and unread text messages, read and unread emails, photos, voicemails, videos and "any other forms of electronic communication."In his application for the search warrant Poluikis noted detectives obtained video showing perpetrators "were specifically targeting this victim," who Superintendent Michael Harrison has said was Lee.Citing an internal email briefing sent to law enforcement, The New Orleans Advocatereported Lee was a suspectin a Dec. 22, 2016, shooting that left 25-year-oldKareem Dowelldead. NOPD has not arrested anyone in that fatal shooting, and police never publicly named a person of interest or suspect in the case. The internal briefing said "Lee has been running with 3NG affiliates since 2013 or prior," according to the newspaper. Lee's brother, Hill, said Lee may have known some gang members from his neighborhood in his past, particularly through his hobby of promoting music, but was not an active gang member.A warrant application seeking to search a burned silver 2008 BMW X3 detectives say was used as the getaway car states a spent shell casing from a rifle was found near the spot where the car waslater found burning. Detectives stated they confirmed the same BMW, which the shooters were seen arriving and fleeing in on surveillance video, was found burning at Cherry and Palmetto streets in Hollygrove. The SUV was found about two hours after NOPD responded to the mass shooting, according to the warrant application filed by NOPD Homicide Detective Arin Starzyk.A pair of "blue surgical gloves" and small pieces of blue plastic from the gloves were found about a half block away from where the burned SUV was found, the warrant says. It also states video of the shooting shows the shooters wearing blue gloves.Three vehicles detectives say were used to drive gunshot survivors to a hospital were also searched, according to search warrants. All three of the vehicles had Louisiana license plates, state the warrant applications, filed by NOPD Homicide Detective Ryan Aucoin. Police are also searching another vehicle, with Texas plates, that Aucoin wrote was found at the scene and possibly contained "an unknown bloody item linked to this investigation."EMS spokesman Lt. John Fourcade said ambulances transported three gunshot survivors to hospitals, and four other wounded people were taken by private vehicles.Detectives also obtained a warrant to obtain and search surveillance video from a business in the 3300 block of Claiborne. Investigators do not need a warrant to view video that's handed over to them voluntarily. NOPD Homicide Sgt. Robert Barrere, a supervisor in the unit, filed that application and was the supervisor who cosigned each of the other warrants in the case.In an interview on Monday with WWL radio, NOPD Superintendent Michael Harrisonsaid detectives have received some tips"that have identified who we believe are the perpetrators." The department has not commented publicly since then about the status of the investigation, other than to continue to plead for information from the public. A reward for information leading to an indictment has been raised to $25,000, up from the $5,000 Crimestoppers typically offers.'You try to be strong'After Cedell Watkins shopped on Thursday to pick out the clothes Taiesha Watkins would be buried in on Saturday (Aug. 4), he reflected on the daughter he lost.Taiesha Watkins was outgoing, always smiling, "just a fun person to be around," said her father. She was well liked at her job at a hospital, and he has heard from many people who knew her from her hobby of coaching Little League cheerleaders.As soon as the Watkins family learned of their daughter's death, Cedell Watkins said, family and friends have been filtering through their home nonstop. The company and the stories of admiration for his daughter that make him feel proud, he said, have helped take his mind off his new reality."Once it's nighttime and they've all gone home and you're in the house alone, then your mind goes back to the same thoughts," he added.A friend of Cedell Watkins asked him how he was doing Wednesday, he said. He realized how dizzying it's been after he told the friend he'd been "dealing with this for two weeks," only to later realize, "it had only been two or three days."His 5-year-old granddaughter, who Cedell Watkins called, "My 5-year-old Taiesha," for her resemblance to his daughter, will grow up without a mother. She has been staying with him and his wife. The girl's father, who remained close with Taiesha and coparented though they were no longer romantically involved, must face, along with the Watkins, the task of explaining where her mother is, Cedell Watkins said. His two sons, 25 and 17, must adjust to life without their big sister."You try to be strong for your other kids, your grandchildren, your wife, your parents, your wife's parents. You just try to be, you try to be strong," he said.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact NOPD's Homicide unit at 504-658-5300 or report a tip anonymously through Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?ByJeanette MarantosAug. 8, 2018Juan Antonio Lopez, a 23-year-old Latino, was fatally shot Saturday, July 28, in the 8800 block of South Vermont Ave. in the South Los Angeles community of Westmont, according to Los Angeles County coroner’s records.Lopez, a resident of Compton, had gone into a liquor store at 8801 S. Vermont Ave. and was walking out with an acquaintance at 8:14 p.m. when a dark-colored sedan pulled up in front of the store, said Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Lt. Joe Mendoza.Three men got out of the car and began shooting at Lopez and his acquaintance, a 21-year-old black male, Mendoza said.Both men and four Latino bystanders were struck by gunfire, Mendoza said.Lopez was pronounced dead at the scene at 8:51 p.m., according to coroner’s records. His acquaintance was taken to the hospital with injuries he is expected to survive, Mendoza said.Three of the four bystanders were also taken to the hospital.Juan Manuel Ayuso, a 51-year-old Latino, was pronounced dead at 8:46 p.m. at the hospital, according to coroner’s records. His cause of death was listed as a gunshot wound to the torso.Ayuso was a homeless man who had been staying in the Westmont area, said Sheriff's Sgt. Guillermo Morales.The fourth bystander had minor injuries and refused treatment, Mendoza said. The other two at the hospital are expected to survive their injuries.Investigators don’t have a description of the shooters except for their gender, Mendoza said. The assailants got back into the dark-colored sedan and were last seen driving south on South Vermont Avenue.Lopez was not involved in a gang, Morales said. Investigators don’t know if the shooters or Lopez's acquaintance have gang ties.Anyone with information is asked to call the sheriff’s Homicide Bureau at (323) 890-5500. Those wishing to remain anonymous should callCrime Stoppersat (800) 222-8477.Contactthe Homicide Report. Follow@latimeshomicideon Twitter.Do you have information to share about the life of 
                    Juan Antonio Lopez
                    ? The Homicide Report needs your help. Please fill out thisformor e-mail us athomicidereport@latimes.com.Before you post, here are some answers to frequently asked questions:Remember, all posts are approved by a Times staffer. Profanity and personal attacks will not be approved.If you enter anything in this field your comment will be treated as spam:My condolences to hes mother I’m a mother my self and I lost my son in 2018 gunshot wounds one thing I can say is never give up thay will be justice I had to be my own investigator to find out who killed my son and after 8 months later thay got two guys that killed my son it’s not going to bring him back but atleast I know thay will pay for what thay didI IAM the mother of 23 yr old Anthony Lopez these Detectives have not even came to see us after our tragedy date  I am so hurt for my loss  and now even more to find out they have nothing they don't haveNOTHING SO THERE FOR NOTHING WILL B DONE BY WHAT IAM READING I HAD TO when this place is surrounded with camerasLOOK THRU THIS ON MY OWN WITH PAIN IN MY💗because NO1 HAS CAME TO SEE ME AFTER !! I THANK YOU FOR REACHING OUT WITH UR COMMENTS  of these two peopleMY SON WAS A HAPPY KIDS ALWAYS WITH HIS BEAUTIFUL SILLY SMILE I LOVE U MY GOLDEN BOI MAMA LOVES U PAPPY REST IN PARADISE ❤️ WILL NEVER UNDER WHY U MADE THIS stopTHERE U COULD HAVE CAME HOME FOR UR WATER LIKE ALWAYS your mother who always have you in her 💗@Ariel they do have 2 people listed as deceased in this article, Juan Lopez and Juan Ayuso. RIP. I don't know them but I hate this happened to these men. May God comfort the families.There were two deaths in this incident but you only have this young man listed.. I live on this block and I have a child the same age please stop this killing I'm heartbroken and I don't even know these people..  RIPRobstown (KIII News) — 61-year-old Richard Starry, the man who Robstown police said shot and killed four relatives before turning the gun on himself Friday, had an extensive criminal past.MORE:Robstown shooting victims identified, grief counseling underwayHis most recent run-in with the law happened just last year.Starry had violent tendencies and a criminal record that dates back to 1986 according to law enforcement agencies, public records, and family members who did not want to be identified.He was arrested by federal agents for conspiracy to possess with intent to distribute more than 2,200 pounds of marijuana between Jan. 1, 1986, to Dec. 31, 1994. He was also charged with a second count of money laundering which was later dropped. However, Starry was sentenced to five years in federal prison for his crime.During his time in prison, sources told 3News that Starry became a member of a white supremacist group.Starry was released from federal prison after serving 48 months, but was arrested last year by Nueces County Sheriff's deputies for an outstanding warrant out of Bee County.Most recently, law enforcement agents were sent to the Starry property to look for weapons. It was believed Starry owned more than 200 firearms.As far as a motive for Friday's shooting, 3News was told that it was about an inheritance and a disputed will that had been the subject of several filings and hearings in Nueces County. The precise nature of the dispute is still unknown, however.Stay connected with 3News for the latest news, sports, and weather.Download the KIII-TV 3News app now.Have an idea for a story? Send news tips tonews@kiiitv.com, and visit us onFacebook,Twitter,andInstagram!Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.As family and friends gathered outside Stroger Hospital awaiting news of three children taken there following a shooting in Lawndale in which a 20-year-old man was also wounded, more ambulances rushed into the parking lot.One brought a man who had just been fatally shot in the Near West Side.About 11:30 p.m. Friday, officers found 42-year-old Raymond Figgers lying on the sidewalk in the first block of South Campbell Avenue, with gunshot wounds in his head and hand, police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said. Figgers, of the 600 block of North Homan Avenue, was taken to Stroger Hospital, where he was pronounced dead at 11:58 p.m., according to the office.He was among five people killed, with 13 others wounded, in shootings throughout Chicago on Friday through early Saturday.Three children and one man wereshot Friday night in Lawndale. From down the block, two people fired shots just after 8 p.m. into a group gathered in the 1100 block of South Troy Street, police said. Police said they have not yet determined whom the shooters were targeting, and no one was in custody. A 12-year-old boy shot in the head was in critical condition, a 10-year-old girl shot in the shoulder was in good condition and an 11-year-old boy shot in the ankle was in good condition at Stroger Hospital, police said. The 20-year-old man, shot in the hands and hip, had been stabilized at Mount Sinai Hospital. Police originally reported the 12-year-old was 14.Also in Lawndale, about 11:30 p.m., a 34-year-old woman was shot while sitting in her car parked in the 4000 block of West Grenshaw Street. Three males got out of a tan van that was in an empty lot nearby and started shooting, hitting the woman in the leg, police said. A group had been on the sidewalk nearby, and police said it’s not clear who the shooter was aiming for. The wounded woman was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital and was in good condition.About 20 minutes later on the northbound Dan Ryan Expressway, a man was found fatally shot in a vehicle near the ramp to the southbound Stevenson Expressway, according to Illinois State Police. No further information was released. A white Mercedes sedan appeared to have crashed against the concrete wall of the far right lane of the overpass, and several lanes of traffic approaching the ramp were closed early Saturday morning as police canvassed the area.In the most recent fatal shooting, just before 4:15 a.m. in the Montclare neighborhood, police responding to a call of a person down in the 7100 block of West Grand Avenue found 26-year-old Ted J. Smart on the sidewalk with gunshot wounds in his chest, police and the medical examiner’s office said. Smart, of the same block, was taken to Community First Medical Center and pronounced dead at 4:37 a.m., the office said.Minutes before midnight Friday, a 24-year-old man was killed in Back of the Yards. Someone walked toward him while he was standing outside in the 5300 block of South Marshfield Avenue and shot him in the back and chest, police said. He was taken to University of Chicago Medical Center, where he was pronounced dead. A man who lives north on the block said he heard six or more gunshots, which caused him to jump up. He saw police out of his window and went outside while the man was still lying on the sidewalk on the east side of the street, he said. Police said the shooter ran to a white sedan at the end of the block, which drove away.About 10:45 a.m. in the Roseland neighborhood, Brian P. Mosely, 25, was standing on the sidewalk in the 10400 block of South Wabash Avenue when he was approached by a gunman wearing a red T-shirt who opened fire, police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said.Mosley was shot multiple times in the abdomen, and was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn where he was pronounced dead at 11:42 a.m., said police. Mosely lived in the 100 block of West 104th Place, according to the medical examiner.In other shootings:CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneCLEVELAND, Ohio -- A 27-year-old Warrensville Heights man and a 20-year-old man filming a music video for Cleveland rapper Q Money are among the seven people shot early Thursday outside a bar in the city's Collinwood neighborhood, police reports say.All seven shooting victims are men between the ages of 19 and 27, according to police reports. At least two people fired shots during the massshooting that happenedabout 1:30 a.m. outside the DPG Dog Pound Bar on St. Clair Avenue and East 186th Street.Three are in critical condition, including the Warrensville Heights man, who was shot two different times during the melee, according to police reports. No arrests have been made in the case.The incident began when two women, including a 24-year-old Cleveland Heights woman, got into a fight outside the bar, police reports say.Surveillance videoreviewed by cleveland.com shows the Warrensville Heights man break up the fight and a group of men fighting a short time later.A man in a green shirt pulled out a gun and fired several rounds into the crowd, including bullets that hit the 27-year-old man. The gunfire knocked him to the ground as the 100 or so people standing outside the bar scattered.Several people tried to help the injured 27-year-old man when a different gunman walked up, stood over him and fired several gunshots into the man's chest.The 20-year-old man told police he was filming 22-year-old Q Money, whose real name is Qamar Williams, when he heard about 15 gunshots.The man said he bumped into a man carrying a gun amid the chaos as everyone tried to run away. The man with the camera said he told the gunman that he wasn't part of the incident and started running away, police reports say. The gunman opened fire on the man, hitting him once in the right forearm, according to police reports.The others who were shot ran to cars and were dropped off at area hospitals. A 23-year-old man suffered several gunshot wounds to his side and arm. Others were shot in the foot, bicep, stomach, arm, according to police reports.Investigators scoured the area and found two guns hidden behind a garage on East 186th Street, police reports say.Other gunshot victims raced to cars and were driven to area hospitals.Tauvarison Waller, who went to the bar to be in the background of Q Money's music video, said he got an uneasy feeling when the parking lot became more and more packed."Yeah, I just knew something was going to happen," Waller said. "I just wanted to go inside. It started to get too crowded. Then it was just a free for all. I tried to tell everyone let's go. Then the next thing I know I'm walking away hurt."Waller was shot in the arm. He remained at the hospital with his 26-year-old brother, who was shot in the stomach. Waller said his brother was recovering.Q Money, who was interviewed by police as part of the investigation, on his Instagram page announced Wednesday that he was shooting a music video in Cleveland.He posted several locations of where the video was filming, including one location at Mark Tromba Park on Mandalay Avenue and London Liquor Store on St. Clair Avenue and East 162nd Street.The group went to the bar to finish filming the video and dozens followed. Bar owner Vincent Haynes said most of the estimated 100 people stood outside the bar to watch Q Money and never went inside.To comment on this story, go to the cleveland.comcrime and courts comments section.Several people were shot outside the DPG Dog Pound bar in Cleveland.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesTrending:OAKLAND — A man and woman died from gunshot wounds and two other people were wounded after someone opened fire on their car as they drove in East Oakland Thursday night, police said Friday.The names of the 21-year-old woman and 19-year-old man who were killed were not released.Nor were the names of the woman and man, both 18, who were wounded.The shooting happened about 11 p.m. Thursday at the intersection of 73rd and Bancroft avenues, across the street from the Eastmont Town Center and police substation.Police said the four people were in a car driving northbound on 73rd possibly headed toward a restaurant.As they were driving someone from outside began shooting at them, hitting all four people.The car continued across the intersection and crashed.The four were taken to a hospital where the man and woman died early Friday.  The conditions of the other two victims were not available.Some other cars were hit by the gunfire but no one else was injured, police said.Police are trying to determine a motive for the shooting and have not made any arrests.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $30,000 in reward money for information leading to the arrest of the shooter.  Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3821 or 510-238-7950 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Check back for updates.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersDallas, TX — A drive-by shooter opened fire in the 3000 block of South Boulevard in South Dallas shortly after 11:00 p.m., Tuesday night.Ambulances took two of the victims, and the other four arrived at a hospital in personal vehicles.Two of the six victims are currently in surgery. One of the victims is a 14-year-old male, and he is in critical condition.One victim, according to police, was an elderly woman. She was in her own apartment when a bullet ripped through and hit her. We have not yet confirmed her condition.Police say they do not have a viable description of the suspect (or suspects); only that it may have been a passenger car.The Dallas Police Department is asking anyone that may have any information regarding this case to please contact Detective Contreras at (214) 671-3085.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Filed under:Five people were shot, including one teenager, Monday night in the Englewood neighborhood on the South Side.The group was standing on the sidewalk when someone came out of a gangway and fired shots at 11:09 p.m. in the 6400 block of South May, according to Chicago Police.A 16-year-old girl was among those wounded in the shooting. She was shot twice in the arm and twice in the leg, police said.She was taken to Stroger Hospital where she was in good condition.An 18-year-old man was shot in the right thigh and left foot and was in serious condition. He was taken to St. Bernard’s Hospital and was being transferred to Stroger Hospital, police said. Another man, 22, was shot in the back and was in critical condition at the same hospital.A 25-year-old man was taken to St. Bernard’s with a gunshot wound to the right hand, police said. His condition had been stabilized.A 26-year-old woman was shot in the side and in her arm and was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center where her condition stabilized, police said.Area South detectives were investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:A second man has died after he and six others were shot at a park Saturday night in the East Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side.About 9:40 p.m., the seven men were gathered at a park bench in the 3100 block of West Fultonwhen four people approached them and opened fire, Chicago Police said.Kevontay Montgomery, 22, was taken to Stroger Hospital, where he was pronounced dead at 8:28 p.m. on Sunday, according to the Cook County Medical Examiner’s Office. He lived in west suburban Maywood. An autopsy Tuesday found he died of a gunshot wound to the back and his death was ruled a homicide.Tavish Harris, 30, of Berwyn, was shot in the head. He was pronounced dead at Stroger at 11:33 p.m. Saturday, according to police and the medical examiner’s office. An autopsy Monday found Harris died of multiple gunshot wounds. His death was ruled a homicide.Five other men, ranging from 26 to 47 years old, were shot and taken by paramedics to hospitals in various conditions, police said.The 47-year-old was shot in his chest and leg, and was taken to Stroger in critical condition, police said. A 33-year-old struck multiples times in his back and a 31-year-old shot in his face  were both in serious condition at the same hospital.A 30-year-old man was taken to Stroger with a gunshot wound to his leg, police said. His condition had stabilized.The seventh victim, a 26-year-old man, was shot in his arm and leg, and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where his condition stabilized, according to police.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Cloudy skies early, followed by partial clearing. High 56F. Winds WNW at 15 to 25 mph.  Higher wind gusts possible..A clear sky. Low 27F. W winds at 10 to 20 mph, decreasing to less than 5 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 11:51 amSUNNYSIDE- Police are investigating after a man opened fire into the backyard of a home, killing one and wounding four others.On Friday at approximately 11:45 pm, Sunnyside Police Department responded to a report of shots fired in the area of the 500 block of S 15th Street within the City of Sunnyside.  Upon arrival, officers encountered numerous victims and witnesses at what was an apparent party.  The event had the appearance of a family gathering with blow-up water slide and remnants of a water balloon fight.  It was clearly evident that small children were present at the residence when the shooting occurred.Just prior to midnight, an unknown gunman armed with an assault rifle opened fire into the back yard of the residence wounding four and killing a 23 year old male from Sunnyside.  The four additional victims, sustained non-life threatening injuries and were treated and released from local hospitals.  Officers from Grandview Police Department, Yakima County Sheriff’s Office and Washington State Patrol provided assistance.At this time the Sunnyside Police Department is continuing to investigate the incident and anyone with information to this case or the recent shooting on Monday at the 600 block of N 4th Street is asked to contact the Sunnyside Police Department at 509-836-6200.Due to the escalation of violent events over the past couple weeks, the Sunnyside Police Department is adding extra patrols to increase officer presence in the community.Currently in KennewickSorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up to get breaking news, weather forecasts, and more in your email inbox.Sign Up NowGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Police are investigating a shooting that injured several people near the Elizabeth Department Headquarters overnight.According to a statement released by Elizabeth city spokesperson Kelly Martin, at approximately 12:07am, officers  responded to reports of shots fired in the area of Prince Street and Irvington Avenue.Spokesperson Martin said upon officers arrival, three male gunshot victims were found at Canadian Fried Chicken located at 323 Irvington Avenue.Martins said multiple gun blasts had officers locate a large number of shell casings on the sidewalk and in the street.A witness stated that  three black male assailants open fired then fled the area in a dark colored vehicle according to spokesperson Martin.EMS transported all the victims to University Hospital in Newark where they remain in stable condition.Spokesperson Martin said one additional walk-in patient who arrived at University Hospital was also determined to have been shot at the restaurant.All the victims were listed in stable condition with non-life threatening gunshot wounds according to spokesperson Martin.The motive for the shooting remains under investigation.MenuRIVIERA BEACH, Fla. - A second person has died from a shooting July 16 in Riviera Beach that injured several people.A police spokesperson said 21-year-old Jamal Forrest died early Thursday morning in the hospital where he was taken for treatment.Six people were standing in a yard when a man began shooting at the group. All six were hit.Norriesha L. Hills died at the scene, and the others were transported to the hospital for treatment, police said.Investigators suspect it was a targeted attack.Police originally said the shots rang out on West 28th Street but now say it happened in the 2100 block of West 23rd Street.Police are urging anyone with information to call (561) 845-4123 or Palm Beach County Crime Stoppers at (800) 458-TIPS.The crew from Wellington Park had been planning a drive-by shooting in rival Clay Terrace turf for weeks, police say, even buying a stolen car to use. On the afternoon of July 16, it was time to recruit some gunmen.“Let’s Go Do Wat We Do,” one leader texted a friend. There was a reminder to bring the “100 Roun” — a gun capable of holding 100 rounds of ammunition. And an admonition that one member “better not be scared.”At 6 p.m., a text announced it was time to “go put some work in.”Two hours later, four masked shooters leaped from a carjacked Infiniti and sprayed a crowded D.C. courtyard with gunfire. Five people were struck, including 10-year-old Makiyah Wilson. The bullet pierced her heart, killing her as she clutched a $5 bill her family gave her to buy a treat from an ice-cream truck.Mother holds 10-year-old as she dies after shooting at D.C. apartment complexAs an innocent child’s death has prompted outrage, city leaders, residents and Makiyah’s family have struggled to understand what could have sparked such a burst of indiscriminate violence. The first court documents in the case reveal no simple answers; rather, they describe long-standing feuds among D.C. neighborhoods, easy access to weapons and relationships among young men who often have been perpetrators or victims of violent crime.Two suspects arrested Saturday and Monday — Qujuan Thomas, 20, and Quentin “Q” Michals, 21 — made their initial appearance Monday at a chaotic hearing in D.C. Superior Court. Each is charged with first-degree murder.As the shackled defendants entered the courtroom, Makiyah’s father, wearing a T-shirt with a photo showing him hugging his daughter, stood up, prompting U.S. marshals to ask him to take a seat. The girl’s mother, Donnetta Wilson, yelled out: “She was only 10 years old! My baby was only 10!” Marshals quickly ushered her out of the courtroom.About 30 members of Makiyah’s family took seats on one side of the courtroom. One carried a large poster with photos of Makiyah. At one point, a man yelled “What are you smiling at?!” to Thomas as the defendant turned around and looked at the audience.A relative of Thomas yelled back: “He’s innocent! He didn’t have nothing to do with this! He’s allowed to smile!”Marshals ordered relatives of both defendants and of the victim to leave the courtroom.When the hearing resumed, attorneys for Thomas and Michals said the case was based on “speculation.” Michals’s attorney argued that the evidence showed only that her client may “have associated” with those involved in the shooting. Court documents say that Thomas “made statements indicating that he actually participated in the shooting” and allege that while Michals was not at the shooting scene, he helped plan the attack.The judge ordered both men detained until their next hearing, Sept. 11.Details of the July 16 killing of Makiyah were included in a 38-page arrest affidavit filed Monday. The documents describe the alleged planning of the shooting and the violent histories of the crews from Wellington Park and Clay Terrace. D.C. authorities mention three other killings in 2017 and 2018 that police say have links to Wellington Park, a neighborhood near Barry Farm in Southeast Washington. One victim, a man shot a week after Makiyah’s death, is identified as a person who helped get the vehicle used in her shooting.According to the court document, police still do not know precisely what started the latest argument. Michals had been wounded in a shooting in October, but it is not clear whether that was a primary instigation, even though people from Clay Terrace were believed to be involved.Police said that after Makiyah’s death, an unnamed informant told them that one of the men involved in the shooting said: “They didn’t even see her. They didn’t mean to shoot her.”The court document shows a detailed investigation that relied on DNA, text messages and intercepted jailhouse phone calls in which police said the shooting was discussed in coded language as a terrorist attack. Police relied on social media postings of suspects holding guns and evidence found in the abandoned Infiniti that included a rifle bullet, found in the railing along the front passenger seat, and two 9mm cartridge casings found under a wiper blade and on a rear floorboard.They all matched casings found at the shooting scene, the affidavit says.Authorities said that some of the guns used in the July 16 shooting had been used in other violent incidents, including shootings in Southeast dating to May 2017. In other incidents, men connected to the crews have been killed.In May 2017, a man named Carl Hardy told police that gunshots heard in Potomac Gardens “were for me,” and while he later denied saying it, he was shot and killed in that community in September. Police charged two men from Wellington Park in the killing — one of them Michals’s brother.In October, Michals and another man were shot when a car pulled up alongside them and someone opened fire, according to the document. No arrests have been made.The police affidavit shows that in recent weeks the Wellington Park crew planned a drive-by shooting. They needed a vehicle, police said, and they learned a man named Kevin Eugene Jones had one. Police said he had taken a black Infiniti at gunpoint from a Maryland woman several weeks earlier.Police charge man with carjacking vehicle used in shooting of 10-year-old girlThe affidavit says Jones was close with a Wellington Park crew member who had been fatally shot in December. Police said in the document that Jones brokered a deal through Monshae “Shay” Burroughs to sell the Infiniti to Wellington Park associates.Jones’s alleged cut was $125. He was arrested Aug. 8 and charged with armed carjacking after police said they found his DNA on a white headband left in the Infiniti after the shooting in Clay Terrace. Police said Burroughs was fatally shot July 23, eight days after Makiyah’s death. No arrests have been made in Burroughs’s killing.The morning after the girl was killed, police said, Michals searched various terms on Google looking for news coverage of the shooting, including “shooting in dc clay street.” He clicked on a WTOP story titled “10-year-old dead . . .  ,” the affidavit says.Within days, police said, they listened to phone conversations between Thomas and an inmate at the D.C. jail. The affidavit alleges the two talked about the Clay Terrace shooting using coded language. Police said that “terrorist attack” at the Pentagon was code for the July 16 shooting and that “they” found “the airplane,” referencing the recovered Infiniti.Clarence Williams and Dana Hedgpeth contributed to this report.The most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy PolicyThe most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy PolicyPHILADELPHIA (AP) — Two gunmen firing from opposite sides of a Philadelphia street unleashed a hail of bullets on four children, killing a 14-year-old boy, police said.Authorities said at a news conference Tuesday that the other three children were wounded, including an 11-year-old boy, and were in stable condition. A 24-year-old man who was walking a short distance away was also shot in the abdomen, but police said the teens were the intended targets.The victims were outside on a sidewalk at about midnight Monday when the shooting occurred in North Philadelphia. Capt. John Ryan said at least 21 shots were fired, all from the two gunmen who acted in concert. He said the victims, who all live within a block of the shooting site, did not return fire.Police did not release the name of the 14-year-old who was shot in the forehead and died from his injuries hours later."As far as a motive for this, we don't know yet. It's probably some kind of neighborhood dispute, as is often the case with kids this age," Ryan said.He said the victims are cooperating. Ryan said investigators are reviewing surveillance footage and a $20,000 reward has been offered for information leading to an arrest.Ryan said they don't have any suspects, and that the shooters were wearing dark clothing and hoodies."It's clearly an issue in the state of Pennsylvania, the city of Philadelphia ... with the availability of handguns when kids this young can be involved in something like this," Ryan said.He said there is a summer curfew in the city of Philadelphia, which the children were violating.Former Mayor Michael Nutter signed a curfew into place in 2015 requiring children under 13 to be inside by 9 p.m., minors 14 to 15 by 10 p.m., and minors 16 and older by 11 p.m. during the summer.PHILADELPHIA (AP) — Two gunmen firing from opposite sides of a Philadelphia street unleashed a hail of bullets on four children, killing a 14-year-old boy, police said.Authorities said at a news conference Tuesday that the other three children were wounded, including an 11-year-old boy, and were in stable condition. A 24-year-old man who was walking a short distance away was also shot in the abdomen, but police said the teens were the intended targets.The victims were outside on a sidewalk at about midnight Monday when the shooting occurred in North Philadelphia. Capt. John Ryan said at least 21 shots were fired, all from the two gunmen who acted in concert. He said the victims, who all live within a block of the shooting site, did not return fire.Police did not release the name of the 14-year-old who was shot in the forehead and died from his injuries hours later."As far as a motive for this, we don't know yet. It's probably some kind of neighborhood dispute, as is often the case with kids this age," Ryan said.He said the victims are cooperating. Ryan said investigators are reviewing surveillance footage and a $20,000 reward has been offered for information leading to an arrest.Ryan said they don't have any suspects, and that the shooters were wearing dark clothing and hoodies."It's clearly an issue in the state of Pennsylvania, the city of Philadelphia ... with the availability of handguns when kids this young can be involved in something like this," Ryan said.He said there is a summer curfew in the city of Philadelphia, which the children were violating.Former Mayor Michael Nutter signed a curfew into place in 2015 requiring children under 13 to be inside by 9 p.m., minors 14 to 15 by 10 p.m., and minors 16 and older by 11 p.m. during the summer.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.poconorecord.com  ~ 511 Lenox St., Stroudsburg, PA 18360~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Trending:Four people sustained non life-threatening injuries in a shooting near 50th Avenue and Grant Street at about 2:30 a.m. Sunday, according to Denver Police Department tweets.Shooting Update: Shooting was the result of an altercation at a party in the area. There were 4 victims total, none of whom suffered life-threatening injuries. There is no suspect information available at this time.— Denver Police Dept. (@DenverPolice)July 15, 2018The shooting was the result of a disagreement that broke out at a nearby party, police said. Multiple victims walked to the hospital to report the shooting.Suspect information is not currently available.Sign up for Newsletters and AlertsThis story was updated July. 15, 2018, at 3:05 p.m. with more information.Five people were injured in a shooting outside Coyote Jack's nightclub in downtown Chattanooga early Sunday morning.Kevin Parks, 32; Kandice Parks, 29; Keosha Strickland, 25; Te Shayla Yearby, 21; and Austin Burns, 22, were all taken to local hospitals, some by ambulance and some by personally owned vehicles.All victims suffered injuries that were not life-threatening, Chattanooga police Chief David Roddy said Sunday morning in a news conference. However, victims' conditions are being monitored closely as they receive treatment.Roddy did not have any suspect information at the time of the news conference.Chattanooga police responded to the club's parking lot in the 1400 block of Cowart Street at about 2:55 a.m. on reports of multiple people shot. Upon arrival, police found several victims and multiple shell casings throughout the lot.In a video posted to Facebook, several people were gathered in a parking lot when multiple shots rang out. People ducked down and another round of shots began. Screaming and yelling could be heard as club-goers tried to get out of the parking lot safely.A Coyote Jack's representative has not yet returned a request for comment.InDecember 2017, a shooting left 22-year-old Sharone Porter dead and his brother, 24-year-old Torrie Porter, injured. A suspect,Roddarius Martin, 24, was charged with criminal homicide, attempted first-degree murder, aggravated assault and felony reckless endangerment.Seven months earlier, the club was put on lockdown after a shooting took place outside in May, according to WRCB-TV Channel 3. Police said a man fired multiple shots into the air and possibly toward a crowd of people and one at the side of the building.In 2016, the club, which was formerly known as Bella Vita, was the site of two shootings—one of which was fatal.On March 13, 2016, Reuben Simpson, 35, wasshot in the headin the early morning on Cowart Street, near the restaurant. Police said his wounds were considered minor. Two months later, a security guard, 40, wasfatally shotin the upper chest at the location. Andrew Wilson, 31, was arrested in that case and charged with criminal homicide.Members of the violent crime bureau are actively investigating Sunday morning's incident. Police ask anyone with any information about the incident to call the tip line at 423-643-5100. Callers can remain anonymous.Contact staff writer Rosana Hughes at rhughes@timesfreepress.com or 423-757-6327 with tips or story ideas. Follow her on Twitter@HughesRosana.Copyright © 2021, Chattanooga Times Free Press, Inc.All rights reserved.This document may not be reprinted without the express written permission of Chattanooga Times Free Press, Inc.Material from the Associated Press is Copyright © 2021, Associated Press and may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. Associated Press text, photo, graphic, audio and/or video material shall not be published, broadcast, rewritten for broadcast or publication or redistributed directly or indirectly in any medium. Neither these AP materials nor any portion thereof may be stored in a computer except for personal and noncommercial use. The AP will not be held liable for any delays, inaccuracies, errors or omissions therefrom or in the transmission or delivery of all or any part thereof or for any damages arising from any of the foregoing. All rights reserved.(WUSA9) — Prince George's County Police said four people were injured in a shooting on Saturday night in Fort Washington.The shooting happened in the 9500 block of Fort Foote Road around 8:30 p.m.It's unknown the sex or age of the victims.Prince George's County Police said all victims suffered non life-threatening injuries.No arrests made at this time.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.MenuRICHMOND, Va. -- News spread quickly about a Friday morningfatal shootingin one of Richmond's most up-and-coming neighborhoods."Early in the morning I got messages about the shooting on the resident's Facebook page," Norfolk Street resident Bryan Diston said. "I was shocked because that never happens in Scott’s Addition."One person was killed and three people were hurt in a shooting outside of a nightclub in the Scott's Addition neighborhood, according to police.Officers responded to Club Infuzion, along the 1400 block of Roseneath Road, just after 2 a.m. Friday.Neighbors recounted hearing a series of eight shots followed by about eight more.Police quickly swarmed the corner of Roseneath Road and West Leigh Street as onlookers started fighting each other, according to scene video.One man was pronounced dead on scene and was seen laying in the parking lot of Club Infuzion.Two other men drove themselves to the hospital with non-life threatening gunshot wounds, according to investigators. Another shooting victim was found inside of a car parked nearby."This is usually a more quiet and fun place - that type of violence is pretty shocking to hear," Diston explained.The Scott's Addition association's website described the area as the city's "fastest growing neighborhood, home of an eclectic mix of apartments, homes, restaurants, breweries, shops and more tucked away in the northwest corner of West Broad Street and North Boulevard."In the past five years, the resident population of the area has grown from 700 people to more than 3,000. Projections show an additional 1,500 residents will move-in over the next five years.Hours after detectives had wrapped up the crime tape along Roseneath Road families and friends converged on the neighborhood's popular breweries and restaurants nearby."I've always felt safe here. We come down here always on the weekends and my friends bring their kids here," said Richmonder Kim Collins.Some residents questioned the future of Club Infuzion, which shares space with InfuzionRVA, a restaurant, bar, and lounge, according to its website.A Richmond BizSense article from November 2017said that Infuzion’s lease in the building is good through July 1, 2019 and the club will relocate at the end of the lease.A group led by Chesterfield-based Blackwood Development recently acquired and is planning to redevelop the building into a restaurant, brewery or office tenant.Residents and business owners said throughout the day Friday an Alcohol Beverage Control agent walked door to door asking if they could tie any crime to the club.That agent said by phone that he couldn't comment on the "ongoing investigation."CBS 6 found a flyer shared through social media advertising several performers who were scheduled to entertain at Club Infuzion on Thursday night.A man who answered the phone number listed on the flyer promptly hung up after we identified ourselves as media.Multiple sources confirmed to CBS 6 that club management canceled off-duty Richmond Police officers who were supposed to work as security Thursday night because a performer canceled.As of Friday night, calls and messages to club organizers and management were not returned.However, at least one Scott's Addition resident felt that the club should stay in his neighborhood."I think it’s a cool addition to Scott’s Addition," Diston stated. "We are a real inclusive community so I think it definitely should stay."Richmond Police had not released a suspect description nor announced any arrests.The identities of the deceased and victims have not been released.If you have information that could help detectives, call Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000 or submit a tip online athttp://www.7801000.com. The P3 Tips Crime Stoppers app for smart phones may also be used. All three Crime Stoppers methods of contact are anonymous.This is a developing story. Witnesses cansend news tips, photos, and video here.Five people were injured in a shooting near a Raleigh community center Thursday night, according to Memphis Police.Two people were in critical condition Friday morning. The other three were stable, police said on Twitter.The shooting happened at 3678 Powers Road, according to police, which is the address for the Raleigh Community Center. Several of the victims arrived at Methodist North Hospital in private vehicles, police spokesman Officer Louis C. Brownlee said.He said the victims were male but had no other details, including their names and ages and what time the shooting happened.Police have a suspect, according to a tweet from the department Friday morning. MPD originally said four people were shot but increased the total to five."It is believed that the shooting stemmed from a fight at a nearby dice game," MPD said on social media.Gunshot victims with serious injuries are typically transferred to the Regional Medical Center, which operates the only Level 1 trauma center in this area.Reach Jennifer Pignolet at jennifer.pignolet@commercialappeal.com or on Twitter @JenPignolet.Reach Daniel Connolly at 529-5296, daniel.connolly@commercialappeal.com, or on Twitter at @danielconnolly.CW39 HoustonHOUSTON — A total of four people were injured during a drive-by shooting Wednesday afternoon outside a Timmy Chan’s restaurant in southwest Houston, according to local police.The victims were pulling into the restaurant’s parking lot in the 9500 block of Bissonnet Street about 5:40 p.m. when a tan Chevrolet Tahoe pulled up next to their vehicle. Investigators said passengers inside the SUV started firing at the victims’ car. The Tahoe then circle back and the suspects fired at the victim’s car, again.One of the victims then drove the group to Memorial Hermann Southwest Hospital. Police said all four victims were in stable condition.Among the injured were Nicholas Davis, 19, Crystal Sistrunk, 18, Winston Fleming, 23, and Alexis Walton, 20.Anyone with information in this case is asked to call the HPD Major Assaults & Family Violence Division at 713-308-1100 or Crime Stoppers at 713-222-TIPS.SubmitHOUSTON (CW39) A FlashMob is happening today in Downtown Houston by an organization called Black Menswear. The organization works to improve the perception of black men and encourages positivity within the black community.Black Menswear focuses on three community-building pillars: FlashMob photoshoots, culture content creation, and social media influence.HOUSTON (CW39) As part of its ongoing commitment to help connect low-income families to the internet so they can fully participate in educational opportunities and the digital economy, Comcast today announced plans to equip Harris County community centers with WiFi enabled "Lift Zones" to provide students who do not have Internet at home with safe spaces to participate in distance learning.In partnership with Harris County, Comcast is providing WiFi hotspots to help students get online, participate in distance learning and do their homework. This initiative provides free connectivity inside partner community centers for the next three years.HOUSTON (CW39) -- You know what day is it, it's Food Truck Friday!Shannon Lanier shares how one food truck is truly the boss when it comes to signature sauces!Bullets hit mobile home and vehicle and injured four people, including a teenager.Two weeks after a barrage of bullets struck a mobile home and a vehicle in Reddick — and injured four people, including a 13-year-old boy — more details have been released.The teen and Amber Hayes, 26 were in the mobile home in the 16300 block of Northwest Gainesville Road. The other two victims, Sonny J. Riggsby, 29, of Citra and David D. Duzen, 63, of Micanopy, were in separate vehicles parked at the residence.The Sheriff’s Office was called at 12:21 a.m. on July 11.When deputies arrived, they found several people inside the mobile home. Hayes was shot in the buttocks. The teenage boy’s right arm near his bicep was grazed, officials said. Both were transported to Munroe Regional Medical Center with none life-threatening injuries.Shlakiesha Jackson, 30 who lives at the mobile home, told deputies that a red sport utility vehicle with a cracked windshield drove by. She later told Detective Damon Baxley that it appeared someone was firing at the SUV.Another resident, Deonte D. Jackson, 26 — also known as “Yella” — also was inside the mobile home, according to sheriff’s detectives. He told a deputy that his family does not have any problems with anyone in the area. Jackson said, prior to the shooting, another man he referred to as “uncle” was in the backyard. After the shooting, Jackson said he did not know where “uncle” was and was not willing to contact him.During the gunfire, Jackson told Detective Craig Evans, “uncle” told him somebody was shooting in the backyard. He said he got his gun and heard more gunshots. He said he heard his girlfriend yelling that she was shot and called 911.The boy, whose identity was not released, told a deputy he was in the home playing video games when he heard several popping sounds. Then he heard someone in the home yelling to get down. The child then he realized he was shot.Hayes said she and Jackson, her boyfriend, were lying in bed when they heard popping sounds she thought were firecrackers or a vehicle backfiring. She said she heard a second round of popping sounds and Jackson reached for a firearm. Jackson told Detective Evans he never fired a shot.Hayes said she heard a third set of popping sounds as she walked to the living room, where she got on the ground and protected the teen. While on the ground, Hayes said, she reached around and felt blood on her hand.As deputies and detectives were investigating the shooting, they were called to Marion County Fire Rescue Station No. 9 at 18945 N. U.S. 441.MCFR Lt. Ray Coloson said occupants of a red Hyundai Santa Fe — later identified as Riggsby and his girlfriend, Kendall Ray — drove to the fire station asking for help. Coloson said Riggsby showed fire officials a gunshot wound under his left arm. Ray was not injured.Riggsby and Ray told Coloson they were jumped by a group of hooded individuals who fired shots at their vehicle.Firefighters treated Riggsby, and he was transported to the University of Florida Shands Hospital in Gainesville.A dark compact truck then pulled up at the fire station. Coloson said he closed the door, and the truck drove away.The Hyundai, whose driver’s side window was shattered, was towed to the Sheriff’s Office for processing.At Shands, Riggsby told Detective David Rasnick that he and Ray were sitting in his vehicle at the mobile home when a vehicle pulled in the driveway. A short time later, he said, he saw three masked men approaching the vehicle behind him. He said he honked his horn at the other vehicle to warn the occupants about the strangers.Riggsby said he heard three shots. He said he was shot while driving away.Ray told Detective Rasnick that she and her boyfriend had been living in their vehicle and were staying in the mobile home's backyard. While leaving, she reported, her boyfriend tried to run over the gunmen.Rasnick also interviewed Duzen, the occupant of the second vehicle — a blue Chevy Tahoe — and the man’s wife, Debra. Duzen said he and his wife gave a ride to a man, known as “Jeff,” to the mobile home. Detectives were told that “Jeff” is also known as “J Baby.”At the home, “Jeff” got out of the vehicle, knocked on the door and sat in the vehicle. Duzen said a few minutes later, they were approached by several people wearing masks and carrying firearms. One of the individuals ordered them to get out of the vehicle, which they refused. Duzen said as he and his wife drove off, the gunmen fired shots and he heard a horn blowing.Duzen said on the way to the fire station they dropped off “Jeff.” When they arrived at the fire station, they saw the other vehicle that was at the residence and did not know if they were connected to the shooting. He said they drove away. Duzen was shot in the left elbow, detectives said.Debra Duzen reported that when the masked men approached the vehicle, one of them asked for “Yella” and she said she did not know anyone by that name.Officials said the mobile home was struck four times in the front.Anyone with any information about this shooting can call the MCSO at 732-9111 or Crime Stoppers at 368-7867 or visit www.ocalacrimestoppers.com.Contact Austin L. Miller at 867-4118, austin.miller@starbanner.com or @almillerosb.Two weeks after a barrage of bullets struck a mobile home and a vehicle in Reddick — and injured four people, including a 13-year-old boy — more details have been released.The teen and Amber Hayes, 26 were in the mobile home in the 16300 block of Northwest Gainesville Road. The other two victims, Sonny J. Riggsby, 29, of Citra and David D. Duzen, 63, of Micanopy, were in separate vehicles parked at the residence.The Sheriff’s Office was called at 12:21 a.m. on July 11.When deputies arrived, they found several people inside the mobile home. Hayes was shot in the buttocks. The teenage boy’s right arm near his bicep was grazed, officials said. Both were transported to Munroe Regional Medical Center with none life-threatening injuries.Shlakiesha Jackson, 30 who lives at the mobile home, told deputies that a red sport utility vehicle with a cracked windshield drove by. She later told Detective Damon Baxley that it appeared someone was firing at the SUV.Another resident, Deonte D. Jackson, 26 — also known as “Yella” — also was inside the mobile home, according to sheriff’s detectives. He told a deputy that his family does not have any problems with anyone in the area. Jackson said, prior to the shooting, another man he referred to as “uncle” was in the backyard. After the shooting, Jackson said he did not know where “uncle” was and was not willing to contact him.During the gunfire, Jackson told Detective Craig Evans, “uncle” told him somebody was shooting in the backyard. He said he got his gun and heard more gunshots. He said he heard his girlfriend yelling that she was shot and called 911.The boy, whose identity was not released, told a deputy he was in the home playing video games when he heard several popping sounds. Then he heard someone in the home yelling to get down. The child then he realized he was shot.Hayes said she and Jackson, her boyfriend, were lying in bed when they heard popping sounds she thought were firecrackers or a vehicle backfiring. She said she heard a second round of popping sounds and Jackson reached for a firearm. Jackson told Detective Evans he never fired a shot.Hayes said she heard a third set of popping sounds as she walked to the living room, where she got on the ground and protected the teen. While on the ground, Hayes said, she reached around and felt blood on her hand.As deputies and detectives were investigating the shooting, they were called to Marion County Fire Rescue Station No. 9 at 18945 N. U.S. 441.MCFR Lt. Ray Coloson said occupants of a red Hyundai Santa Fe — later identified as Riggsby and his girlfriend, Kendall Ray — drove to the fire station asking for help. Coloson said Riggsby showed fire officials a gunshot wound under his left arm. Ray was not injured.Riggsby and Ray told Coloson they were jumped by a group of hooded individuals who fired shots at their vehicle.Firefighters treated Riggsby, and he was transported to the University of Florida Shands Hospital in Gainesville.A dark compact truck then pulled up at the fire station. Coloson said he closed the door, and the truck drove away.The Hyundai, whose driver’s side window was shattered, was towed to the Sheriff’s Office for processing.At Shands, Riggsby told Detective David Rasnick that he and Ray were sitting in his vehicle at the mobile home when a vehicle pulled in the driveway. A short time later, he said, he saw three masked men approaching the vehicle behind him. He said he honked his horn at the other vehicle to warn the occupants about the strangers.Riggsby said he heard three shots. He said he was shot while driving away.Ray told Detective Rasnick that she and her boyfriend had been living in their vehicle and were staying in the mobile home's backyard. While leaving, she reported, her boyfriend tried to run over the gunmen.Rasnick also interviewed Duzen, the occupant of the second vehicle — a blue Chevy Tahoe — and the man’s wife, Debra. Duzen said he and his wife gave a ride to a man, known as “Jeff,” to the mobile home. Detectives were told that “Jeff” is also known as “J Baby.”At the home, “Jeff” got out of the vehicle, knocked on the door and sat in the vehicle. Duzen said a few minutes later, they were approached by several people wearing masks and carrying firearms. One of the individuals ordered them to get out of the vehicle, which they refused. Duzen said as he and his wife drove off, the gunmen fired shots and he heard a horn blowing.Duzen said on the way to the fire station they dropped off “Jeff.” When they arrived at the fire station, they saw the other vehicle that was at the residence and did not know if they were connected to the shooting. He said they drove away. Duzen was shot in the left elbow, detectives said.Debra Duzen reported that when the masked men approached the vehicle, one of them asked for “Yella” and she said she did not know anyone by that name.Officials said the mobile home was struck four times in the front.Anyone with any information about this shooting can call the MCSO at 732-9111 or Crime Stoppers at 368-7867 or visit www.ocalacrimestoppers.com.Contact Austin L. Miller at 867-4118, austin.miller@starbanner.com or @almillerosb.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Ocala.com  ~ 2121 SW 19th Avenue Rd., Ocala, FL 34471~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Adrienne Cutway, Web EditorAdrienne Cutway, Web EditorORANGE COUNTY, Fla.– A second man has been arrested in connection with ashooting at an Orlando-area sports barthat left one man dead and four others injured, according to the Orange County Sheriff's Office.The shooting happened at about 1:30 a.m. on July 9 at Happy Place Sports Bar on Southland Boulevard. Deputies said they found Edgar Rivera and a security guard suffering from gunshot wounds.Rivera died at the scene.Three other men showed up at Orlando Regional Medical Center suffering from gunshot wounds, a news release said.Bryan O'Neill Diodonet Cortes, 20, was arrested July 20 on charges of second-degree murder and attempted second-degree murder. On Thursday, Ramon Louis Gonzalez Marquez, 34, was arrested on the same charges.Deputies said witnesses reported an altercation in the parking lot prior to the shooting.Copyright 2018 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Adrienne joined News 6's digital team in October 2016 to cover breaking news, crime and community interest stories. She graduated from the University of Central Florida and began her journalism career at the Orlando Sentinel.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.Learn more about the Coronavirus (Covid-19)More InfoDSP MenuSuperintendent Colonel Melissa ZebleyWilmington – The Delaware State Police are releasing the names of individuals that were found deceased in their residence last night.The individuals have been identified as 42-year-old Matthew Edwards and his wife 41 year-old Julie Edwards, the children included; a 6 year-old boy, 4 year-old girl and 3 year-old boy. The victims were located inside the home deceased, all from an apparent gunshot wound. Matthew Edwards sustained a self-inflicted gunshot wound.The individuals have been turned over to the Delaware Division of Forensic Science where autopsies were performed and have ruled the deaths to be murder/suicide by gunshot.Troopers Conducting Death Investigation-Wilmington*Update*Troopers Conducting Death Investigation-WilmingtonIf you or someone you know is a victim or witness of crime or have lost a loved one to a sudden death and are in need of assistance, the Delaware State Police Victim Services Unit/Delaware Victim Center is available to offer you support and resources 24 hours a day through a toll free hotline 1800 VICTIM-1. (1800 842-8461).  You may also email the unit Director atdebra.reed@delaware.gov.You can follow the Delaware State Police by clicking on:Delaware State Police Official Web SiteFacebookTwitterNextdoorPlease tell us how we’re doing via ourCitizen Satisfaction Survey.Presented by the Director of Public Information, Sergeant Richard BratzReleased: 071018 1501-End-Delaware's GovernorState AgenciesElected OfficialsGeneral AssemblyDelaware CourtsState EmployeesCities & TownsDelaware State CodeState RegulationsBusiness First StepsPhone DirectoryLocations DirectoryPublic MeetingsVoting & ElectionsTransparencyDelaware MarketplaceTax CenterPersonal Income TaxPrivacy PolicyWeather & TravelContact UsCorporationsFranchise TaxGross Receipts TaxWithholding TaxDelaware TopicsHelp CenterMobile AppsE-mail / Text AlertsSocial MediaBuilt by theGovernment Information Center©MMXXIDelaware.govApril 10, 2021Christy Johnson, 39, has been named managing editor of the Greenville Advocate, the Luverne Journal and Lowndes Signal, all of which are owned by Boone ...Read moreAfter an announcement by Governor Ivey on March 18, the Alabama National Guard began preparation work for the twenty-four mobile vaccination clinics that would appear ...Read moreThe Alabama Senate recently passed a historic $7.67 billion education trust fund budget for the 2022 fiscal year, the largest education budget in state history. ...Read moreThe Easter bunnies visited White Hall Volunteer Fire Department Saturday morning. Kids of all ages enjoyed an egg hunt, prizes and refreshments. Special thank you ...Read moreAccording to a new survey commissioned by AlabamaWorks, the three top barriers for Alabamians seeking to enter the workforce are transportation, childcare, and concerns over ...Read moreAlabama Governor Kay Ivey has issued a state of emergency for 46 counties ahead of the anticipated severe weather. The state of emergency went into ...Read moreCongresswoman Terri Sewell announced this morning that she would not be running for the U.S. Senate seat being vacated by Senator Richard Shelby in 2022. ...Read moreThree Lowndes County students recently placed first in the fourth annual EXERT youth competition. EXERT stands for Extension, Education and Research Track. Due to COVID-19, ...Read moreThe town of Fort Deposit is working to gather donations for its first Community Easter Egg Hunt. The event will be held at Fort Deposit ...Read moreThe Elmore Bolling Initiative Inc. (TEBI) is proudly working with the Lowndes County Public Schools to bring a new program to three elementary schools. Known ...Read moreMEMPHIS, TN (WMC) - Four people were injured in a shooting Sunday night, Memphis Police Department confirmed.The shooting happened around 7 p.m. near the area of Mt. Moriah and South Mendenhall roads, close to American Way.Police said the victims are in non-critical condition.The suspect was last seen in a gray or blue Infiniti driving southbound on Perkins Road.If you know anything about this case, call Crime Stoppers at (901) 528-CASH.Copyright 2018 WMC Action News 5. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Charlene "Charley" Orsi was shot and killed on Saturday, July 7, 2018, during an apparent murder-suicide in Wetumpka, Ala. Orsi was a third-grade teacher at Redland Elementary School. (photo from the Redland Elementary School website).Two of the three 12-year-old triplets shot by their father during a tragic murder-suicide Saturday in Wetumpka are expected to make a full physical recovery, Elmore County Sheriff Bill Franklin said."They underwent surgery last night and everything seems to be OK and they came through alright," Franklin said Sunday. "From my understanding, the doctor said that it was promising for both of them. That's good news."Franklin added, "You can imagine, though, the mental trauma involved. I mean, that's their dad."The girls were shot around 5 p.m. Saturday by their father -- identified as 51-year-old Robert Orsi -- inside the family's house on Granite Way in the Stonegate subdivision in Wetumpka. The subdivision is located just north of Montgomery.According to Franklin, Orsi shot and killed his wife, Charlene Ann Orsi, and one of their four children.The Wetumpka Herald reportedthat that the girl who was killed was one of the couple's 12-year-old triplets.Robert Orsi then set the house on fire before shooting and killing himself.The tragedy occurred nine days after Charlene Orsi, 44, filed for divorce.An investigation is ongoing, and Franklin said authorities are looking into allegations that Robert Orsi was using illegal drugs."What we were being told is the catalyst of (the divorce filing) was illegal drug use from the father," said Franklin.The sheriff said he is waiting to release the minor victim's name until after an examination from the Alabama Department of Forensic Sciences."They will be looking at the three individuals and obviously they can tell us the matter of death," said Franklin. "We seem to believe that it will probably show the father died from a self-inflicted gunshot wound. We cannot rule out the heat exposure of the father."The two injured girls, who were able to escape the house after being shot, were transported to Baptist Medical Center South in Montgomery, where they remained on Sunday.It's unclear where the girls were shot, but Franklin said at least one of the girls suffered multiple gunshot wounds."By the grace of God, these other two children were able to escape the house while he was spewing a flammable liquid which we believe was gasoline throughout the house," said Franklin. "They were able to get up and scamper out of the house."Franklin said Sunday afternoon that one of the two girls will likely need to return to the hospital for another procedure.The couple's 13-year-old daughter was uninjured. She was able to escape to a neighbor's house.Franklin said an investigation is ongoing. He said he contacted Elmore County Public Schools Superintendent Richard Dennis late Saturday, where Charlene Ann Orsi was employed. She had been a third-grade teacher at Redland Elementary School since August 2016.This is so heartbreaking. Mrs. Orsi was was my daughter’s teacher last year. Such a sweet lady! You never know what others may be going through. Praying for her sweet baby’s during this devastating time."We talked at length last night," said Franklin, regarding his conversation with the superintendent. He said that counselors will be available, though details will be made by the school district.Elmore & Autagua News editor Sarah Stephens,in a post Sunday, reported that Redland Elementary will offer counseling at 9 a.m. until noon Monday and Tuesday at the school. The counseling is for students and adults, or "anyone who needs to talk to someone about his horrific event."Stephens, who said she was friends with the Orsi family, reported that a fund has been established at Redland Elementary School for people who want to donate to the girls for "their immediate and future needs." Checks can be made out to RES Orsi Fund, 495 Scholars Drive, Wetumpka, AL 36093.A GoFundMe accounthas been establish in honor of the Orsi family. Close to $9,000 was raised on Sunday.Charlene Orsi, known as "Charley" according to her school biography, filed for divorce on June 28 citing an incompatibility of temperament. She was seeking full custody of the couple's four children.Orsi is a Saratoga Springs, New York, native. Her school biography shows that she served in the Air Force for four years, starting in 1992. She was a full-time mom, who volunteered working in school districts after her husband was transferred to Hurlburt Field in Okaloosa County, Florida.She became a certified teacher in 2014. According to her biography, "I fell in love with being a part of children's education.""She was very well-liked," said Franklin. "I've only known good things about her."Robert Orsi was a retired U.S. Air Force veteran, according to Franklin. He said the U.S. Department of Defense was contacted Saturday, and they were undergoing a background check into him."We don't have any record where we've had prior dealings with them in the past," said Franklin. "If they had problems, they must've kept that to themselves."Sarah Stephens said the two parents were "very active in their children's lives," often publishing photos of their adventures on social media. She, too, said that family friends were unaware of "issues behind the scenes."Franklin said his deputies were struggling to make sense of the tragedy in the smaller-sized, but growing city of around 8,200 residents."Who would've thought a retired military fellow would try to kill his triples and kill his wife, and then take his own life?" said Franklin.About half of our youth group lives in Wetumpka. At least one of our teens is friends with one of the teens in this family. Please pray for this family!https://t.co/oWsYYTlxy0The sheriff also credited his own department for its handling of the tragedy. He said the first deputy who arrived to the house, which was engulfed in flames, approached two of the children as they ran outside to "ascertain what was going on."Said Franklin: "He runs into the house, between the smoke and the fire, and cannot find the active shooter. He was then able to find him. There is a whole lot going on in a 60-second period. There was a lot going on in his mind."Another deputy, who was en route to the house, crashed and "totaled his vehicle" before arriving to the scene."He was trapped for awhile," Franklin said. "The ironic thing about that is we all flew by him because he had paramedics attending to him. He understood our plight and knowing that we had to go and help (the family)."This story was updated at 4:06 p.m. on Sunday, July 8, 2018, to include additional details about Saturday's incident and various funds set up in honor of the Orsi family.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesWATCHVIDEOS4 people injured in shooting in Bedford-StuyvesantALBANY — Four victims in a shooting on Lexington Avenue in Albany are being “highly uncooperative” as police investigate the early Thursday morning incident, Albany Police said.Officers responded at about 1:15 a.m. Thursday to First Street and Lexington Avenue for a reported shooting, where they found four people injured.Police said one victim had been shot in the arm, another in the ear, and two others were shot in the leg. All four were treated at the scene and taken to Albany Medical Center Hospital with non-life-threatening injuries, officials said.Anyone with information regarding the shooting should contact detectives at 518-462-8039. Anonymous tips can be submitted toCapital Region Crime Stoppers, or through the free P3 Tips app.Tips leading to an arrest may be eligible for a cash reward of up to $1,500.Amanda Fries covers the Capitol in Albany and state government for the Times Union, focusing on the state workforce, housing, budget issues, malfeasance and other forms of corruption. She first started in June 2016 covering the city and county of Albany for the Times Union. Got a tip? Contact her at518-454-5353orafries@timesunion.com.WATCHVIDEOS3 dead, 3 injured in Westlake house party shootingPolice now say 6 people were shot overnight in the Westlake District. 3 are dead, 3 more are in critical condition. Investigators are looking for multiple suspects. Details at@ABC7pic.twitter.com/EjgSeT32EQMenuVIRGINIA BEACH, Va. - The Virginia Beach Police Department arrested a suspect on Tuesday in connection with a shooting thatleft six people injured at the Oceanfrontduring the Fourth of July holiday.Ladarius Malik Trisvan21-year-old Ladarius Malik Trisvan of Emporia, Virginia, has been charged with six counts of malicious wounding and six counts of use of a firearm in the commission of a felony.Around 12:30 a.m. on Thursday, July 5, officers responded to the area of 19th Street and Atlantic Avenue in reference to a shooting. They were within a block of the shooting scene when the incident happened.Officers arrived at the scene to find two women and four men suffering from non-life threatening injuries. An investigation revealed that the victims were walking within the flow of pedestrian traffic on the west side of Atlantic Avenue when they heard gunshots and were hit. With the exception of a married couple, none of the victims knew each other, and they were all from out of town.Authorities initially said while "none of the victims reported any problems or disputes" that could have led to the shooting, in a statement the next day police said a city camera "picked up a possible dispute in the crowd in the 1800 block just before the shooting."Two people were also hurt after a shooting in the 1300 block of Atlantic Avenueon July 4 around 2 a.m. These incidents prompted city officials to address the ongoing problems of violence in the city.“Gun violence is a growing problem in America. The fact that we are the safest large city in the country is of little comfort to those who were injured by irresponsible and reckless individuals who apparently have such little regard for the lives of others,” said Virginia Beach Police Chief Jim Cervera.“The City takes extra measures, especially on holidays and other large event weekends, to provide a safe and family friendly environment," he said. "We always increase staffing for these holiday weekends and will continue to do that. We may consider additional steps to help manage crowds once the festivities are over, like close parking lots sooner to encourage earlier departures for day visitors."Trisvan is being held at the Virginia Beach City Jail without bond.Related:Virginia Beach City leaders react to violence at OceanfrontSix people shot at Virginia Beach OceanfrontMan arrested for Oceanfront double shootingTwo people shot at Virginia Beach OceanfrontReport a typoBy J Swygart - jswygart@limanews.comLIMA — One person was killed and five others suffered what police described as non life-threatening injuries as the result of a shooting early Thursday morning at the United Auto Workers hall in Lima.The deceased individual was identified by police as Carrington Lott, 23, of Lima.According to Jason Garlock, spokesman for the Lima Police Department, the UAW hall had been rented for a private Fourth of July party. Police were dispatched to the hall, located at 1440 Bellefontaine Ave., at about 3:45 a.m. Thursday in response to a report of multiple shots being fired.Upon their arrival, officers found multiple victims suffering from gunshot wounds. The victims — three males and three females — were all transported to Lima hospitals for treatment of their injuries, Garlock said. Lott was pronounced dead after arriving at the hospital, the result of gunshot wounds.Garlock said Thursday afternoon that a handgun believed to have been the weapon used in the shootings was recovered at the scene.The names of the other victims are not being released until the families of the victims can be notified, police said Thursday afternoon.Persons with additional information regarding the shooting are asked to contact the Lima Police Department at 419-221-5264, Detective Sean Neidemire at 419-221-5295 or Lima CrimeStoppers 419-229-STOP.By J Swygartjswygart@limanews.comPost navigationView Print Ads419-223-1010419-229-29263515 Elida Road,Lima OH, 45807We appreciate you sharing our content on social media.Please consider following us by clicking below.Send this to a friendCLAYTON COUNTY, Ga. — Police are investigating a deadly shooting at a bar in Clayton County early Wednesday morning.Officers said one man was killed and several others were injured when shots broke out at the Ice Bar Lounge and Restaurant around 1:40 a.m.According to police, people began arguing inside the bar and soon the fight became physical. The fight spilled out into the parking lot, where a shootout began.Bullets flew through the parking lot, shattering the glass at a nearby barbershop in the River Station Plaza on West Fayetteville.Police said 25-year-old Curtis Lamar Wright died at the scene. Several others transported themselves to area hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries."There's never, never, never a reason for it to result in something like this," the bar owner's friend Satchel Jester said. "They need to get their life together. Gunfighting? They need to put them away."Jester says the owner of the bar is making plans for a peace rally that will happen soon. A Fourth of July party planned for Wednesday night at the bar was canceled.TRENDING STORIES:The deejay who was planning the event spoke to Channel 2's Tom Jones."We were expecting a big turnout tonight," the deejay, who goes by Hollywood Boo Man, said. "This is how I feed my family so what I gotta say now, the whole day without making no money just because somebody want to shoot somebody."He says he feels sorry for the man who lost his life and he doesn't blame the club."It ain't got nothing to do with the club. It's the people that came in there," he said. "If you got to bring a gun, don't go man."Police are still working to determine a motive and who may face charges.If you have any information, contactCrimeStoppersat 404-577-8477.(Credit: KMOV).According to police, the shooting took place in the 1700 block of Billups in the Ville neighborhood (Credit: KMOV)Digital Content Producer(Credit: KMOV).According to police, the shooting took place in the 1700 block of Billups in the Ville neighborhood (Credit: KMOV)Police are investigating after six people were shot, one of them fatally, just after 5:30 p.m. Tuesday.According to police, the shooting took place in the 1700 block of Billups in the Ville neighborhood. The suspect reportedly drove by and began firing a rifle from the car.Police said one victim, 40-year-old Stanley Sparkling, who lived in the area, was sitting on a porch when he was shot. He was pronounced dead at the scene.Four victims, who range in age from 22 to 36, were taken to the hospital and listed in critical, stable condition. A 39-year-old woman who was also shot refused medical treatment.The Homicide Division is handling the ongoing investigation.Anyone with information is urged to contact CrimeStoppers at 866-371-8477.Copyright 2018 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Digital Content ProducerYvette Johnson and her grandson, Kyrie Johnson, were killed in a quadruple shooting July 2. (Photos courtesy of Crime Stoppers Buffalo)Kenyatta Austin has a history of gun trouble.Austin was convicted of firing gunshots into a Buffalo home in 2010, when he was 17.Last month he was charged with gun possession in Niagara Falls.Austin, 25, now faces murder charges for a quadruple shooting last month in the city's Fruit Belt neighborhood that killed a toddler and his grandmother.Austin, also known as "Manny," has been indicted by a grand jury for the double homicide on Grape Street on July 2. He pleaded not guilty Wednesday at his arraignment on murder, assault and other charges and was held without bail.Police and prosecutors said after the court appearance that information from the public helped lead to an arrest, but stressed that the investigation into the shooting continues."We believe there were others involved," Erie County District Attorney John J. Flynn said.The shooting happened about 12:30 a.m. July 2. Yvette Johnson, who had beencelebrating her 54th birthdaywith her family, was fatally shot, along with her 17-month-old grandson Kyrie Johnson in front of the grandmother's home on Grape Street, near the corner of Best Street in the Fruit Belt section of Buffalo.Devery Johnson, who is Yvette Johnson's son and Kyrie's father, was also shot in the leg, as was a second man in the same attack. Police called the quadruple shooting a "horrific, horrific crime" and implored the public to come forward with information to help them catch the killers.Then on the night of July 26, two other men, ages 23 and 24, wereshot outside the same Grape Street house. They were not the same men who survived the July 2 quadruple shooting.Police sources said the next day that at least one"person of interest"in the initial shootings was in custody on unrelated charges. Austin has been in custody on the Niagara County charge since his arrest in Niagara Falls on the day after the Grape Street shooting. Authorities have described both Grape Street shootings as "gang-related."A law enforcement source said Buffalo police searched Austin's residence on 27th Street in the Falls July 3 and found an assault rifle with a round in the chamber and 15 rounds in the magazine.In the days and weeks since, police officials pleaded with the public to come forward and provide information about the killings. Politicians and community activists including members of the Stop the Violence Coalition and the Peacemakers went door to door in the Fruit Belt with flyers offeringrewards of up to $4,000for confidential tips.Authorities said their calls were answered, but added that they still are looking for more help as the investigation continues."We really want to thank members of the community who have come forward with information and who have been coming forward with information," Mayor Byron W. Brown said at a news conference Wednesday morning. "We would not be at the point where we are today in this investigation without the assistance, the cooperation and the support of the community."The shootings came amid a disturbing rise in violence in the City of Buffalo this summer during which three other women were killed and two children were wounded in separate incidents when someone fired a gun into their houses. As of Aug. 25, there have been40 homicides.Yvette Johnson, a mother of three and grandmother of six, was preparing to leave Buffalo for a corrections officer job in Georgia. She worked for Buffalo Federation of Neighborhood Centers and previously worked for AmeriCorps and at a residence for at-risk young women.Austin was charged with four counts of murder under two legal theories — two charges based on intentional murder and two alleging he showed a "depraved indifference" to human life, Flynn said. He also was charged with two counts of second-degree assault, as well as one count each of first-degree reckless endangerment and second-degree criminal possession of a weapon.He was sentenced to two to six years in prison in August 2010 after being convicted of reckless endangerment for a January 2010 incident on Dewey Avenue in Buffalo, according to state prison records and a Buffalo police report. Austin and two others were arrested after shots were fired from a driveway at two men inside a home on Dewey, just east of Main Street, according to the police report.He was released from prison in May 2016, according to the state Department of Corrections and Community Supervision.Austin's next court date will be scheduled once a judge is assigned to the case, officials said.Authorities on Wednesday renewed their call for information about the Grape Street shootings by encouraging people to call the Buffalo Police Department's confidential tip line at 847-2255."We still need more people to come forward," said Deputy Police Commissioner Joseph A. Gramaglia. "We're hoping people see that an arrest was made here and now will feel even more comfortable coming forward and talking to us."News Staff Reporter Thomas J. Prohaska contributed to this report.Map: Homicides in Buffalo in 2018The smart way to start your day. We sift through all the news to give you a concise, informative look at the top headlines and must-read stories every weekday.Yvette Johnson and her grandson, Kyrie – who was just shy of 17 months old – were both fatally wounded when several people opened fire outside Johnson's home.Yvette Johnson and her grandson, Kyrie – who was just shy of 17 months old – were both fatally wounded when several people opened fire outside Johnson's home.Yvette Johnson and her grandson, Kyrie Johnson, were killed in a quadruple shooting July 2. (Photos courtesy of Crime Stoppers Buffalo)Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.ASHBURN, GA (WALB) - On Tuesday, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation arrested Jontavious Coley, 17, from Cordele, for a fatal shooting last weekend.Coley has been charged with aggravated assault and felony murder in connection to theshooting incident that occurred at Studio 2.0in Ashburn.Coley was identified as one of several shooters who fired multiple rounds while the people were fleeing the club. In all, seven people were shot.One of the victims, Za'quavia Smith from Crisp County, died.Coley is the second person to be arrested in connection to the shootings. According to the GBI, Club Promoter Tio Davis, 36, wasarrested and chargedwith providing alcohol to people under 21.On Wednesday, Maj. Richard Purvis with the Ashburn Police Department released new details in the shooting.Purvis said investigators are working to make several more arrests in the deadly shooting because new surveillance footage from a neighboring store shows that there were multiple shooters.Purvis reiterated that the shooting was gang-related."Basically, it boils down to they're wearing one color, this other gang is wearing another color," Purvis explained. "They're, in technical terms or street language, they're beefing. But it put all these other people in danger."Investigators said they are still urging more potential witnesses to come forward."We're pretty sure that somebody's car has been shot that we have not talked to," said Purvis. "They're not in trouble. We just want to account for what happened."GBI Special Agent J.T. Ricketson said that around 150 to 200 people were in attendance at Studio 2.0 Saturday night.Ricketson said a 'county versus county' flyer advertising an event at the nightclub was passed around to people in Tift, Worth, Turner and Crisp Counties.The GBI is continuing to investigate this shooting. If anyone has information concerning this incident, please contact the GBI Perry Office at (478) 987-4545 or call the GBI TIPS Line at 1-800-597-8477 (TIPS).Copyright 2018WALB. All rights reserved.Emileigh Forrester is a Today in Georgia anchor and reporter.P.O. Box 3130Albany, GA 31706(229) 446-1010A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Jersey City Capt. Ilias Voustas answers a question at the West District Captains Meeting with residents on  July 11, 2018. (Reena Rose Sibayan | The Jersey Journal)JERSEY CITY– Police have arrested an 18-year-old man in connection with a shooting last month that left five people injured.Sheldon Mays, of McAdoo Avenue, is charged with aggravated assault and multiple weapons offenses for the shooting nearKennedy Boulevard and Lexington Avenue on June 30,Jersey City Police Chief Michael Kelly said in a phone interview.Sheldon Mays has been charged in a shootout that left five people injured, police said. (Michaelangelo Conte | The Jersey Journal)Mays is the first of several arrests expected to be made for the gunfire. Kelly would only say they are looking at more than one additional suspect, but less than five."The investigation indicates that there were multiple weapons used, so we know there were people shooting at each other."Police were called to the neighborhood at about 2 a.m. and found two victims with gunshot wounds. An additional three victims showed up at Jersey City Medical Center in a private vehicle, also with injuries from the same shooting.Mays was arrested by the warrant squad outside of his McAdoo Avenue home on Tuesday morning. Kelly said Mays was with other people when another group shot at them. Mays is accused of returning fire. He made his first court appearance Wednesday and his detention hearing is scheduled for Monday.In March,Mays was charged with receiving stolen property, a car, and in April he pleaded guilty to unlawful taking of means of conveyence.Residents in the neighborhood expressed concerns about the shooting during a West District Captain's meeting last Wednesday night.Capt. Ilias Voustas told about a dozen and a half residents that three people got out of car and opened fire on a group as they walked down the street to 7-11. The other group fired back before the initial shooters fled in the car.He described the shooting as being done by "knuckleheads" playing a "territory game." Voustas said the groups involved lived on Wilkinson Avenue and in the Curries Woods housing complex. Sources, however, said police do not believe that is the case and are investigating other leads.Caitlin Mota may be reached atcmota@jjournal.com. Follow her on Twitter@caitlin_mota. FindThe Jersey Journal on Facebook.Journal Staff Writer Michaelangelo Conte contributed to this report.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesA gunman blasted his way into the Capital Gazette newsroom in Annapolis with a shotgun Thursday afternoon, killing five people, authorities said.Journalists dived under their desks and pleaded for help on social media. One reporter described the scene as a “war zone.” A photographer said he jumped over a dead colleague and fled for his life.The victims were identified asRob Hiaasen, 59, a former feature writer for The Baltimore Sun who joined the Capital Gazette in 2010 as an assistant editor and columnist;Wendi Winters, 65, a community correspondent who headed special publications;Gerald Fischman, 61, the editorial page editor;John McNamara, 56, a staff writer who had covered high school, college and professional sports for decades; andRebecca Smith, 34, a sales assistant hired in November.Two others were injured in the attack that began about 2:40 p.m. at the Capital Gazette offices at 888 Bestgate Road in Annapolis.Police took a suspect into custody soon after the shootings. He was identified asJarrod W. Ramos, a 38-year-old Laurel man with a long-standing grudge against the paper.Suspect swore 'oath' to kill Capital staff years ago, had restraining orders — but bought gun legallyRamoswas charged with five counts of first-degree murder, according to online court records. He did not have an attorney listed; a bail review hearing is scheduled for 10:30 a.m. Friday in Annapolis.“This was a targeted attack on the Capital Gazette,” said Anne Arundel County Deputy Police Chief William Krampf. “This person was prepared today to come in. He was prepared to shoot people.”Local, state and federal law enforcement officials cordoned off the Laurel apartment complex listed as the address for Ramos Thursday evening.Ramos’ disputewith the Capital Gazette began in July 2011 when a columnist wrote about a criminal harassment case against him. He brought a defamation suit against the columnist and the organization’s editor and publisher. A court ruled in the Capital Gazette’s favor, and an appeals court upheld the ruling.Neither the columnist, Eric Hartley, nor the editor and publisher, Thomas Marquardt, are still employed by the Capital Gazette. They were not present during the shootings.Police said the suspect used “smoke grenades” in the attack. They said 170 people were inside at the time.The Capital Gazette is owned by The Baltimore Sun.Phil Davis, a Capital crime reporter who was in the building at the time of the shooting, said multiple people were shot as he and others hid under their desks. He said there was a single male gunman.“Gunman shot through the glass door to the office and opened fire on multiple employees,” he wrote on Twitter. “Can’t say much more and don’t want to declare anyone dead, but it’s bad.”“There is nothing more terrifying than hearing multiple people get shot while you’re under your desk and then hear the gunman reload.”What we know about the shooting at the Capital Gazette newsroom in AnnapolisDavis later told The Sun it “was like a war zone” — a scene that would be “hard to describe for a while.”“I’m a police reporter. I write about this stuff — not necessarily to this extent, but shootings and death — all the time,” he said. “But as much as I’m going to try to articulate how traumatizing it is to be hiding under your desk, you don’t know until you’re there and you feel helpless.”Davis said he and others were hiding under their desks when the shooter stopped firing. Then police arrived and surrounded the shooter.Photographer Paul Gillespie had finished editing photos from one assignment and was preparing for the next when he heard shots behind him and the newsroom’s glass doors shatter.He heard another shot, he said, dived under a co-worker’s desk “and curled up as small as I could.”“I dove under that desk as fast as I could, and by the grace of God, he didn’t look over there,” he said. “I was curled up, trying not to breathe, trying not to make a sound, and he shot people all around me.”Gillespie said he heard one colleague scream “No!,” then a shot. Then another colleague’s voice, and another shot. He could hear the gunman approaching his hiding place.“I kept thinking, ‘I can’t believe I’m going to die. I can’t believe this.’ ” Gillespie said.But the gunman passed him, he said, and continued to shoot. Eventually, there was a lull in the shots. Gillespie stood and ran for the exit, through the shattered glass, jumping over the body of a colleague he believed was dead as another shot rang out in his direction.He ran to a nearby bank and screamed for people to call the cops.“I feel like I should be helping to cover it,” he said, “but I’m a mess.”Authorities said police responded to the scene within a minute of the shooting.“If they were not there as quickly as they were, it could have been a lot worse," Annapolis Mayor Gavin Buckley said.Officials at the Maryland Shock Trauma Center in Baltimore confirmed that the hospital was treating at least one victim. County Executive Steve Schuh said others were being treated at Anne Arundel Medical Center.Loren Farquhar, a medical center spokeswoman, said the hospital received two patients, both with minor injuries not from gunfire.The injured employees were identified as Rachael Pacella, a reporter who covers education and the Naval Academy, and Janel Cooley, a sales representative who covers downtown Annapolis. Both were treated and released.A spokeswoman for the Baltimore Sun Media Group said the company was “deeply saddened” by the shooting.“Our thoughts and prayers are with our colleagues and their families,” spokeswoman Renee Mutchnik said. “Our immediate focus is on providing support and resources for all our employees and cooperating with the authorities as this situation is still under investigation.”'I don't know what else to do': Grieving Capital Gazette journalists cover the massacre of their own newsroomPresident Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that he had been briefed on the shooting.“My thoughts and prayers are with the victims and their families,” he wrote. “Thank you to all of the First Responders who are currently on the scene.”Josh McKerrow, a Capital Gazette photographer for 14 years, started his day Thursday covering Induction Day at the Naval Academy at sunrise. He was driving home to celebrate his daughter’s birthday when Capital editor Rick Hutzell called.“He said he’d heard there had been a shooting, and he couldn't get in touch with anyone in the newsroom,” McKerrow said.Then he heard sirens.“My heart sank,” McKerrow said. “I knew.”Police in SWAT gear carrying assault rifles cordoned off the area around the newsroom and closed Bestgate Road. Outside the police tape, McKerrow and reporter Chase Cook called and texted friends and co-workers in search of answers.Jimmy DeButts, an editor, wrote on Twitter that he was “devastated and heartbroken.”He praised his colleagues’ work.“There are no 40-hour weeks, no big paydays — just a passion for telling stories from our community,” DeButts wrote. “We keep doing more with less. We find ways to cover high school sports, breaking news, tax hikes, school budgets & local entertainment. We are there in times of tragedy. We do our best to share the stories of people, those who make our community better. Please understand, we do all this to serve our community.”Gov. Larry Hogan wrote on Twitter that he was “absolutely devastated to learn of this tragedy in Annapolis.”House Speaker Michael E. Busch, who has represented Annapolis in the House of Delegates since 1987, called the Capital Gazette “the voice of the community.”“This is a shocker,” Busch said. “Over the years, a lot of these people become friends. They do their job, you do your job, and you respect them for it. A lot of good writers have come out of there.”The Capital Gazette is one of 30 tenants in the building. Five others share the first floor with The Capital. They include accountants, lawyers, financial and medical offices. The newspaper has been in the building since 2015, according to CoStar, a real estate information company. They have 5,000 square feet of offices.Aaron Smith and Randall Fisher of the Fisher Law Office were on the fourth floor at the time of the shooting, but they didn't hear or see anything. They learned of the assault when a colleague texted Smith.They flipped a desk over in front of the door to the office and stayed there until SWAT officers arrived. They then walked out of the building with their hands on their heads, like everyone else in the building, Fisher said.Bethany Clasing, who works on the second floor, said she heard a single gunshot. Then police yelled: “Get down! Get down! Don't move!”Rayne Foster of Frost and Associates LLC said a plainclothes officer entered her fourth-floor office suite and told the receptionist to lock the doors because there was an active shooter. She quickly gathered people together.Some employees removed high heels to prepare to flee the building. Others hid. One pulled two handguns out of his desk drawer for self-defense.More police arrived, and they all began filing out of the office. Foster said she and her employees tried to hold hands to comfort each other, but were told by police to keep their hands in the air.“You see it on the news,” Foster said, “and you think, ‘These poor people.’ You wonder how they feel.“Now I know.”Baltimore Sun reporters Scott Dance, Doug Donovan, Tim Prudente, Justin Fenton, Erin Cox, Jessica Anderson and Meredith Cohn and the Associated Press contributed to this article.Trending:OAKLAND — An 18-year-old man fatally shot Wednesday evening outside an East Oakland mini-market was identified by police Friday as Derick Alexander.A 17-year-old boy and two men, ages 25 and 29, who were wounded in the shooting are still recovering and all are expected to survive, authorities said.  Their names have not been released.Homicide investigators have not released a motive for the shooting. No arrests have been made.Police said Alexander, an Oakland resident, and the three wounded knew each other and regularly hung out outside the store in the 8900 block of MacArthur Boulevard, where the shooting happened about 5:31 p.m. Wednesday.At least one gunman opened fire on them as they stood on the sidewalk outside the store, police said.Alexander and one of the men wounded fled inside the store for cover. Alexander was pronounced dead at the scene.The two men wounded were transported from the scene to a hospital and the 17-year-old got a ride from another person to a hospital.The gunman fled before police arrived.Start your day with the news you need from the Bay Area and beyond.Sign up for ourMorning Report weekday newsletter.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $25,000 in reward money for information leading to the arrest of the shooter. Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3821 or 510-238-7950 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersOfficers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.Officers responded to the shooting around 11:10 p.m. June 27, 2018, in the 100 block of Holly Street. They arrived to find several people fighting in the street.A 22-year-old man shot four people, including a juvenile, during a street brawl between West Side neighbors on Wednesday, police said.Abelardo Garcia III faces four charges of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon. He was booked into the Bexar County Jail Thursday morning on a $300,000 bond.RELATED:SAPD: Masked man raped woman while accomplices forced her husband to open safeAccording to a police report, the melee started as an argument between neighbors around 11 p.m. in the 100 block of Holly Street. It turned physical, and Garcia and one other person brandished firearms and started shooting.Four people were struck, including a father, mother and their son, police said. The father and son were struck by a high-powered rifle and remain in critical condition, authorities said.Two responding officers first encountered a hostile man, who allegedly resisted when they tried to subdue him. The officers suffered minor injuries during the ensuing struggle and used their stun gun on the man so they could take him into custody, according to the preliminary report.RELATED:SAPD: Driver fatally hit, dragged man pushing shopping cart on West Side road, then fledAdditional officers then arrived and found three of the victims lying in the street. The fourth was discovered sitting on a sidewalk nearby.All four were taken to University Hospital for treatment. The two officers injured while trying to take the hostile man into custody were taken to Metropolitan Methodist Hospital for treatment.Police found Garcia inside a home in the 100 block of Holly Street, along with a firearm, according to the report.It is unclear if anyone else will be arrested in connection to the shooting.Text "NEWS" to 77453 for breaking news alerts from mySA.comCaleb Downs is a crime reporter formySA.com. Read more of his storieshere.| cdowns@mysa.com | Twitter:@calebjdownsCaleb Downs is a breaking news reporter for the San Antonio Express-News. His job is to hunt down crime and chaos in San Antonio and Bexar County. He is a graduate of the University of North Texas and has previously worked for The Dallas Morning News as a breaking news reporter.Three people were injured, one critically, in a drive-by shooting Wednesday night, Hartford police said.Just after 10 p.m., officers were called to Hillside Avenue near La Rumba Market, where they found four victims who had retreated to the bodega with gunshot wounds. Three men and one woman were taken to Hartford Hospital, police said. Their names have not yet been released.At least one of the victims was targeted by the shooter, police said. The two most seriously injured victims were shot in the abdomen and thigh, Lt. Paul Cicero said. Another was shot in the lower leg, and a fourth got clipped in the ear.Part of Hillside Avenue was taped off between Wilson Street and Ward Place late Wednesday as police investigated. The bodega is at 122 Hillside Ave. in the Behind the Rocks neighborhood.Check back for updates.Courant Staff Writer Christine Dempsey contributed to this report.RecommendedFiled under:Six people were shot Monday night near Ellis Park in the South Side Bronzeville neighborhood.The group was standing near the park when someone opened fire about 10:45 p.m. in the 3600 block of Vincennes, according to Chicago Police.A 15-year-old boy was among those wounded. He was shot in the ankle and was taken to Mercy Hospital in good condition, police said.A 27-year-old man was shot in the leg and a 20-year-old man was shot in the hip and in both legs. Both of their conditions had stabilized at the University of Chicago Medical Center. A 24-year-old man and 22-year-old man were both shot in the ankle and taken to the same hospital where they were both in good condition, police said.A 19-year-old man was struck by four bullets. He was shot twice in the hip, once in the buttocks and once in the arm and was taken to North Western Medical Center where his condition was stabilized, police said.Area South detectives were investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.SANFORD — A Raleigh man who was shot in both legs is accused of killing a 27-year-old man during the fight a week ago.Dominique Devonn Williams, 20, of the 5100 block of Chasteal Trail in Raleigh, was charged Saturday with murder, according to a Sanford police report. No bail was set.Travis Jamarian Mclean, 27, of Sanford, died after being shot in the chest on June 24, according to a statement released by police. He was pronounced dead at Central Carolina Hospital, it said.Williams was one of six people who were treated for gunshot wounds after the fight that started at a birthday party in a Sanford dance studio, according to the statement.Staff writer Steve DeVane can be reached at sdevane@fayobserver.com or 486-3572.SANFORD — A Raleigh man who was shot in both legs is accused of killing a 27-year-old man during the fight a week ago.Dominique Devonn Williams, 20, of the 5100 block of Chasteal Trail in Raleigh, was charged Saturday with murder, according to a Sanford police report. No bail was set.Travis Jamarian Mclean, 27, of Sanford, died after being shot in the chest on June 24, according to a statement released by police. He was pronounced dead at Central Carolina Hospital, it said.Williams was one of six people who were treated for gunshot wounds after the fight that started at a birthday party in a Sanford dance studio, according to the statement.Staff writer Steve DeVane can be reached at sdevane@fayobserver.com or 486-3572.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Fayetteville Observer  ~ 458 Whitfield St., Fayetteville, NC 28302~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.STUART  -- A quadruple shooting in Indiantown Saturday night left four men with non life-threatening injuries and prompted Martin County Sheriff’s officials to ask witnesses to come forward with any information.According to Martin County Sheriff Will Snyder, it was just past 1 a.m., when Martin deputies responded to calls of shots fired outside Roger’s Market at the 17000 block of Southwest Palm Beach Street, where a large outdoor party was underway.“When they got there they determined there had been shots fired; they found one victim who had been shot a couple of times. He was transported to a trauma center,” Snyder said Sunday.  “Three other gunshot victims were transported by friends or relatives to hospitals in Martin County.”The man taken to a trauma center was shot in the upper torso, and the other three were wounded in the lower extremities.The victims were “all males,” Snyder said, who declined to identify them, “because of the complexities of the case and for their own protection.”“We do fear that there could be retaliation actions taken,” he said. We will be deploying multiple extra units into the field tonight in an attempt to prevent this from escalating.”The shooting happened amid a large crowd gathered under a tent set up in front of Roger’s Market.“Several hundred people attended,” he said, “it occurred in the mix of the street party.”But detectives are are stymied without more information, Snyder insisted.“We do not have one single witness out of all the hundreds of people,” he said. “So we are in the dark right now as to motive and sequence of events; no cooperation.”More:Fort Pierce Police investigate fatal head-on crash on U.S. 1One gun was recovered and authorities know at least one more weapon was used.“Without the final reports from the hospitals or getting those projectiles, there’s no way to know if it was an exchange of gunfire or one person doing all the shooting,” Snyder said. “Because there’s no eye witnesses. And we’re still on the middle of evaluating the physical evidence.”Snyder urged anyone with information to call the Martin County Sheriff's Office at 772-220-7060.More:Car burglars hit Poinciana Gardens, Parkwood in Martin CountySix teenagers face charges after leading Riviera Beach police on a chase Tuesday in a car believed to be involved in Sunday’s fatal shooting, authorities said.The driver of the stolen gray 2017 Nissan Altima was taken to the county’s Juvenile Assessment Center on charges of grand theft auto and fleeing and eluding, said Riviera Beach police spokeswoman Rose Anne Brown. The 15-year-old boy also faces multiple traffic citations.RELATED: 2017 Forest Hill High grad killed in Riviera Beach shootingThe five passengers — 18-year-old Tonesha Hunter and four juveniles ranging in age from 15 to 17 — face trespassing charges, Brown said. The teens were taken to the Juvenile Assessment Center and Hunter was given a notice to appear.One juvenile was put in detention Wednesday afternoon after Palm Beach County Circuit Judge Gregory Keyser found probable cause for fleeing and eluding law enforcement.First appearance hearings for two other teens were postponed because the state is awaiting information from police.It is unclear Wednesday whether the two remaining teens will be seen by a judge.As of Wednesday morning, Brown said no one faces charges in Sunday’s shooting, which killed Timothy James Frederick, 19, and injured three others.Authorities still are investigating whether any of the teenagers were involved.Brown said one of the city’s license-plate readers spotted the stolen Altima and alerted detectives working the homicide case.Officers caught up to the car shortly before 3:30 p.m. on the 2700 block of Avenue O, west of President Barack Obama Highway, and followed it. They tried to stop the car at Australian Avenue and West 10th Street, but the driver headed south toward Interstate 95.Police pursued the Altima because of "suspicions of direct involvement in the recent homicide and potential for serious harm to others," Brown said in a news release Tuesday.The car, which was reported stolen out of Palm Beach County, crashed into at least two vehicles, the Florida Highway Patrol said. No one was seriously injured in the wrecks.Police finally stopped the Altima by Sixth Avenue South in Lake Worth.Six teenagers face charges after leading Riviera Beach police on a chase Tuesday in a car believed to be involved in Sunday’s fatal shooting, authorities said.The driver of the stolen gray 2017 Nissan Altima was taken to the county’s Juvenile Assessment Center on charges of grand theft auto and fleeing and eluding, said Riviera Beach police spokeswoman Rose Anne Brown. The 15-year-old boy also faces multiple traffic citations.RELATED: 2017 Forest Hill High grad killed in Riviera Beach shootingThe five passengers — 18-year-old Tonesha Hunter and four juveniles ranging in age from 15 to 17 — face trespassing charges, Brown said. The teens were taken to the Juvenile Assessment Center and Hunter was given a notice to appear.One juvenile was put in detention Wednesday afternoon after Palm Beach County Circuit Judge Gregory Keyser found probable cause for fleeing and eluding law enforcement.First appearance hearings for two other teens were postponed because the state is awaiting information from police.It is unclear Wednesday whether the two remaining teens will be seen by a judge.As of Wednesday morning, Brown said no one faces charges in Sunday’s shooting, which killed Timothy James Frederick, 19, and injured three others.Authorities still are investigating whether any of the teenagers were involved.Brown said one of the city’s license-plate readers spotted the stolen Altima and alerted detectives working the homicide case.Officers caught up to the car shortly before 3:30 p.m. on the 2700 block of Avenue O, west of President Barack Obama Highway, and followed it. They tried to stop the car at Australian Avenue and West 10th Street, but the driver headed south toward Interstate 95.Police pursued the Altima because of "suspicions of direct involvement in the recent homicide and potential for serious harm to others," Brown said in a news release Tuesday.The car, which was reported stolen out of Palm Beach County, crashed into at least two vehicles, the Florida Highway Patrol said. No one was seriously injured in the wrecks.Police finally stopped the Altima by Sixth Avenue South in Lake Worth.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Palm Beach Post  ~ 2751 S. Dixie Highway, West Palm Beach, FL 33405~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKHOBART — The 25-year-old man shot Sunday at Walmart has been wounded in three separate shootings since his release from prison in June, according to police and court records.The Gary man charged Tuesday with shooting Kyran Hawthorne Sr., of Gary, and his 9-year-old son at the Hobart Walmart had been awaiting sentencing for misdemeanor possession of cocaine in a 2016 case where police also seized an AK-47 and a Glock handgun.Alex C. Hughes, 26, and Hawthorne belong to rival gangs in Gary's Glen Park neighborhood, according to court records.Hughes is accused of shooting Hawthorne and Hawthorne's son after "mean mugging" him during a chance encounter inside the Hobart Walmart off U.S. 30. A warrant has been issued for his arrest on two felony counts of attempted murder, felony aggravated battery and criminal gang activity.Police first became aware of the two gangs in 2011, though the groups initially formed an alliance, according to court records.A feud between the groups reached a fever pitch July 11, 2015, when alleged Glen Park Affiliates associate John T. Davis and alleged Get Fresh Boys associate Ronald Steward were wounded in a shooting in the 3500 block of Polk Street in Gary's Glen Park neighborhood, according to a probable cause affidavit filed in Hughes' case."This is believed to be the first time that the two groups wounded each other as a result of gunfire," court records state.Hughes and Ronald Steward each were charged in June 2016 after police investigating a report of a man with a gun stopped a black Chevrolet Blazer near 39th Avenue and Tyler Street.Police found a bag containing 0.2 grams of suspected cocaine on the center console next to Hughes, the driver, court records state. Officers also found an AK-47, Glock handgun and bag of suspected marijuana in the passenger area near Steward.Steward pleaded guilty in 2017 to felony carrying a handgun without a license and was sentenced to 18 months in the Lake County Community Corrections program, records show.Hughes pleaded guilty Nov. 16, 2017, to misdemeanor possession of a narcotic drug. His sentencing hearing has been delayed several times and is currently set for Nov. 15.Police suspect Hughes and four other alleged gang members took part in a shooting Dec. 14, 2014, in the Glen Park area, court records say.Hawthorne was released from prison in early June after serving more than five years for resisting law enforcement and attempted robbery convictions, according to Indiana Department of Correction records.On June 24, Hawthorne was among four men shot about 11 p.m. in the 2500 block of Harrison Street, Gary police Cmdr. Jack Hamady said.Hawthorne, a 21-year-old man and an 18-year-old man were wounded, and 19-year-old Jazaniel Davis, of Merrillville, was killed. Handgun rounds were recovered from the scene, police said.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call Detective Jeff Minchuk of the Gary/Lake County Metro Homicide Unit at 219-755-3855.Hawthorne suffered another gunshot wound — this time to the back — and a 21-year-old was shot in the arm and knee the night of Aug. 17, Hamady said.Hawthorne was driving east on 41st Avenue when another car pulled up alongside him and someone in that car opened fire. Hawthorne crashed in a vacant lot near 41st and Jefferson Street. As Hawthorne and two associates attempted to run, the shooters continued to target them, police said.Hawthorne and the 21-year-old were wounded, but a 29-year-old man escaped injury. Officers arrived and recovered handgun rounds from the scene.The 21-year-old told police he didn't want to talk to them, Hamady said. Anyone with information about the case is asked to call Detective Sgt. Daniel Callahan at 219-881-1210.In the Walmart shooting, Hughes is accused of shooting at Hawthorne as Hawthorne's son and girlfriend walked behind him. After the 9-year-old boy fell to the ground, Hawthorne's girlfriend lay on top of the boy to shield him from the gunfire.Hughes is accused of walking by her as she lay on the ground and saying, "You're lucky I don't shoot you, too, b----."Police recovered 10 spent .40-caliber bullet casings and 16 spent 9mm casings from the scene, court records say.The .40-caliber bullets likely were fired by an associate of Hawthorne's, who told police he returned fire because he feared he was in danger, court records say.An off-duty Gary police officer, who was shopping with his family when the gunfire broke out, recovered a .40-caliber Glock handgun from the associate's waistband.Hobart police have not ruled out seeking additional charges against more people as the investigation continues, Lt. James Gonzales said. Anyone with information is asked to contact Sgt. Nicholas Wardrip atnwardrip@cityofhobart.orgor 219-942-4900.Gary's anonymous crime tip line is 866-CRIME-GP.Alex C. Hughes, 26, of GaryGet the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Lake County Courts and Social Justice ReporterSarah covers crime, courts and public safety. She began her career at The Times in 2004. Contact her at sarah.reese@nwi.com or 219-933-3351.GARY — Police are seeking tips about three suspects in a burglary Aug. 9 at a store on the city's West Side.A Chicago woman killed in a crash early Wednesday in Newton County has been identified as 25-year-old Candace Tuckenberry, police said.DYER — Police responded to a report that a vehicle hit a house about 5 p.m. Wednesday and found a 77-year-old woman unresponsive behind the wh…GARY — Police arrested a 17-year-old Thursday and discovered he had been driving a stolen vehicle during a high-speed chase that involved at l…FLORENCE, S.C. — A Vietnam veteran who bragged online about maintaining his target-shooting skills was being held Thursday on charges that he …GARY — Police are seeking tips about a woman suspected of stealing several tote bags full of Red Bull energy drinks from a gas station and ret…HOBART — The man wanted on allegations he shot a 9-year-old boy and the boy's father at the Hobart Walmart was arrested Tuesday after Gary pol…CROWN POINT — A man charged with shooting a boy and his father at a Hobart Walmart will need to post a $200,000 surety bond to be released fro…An alleged gang member is charged with helping Alex C. Hughes flee authorities Tuesday while Hughes was wanted in the double shooting at a Hob…CROWN POINT — A criminal court judge denied a bond reduction for the Gary man charged with injuring a father and his 9-year-old son in a gang-…CROWN POINT – A Gary man who allegedly sheltered the suspected shooter of a father and his 9-year-old son at a crowded Walmart in Hobart was c…CROWN POINT — A defense attorney for the Gary man accused of wounding two people in a shootout at a crowded Hobart Walmart is requesting a spe…CROWN POINT — Surveillance videos failed to persuade a judge to reduce bond Thursday for the man charged with shooting a rival gang member and…CROWN POINT — A judge granted a Gary man's request Thursday to delay his trial on charges alleging his involvement in a shooting last fall out…CROWN POINT — An alleged gang member convicted in 2014 of shooting at people was charged Thursday in connection with a brief police chase that…CROWN POINT — A Gary man wounded in a gang shootout last fall outside the Hobart Walmart was arrested Monday after telling police the cocaine …CROWN POINT — A man wounded in a gang shootout last fall outside the Hobart Walmart is wanted on new charges alleging he stole a gun from a ma…HOBART — People ran, others stood still and cars poured out of the Walmart parking lot Sunday as police Cpl. Kevin Garber Jr. pulled up in res…An explosion of gunfire sent scores of Walmart shoppers into panic, left a child critically injured and pressed an off-duty Gary officer, at t…HOBART — Police said Monday they suspect a shooting at Walmart that wounded a 25-year-old Gary man and his 9-year-old son was gang-related.Hobart Police host a press conference on the Sunday night shooting at Walmart.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Filed under:A man has died days after being wounded in a mass shooting last week in Bronzeville on the South Side.Michael Sutton Jr., 31, was pronounced dead Tuesday, four days after a shooting that wounded four other people, according to Chicago Police and the Cook County Medical Examiner’s Office.An autopsy on his cause of death hasn’t been released.The shooting happened about 12:10 a.m. Saturday in the 100 block of East 51st Street, police said. Five people were standing on a sidewalk whensomeone in a gray vehicle shot at them.A 15-year-old boy was shot in his leg; a 50-year-old man was shot in his back; a 26-year-old man was shot in his head and a 33-year-old man was shot in his lower back, police said. Their conditions had stabilized.Area Central detectives were conducting a homicide investigation.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Follow KDKA-TV:Facebook|TwitterPITTSBURGH (KDKA) — A local college student was shot and killed this past summer, and several months later, no one has been arrested.Jazmere Custis, 19, was an Indiana University of Pennsylvania student majoring in clinical and child psychology. She was home for the summer.(Photo Provided)On June 22, Custis and a college roommate were in Homestead in her mother’s car. Her family says she reluctantly agreed to give her roommate’s brother and a friend a ride.Gunfire erupted. Cell phone video shows police around their car riddled with bullets. All four young people were shot. Custis’s wounds proved fatal.RELATED STORIES:Teenager Killed, 3 Others Wounded In Munhall Shooting“The four victims had been at a party in Homestead. They drove to Munhall in a silver Nissan and stopped in front of 1324 Margaret Street. At that point, a car approached them and an unknown person shot into the silver Nissan, striking all four victims,” Allegheny County Police Detective Steven Dish said.Investigators say Custis was an innocent victim who was not the intended target of the gunman.“I want the world to know she was a wonderful girl, the best daughter you could ever ask for,” the victim’s mother, Tanya Burt, said. “She was a good girl, all As in school.”Burt said her daughter was a graduate of Steel Valley High School. She was getting ready to start her sophomore year at IUP, looking for an apartment and looking for a puppy she wanted.“I’m pretty sure somebody does know something. I really wish they would come forward. She deserves justice. This is so unfair,” Burt said.“She was somebody who wanted peace in this world and the simple fact is she got taken out in the most violent way. What more can you say about that? It’s not right,” Jerald Custis Jr., the victim’s brother, said.The Crime Stoppers number is(412) 255-8477. Information leading to an arrest and conviction could be worth up to $1,000.WATCHVIDEOS1 dead, 3 wounded in San Bernardino liquor store shootingAlize Ross, 20, of Fontana, was killed in a shooting at King Tut Liquor Store in San Bernardino, authorities said.San Bernardino Police DepartmentMORGANZA - At least one person is being questioned after four people showed up with gunshot wounds at different hospitals in Pointe Coupee Parish Thursday.Officials with the sheriff's office confirm a shooting occurred on Deaton Lane sometime before 3:30 p.m. The sheriff initially confirmed two people were injured in the shooting, one of them with critical injuries. Sources told News 2 those victims received injuries to the hand and wrist.However, the sheriff's office confirmed that two more people showed up at different hospitals with injuries about an hour later. The sheriff believes that all four are connected to the same shooting.Two of the victims were taken to Pointe Coupee General Hospital in New Roads. Sources said one of those two was being brought to Our Lady of the Lake Hospital in Baton Rouge via helicopter.20-year-old Junathan Brown of Morganza, one of the four people shot, was arrested on unrelated charges. However, deputies say he is being questioned in connection with Thursday's shooting. No bond has been set.Filed under:Four people were wounded, three seriously, in a shooting Thursday afternoon in the West Englewood neighborhood on the Southwest Side.They were shot at 2:33 p.m. in the 6500 block of South Claremont, according to Chicago Police.An 18-year-old man was grazed in the lower back and lower leg and refused medical treatment, police said.A 16-year-old boy was shot in the leg and taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where he was in serious condition. An 18-year-old man was taken to Stroger Hospital in critical condition with a gunshot wound to his lower left leg. Another 18-year-old man was shot twice in the buttocks and once in the lower left leg, and he was in serious condition at the University of Chicago Medical Center.More details weren’t provided.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Marcus Prentice is wanted for felony assault, Huntsville police said.A suspect is in police custody in connection with the shootings of four people at a north Huntsville home, police said.Marcus Antonio Prentice, 37, was wanted on four felony assault charges, said Huntsville police Lt. Michael Johnson.Officers foundfour people suffering gunshot woundswhen they responded to 905 Lee Drive on Tuesday around 9:30 p.m. Police said an incident involving the suspected shooter and his girlfriend happened earlier in the night, and the shootings are believed to be retaliatory."The offender returned after the initial altercation and fired multiple rounds striking several victims," police said in a news release.A bullet also hit a home on 807 Appleby Street. No injuries were reported there.Further details weren't made public.Updated at 7:20 p.m. to show the suspect is in custody.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:A teenager who was shot multiple times in the head and had a sheet placed over him by paramedics — who realized minutes later that he was still breathing — has died.Erin Carey, 17, of the Austin neighborhood was pronounced dead at 1:14 a.m. Tuesday at Stroger Hospital.He was shot about 4:45 a.m. Monday in the 1300 block of South Loomis outside the ABLA/Brooks Homes, a CTA housing facility, in the University Village neighborhood. Four others were also shot — one of them fatally.Authorities are trying to determine how paramedics mistakenly thought Carey was dead. On Tuesday, CFD spokesman Larry Langford said officials were investigating why Carey wasn’t treated in “a more timely manner.”“We are reviewing dispatch recordings, phone calls and our paramedics to determine what did led to the patient being left under a sheet when he had not been pronounced dead, and in fact had life signs despite a traumatic wound from which he could not recover,” Langford said.At a Monday news conference, CPD Deputy Supt. Anthony Riccio said he didn’t know “the length of time [he was under the sheet] but from what my understanding of the incident is — that individual has a catastrophic injury.”WLS-TV (Channel 7) recorded videoof the teen moving under the sheet and reported he was covered for several minutes before a paramedic uncovered him and began performing chest compressions.“He was shot in the head and the prognosis is not good. I do understand that paramedics looked at him, believed him to be deceased, covered him with that sheet and moved on to another individual who was nearby who was also shot,” Riccio said.“(Officers) saw a motion, movement, underneath the sheet. Officers who were present notified the paramedics ‘this man is still alive’ and treatment began on him as well,” Riccio said.“Again, his injuries are catastrophic, that is something I think definitely has to be looked at to find out exactly what happened,” Riccio said. “He’s on full life support. … I understand the family is there with him and they’ll have to make a decision on how to proceed.”Chicago Fire Department Commissioner Jose Santiago said Monday after an unrelated news conference that he was unaware of specifics and couldn’t immediately comment.“We’re looking into it right now,” he said, briefly noting that paramedics consider several factors when assessing gunshot victims.“There’s also something going on that a lot of people forget, it’s known as triage,” Santiago said, referring to the practice of first responders sorting victims by medical priority in order to increase the number of survivors.“When the first ambulance gets on the scene they’ll take a look at the victims and they will concentrate on the ones they know they can save, right away. That’s the first thing that takes place,” Santiago said.Riccio said multiple shell casings found at the scene suggest an exchange of gunfire from multiple shooters.A woman in her early 20s, shot multiple times in her head and arm, was pronounced dead at the scene.A 21-year-old man was shot in his leg, a 23-year-old man was shot in his arm and another 23-year-old man was shot multiple times in his abdomen.The shooting stemmed from an argument at a party, police said.“At least four of the victims are known to the Chicago police department,” Riccio said, adding that there is an ongoing gang conflict in that area.“We’re working to find out why exactly these individuals were targeted and what caused the shooting … at this time none of the non-fatal victims are cooperating with the police,” he said.The shooting occurred adjacent to the CTA housing facility and about a block west of the Chicago Police Department’s 12th district police station, also known as the Near West District.The shooting also occurred about right outside the front entrance of the Jane Addams Family Resource Center, less than a block from Urban Prep Academy’s West Campus and three blocks south of Taylor Street — the main drag of Little Italy.Contributing: Sun-Times WireKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.CHARLOTTE, N.C. — Four people were shot at a gas station in west Charlotte Sunday morning, police said.England Wimbush, who lives nearby, said she was inside her west Charlotte apartment when she heard multiple gunshots.“I heard about five or six shots or what I thought were shots anyway,” she said.Police found three victims with gunshot wounds around 2:37 a.m. at the Exxon Station in the 3200 block of Queen City Drive. A fourth victim was dropped off at a hospital.At the time, Wimbush didn’t know about the large police presence near her home.“I never would have thought because I didn't hear the ambulance after it happened,” Wimbush said.The Exxon gas station was taped off for hours as investigators combed for evidence. Evidence markers were on and off gas station property."I'm not surprised. It happens. This is Charlotte,” gas station customer Joshua Smith said, “It used to, but not anymore."Police said one person has life-threatening injuries.Investigating officers are still looking for the shooter."That's crazy,” Wimbush said. “No one deserves to be shot. I don't care what they do."Davone White, left, and Amir ArmstrongOne of two men charged in connection with the Father's Dayshooting that killed one person and injured nearly 30 othersat the Art all Night festival in Trenton appeared in court Monday.Amir Armstrong, 23, who was wounded himself in thegunfireat the overnight event on June 17, was recently moved from a medical facility to the Mercer County jail, officials said. He's charged with firearms-related offenses.He made an appearance via video conference in Superior Court in Trenton, and pleaded not guilty.At the hearing, prosecutors said they would seek to detain him until and throughout his trial. That hearing is scheduled for this Thursday.Representatives from the Mercer County Prosecutor's Office did not divulge any new details Monday about the shooting.Gunfire that began at about 2:45 a.m. caused a stampede of people - about 1,000 were present at the time - who were trying to escape the event.Arriving Trenton police returned gunfire with suspects, killing one,Tahaij Wells, 32, of Trenton.Authorities later charged two wounded men,Armstrong and Davone White, 26, with weapons offenses charges. White has yet to appear in court.A probable cause affidavit describes officers treating Armstrong with a head wound and then removing his shirt to check for additional injuries, only to find a revolver in his waistband. According to another affidavit, a black handgun was found at the scene three feet from White.Kevin Shea may be reached atkshea@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@kevintshea. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Four people were shot Sunday night in the Little Village neighborhood on the South Side.The group was standing on the street when a male walked up and fired shots at 9:27 p.m. in the 2200 block of South Sacramento, according to Chicago Police.A 21-year-old man was shot in the chest and was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, where he was in critical condition. A 30-year-old man was shot in the left arm and hip and was at the same hospital in serious condition, police said.A 34-year-old woman was in good condition at Mount Sinai with a gunshot wound to the right leg, police said. A 20-year-old man was taken to Saint Anthony Hospital with a gunshot wound to his left leg.Area Central detectives were investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Doctors at Lurie Children’s Hospital said Kayden Swann "continues to demonstrate positive improvements," though he is still in critical condition in the pediatric intensive care unit.Eric V. Swain, right, and Christina Corchado, were engaged and planned an August 2019 wedding. (Photo courtesy Christina Corchado)Hattie Ellison, left, with her son, Eric V. Swain. (Photo courtesy Christina Corchado)Eric V. Swain had dreams of making money through his rap music, but he also had a practical side.Swain, a 38-year-old father of seven, started publishing songs online about six years ago. In his early 30s by then, he already had kids and had been working a variety of jobs.While he loved his music, he saw greater importance in what would become of his children."To see your kids blossom and bloom and be somebody in life, that's making it," he said in April during a weekly Facebook Live webcast produced in Buffalo called"What We Used To Do Wednesdays."Swain was fatally shot June 14 on Marigold Avenue in Buffalo. It was four days before he was slated to start a new job working at a boys' home. He was shot in the arm and the bullet traveled into his chest, puncturing his lungs. Four others were injured in the shooting but survived.Swain, whose funeral was held Saturday at True Bethel Baptist Church on East Ferry Street, leaves behind three sons and four daughters, including the oldest, Eric Jr., 16.Born in Buffalo, Swain was known as "D.I.P Out Da Park," or "DIP" for short."He had a lot of more heartfelt songs," said his fiancee, Christina Corchado. "As a black man born and raised in an urban community, the hardships, the trials and tribulations that they go through when they wake up, just being who they are. He had a lot of music that was aimed at that to give men – it doesn't have to be just a black man, but any man – in an urban society some type of hope that you can make it out there and you don't have to be what society makes you out to be."You don't have to be what people portray the men that walk around a specific neighborhood to be," Corchado said.The couple, who had been together for about 2½ years, got engaged about two months ago. They had set a wedding date of Aug. 19, 2019.Swain was dedicated to his family – it was virtually guaranteed he would attend family get-togethers and holidays. He took care of his children, spending time with them and paying child support, Corchado said. He recently had worked about a year in maintenance for the Community Action Organization.Swain loved to cook, especially soul food, a skill he learned from his mother, Hattie Ellison.She and Eric's father, the late Joseph J. Ellison, separated. Swain viewed his father leaving his mother also as separating from his children – Eric, his three brothers and a sister, Hattie Ellison said, and her son pledged he wouldn't treat his children that way."He wasn't going to disappear out of their lives," she said. "They were going to know who he was and I was proud of him for that."Swain also acted as a father figure to Corchado's child from a prior relationship.This isn't the first time the family's been touched by gun violence in Buffalo. On July 22, 2012, Swain's 17-year-old nephew, Dominique Cotton, was fatally shot on Davidson Avenue. His killing has not been solved.Around 11 p.m. June 14, Swain was walking to the store and stopped to talk with some guys in the neighborhood when a vehicle drove by and shots were fired at the group, according to family members, who do not believe Swain was the target. It happened two houses away from where his grandmother lives."It wasn't somebody out looking for him," his mother said. "It wasn't him."In addition to his eldest son, Swain is also survived by his six other children: Kahlil, 14; Ericka, 11; Elaina, 7; Jonathan, 7; Janiyah, 4; and Amaya, 3.Two weeks ago, after another shooting in their Leroy Avenue neighborhood, Swain told his mom that he didn't want to live in that part of the city anymore, she said.What was primarily on his mind at the time was his 16-year-old son and what he was being exposed to on the surrounding streets.Swain was good at motivating others, according to his fiancee, and with the music he left behind, he fulfilled a dream of leaving something behind for others."He always wanted to leave something here for people to be able to go back to," Corchado said.Corchado createda GoFundMe pageto raise money to support Swain's children.Map: Homicides in Buffalo in 2018The smart way to start your day. We sift through all the news to give you a concise, informative look at the top headlines and must-read stories every weekday.Buffalo police say an Amherst man was shot in the 100 block of Jefferson Avenue early Sunday, sometime shortly after midnight.Buffalo police say an Amherst man was shot in the 100 block of Jefferson Avenue early Sunday, sometime shortly after midnight.Prosecutors allege that Mark M. Miller owned and operated several businesses, “which engaged in a wire fraud scheme related to unlawful debt collection activities."Prosecutors allege that Mark M. Miller owned and operated several businesses, “which engaged in a wire fraud scheme related to unlawful debt collection activities."Workers restoring the historic building recently came across the names.Workers restoring the historic building recently came across the names.Suddenly, the pandemic that has ravaged the world is raging far worse not in the United States, but on the other side of the Peace Bridge.Suddenly, the pandemic that has ravaged the world is raging far worse not in the United States, but on the other side of the Peace Bridge.The longtime director of a Christian youth camp in Delevan is refusing to step down despite complaints that he inappropriately touched young women and girls.The longtime director of a Christian youth camp in Delevan is refusing to step down despite complaints that he inappropriately touched young women and girls.More than 111,000 Western New Yorkers have contracted Covid-19 since March 2020 and nearly 2,300 have died of it.The final pieces of the budget, which was due by March 31, are still under negotiation, but officials are banking on legalization of mobile sports betting to be in it to help finance massive spending hike desires.The final pieces of the budget, which was due by March 31, are still under negotiation, but officials are banking on legalization of mobile sports betting to be in it to help finance massive spending hike desires.According to Forbes, the 20 richest owners controlling major league sports have a combined net worth of $426 billion, up 60% from a year ago.According to Forbes, the 20 richest owners controlling major league sports have a combined net worth of $426 billion, up 60% from a year ago.The seven-day average positive rate for the five counties the state calls Western New York was 4.7% after reports were compiled among those receiving tests for the virus Sunday.The seven-day average positive rate for the five counties the state calls Western New York was 4.7% after reports were compiled among those receiving tests for the virus Sunday.In one of the incidents, police found a 22-year-old Hamburg man shot inside an apartment and a side porch of the home on fire.In one of the incidents, police found a 22-year-old Hamburg man shot inside an apartment and a side porch of the home on fire.Eric V. Swain, right, and Christina Corchado, were engaged and planned an August 2019 wedding. (Photo courtesy Christina Corchado)Hattie Ellison, left, with her son, Eric V. Swain. (Photo courtesy Christina Corchado)Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Please log in, or sign up for a new account and purchase a subscription to continue reading.Please purchase a subscription to continue reading.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Your digital subscription allows you to view any content, comment on any issue and submit your own news to our newsroom.Digital subscriptions do not include home delivery of the Tracy Press. To receive the paper at home, sign up forPremium Membership.Abundant sunshine. High around 80F. Winds NW at 10 to 20 mph..Clear to partly cloudy. Low around 50F. Winds W at 10 to 20 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 12:01 pmDiaundre Campbell smiles in court Tuesday during his arraignment on a murder charge.Diaundre Campbell smiles in court Tuesday during his arraignment on a murder charge.STOCKTON — A Tracy man arrested in connection with the shooting death of 15-year-old Emilio Gerardo Enriquez Almanza had his first appearance in San Joaquin County Superior Court on Tuesday.Diaundre Lee Campbell, 23, is charged with murder. As he awaited his first arraignment hearing, Campbell could be seen smiling and laughing in the containment area of the courtroom before Judge Ron Northup announced his case.Northup read Campbell the charges filed against him, which included a case with a prior strike. When asked what he wanted to do, Campbell requested an attorney. Northup appointed public defender Jennifer Perkins to handle his defense.Perkins talked with Campbell momentarily and then asked the judge to schedule a further arraignment hearing at 8:30 a.m. June 29, which the judge granted.On Sunday, the Tracy Police Department announced the arrest of 16-year-old Jesus Renteria on the charge of murder and Campbell and two unidentified boys, ages 16 and 17, as accessories to the fatal shooting.Court records show that Campbell’s charges were changed by the district attorney’s office when his criminal complaint was filed Tuesday. The complaint also noted that he had two convictions for first-degree burglary in 2017.According to Sgt. Timothy Bauer, who oversees the detectives division of Tracy Police Department, the shooting had nothing to do with gangs.“There is no evidence that supports this being a gang-related incident,” Bauer said Wednesday.Police reported that 15-year-old Emilio was shot and found dead next to the nearby railroad tracks on the 900 block of West Sixth Street on June 14. Leads developed during the investigation resulted in the arrests of the three teenagers and Campbell, all Tracy residents.Witnesses say multiple shots were fired about 7:30 p.m. at the dead end of Sixth Street west of Tracy Boulevard. When officers arrived, they found a group of people around Emilio, who had already died.Lt. Tony Sheneman said on the night of the shooting that there were other people, also juveniles, who were shot, but they had left to seek medical assistance at local hospitals before officers arrived.Police said Emilio knew at least one of the four people arrested in connection with his death.Campbell is being held in San Joaquin County Jail without bail, and the three teenagers remain within the juvenile court system, which is not open to the public.Contact the Tracy Press attpnews@tracypress.comor 835-3030.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular videos.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Would you like to receive our daily news?Sign up today!Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Get the latest local news on COVID-19 from the Tracy Press.WESTMINSTER, Colo. (CBS4)– A family who suffered a big loss after a suspected road rage incident that ended in a crash and deadly shooting was given a donation in hopes of making their lives easier.The Denver Toyota Dealer Association delivered a brand new Toyota Sienna to the Bigelow family on Thursday.(credit: Tommy Carlisle)That happened after the family came to the dealership last week to purchase a new car and employees felt compelled to help out the family.(credit: Tommy Carlisle)TOGETHER 4 COLORADO:Latest Stories|Watch ‘Together With Karen Leigh’|Share A Together 4 Colorado Story Idea With CBS4(credit: CBS)The family was targeted in a suspected road rage shooting in Wesminster in June.Vaughn Bigelow Jr., 13, was killed. His mother and brother and another man were wounded in the shooting outside a dentist’s office.(credit: Bigelow family)The suspect, Jeremy Webster, faces first-degree murder and multiple counts of attempted first-degree murder.Jeremy Webster (credit: Westminster Police)LINK:Bigelow Strong FundraisersURL:https://phl.carto.com/api/v2/sql?q=SELECT+*,+ST_Y(the_geom)+AS+lat,+ST_X(the_geom)+AS+lng+FROM+shootings&filename=shootings&format=csv&skipfields=cartodb_idSource:Shooting VictimsThis resource view is not available at the moment.Click here for more information.Download resourceYour browser does not support iframes.You can copy and paste the embed code into a CMS or blog software that supports raw HTMLFour people were shot in the Bronx when a gunman, who is still on the loose, unleashed a hail of bullets early Tuesday, police say.The bullets went flying just before 1 a.m. at West 166th Street and Summit Avenue in Highbridge, according to the NYPD.Three 32-year-old men and a 34-year-old man were all shot. The 34-year-old was hit in his leg and elbow while one of the 32-year-olds was shot in the head and leg, the second was shot in the thigh and chest and the third was shot in both calves. All four victims are expected to survive.The circumstances leading up to the shooting wasn’t immediately known.There are no arrests and cops didn’t elaborate on a description of any suspects.Montgomery authorities have charged two more men in a June quadruple shooting on Virginia Pines Lane despite initial police reports that a suspect arrested on June 12 was the sole shooter.Christopher Ballard, 25, was arrested July 5 in connection to the June 11 shooting. Marquis Hart, 27, also faces charges in the quadruple shooting incident.Montgomery police initially arrested 29-year-old Stacy Coleman on June 12 for the June 11 incident.All three suspects face charges of attempted murder, first-degree assault, discharging a firearm into an unoccupied vehicle, discharging a firearm into an occupied vehicle and two counts of second-degree assault.MPD patrol and Fire medics responded to the 3200 block of Virginia Pines Lane on June 11 at about 6 p.m. in reference to subjects shot. Upon arrival, four adult males were located who had sustained gunshot wounds. All four were transported to a local for treatment; three non-life threatening and one possibly life-threatening, now listed as non-life threatening.More:Man held after woman shot, killed on July 4The initial investigation indicated that the four adult males were in the same vehicle when they were fired upon by an occupant in a second vehicle. Further investigation indicated that the suspect was on foot and that the shooting stemmed from a verbal altercation that resulted in gunfire.Montgomery police identified the suspect on foot as Coleman.More:Suspect charged in Monday shooting that injured fourJon Jankowski, Digital journalistJon Jankowski, Digital journalistORLANDO, Fla.– Orlando Police Officer Kevin Valencia has died from injuries he suffered during astandoff on June 11, 2018when he was shot, according to the Orlando Police Department.“It is with deep regret and heartache that I inform you of the passing of Officer Kevin Valencia,” Chief Orlando Rolon said in a statement Monday.Police said Valencia was shot in the head when he responded to a domestic violence call.[TRENDING:Sheriff: Man cut off grandpa’s ears|Cops kill man suspected of fatally shooting his mom|SpaceX launch creates crazy clouds]It is with deep regret and heart ache that I inform you of the passing of Officer Kevin Valencia. I ask everyone to keep Meghan, their kids, and the entire Valencia family in your prayers.pic.twitter.com/MB039dko5AGary Wayne Lindsey Jr., the maninvolved in the domestic violence call killed four young children and himself, according to investigators.Two of the children killed were kids of Lindsey.During the standoff, Lindsey’s girlfriend gave OPD the key to the apartment.Records show Valencia tried to use the key to open the door, but the key broke.[RELATED:Orlando police sergeant broke policy in shooting that left Kevin Valencia in coma]Valencia started to kick the door and after the second time, Lindsey started firing shots through the door.Officer Valencia was shot in the head.Records show another officer returned fire through the door, this caused the shooter to run.“[T]he decision to kick the door made by Sergeant Amanda White was made in good faith, but was not made to an acceptable standard of performance and was NOT within Orlando Police Department’s Policies and Procedures,” investigator Nick Collins wrote in his report.White told investigators she made the decision to force entry because there were no sounds coming from the apartment.“I felt like the kids, like we needed to get inside for the kids. There was no sound coming from inside,” White told investigators. In another interview, she said it was a “gut feeling that there’s just ... something is not right.”Valencia officially retired on Oct. 20, 2020, from the department and wasawarded a Purple Heart.Five months ago, the police department said Valencia wasshowing signs of improvementfrom his injuries.Valencia leaves behind his wife, Meghan, and their two young sons.“My thoughts and prayers are with Meghan, the kids and my Orlando police family. Officer Kevin Valencia risked his life for this community and paid the ultimate sacrifice,” Orange County Sheriff John Mina said. “He is a hero and will be remembered forever.”My thoughts and prayers are with Meghan, the kids and my@OrlandoPolicefamily. Officer Kevin Valencia risked his life for this community and paid the ultimate sacrifice. He is a hero and will be remembered forever#NeverForgethttps://t.co/qTboADCcqmThe police department shared the news Monday afternoon asking the community to continue their prayers and support for the Valencia family.Rolon said the Valencia family will always be part of the OPD family.“We will do all that we can to honor Kevin’s service to the OPD and the city of Orlando and ensure that our community never forgets the ultimate sacrifice Meghan’s husband and Kaleb and Kolton’s father made for his community,” the statement read.Details on the funeral arrangements have not been made public at this time.The Orlando Police Department posted a video of investigators escorting Officer Valencia.This evening, Officer Kevin Valencia was escorted by our officers, as well as those from other agencies.  Brother, we’ll take it from here...pic.twitter.com/UcywwuLdug“Brother, we’ll take it from here,” OPD posted on social media.Copyright 2021 by WKMG ClickOrlando - All rights reserved.Jon is a Web Producer for ClickOrlando and has been with News 6 since March 2019.If you need help with the Public File, call 407-291-6000.WATCHVIDEOS7 people wounded in shooting at Valley Village party3 hours ago4 hours ago10 hours ago3 hours ago4 hours ago18 hours ago9 hours ago9 hours ago22 hours ago23 hours ago18 hours ago24 hours ago17 hours ago21 hours ago21 hours agoWISH-TV InstagramWISH-TV TwitterWISH-TV YouTubeWISH-TV FacebookIndy Style FacebookAll Indiana FacebookLocalStaff Reports2021-04-10T11:59:03-04:003 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T10:18:18-04:005 hours ago|Aleah Hordges2021-04-10T09:36:22-04:007 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T08:14:08-04:008 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T06:23:57-04:009 hours ago|NationalJay Croft, CNN2021-04-10T15:11:58-04:0057 seconds ago|LISA MASCARO, BEN FOX and LOLITA C. BALDOR, Associated Press2021-04-10T14:04:33-04:004 hours ago|Clare Foran, CNN2021-04-10T08:23:17-04:007 hours ago|JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T08:03:23-04:007 hours ago|JONATHAN LEMIRE and JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T06:46:02-04:008 hours ago|TRENDING PODCASTSSPORTSChris Boyette, Hollie Silverman and Jennifer Henderson, CNN2021-04-10T06:20:11-04:009 hours ago|Gregg Montgomery2021-04-09T22:07:21-04:0017 hours ago|Dan Klein2021-04-09T23:02:09-04:0018 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-09T14:04:08-04:001 day ago|Charlie Clifford2021-04-09T10:19:21-04:001 day ago|INDY STYLEAmber Hankins2021-04-09T15:50:08-04:0023 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:52:12-04:0023 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:52-04:0023 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T16:39:40-04:0023 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:38-04:0023 hours ago|FEATURED POLLTake Our PollCOMMUNITY CALENDARFiled under:Seven people were wounded, one of them critically, when gunmen opened fire early Sunday at a child’s birthday party in west suburban Aurora.Shortly after midnight, officers responded to a home in the 300 block of West Park Avenue and found six people suffering from gunshot wounds, according to Aurora police. A seventh person was driven to a hospital after being shot.Five men — including a 21-year-old, two 22-year-olds, a 25-year-old and a 28-year-old — were among the wounded, police said. The 21-year-old was listed in critical condition. Two women, ages 27 and 30, were also shot. All seven victims are expected to survive.Several male shooters, who biked or walked to the home, opened fire during the party, police said. An attendee then returned fire, and the group took off north on Grand Avenue.Roughly a dozen children were found inside the home after the shooting, which appears to have been gang-related, police said.Anyone with information about the shooting should call Aurora police at (630) 256-5500 or Aurora Area Crime Stoppers at (630) 892-1000. A reward of up to $5,000 is being offered for information that leads to any arrests.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:Six people were shot, one of them fatally, early Sunday in the West Woodlawn neighborhood on the South Side.About 1:10 a.m., the six people were gathered outside in the 6400 block of South Eberhart when someone fired shots from a passing vehicle, Chicago Police said.They were taken to University of Chicago Medical Center, where one of them, 39-year-old Tyrone White, was pronounced dead, police and the Cook County Medical Examiner’s Office said.The five other victims included a 24-year-old man shot in his leg, a 21-year-old man grazed in the head, a 24-year-old woman shot in her arm, a 21-year-old man shot in his leg and a 19-year-old man shot in the back. Their conditions had stabilized, police said.Shortly after the shooting, police taped off the entire block of 6400 South Eberhart. Several cars on the street had bullet holes. One smelled strongly of leaking gasoline.Outside the emergency room of the hospital, a group of women walked outside. One of them said, “He didn’t make it…that’s bogus as hell. They won’t let me go and see my son again.” Another woman in the group was sobbing.Near the intersection of 64th and Eberhart, a film crew was loading trucks with equipment. City records showed that an NBC Universal crew had permits to film at Martin Luther King Drive and 64th Street from 4 a.m. to 5 a.m. Sunday.White lived in the Bronzeville neighborhood, according to the medical examiner’s office.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.KANNAPOLIS, N.C. — Students, parents and police are searching for answers after a gunman open fired at a high school graduation party in Kannapolis Sunday morning.Four teenagers were wounded in the parking lot of Party Rental Plus on South Cannon Boulevard.A woman who spoke to Channel 9 said her brother, a rising high school senior, was at the party and told her that once people heard gunshots, they started running for their lives."My heart really dropped,” said the woman, who didn’t want to be identified. “Everybody started running as soon as they heard gunshots."She said he called her shortly after midnight desperate for help."When I really realized he was actually serious about the shooting on the phone, I was like, ‘Oh my God.’ He was like, ‘They're shooting. They're shooting. Come get me.’"Police said eight shots were fired, hitting four teens, who are expected to recover.Police haven't identified any suspects."He was like, ‘No, I'm for real. I'm running to the Food Lion right now. I heard like seven gunshots and seen somebody drop to the floor,’” the woman said.Detectives said more than 200 people were at the party.Police received a noise complaint about 11:30 p.m. Saturday, and about an hour later, officers responded to a shots-fired call."It's disturbing this could happen so close to home,” said Sherri Kline, who lives nearby.Police said the shooting started after an argument broke out outside the venue.“What did it stem from? I mean what could be that bad that you would open fire?” Kline said."I'd like to see the person responsible caught and brought to justice,” said Jim Morris, who lives nearby.WATCHVIDEOSOne dead, four injured following shooting in North PhiladelphiaJenese Harris, Reporter/weekend anchorChris ParenteauAshley Harding, ReporterErik Avanier, ReporterJenese Harris, Reporter/weekend anchorChris ParenteauAshley Harding, ReporterErik Avanier, ReporterJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– Three people under the age of 20 were killed Tuesday night when someone pulled alongside a silver Chevrolet Cruze on Town Center Parkway just before 11 p.m. and opened fire. A fourth occupant was also shot, but survived.The Jacksonville Sheriff's Office identifies those killed as Trevon Bullard, 18, of Orange Park; Jercoby Groover, 19, also of Orange Park; and Royale D'Von Smith Jr., 18, of Jacksonville.Friends identified the surviving victim as 20-year-old Kenyata Bullard, Trevon's older brother. At last check, he remained hospitalized in serious condition. A family friend said Kenyata Bullard, who goes by the nickname Ace, is an aspiring rap artist who posts his videos on YouTubeThe Sheriff's Office said detectives have determined that the teenagers were targeted based on an ongoing dispute between two groups and the shooting was not a random act of violence.Sheriff Mike Williams told News4Jax that two of the four men shot have ties to a known gang."Not a random act of violence, obviously," Williams said. "It's a tragedy, but one that could have been avoided."Based on social media posts, it appears the four victims were at nearby restaurant celebrating a friend's birthday party. Williams said apparently the rival group followed them to the area.Family members told News4Jax that Groover, whom friends called Coby, was a recent graduate of Lee High School.Groover played football at University Christian, then Lee, wearing No. 4."It made me sick to my stomach," said David Penland, who was Groover's Coach at University Christian. "I started texting all his former teammates and all the guys I knew were close with him."Penland said Groover was a standout running back and safety in high school who went on to play football at a college in Virginia. He said Groover was home for the summer break."He was a good kid. I didn't have any issues with him. He was always smiling. All his teammates loved him," Penland said. "He died too young."A former neighbor said he was an awesome, sweet kid."He was always outside with his friends talking ... always very sweet, polite, well-mannered," the neighbor told News4Jax.Trevon Bullard, who went by the nickname Quan, also played football and graduated last week from Ridgeview High School in Clay County.“I saw him at school all the time because all the my friends played football and he was on the football team," former classmate Jeffrey Dead said.Kshawn Price, who graduated with Trevon Bullard, said he learned about his death through social media."I went on my Instagram and it was all over my feed. It was crazy," Kshawn Price said. "I was just shocked. When I heard about it, my heart dropped. I was, like, 'Bro, I was just with him. I just saw him.'"Jayden Price knew both Bullard brothers. He said he learned about the shooting from classmates when he went to school Wednesday morning.“I wanted to know from his family members because I’m really close to them too," Jayden Price said. "I didn’t want to find out from just a friend or friends at school, I wanted to find out from someone close.”Clay County court documents show Kenyata Bullard was, at one time, under investigation as a suspect in an incident involving shots being fired. According to an arrest warrant, he was charged in connection to shots being fired during a suspected drug deal involving other co-defendants.Jacksonville homicide detectives have not said what led to the violence, but investigators said at least one person in the second vehicle opened fire before driving off. Investigators were not sure if shots were exchanged between the two vehicles.Homicide detectives said this does not appear to be a case of road rage.There was no description of the vehicle that sped away or of who fired the shots. Police were looking through video recorded by surveillance cameras in the area, trying to learn more.PHOTOS:Disturbing scene on Town Center ParkwayPHOTOS:Disturbing scene on Town Center ParkwayThe two businesses closest to the shooting scene, Baptist Emergency Center and the Gate gas station, both told News4Jax that any surveillance video recorded of the incident would have been turned over to investigators. The Baptist ER said it was put on a brief lockdown after of the shooting, but resumed full operations quickly.The University of North Florida sent out an emergency alert early Wednesday morning letting students and staff know it happened near the main entrance to campus, but police did not believe the shooting was connected to UNF."It is unusual for this location, however it could occur anywhere. We aren't sure what the background is," Lt. Craig Waldrup said.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact Crime Stoppers at 866-845-TIPS. Callers can remain anonymous, and information leading to an arrest may be eligible for a cash reward.RELATED STORIES:More young black men die by violence|13 shootings of 3 or more in 30 monthsRELATED STORIES:More young black men die by violence|13 shootings of 3 or more in 30 monthsA small piece of crime scene tape is one of few reminders that remain of Tuesday night’s quadruple shooting. Learning that three were shot and killed on the road connecting UNF to one of Jacksonville's most-popular shopping areas came as a surprise to many people who passed the area Wednesday.Tens of thousands of cars travel daily through the shopping district less than a quarter mile from where the shooting happened. Some told News4Jax that last night’s shooting will make them much more aware of what’s happening around them while they drive.VIDEO:Residents shocked, frightened by Town Center Parkway shootingVIDEO:Residents shocked, frightened by Town Center Parkway shooting"Just surprising because it (is) such a busy area," said David Opdycke, who regularly shops in the area. "You don’t expect to see that kind of thing here in the Town Center.""I was just really glad that my store was closed, none of my friends were working nearby and that a lot of the area was closed at that time," said Jennifer Brady, who works in the St Johns Town Center. "So that was really good."Based on JSO's crime mapping system, in the past six months, within a half-mile radius, there were:A woman who shops in the area was upset to learn of the quadruple shooting.'We're moving pretty soon because of all the crazy crime activity around here," Casie Butzirus said.Many people in the area Wednesday said they still feel safe, but will be relieved once someone is caught."The area is kind of quiet, but we never know who is around really," said Pepé Cueba, who works in the area. "I have kids and, you never know what could happen anytime."Copyright 2018 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.16-year veteran journalist and Emmy Award winning anchorAshley Harding joined the Channel 4 news team in March 2013 and reports every weekday for The Morning Show.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.DALLAS (CBSDFW.COM)– A grandmother will accept a high school diploma for her 17-year-old granddaughter Monday night.That granddaughter is one offive people injured during a shooting at a recreation center football game Sunday night.Relatives told CBS11 the seven-months pregnant teenager has undergone surgery; but, did not deliver early.A young relative was with her and was not harmed; but, asked that we not use her name, telling CBS11 the shooting appeared to go on for several minutes. “When they had stopped shooting, I got up and she was still on the ground. I was like ‘come on get up, we got to go’… And she was like ‘I’m shot, call an ambulance.’ I just panicked from there.”Another woman remains in critical condition, a third woman and two men are stable. According to police, a man pulled out a gun and started spraying the crowd after some kind of disturbance on the field. Several others in the crowd then apparently pulled their own weapons and returned fire.“He started spraying, he just started shooting,” says Quincy Guinyard, full of anger and frustration that the series of friendly football games between Dallas neighborhoods had been marred by violence.Dallas football field shooting“Kids was out here, babies running on the field,” says Guinyard. Tthat could have been my baby, that could have been my sister, my mother, my grandmother… that could have been anyone and it’s wrong.”Now, he, too is among those encouraging witnesses to come forward.“Step forward, says Betty Curley, visiting the Juanita Craft Rec Center Monday. “You don’t have to be identified; but, step forward and tell… let it be known that somebody spoke up.”Curley remembers when Juanita Craft, for whom the rec center is named, was running for Dallas city council. She says she voted for her, then, and believes she can speak for her reaction to the senseless violence now.“She would be hurt,” says Curley, “she really would be hurt.” As for herself, Curley is frustrated that the good people in the community and the progress being made gets overlooked when people promote rather than challenge negative stereotypes. “I am angry and I get angry every day, because this is history over here.”Velma Price, 89, says, “What if someone had been killed? You cannot give back life! Think about what you’re doing before you do it.”Police announced Crime Stoppers is offering a $5,000 reward for information. Witnesses can speak with a Dallas police detective working on the case by calling 214-671-3703.WGN-TVby:Melissa Espana,Courtney GousmanCHICAGO – Family members say a former CPS security guard killed in a drive-by shooting was an innocent bystander when he and three others were shot outside a party in West Englewood early Sunday.Around 2:25 a.m. Sunday, police say, a gathering had formed outside a party on the 1200 block of West 73rd Place when two people inside an SUV drove by and opened fire on the crowd. Four people were struck, including 35-year-old Ari Armour, who family members say was shot in the neck. He was pronounced dead at the scene.A 25-year-old woman shot in the leg and upper body, and a 19-year-old man shot in the leg were taken to University of Chicago Medical Center in serious condition. A 32-year-old man hit in the chest was rushed to Stroger Hospital in serious condition. Police say he is a documented gang member.Family described Ari Armour, the man killed in the shooting, as a football coach, author, and father, whose second daughter was born this April. He had just celebrated his wedding anniversary on May 23.According to the Tribune, witnesses said they were having a birthday party for a relative of at least one of the people that was shot. Ari’s sister, Malorie Armour, says she’s confident her brother was not the intended target, saying he came to the area to meet up with a cousin who was attending the party.“From my understanding, everybody was standing out on the block,” Malorie said. “Somebody shot into a crowd like usual like over 20 times.”Malorie said Ari was “definitely not on the streets causing trouble,” and was the author of a children’s book aimed at helping young kids learn their ABCs in Spanish. She said he also worked previously as a CPS security guard, and an assistant football coach at his alma mater Hubbard High School.“By him working in CPS he seen the need and the disadvantage that the black children have,” Malorie said. “A lot of the kids love my brother. They look up to him.”Pastor and victim’s advocate Donovan Price was near the site of the shooting Sunday to support and pray with families.“There’s a spirit of defeat, and that defeat is what’s coming out of those guns in many cases,” Price said.Police have yet to make an arrest in this case.“We always want to say black lives matter. When will black lives matter to the black?” Malorie said Sunday. “We’re taking out our foundation, piece by piece, and we’re going to be left with gravel in a minute.”The investigation is ongoing.Ari Armour, 35, was shot and killed after an Englewood drive-by.Ari Armour, 35, was shot and killed after an Englewood drive-by.Ari Armour, 35, was shot and killed after an Englewood drive-by.SubmitRAVENEL, S.C. (NEXSTAR) — A South Carolina meat processing and taxidermy business found a collection of bizarre items in the belly of a 445-pound alligator a customer brought in recently.Among the photos of turkey, deer and other game that people brought in recently to be processed, the 12-foot gator stands out among the Facebook photos Cordray's shared.CHICAGO — The Illinois Department of Public Health reported 3,630 new cases of COVID-19 and 13 deaths.The deaths were reported in the following counties:LONDON — Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Philip, also known as the Duke of Edinburgh, took part in planning his funeral and its focus on family was in accordance with his wishes. The 99-year-old duke, who died Friday, also took part in designing the modified Land Rover that will carry his coffin.Markese Davis told his friend Robert McGhee-Gould that they were going to need a handgun on the night of June 2. But Davis was wearing athletic shorts and sweats, so he gave the gun to McGhee-Gould to tuck into his waistband, according to an Omaha police detective’s account.As Davis, McGhee-Gould and other friends hung out near the giant slides in Gene Leahy Mall, a group of 15 members of the Crips gang walked nearby.Davis went to McGhee- Gould, grabbed the gun, brandished it, then returned fire when a Crip began shooting, Omaha Police Detective Matt Backora testified Friday.Caught in the crossfire was Jasmine Harris, an innocent bystander who was shot in the chest by a 9 mm bullet — which police think was fired by the Crip.Harris was taken to a hospital, where she died. Six other people also were shot, including McGhee-Gould, who was shot in the foot.No one has been arrested in connection with Harris’ slaying. But Davis, 20, will stand trial on a charge of being a felon in possession of a firearm, a judge ruled Friday.McGhee-Gould and two other witnesses told police that just before 11:45 p.m. June 2, they saw Davis take hold of a handgun shortly before they heard shots near 11th and Farnam Streets following the Taste of Omaha event, Backora testified.One man contacted Harris’ father through Facebook after seeing news of her death. The man told him he was there and had information to share with the police. The man had been walking with a woman on Farnam Street and encountered the Crips. The man shook hands with one of the Crips he knew as a youth and then continued to walk.The man said he noticed a guy grab a gun from his friend’s waistband. He then heard 10 to 15 shots and ran away.In a police interview, the man identified Davis in a photo lineup as the one holding the gun.Two different types of shell casings — seven .40-caliber casings and 10 9 mm casings — were found at the scene.The area where witnesses said Davis was standing matched where the .40-caliber shell casings were scattered on the ground, Backora said.Joe Howard, Davis’ attorney, said police have not recovered any gun in connection with the shooting and argued that witnesses could have seen a BB or pellet gun.“It really comes down to the credibility of the witnesses in this case,” Howard said after the hearing. “The worst type of evidence, in my humble opinion, is eyewitness testimony, because our minds change. ... Physical evidence usually is much better in terms of determining what happened.”Prosecutor Jim Masteller disagreed with Howard’s BB gun theory.“These felon-in-possession cases where we don’t actually recover the firearm are especially challenging,” he said. “However, we know a BB gun wasn’t used in this case because BB guns don’t shoot real bullets.”Markese L. DavisGet local news delivered to your inbox!Markese L. Davis' arrest was made in connection with the June 2 shooting death of Jasmine Harris, 20, in downtown Omaha, according to Omaha police. Harris was an innocent bystander in a gang-related conflict that occurred shortly before midnight.Markese L. Davis' arrest was made in connection with the June 2 shooting death of Jasmine Harris, 20, in downtown Omaha, according to Omaha police. Harris was an innocent bystander in a gang-related conflict that occurred shortly before midnight.For almost 40 years, the public slides near the intersection of 11th and Farnam Streets have served as a nostalgic enclave for many Omaha families, attracting generation after generation for speedy trips down to the crushed rocks below. Earlier this month, 20-year-old Jasmine Harris was killed in a shooting on the street near the slides after attending downtown’s Taste of Omaha festival.For almost 40 years, the public slides near the intersection of 11th and Farnam Streets have served as a nostalgic enclave for many Omaha families, attracting generation after generation for speedy trips down to the crushed rocks below. Earlier this month, 20-year-old Jasmine Harris was killed in a shooting on the street near the slides after attending downtown’s Taste of Omaha festival.Omaha police have arrested one person in connection with a Saturday shooting downtown that killed one and injured six.Omaha police have arrested one person in connection with a Saturday shooting downtown that killed one and injured six.Omaha police said in a press release Friday that progress has been made in both investigations, but officials said they wanted to keep the cases “in the forefront of the community.”Omaha police said in a press release Friday that progress has been made in both investigations, but officials said they wanted to keep the cases “in the forefront of the community.”Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.BUFFALO, N.Y. — A Buffalo Police spokesperson said five people were hurt in a shooting on the city's east side Saturday night.The shooting happened around 9:15 p.m. on Strauss Street near Broadway.The five who were hurt and other people were at some type of outdoor gathering when the incident happened.All five were taken to Erie County Medical Center to be treated. Two men from Buffalo, both 21, are listed in serious condition. A 27-year-old man from Buffalo is in good condition.A 17-year-old boy was treated and released, and a man, 47, had non-life threatening injuries.Anyone with information is asked to call or text the Buffalo Police confidential tip line at (716) 847-2255.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.TIMMONSVILLE, S.C. – Florence County sheriff's deputies who responded to the May 31 shooting deaths of three people, and wounding of two others, arrived at a neighbor's residence where one of the victims had gone to call for help.Florence County Communications received the initial call at 1:42 a.m. when the neighbor reported that Bobby Jackson was at his house and had been shot and said that his family had all been shot."The neighbor did not know if the shooter was still inside or not," according to the incident report.Deputies were en route at 1:44 a.m. and arrived at the neighbor's house at 1:56 a.m.At least five deputies worked to clear and secure 544 Chaney Grove Road; they found no suspect but did find three bodies, according to the report.Dead inside the house were 39-year-old Cheresse Lutricia Jackson and two daughters, Nykerria Shanyia Jackson, 14, and Breyanna Priscilla Jackson, 11, all of Timmonsville, according to Florence County Coroner Keith von Lutcken.Jackson and an 8-year-old daughter survived.Sardis-Timmonsville firefighters were the first medical responders to arrive, and they treated the survivors – while the 8-year old was held by a deputy – until medics with Florence County EMS could arrive and take them to a hospital.The 8-year-old eventually was transferred to the Medical University of South Carolina where she was treated for several days, discharged and escorted by deputies back to Timmonsville.Jackson has also been discharged. Both Jackson and his daughter face challenges along their road to recovery, said S.C. Rep. Robert Williams, who is speaking for the family."Bobby stated that he did not know who shot him and his family. Bobby stated that the only thing he could think of was that Cheresse had been having problems with a guy and told him that she did not feel safe at home alone at night, so he had been staying with her," according to the report.Two of the responding deputies were called away from the scene later in the morning to a report of another possible murder. The report doesn't indicate where that call was, but deputies are investigating a second killing that took place that morning on North Williston Road.Antwain Lashawn Adams, 35, of 214 Chappel Drive, Bishopville, was arrested at 1:23 p.m. and is charged with three counts of murder and two counts of attempted murder, said Maj. Mike Nunn of the Florence County Sheriff's Office.Digital Editor Matt Robertson is a veteran journalist who has fulfilled just about every role that a newspaper has and now serves as a key member of the Morning News' newsroom by maintainingSCNow.comand covering the occasional story and photo assignment.Get local news delivered to your inbox!LAKE CITY, S.C. – The results of Darla Moore's April 5 letter to the University of South Carolina Board of Trustees reads like the first few lines of a story recapping a typical South Carolina-Clemson football game: Tigers could take advantage of Gamecocks' mistake. The Post and Courier reported Tuesday evening that Moore sent a letter to the board on April 5, four days after the death of her mother, Lorraine.LAKE CITY, S.C. – The results of Darla Moore's April 5 letter to the University of South Carolina Board of Trustees reads like the first few lines of a story recapping a typical South Carolina-Clemson football game: Tigers could take advantage of Gamecocks' mistake. The Post and Courier reported Tuesday evening that Moore sent a letter to the board on April 5, four days after the death of her mother, Lorraine.FLORENCE, S.C. -- Florence County Sheriff's deputies with the agency's narcotics unit with support from two SWAT teams served a search warrant at a Tara Village residence knows as Margaweedaville, arrested two people and seized drugs and cash.FLORENCE, S.C. -- Florence County Sheriff's deputies with the agency's narcotics unit with support from two SWAT teams served a search warrant at a Tara Village residence knows as Margaweedaville, arrested two people and seized drugs and cash.TIMMONSVILLE, S.C.-- Two people are dead after shots were fired into their car Tuesday evening.TIMMONSVILLE, S.C.-- Two people are dead after shots were fired into their car Tuesday evening.FLORENCE, S.C.-- A Florence man faces drugs and weapons charges following a Tuesday traffic stop on TV Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- A Florence man faces drugs and weapons charges following a Tuesday traffic stop on TV Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence Police are searching for a Chevrolet Z-71 pickup truck in connection with an early Friday morning incident in which two people were wounded and several buildings along Church Street sprayed with gunfire.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence Police are searching for a Chevrolet Z-71 pickup truck in connection with an early Friday morning incident in which two people were wounded and several buildings along Church Street sprayed with gunfire.FLORENCE, S.C. — The Black Lives Matter mural in front of the Pearl Moore Basketball Center on Barnes Street has been removed.EFFINGHAM, S.C. — Florence County Sheriff T.J. Joye has a list of accomplishments to his credit, a long-term community-improvement project to …TIMMONSVILLE, S.C. – Count Timmonsville in on Florence County’s industrial building development plan.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence County Sheriff's investigators are asking for the public's assistance to locate three people they want to talk to in connection with the slaying of two motorists on US 76 near Alligator Road.FLORENCE, S.C.-- Florence County Sheriff's investigators are asking for the public's assistance to locate three people they want to talk to in connection with the slaying of two motorists on US 76 near Alligator Road.DARLINGTON, S.C. –  A major road connecting Florence and Darlington may soon be renamed the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway. South Carolina House Speaker Jay Lucas and Rep. Robert Williams are sponsoring a resolution to request the state department of transportation name the portion of Hoffmeyer Road between between the Florence and Darlington County line and west of the Timmonsville Highway (SC Route 340) the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway.DARLINGTON, S.C. –  A major road connecting Florence and Darlington may soon be renamed the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway. South Carolina House Speaker Jay Lucas and Rep. Robert Williams are sponsoring a resolution to request the state department of transportation name the portion of Hoffmeyer Road between between the Florence and Darlington County line and west of the Timmonsville Highway (SC Route 340) the Terrence Carraway Memorial Highway.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Authorities now have in custody an alleged gunman from aMemorial Day weekend shootingin Shreveport that left three people wounded.ElJamario Washington, 22, of the 8100 block of Pines Road, was booked into Caddo Correctional Center Tuesday night. He faces single counts of illegal use of a weapon and aggravated flight from an officer.The shooting occurred May 27 at the Stoner Boat Launch at Stoner Avenue and the Clyde Fant Parkway. Two men were wounded after a barrage of gunfire erupted in the parking lot adjacent to the launch. A third man was taken to the hospital later, Shreveport police said.Officers pursued a light-colored Mercury Grand Marquis that was observed speeding from the scene. Police pursued the car into Bossier City where officers lost sight of it, police said.A warrant for Washington's arrest was issued July 9. His bail is $17,500.More:Inmate dies at Caddo Correctional CenterThe Arapahoe County coroner identified on Wednesday the person who was killed during an altercation outside ofan Aurora nightclub over the weekend.Dejon Andre Leon Williams, 37, died from a gunshot wound to the head, a release from the Arapahoe County Coroner's Office read.The shooting happened just before 2:10 a.m. Sunday in the parking lot of the Kasbah nightclub near East 6th Avenue and North Helena Street.Aurora Officer Kenneth Forrest said the shooting stemmed from a fight inside the establishment that spilled out into the parking lot.Shots were fired during the ensuing melee, Forrest said. Two other men and a woman were also injured.More than three days later, there are no suspects in custodyor suspect information to share. The Aurora Police Major Crimes Unit is investigating the shooting.Anyone with information about what occurred is asked to call Det. Alton Reed at 303-739-6068. To remain anonymous, you can contact Crime Stoppers at 720-913-STOP. You could be eligible for a $2,000 reward.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Two people have been arrested after a shooting in East Price Hill that sent multiple victims to the hospital on Thursday.Around 6 p.m., officers responded to the area of Glenway Avenue and Ross Avenue. Police said the shooting happened when one man tried to rob a group of people playing dice.On Friday, police said there are a total of five people injured, including one who was not shot, but was shot at. Four victims, all males under the age of 21, were taken to University of Cincinnati Medical Center after the shooting.Cincinnati Police Spokesman Lt. Steve Saunders said the two victims with life-threatening injuries are listed in critical but stable condition.On Friday police said Da'von Owens, 21, was charged with five counts of felonious assault and aggravated robbery due to his involvement in the shooting.Owens is being held at the Hamilton County Justice Center on a $1 million bond.According to the incident report on the shooting, one of those shot, a 16-year-old male, was arrested and charged with felonious assault on Thursday. Saunders said he had no additional details on that arrest.Police said a firearm was recovered near the scene. The investigation is ongoing.The shootings Thursday brought the total number of shootings in East Price Hill for the year to 12. During the same period last year, the neighborhood saw 7 shootings, according to Cincinnati police data.As of Wednesday, shootings were down about 39 percent citywide. From Jan 1. to May 23, Cincinnati saw 98 shooting this year compared to 160 in 2017.At 6:30 p.m. Friday, Ceasefire and the Cincinnati Pheonix Program is holding an anti-violence march and neighborhood outreach event beginning at the McDonald's at the corner of Ross and Warsaw avenues.Pete Witte owns a business about half a mile from the site of Thursday's shooting and is the past president of the Price Hill Civic Club.“We’ve got too many guns on the street of Price Hill right now,” Witte said. “There’s too many drug dealers operating here. I think that leads to quite a bit of the gunfire that happens.”He said the police are going to have to focus on that "relatively small piece" of East and West Price Hill where these shootings are occurring.Earlier this month, 20-year-old Jermaine Johnson was killed in a shooting that left another person injured on Rosemont Avenue. That shooting occurred less than a mile from the Thursday incident.”You just start to have an atmosphere that is charged up," Witte said.Anyone with information about this Thursday's shooting is being asked to call Crimestoppers at 513-352-3040.Correction: Police originally reported the shooting was in West Price Hill.Fox 59by:Alexis McAdamsANDERSON, Ind.– A teenager was shot in the chest and three others were wounded at an Anderson block party after investigators say someone opened fire into a crowd.“We just heard like a pop, pop, pop, pop, pop,” said a witness.Investigators say those bullets hit four people including a 19-year-old victim from who was shot in the chest. He was flown by medical helicopter to Indianapolis and is now in stable condition.“The shots were so close by me so I took off running up Madison Street,” said a witness.That witness said she was at the party around 2 a.m. on Sunday in the parking lot of the Davis’ Unique Salon on Madison Avenue when gunshots rang out. For safety reasons, she did not want to be identified but says she was standing just feet away from the teen who was shot in the chest. The witness said when the bullets started flying, people hit the ground to dodge the gunfire. She was scared for her life.“I could have been easily grazed by the bullet but I ran,” she said.Over in the alleyway, the witness says she spotted a man with a gun.“I saw a guy he had a chopper which is like an AK or a big gun,” said the witness.Police believe more than one person fired gunshots that night.“We have a person of interest that has been named that we think is good for the shooting,” said Major Joel Sandefur of the Anderson Police Department.Right now, investigators still working to track down the shooters to try and prevent retaliation. That investigators say they could stem from this shooting but to do that they need help from witnesses.“That is always a challenge that we face. No one has seen anything knows anything but that is something we work with,” said Major Sandefur.SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.Two men wanted in a nightclub shooting that left one man dead and seven injured have surrendered to police.Odarius Black and Dariendejuan Fells turned themselves in Friday night in Lincoln County and are now booked into the Lincoln County Jail under a hold for Hazlehurst Police Department. They had been on the run since May 20, officials said.Hazlehurst Police Chief Byron Swilley told the Clarion Ledger last week that the men would be charged with murder and seven counts of aggravated assault once they were apprehended.It began around closing time at Tootsie's Spot in Hazlehurst when Swilley said police believe there was a fight inside the club. The suspects appeared to have been using handguns, authorities said, adding that it was not clear which one was the shooter, or if both of them were firing shots.Johnathan Miller, 26, was pronounced dead of a gunshot wound around 3:25 a.m. May 20, according to Copiah County Deputy Coroner Rick Akin.Brookhaven Police Chief Kenny Collins said police had been looking for Fells on a warrant for aggravated assault and felony fleeing, and he said Black had recently been released from prison and was still on probation.PEARLAND, Texas — A 12-year-old Alexander Middle School student was arrested and charged Monday for bringing an unloaded gun to school.Pearland police officers found the gun in the student's backpack, which was inside his locker. The tip about the weapon came from another student, according to the school district.The student has been charged with unlawfully carrying a weapon.No one at the school was injured.This investigation is ongoing.ALSO POPULAR ON KHOU.COM:Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.NewsByValerie Wigglesworth,Claire Z. CardonaandMarc Ramirez6:45 AM on May 17, 2018 CDTUpdated at 7:45 p.m.:With details from Facebook Live video.PONDER — A man shot his ex-wife, three children and her boyfriend at a home Wednesday morning in Ponder before turning the gun on himself, officials said.Five people died in the shooting. The ex-wife, the only survivor, was taken to Medical City Denton in unknown condition.The incident was reported about 8:30 a.m. as a burglary in progress, Denton County sheriff's Capt. Orlando Hinojosa said.The Ponder Volunteer Fire Department toldKXAS-TV (NBC5)that they were called to the home in the 600 block of Lone Star Park Lane to tend to someone with a self-inflicted gunshot wound. They later learned that several victims were inside the home.Late Wednesday, the Tarrant County medical examiner's office, which handles Denton County cases, released identities for two of the dead: 39-year-old Justin Painter of Fort Worth and 29-year-old Seth Richardson of Lancaster, S.C.Tarrant County records hold a marriage certificate dated March 14, 2012, for Justin Tyler Painter and Amanda Lee Simpson.Under the “family” section of Justin Painter’s Facebook page are listed a daughter, Caydence Nicole Painter, and two sons, Drake Alexander Painter and Odin Tyler Painter.A Facebook page thought to belong to Justin Painter had a public post from October 2017 that said he was in a “complicated relationship.”In the comments he added: “She is worth fighting for.”Wednesday afternoon, Amanda Lee Simpson posted a distraught Facebook Live video from a hospital bed describing her injuries and her version of events leading up to the tragedy. It ended with her displaying a photo of her three children."I’ve relived it over and over, and every time I close my eyes, I see my babies," she said, noting early in the video that she was under sedation. "I see them dead."In the video, she expressed anger toward the judge who handled her divorce case, saying that her ex-husband had tried to commit suicide and that her warnings to the judge that she considered him mentally unstable had gone unheeded.Tearful throughout the video, she said she hoped her children "knew that I loved them.""You never think you'll lose a child, and I always watch the news," she said. "And I just stopped watching it because too many children get killed."I just don't know what to do."Authorities were not openly discussing possible motives for the shooting. Nor had they disclosed the type of weapon or weapons used in the shootings.Also on Facebook, a woman believed to be Simpson’s sister posted about the shooting.“My heart is broken ... I lost my niece & 2 nephews this morning. Please pray for our family & my sisters recovery Ams Lucas,” read the post from Ashley Rae Sides, whose page parenthetically included the last name Simpson.In an earlier post possibly referencing the Facebook Live video, Sides posted: “You are reading correctly. Amanda has posted but not all the details. Today God gained 3 angels. 3 babies .. Drake, Odin, & Caydence. Please pray for Amanda’s recovery. I will be flying out tomorrow.”At the home, investigators held up white sheets to briefly block the view of the front door Wednesday afternoon while bodies were carried out and placed in waiting vehicles.Two dogs were removed from the home and placed in a neighbor's care, said Hinojosa, the sheriff's captain.Neighbors were shocked by Wednesday’s violence, with some saying that Lone Star Park Lane is a generally peaceful, middle-class neighborhood."I’m surprised that it happened in this neighborhood," said neighbor Diana Booker told NBC5. "Especially on this street. This street is usually the quiet street."Resident Bruce Dotterer told theDenton Record-Chronicle: "We've lived in Ponder now 38 years, been [in our house] for 16 years, and we've never had anything like this. Not around our neighborhood."Mary Jean Dennis told theDenton Record-Chroniclethat she had seen a man and three children between 3 and 6 years old walk toward the house about eight minutes before police were called."I walked past all three of the kids, and they said 'Good morning' and just looked at me," Dennis said. "Had I known a man was going to go in there and do that, I would have stopped. And I'm thinking, 'Why did I not know? Why didn't I sense that something was going to happen?'"Natalie Carr said she had left for work Wednesday morning before the shooting and had heard about it later from a neighbor."It's too close to home," said Carr, who lives across the street and has four kids. "It's very heart-wrenching."She did not know the people in the house but thought they had been living there six to eight months. In that period, she said, she had seen a woman and possibly some men there only a few times.1/2A crime scene photographer takes a photo of a vehicle in the driveway of the Ponder home where Wednesday's shooting occurred. (Rose Baca/Staff Photographer)2/2Denton County Sheriff's officers investigate a crime scene at a home where five people were killed.(Rose Baca / Staff Photographer)Denton County Central Appraisal District records list Lorrena and Walter Lucas as the owners of the house, but they could not be reached for comment. It was unknown if the people inside the house were renting it.Ponder ISD officials said none of the district’s students were listed as living at home where the shootings occurred.The Ponder Police Department is leading the investigation with the help of the Denton County Sheriff's Office, Hinojosa told theRecord-Chronicle.Staff writers Loyd Brumfield and Naheed Rajwani contributed to this report.Valerie WigglesworthClaire Z. Cardona, Breaking News Producer. Claire joined The Dallas Morning News as an intern in 2012. She now writes about crime, other breaking news and the Dallas Zoo. She grew up in New Orleans and graduated with a journalism degree from the University of Texas at Austin.Marc Ramirez. Marc Ramirez is a veteran narrative/lifestyles journalist and food/drink enthusiast. In addition to the Dallas Morning News, he has worked for the Seattle Times, The Wall Street Journal and Phoenix New Times and has degrees from the University of Notre Dame and the University of California-Berkeley. When life gives him lemons, he makes Aviations.Get email alerts on breaking news stories as soon as they happen.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasFour men were shot near a playground in Druid Heights on Monday afternoon, according to Baltimore Police.Investigators combed the narrow 2000 block of Etting St., where police believe the victims were shot around 2:30 p.m. Two were 18: one shot in the chest, another in the leg. Two were 22 years old: one was wounded in the hand, and another, found later, was shot in the butt. All four victims were taken to the hospital for treatment.Blocks away, families sat outside on the marble steps of their houses, doing their best to enjoy the sunshine despite the regular presence of violence they say plagues the neighborhood."The killing is around us, but it's just not in this block here," said Mary Hardy, 66, who sits in a chair outside of her house on Bloom Street every afternoon. On Monday, she was joined by neighbors and family members. The chimes of an ice cream truck could be heard from up the street — a few kids clamored to catch it in time.Fourth Baltimore Ceasefire weekend ends with no fatal shootings; mother charged in son's deathAcross the street, yellow police tape had marked off the scene where the four men had been shot just hours before.Hardy said that even though people sell drugs in the playground nearby, they stay off the little stretch of white sidewalk in front of the home she's lived for over 20 years, where she waters the plants, where her family and friends gather."They give me that much respect," she said. "They let the kids play."Hardy said that she and her neighbors have stopped calling police when they see people selling drugs or worse. She said they fear that police will tell the criminals who reported them."People don't talk. They see things, but they don't talk," she said. "Probably a lot of people wanna come forward and say a lot, but nobody trusts the police. So we just sit back and look."Later Monday a 20-year-old man was shot in the Allendale neighborhood.At about 7:25 p.m., officers found the man with a gunshot wound to the chest in the 500 block of Allendale St., police said. He was transported to an area hospital for treatment.Detectives from the Citywide Shooting Unit are investigating these incidents. Police ask that anyone with information call 410-396-2221 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.ctkacik@baltsun.comtwitter.com/xtinatkacikRecommendedKTLAby:Erika Martin,Kareen WynterA man has been charged with shooting four 15-year-old boys, two of them fatally, in an unprovoked attack last month in South Los Angeles, police announced Friday.Cristian Ivan Macias, 19, is accused of opening fire on the teens in the area of Manchester and Grand avenues, on the southwest edge of the Florence neighborhood, around 1:25 a.m. on May 13, which was Mother’s Day.La’marrion Upchurch and Monyae Jackson were walking with two other friends when they were gunned down “senselessly, for no reason that we can determine at this point in our investigation,” said Los Angeles Police Capt. Peter Whittingham at a news conference held Friday to announce the charges.“I cannot tell you how saddened I was, not just as a police officer but as a parent, getting a call on Mother’s Day: Four 15-year-olds, walking down the street, shot,” Whittingham said.Jackson’s mother, Bridget Green,previously told KTLAthe boys had driven up from Long Beach to attend a party. Just after they left the gathering, they were approached by two men who asked them where they were from then opened fire, she said.Upchurch was pronounced dead at the scene, while Jackson died two days later at the hospital. The other two were hospitalized but later released, police said.Jackson and Upchurch were lifelong friends.Prosecutors allege that Macias is a gang member and, along with two counts each of murder and attempted murder, he faces a sentencing enhancement for allegedly committing the act on behalf of the gang.There is no evidence the victims were in any way affiliated with gang activity, Whittingham said.Surrounded by other family members at Friday’s press conference, Jackson’s brother Kevonte Watkins described the 15-year-old as exceptionally intelligent and bright, someone who drew others in with his outlook.“He was not an ordinary 15-year-old,” Watkins said. “I felt like he was above what a young 15-year-old should have been. I taught him a lot, but also learned a lot from him. I was his positive role model, but also the courage he gave me, the inspiration to be that positive role model in his life.”Watkins also said his brother “wasn’t a bad kid at all,” but he feels he was treated that way when LAPD responded to the scene that Sunday morning and “profiled him as being something that he isn’t.”“I felt like my little brother was victimized not once but twice — not just by the killers, but also by the arriving officers as well,” Watkins said, adding that the teen was handled as an “aggressor” more than as a victim.Officers responding to the scene haddescribed the victims as men in their 20s, not high school students.Watkins said he heard his brother was handcuffed and put into the back of a police car, and after reviewing police documents on the officers’ response he believes “there could have been a different outcome” if first responders had focused on life-saving measures.Whittingham said the handcuffing claim has “been looked into” and that procedures are being addressed. He also defended his officers’ conduct at a scene with multiple victims and unknown suspects.“Don’t confuse some procedural matter with an issue here where we have four 15-year-olds who were shot,” the captain said. “The issue at hand is that we have young black men being killed on the streets of Los Angeles. That has to stop.”Watkins also said he heard there were additional suspects involved in the shooting who remain at large.“Standing here is not a good feeling because I know that they’re still out there,” he said. “Hopefully this message resonates to whoever did this and whoever can come forward and give information.”Police are continuing to pursue any kind of verifiable leads in the case, according to Whittingham.Macias, meanwhile, was being held without bail at the North County Correctional Facility following his June 14 arrest, inmate records show.Police had previously said he was arrested June 15, but that was the day he was booked. The L.A. County District Attorney’s Office then filed charges three days later, on June 18.According to Whittingham, the charges were not announced until Friday because “we wanted to make sure, after consultation with the district attorney’s office and their procedures.”Macias is scheduled to appear in court in July 25.SubmitInternal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.An LAPD officer was taken to a hospital after a carjacking suspect he was chasing crashed into a police cruiser in South Los Angeles early Saturday morning, officials said.The crash happened around 2 a.m. in the area of  64th Street and Budlong Avenue in the Vermont-Slauson neighborhood of South L.A., according to Los Angeles Police Department officials.STOCKTON — A mass shooting Sunday night in southeast Stockton took the lives of a family of three, including a 5-year-old girl, and sent two men to the hospital for treatment of gunshot wounds, police reported.“This is just shocking to our entire community,” Stockton Police Chief Eric Jones said, “especially because this family was together celebrating Mother’s Day.“Based on the type of violence this was, involving parents and a 5-year-old, I haven’t seen this kind of violence in my 25 years. It’s just very impactful and we are working hard to solve it,” Jones said.While he would not get into specifics, Jones said this case is of the highest priority and he urged anyone with information to contact police.By midday Monday, police still had not released information on a motive or possible suspects in the shooting about 10:15 p.m. on East 11th at Belleview streets in the Sierra Vista Homes neighborhood.Two victims were pronounced dead at the scene: Joe C. Lor and Gina Xiong, both 22 of Stockton and the parents of 5-year-old Kayleen Lor, who was pronounced dead at an area hospital, according to police and the San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office.The two men who were hospitalized have not been identified, and their conditions have not been reported.The family was gathered in their home for a Mother’s Day celebration when the shooting occurred. A relative said nine people lived in the two-story duplex.The front window of the home was shot out, and at least five bullet holes could be seen scarring the front of the home. Neighbors reported hearing multiple loud gunshots, as many as 10 or more.Mayor Michael Tubbs issued a statement Monday, describing the Mother's Day incident as “senseless:”“This news is simply heartbreaking. We must hold accountable those that committed this act of violence and support the family, friends and the community impacted by this horrific crime. Today, I have been working with numerous community groups, Stockton Unified and our Police Department, to ensure this community has the resources and support needed to deal with this tragedy.”The Police Department’s observation truck, referred to as SPOT, was placed on the street next to the shooting scene Monday morning and was expected to remain for several days. It is equipped with 24/7 multiple video surveillance cameras and is capable of providing a live feed back to police headquarters.Noting that the victims were members of Stockton’s large Hmong community, Jones emphasized that his department is striving to work with all of Stockton’s diverse communities.“This crime has really impacted our entire community and the Police Department. We will be working diligently with the Hmong community in general so the family gets justice. We will see what we can do to make them feel safer moving forward,” Jones said.“I work with and have met with leaders of the Southeast Asian community. We are always looking for more doors to open,” he said.While Jones would not reveal how much manpower is being dedicated to the homicide investigation, he said it is “a very high priority” for detectives, department staff, neighborhood outreach employees and officers assigned to Sierra Vista.The neighborhood itself, while poor, has seen a turnaround in recent years in terms of crime reduction, increased literacy and a reduction in poverty, Jones said while adding, “This is shocking no matter where it happens in town. … But this is not representative of what has been going on there over the years.”Residents who live near the shooting scene said much the same, referring to how “quiet” Sierra Vista is now compared to several years ago.“All the kids play out here. She was a good little kid,” former neighbor John Johnson said, referring to Kayleen.A GoFundMe account has been set up to help the victims’ loved ones at gofundme.com/remembering-gina-joe-and-kayleen.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Or they can use the Stockton Police Department mobile phone app and also remain anonymous. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Contact reporter Joe Goldeen at (209) 546-8278 or jgoldeen@recordnet.com. Follow him at recordnet.com/goldeenblog and on Twitter @JoeGoldeenSTOCKTON — A mass shooting Sunday night in southeast Stockton took the lives of a family of three, including a 5-year-old girl, and sent two men to the hospital for treatment of gunshot wounds, police reported.“This is just shocking to our entire community,” Stockton Police Chief Eric Jones said, “especially because this family was together celebrating Mother’s Day.“Based on the type of violence this was, involving parents and a 5-year-old, I haven’t seen this kind of violence in my 25 years. It’s just very impactful and we are working hard to solve it,” Jones said.While he would not get into specifics, Jones said this case is of the highest priority and he urged anyone with information to contact police.By midday Monday, police still had not released information on a motive or possible suspects in the shooting about 10:15 p.m. on East 11th at Belleview streets in the Sierra Vista Homes neighborhood.Two victims were pronounced dead at the scene: Joe C. Lor and Gina Xiong, both 22 of Stockton and the parents of 5-year-old Kayleen Lor, who was pronounced dead at an area hospital, according to police and the San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office.The two men who were hospitalized have not been identified, and their conditions have not been reported.The family was gathered in their home for a Mother’s Day celebration when the shooting occurred. A relative said nine people lived in the two-story duplex.The front window of the home was shot out, and at least five bullet holes could be seen scarring the front of the home. Neighbors reported hearing multiple loud gunshots, as many as 10 or more.Mayor Michael Tubbs issued a statement Monday, describing the Mother's Day incident as “senseless:”“This news is simply heartbreaking. We must hold accountable those that committed this act of violence and support the family, friends and the community impacted by this horrific crime. Today, I have been working with numerous community groups, Stockton Unified and our Police Department, to ensure this community has the resources and support needed to deal with this tragedy.”The Police Department’s observation truck, referred to as SPOT, was placed on the street next to the shooting scene Monday morning and was expected to remain for several days. It is equipped with 24/7 multiple video surveillance cameras and is capable of providing a live feed back to police headquarters.Noting that the victims were members of Stockton’s large Hmong community, Jones emphasized that his department is striving to work with all of Stockton’s diverse communities.“This crime has really impacted our entire community and the Police Department. We will be working diligently with the Hmong community in general so the family gets justice. We will see what we can do to make them feel safer moving forward,” Jones said.“I work with and have met with leaders of the Southeast Asian community. We are always looking for more doors to open,” he said.While Jones would not reveal how much manpower is being dedicated to the homicide investigation, he said it is “a very high priority” for detectives, department staff, neighborhood outreach employees and officers assigned to Sierra Vista.The neighborhood itself, while poor, has seen a turnaround in recent years in terms of crime reduction, increased literacy and a reduction in poverty, Jones said while adding, “This is shocking no matter where it happens in town. … But this is not representative of what has been going on there over the years.”Residents who live near the shooting scene said much the same, referring to how “quiet” Sierra Vista is now compared to several years ago.“All the kids play out here. She was a good little kid,” former neighbor John Johnson said, referring to Kayleen.A GoFundMe account has been set up to help the victims’ loved ones at gofundme.com/remembering-gina-joe-and-kayleen.Anyone with information about the case is asked to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Or they can use the Stockton Police Department mobile phone app and also remain anonymous. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Contact reporter Joe Goldeen at (209) 546-8278 or jgoldeen@recordnet.com. Follow him at recordnet.com/goldeenblog and on Twitter @JoeGoldeen© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordnet.com  ~ 530 East Market Street, Stockton, CA 95202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.WREG.comby:Eryn TaylorBarry TunstallMARSHALL COUNTY, Miss. — A 36-year-old man has been arrested in connection to a recent shooting at a block party in Marshall County.Barry Tunstall was taken into custody at his home early Monday morning. He was charged with three counts of attempted murder after allegedly shooting three people a home on French and Berta Road around 3 a.m. Sunday.It’s believed the shooting may have stemmed from an argument over a dice game, authorities said.All three victims are still in the hospital.Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.A shooting at a party near 32nd and Decatur Streets sent seven people to Omaha hospitals Saturday with injuries that were not life-threatening.A caller to 911 had reported hearing about a dozen gunshots and said several people had been shot about 11:25 p.m. Police responding to 3201 Decatur St. did not find any of the wounded.Emergency dispatchers updated the responding officers as the wounded began arriving by private vehicle at three medical facilities: the Nebraska Medical Center, Immanuel Medical Center and Lasting Hope Recovery Center. The one who went to Lasting Hope was taken to the Nebraska Medical Center by Omaha Fire Department paramedics.Injured were Mani Smith-Pittman, 19; Kaleb Johnson, 21; Jacobe Hollingsworth, 21; Moriah Clark-Dismuke, 19; Kalyn Knutson, 17; Lydia Ruiz, 16; and C’Jai Payne, 18, said Omaha Police Officer Michael Pecha, a police spokesman. The wounded reported hearing gunshots but told police they did not see the shooter.The investigation is ongoing. Anyone with information is urged to contact Omaha Crime Stoppers at 444-STOP, atwww.omahacrimestoppers.orgor on the P3 Tips mobile app. Tipsters remain anonymous and are eligible for a cash reward.news@owh.com, 402-444-1304Get local news delivered to your inbox!Jacob K. Osbon, 26, was taken to the Nebraska Medical Center with injuries that were not thought to be life threatening. He's under police guard and will be arrested when he's released from the hospital.Jacob K. Osbon, 26, was taken to the Nebraska Medical Center with injuries that were not thought to be life threatening. He's under police guard and will be arrested when he's released from the hospital.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Follow CBSPHILLYFacebook|TwitterPAULSBORO, N.J. (CBS) —A shooting at a birthday party that took place early Saturday morning in Gloucester County is under investigation.Police in Paulsboro say that three men and one woman were shot outside Elks Club around 1:30 a.m. Another man was injured trying to flee the scene.Credit: CBS3.It is alleged that one man had been punched and knocked down prior to the shooting, but no motive has been confirmed.The victims were brought to a police station before they were taken to the hospital.Two of the men are believed to be in critical condition.According to Police Chief Vernon Marino, the shootings are believed to be an isolated event and the community should not be concerned.More than one shooter is believed to have been involved.No suspects have been arrested at this time.Police are asking that anyone with information about the incident to contact Detective Sgt. Ridinger or Detective Minnitti of the Paulsboro PD at 856-423-1101 or the borough police anonymous tipline at 856-423-6222. They can also call Detective Michael Bates of the Gloucester County Prosecutor’s Office at 856-384-5552.(Credit: KMOV)Detectives are investigating a quadruple shooting in the Penrose neighborhood. ( Credit: KMOV)Digital Content Producer(Credit: KMOV)Detectives are investigating a quadruple shooting in the Penrose neighborhood. ( Credit: KMOV)Detectives are investigating a quadruple shooting in the Penrose neighborhood Friday.The shooting happened just before 7 p.m. in the 4800 block of Farlin Ave. Upon arrival, officers located two adults and two children, a 5-year-old and 13-year-old, suffering from gunshot wounds.Police said two black cars drove down the street and opened fire, striking the victims as they were getting out of a car.The victims were transported to an area hospital.Both adults and one of the children are listed in serious condition while the other child is in critical condition, police said."We have innocent victims, we have victims who were unintended targets and if we don't have the information to solve that it makes it very difficult to figure out these relationships," said St. Louis Police Department Captain Perri Johnson. " Or who's involved so we can cut down on whats going on here."According to authorities, multiple weapons are believed to have been used during the shooting.Anyone with information is urged to contact local law enforcement.Copyright 2018 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Digital Content ProducerSun and clouds mixed. High 68F. Winds NW at 10 to 20 mph..A clear sky. Low around 45F. Winds WSW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:52 pmServing Southeast Oklahoma Since 1896Bradley Webster was identified as the suspect in the Talihina shootout with law enforcement.Officials released the identity of the suspect behind the Talihina shootout — and the man has a criminal history.Bradley Daniel Webster, 52, of Talihina, was identified as the suspect that was shot and killed by law enforcement officers who were attempting to execute a search warrant on the morning of May 11, according to Oklahoma Highway Patrol Cpt. Paul Timmons.Four troopers suffered minor injuries from either shrapnel from the explosion or from gunfire; a fifth trooper was struck in his bulletproof vest which stopped the round from penetrating and ultimately saved his life, according to OHP.OHP identified the injured troopers as Brett Stephens, Brandon Seward, Sammy Lee, Chris Bunch, and Chance Tuttle. The troopers were treated and released from a Talihina-area hospital the same day.The investigation into the resulting fire that destroyed two historic buildings in downtown Talihina is still ongoing, but officials believe that Webster, based on his criminal history, may have had the building “booby-trapped.”Timmons said during the May 11 press conference that the suspect has "a violent criminal history" and made threats against law enforcement in the past.Webster also has previous run-ins with law enforcement, including an active criminal case.LeFlore County District Court documents show Webster is named in an active criminal court case for charges including felony throw or drop object on motor vehicle, felony malicious injury to property – over $1000, and misdemeanor breaking and entering without permission. Police allege in the case that Webster used a rock to damage a vehicle before allegedly breaking into the vehicle.Records show Webster waived his rights to a preliminary hearing on May 3 and was scheduled for formal arraignment on May 29.A supplemental information sheet prepared by the office of District 16 District Attorney Jeffrey Smith states Webster was convicted in 2007 for felony first degree endangering welfare of a minor and was sentenced to six years.The News-Capital obtained documents from the Circuit Court of Polk County, Arkansas, that state Webster was also convicted and sentenced to the following under the same court case number:1. Ten years for felony possession of a schedule six controlled substance with intent to deliver2. Ten years felony possession of drug paraphernalia3. Six years for felony possession of a defaced firearm4. Ten years for manufacturing a schedule six controlled substanceAccording to the documents, counts one through four "shall run concurrent" and the fifth count "shall run consecutive" to the other counts for a total sentence of 240 months. Webster was credited with 311 days served in jail, court documents state.Arkansas Dept. of Correction documents state Webster came into custody on March 23, 2007 and was released on parole Sept. 3, 2009 — a total of 895 days.The charges stemmed from an April 2006 home invasion that turned deadly. According to a probable cause affidavit prepared by then-Polk County, Arkansas, Sheriff Mike Oglesby, Webster shot and killed two men — Chris Pangle and Thai Flores, both of Henryetta, Oklahoma — who broke into his then Mena, Arkansas residence — with guns while wearing ski masks.Webster told investigators that “he was not a violent person” and stated he was at home when two men broke the sliding glass door and set off the beeper alarm on the door, the affidavit states. Webster says he saw possibly three people enter the room before he was shot in the right lower abdomen by one of the men, according to the affidavit.The affidavit states Webster then returned fire in the general direction of the intruders and stated he only recalled striking one and did not know if he shot any of the others, the affidavit states. Documents show Webster was not charged in the two deaths.According to the affidavit, statements from two other men that were with Pangle and Flores that night admitted to investigators that “they were coming to Mena (Arkansas) to rob Webster,” which cleared Webster of any charges for the deaths.A search warrant of the house after the incident revealed a 9 mm submachine gun, which was defaced with no visible serial number and was modified to fire fully automatic, the affidavit states.The search also revealed an enclosed room with “an elaborate hydroponic marijuana growing operation,” while a second room was also found to have a marijuana growing operation in it and a total of 292 marijuana plants were found from the search conducted by the Arkansas State Police, the affidavit states.According to the affidavit, Webster’s wife, Amy, and then 17-month-old son were in the house at the time of the incident. Amy Webster was arrested for being an accomplice in the marijuana operation and the child was taken into temporary custody of the Arkansas Department of Human Services, the affidavit states.The investigation into the May 11 incident is still under investigation by multiple agencies, including the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, and the Fire Marshal’s Office.Contact Derrick James atdjames@mcalesternews.comSorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Sign up now to get our FREE breaking news coverage delivered right to your inbox.First Amendment:Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.Police investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comUPDATEDat noon Thursday with ages, other details.ST. LOUIS •One man was in critical condition and three others were wounded after a quadruple shooting Wednesday afternoon near Union Boulevard and Minerva Avenue.Police responding to a shooting call about 4:30 p.m. in the 5200 block of Minerva Avenue found three men with gunshot wounds, police said. One, 20, had been shot in the shoulder. Another, also 20, had been shot in the foot. The third, 24, was shot in the arm.All three were conscious and breathing when they were taken to a hospital, police said. They were said to be stable, but their medical conditions were not available.A fourth victim of the shooting was dropped off at a hospital where he was in critical but stable condition, police said. He had an apparent gunshot wound to his back.The victims told police an unknown man with a bandana pulled over his face opened fire on them.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Reporter covering breaking news and crime by night. Born in Algeria but grew up in St. Louis. Previously reported for The Associated Press in Jackson, Mississippi and at the Wichita Eagle in Wichita, Kansas.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Police investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comPolice investigate the scene of a quadruple shooting on the 5200 block of Minerva Ave, Tuesday, May 8, 2018, in St. Louis. Photo by Nikos Frazier,nfrazier@post-dispatch.comGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Main NavigationEyebrow MenuApril 9, 2021 11:11 pmApril 9, 2021 10:42 pmApril 9, 2021 9:36 pmApril 9, 2021 6:33 pmApril 9, 2021 6:19 pmApril 9, 2021 4:50 pmMore Weather >>More Weather >>More Weather >>Sign up for our Breaking News email alerts!© 2021 KLKN-TV.SAN DIEGO (NEWS 8) - Detectives on Tuesday continued investigating a shooting spree near Petco Park that wounded five people.Paramedics took all five victims to local hospitals with injuries that were not expected to be life-threatening.Four victims were wounded just after 11 p.m. Monday on the corner of 15th Street and Island Avenue, four blocks south of the San Diego Police Department's headquarters, and a fifth victim was wounded a few blocks east of the first shooting scene, San Diego police Officer John Buttle said.RELATED:Homicide Investigation: 3 people killed in separate San Diego shootingsOne witness told News 8's Chris Gross she heard at least 12 to 15 gun shots from her condo.As of 7:30 a.m., no suspects were identified and no arrests were made, Buttle said.Police say two men wearing dark clothing approached a group of four people standing in the 500 block of 15th Street and began shooting at them, Buttle said. All four people -- reportedly three men and a woman -- were wounded.Investigators suspect the initial attack may have been gang-related, Capt. Mike Holden said.A fifth victim was shot in the 1800 block of Island Avenue near where the road cross above Interstate 5, about three blocks east of where the four people were shot, Buttle said.Both suspects were described as black men in their late teens or early 20s, about 6 feet to 6 feet 2 inches, and dressed in all black clothing. Holden said that the suspected gunman was wearing gloves and the other man was wearing a pullover sweatshirt with blue or white squares on the front.The shootings late Monday happened less than a mile and a half from where a man was fatally shot Sunday night in the area of 28th and Sampson streets in Logan Heights. Earlier on Sunday, two men died at a hospital after they were gunned down near Mountain View Park, less than two miles from the Barrio Logan shooting and about three miles from Monday's shootings.Detectives are working to determine if the Sunday afternoon, Sunday night and Monday night shootings are related. But as of Tuesday morning, any connection between the violent incidents was unclear.Anyone with information about Monday's shooting was asked to call SDPD at(619) 531-2000or San Diego County Crime Stoppers' anonymous tip line at(888) 580-8477.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.WREG.comby:Mitchell KochJarmon Smith, 24MEMPHIS, Tenn. — A man was indicted in connection to aMay 2018 shootingthat lefttwo victims deadin a car outside theCrosstown Concourse.Jarmon Smith, 24, is facing two counts of first-degree murder, four counts of attempted first-degree murder and four counts of the employment of a firearm in the commission of a dangerous felony.The incident on May 6, 2018, started around 9:30 p.m. that night on North Cleveland near North Watkins. Smith’s vehicle pulled alongside another, and he fired multiple shots into the other car, according to the indictment.Dejaun Hill, 18, and DeAndre Rogers, 18, were both killed. The two deceased and four other critically injured victims, with ages ranging from 14 to 22, were found in their car outside of the Crosstown Concourse.Witnesses on the scene at the time said they heard about 13 gunshots and a loud boom, which seemed to be from a car accident that followed the shooting.Smith is being held on a $2 million bond.Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.CBS17.comby:CBS 17 staffHenderson police are investigating a shooting that left four people injured on May 4, according to a press release sent out Tuesday.Around 11:27 p.m., police were dispatched to 519 Hilliard St. and upon arrival, found four people who had been shot.Thomas Williamson, 47, Latoya Taylor, 36, Travis Williams, 23, and Dana Elliott, 26, had all been shot and were transported to local hospitals for treatment, police said.Henderson police are working with the North Carolina State Bureau of Investigation to solve the crime.Anyone that has information is asked to contact the Henderson Police Department at 252-438-4141 or Crime Stoppers at 252-492-1925. Callers may remain anonymous.WHAT OTHERS ARE CLICKING ON:NEARLY 10 FOOT LONG ALLIGATOR CAUGHT AT OUTER BANKSVIDEO: MARYLAND DEPUTY FATALLY SHOOTS GROUNDHOG AS IT CROSSES ROADJUST DAYS AFTER PURCHASE, FAMILY MOVES OUT OF METH-CONTAMINATED HOMEUS HOUSE MEMBERS, LEGISLATORS SEEK NC PRIMARY WINSWAKE COUNTY TIGHTENING DATA SECURITY FOR TUESDAY’S PRIMARY ELECTIONCopyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.RALEIGH, NC -- People are packing the North Carolina State Fairgrounds looking to cure a common side effect of the pandemic with the return of the Southern Ideal Home Show."We've all been sitting home for the past year looking at our houses seeing all of the different things we'd like to fix," said Tina Robinson, manager of the Southern Ideal Home Show.DURHAM, N.C (WNCN) - An investigation is underway following an early morning shooting at Waffle House located in the 1600 block of TW Alexander Drive.Authorities say a woman was injured in the shooting. She was transported to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.DURHAM, N.C. (WNCN) -- Recently, grassroots political organization, Durham For All, sent a letter to Durham City Council.In it, was a demand for change.Four people were shot at a house party in Chicago Heights Friday night, authorities reported.One victim is a 28-year-old woman from Homewood whom Chicago Heights police found lying in the backyard with gunshot wounds to her chest and arm.She was transported to St. James Hospital in Chicago Heights and her condition was not available Sunday afternoon.Police later discovered that three more shooting victims had checked themselves into the emergency room at St. James.A 20-year-old woman from University Park had a gunshot wound to her left foot, an 18-year-old woman from Chicago Heights had a gunshot wound to her left thigh and an 18-year-old man from Sauk Village had gunshot wounds to his chin and left leg. The three were treated and later released from the hospital.Police said all four victims were attending a party in the 200 block of East 23rd Street.Police are asking anyone with information to call 708-756-6422.Frank Vaisvilas is a freelance reporter for The Daily Southtown.CONNECTTRIBUNE PUBLISHINGCOMPANY INFOCopyright © 2021, Chicago TribuneFiled under:A second man is facing multiple felony charges in connection with a shooting last month in the Homan Square neighborhood that wounded five people, killing one.Issaiah Hayes, 22, of the Gresham neighborhood, is charged a count of first-degree murder in the fatal shooting of 21-year-old Nakia Bailey and four counts of attempted murder, according to the Cook County State’s Attorney’s Office.He was was ordered held without bail at a hearing Friday at the Leighton Criminal Court.Dressed in a long sleeve black shirt, blue pants and wearing bright red gym shoes, Hayes looked back into the courtroom gallery several times, but was stoic as he listened to the case against him.Prosecutors said Hayes opened fire from the rear passenger seat of a silver sedan at a group of people standing outside about 9:40 p.m.May 2 in the 3500 block of West Grenshaw.The other accused shooter and the alleged driver of the sedan,31-year-old Barry Smith of the Lawndale neighborhood, was previously chargedwith the same counts and ordered held without bail at a hearing June 9.Smith and Hayes were identified by witnesses who saw both men in the car as it drove in the block toward the group, Assistant State’s Attorney Jamie Santini said in court Friday. After stopping the car in front of the group, Hayes and Smith pointed their guns out the window and opened fire.Five people were wounded in the shooting and all were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital, according to authorities. Investigators recovered  11 shell casings at the scene, which subsequent analysis showed had been fired from two different weapons, according to Santini.Bailey was struck by three bullets, prosecutors said. She died the next day at Mount Sinai Hospital, according to the Cook County medical examiner’s office.The four others who were wounded — two 19-year-old men, an 18-year-old man and a 17-year-old boy — were treated and released, prosecutors said. One of the 19-year-olds was left paralyzed in the attack.Hayes’ attorney asked for a reasonable bond to be set in his case, pointing out that prosecutors did not say that a witness saw Hayes fire a gun. She also questioned why it took prosecutors more than a month to bring charges in the case.Judge Sophia Atcherson said she found Hayes to be a danger to the community and ordered him held at the Cook County Jail without bail. His next court date was set for July 5.Smith is scheduled to appear in court next on June 28, according to the Cook County Sheriff’s Office records.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.MINNEAPOLIS (KMSP)-Two people have been charged in connection with ashooting in Little Earth neighborhoodof Minneapolis that injured six people Wednesday night.Rico King, 21, of Minneapolis was charged with five counts of second-degree assault for shooting five people, according to Hennepin County Attorney Mike Freeman. Georgina Kellum, 35, of Crystal, was charged with one count of aiding an offender-accomplice after the fact. They made their first court appearance on Friday afternoon and will have their next appearance on Monday.A 14-year-old also took part in the shooting, but because he is a minor, his name and proceedings will be confidential."What's a 14-year-old doing with a handgun shooting people up?" said Freeman. "You know, police and prosecutors do what we can. The police arrest everyone who has a gun who shouldn't have. We charge all felons in possession with that crime and we convict a lot of them. But society has got to do more about removing handguns off the streets."The shooting took place at 7:45 p.m. near the intersection of 24th Street and Ogema Place. When officers arrived, they encountered a “chaotic scene of over 50 people,” according to the charges. Investigators have previously said the shooting started with a fight.Six people, including one juvenile, were struck by gunfire. The victims were taken to the Hennepin County Medical Center, where two of them remain in critical condition.AdvertisementOfficers recovered multiple discharged cartridge casings and several firearms, including an assault-style rifle, from the scene.Police have identified all three gunmen seen on surveillance video. Two of the gunmen, King and the 14-year-old, were seen firing their weapons. The third gunman, who appeared to be carrying the assault-style rifle, was unable to get the firearm out from under his clothes.In the aftermath of the shooting, Kellum obtained the gun used by the 14-year-old. Kellum lied to investigators about the gun, but police found it on her while she was being booked into the Hennepin County Jail.The Hennepin County Attorney’s Office has not released additional details on the juvenile or the third gunman.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsWATCHVIDEOS1 dead, 4 injured in drive-by shooting in Brownsville, BrooklynNEW ORLEANS – Police say five people were hurt in an early morning shooting in the St. Claude neighborhood Tuesday morning.According to the New Orleans Police Department, the shooting happened around 12:46 a.m. in the 3200 block of St. Claude Avenue. Officers arriving at the scene found three people with gunshot wounds. Officers later learned that two other people with gunshot wounds arrived at a local hospital by car.Roommates Bonnie Salvagio and Angelina Thomas were about to go to bed when the gunfire erupted outside their windows.“I heard an automatic weapon discharge probably about nine times it sounded like. They emptied their clip,” Salvagio said. Thomas agreed. “All the sudden I just hear ‘boom boom boom,' I thought someone was breaking into the house,” Thomas said.When they looked outside they saw a man slumped against their porch and several more people lying on the sidewalk.“There was blood in the street, dripping down the sidewalk and dripping across the grass,” Salvagio said.(story continues under video)Thomas and Salvagio say the man on their porch was shot in the back and asking for water. They got him a bottle and tried to reassure him as they waited for police. Once first responders arrived, Thomas shot video with her cell phone.They're now trying to clean the blood off their porch and they're assessing the damage to their cars. One car had a flat tire and another had the back windows shot out. Cars can be replaced but their sense of security is shattered.“I'm probably going to be moving,” Salvagio said.For Salvagio and Thomas, shootings across the city had never directly impacted them until last night.“This brings the violence in New Orleans very close to me,” Salvagio said. “I was in the crime scene, this brings it literally to my front door.”Police say one victim suffered a gunshot wound to the shoulder, however an update on the conditions of the victims are not known at this time.The investigation into the shooting is still ongoing.Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact NOPD fifth district detectives at 504-658-6050. Residents can also report information to Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.DEERFIELD BEACH, FLA. (WSVN) - Authorities are investigating an overnight shooting at a packed Deerfield Beach club that left four people injured.Broward Sheriff’s Office deputies responded to the Tropicante nightclub, located along Northeast 42nd Street and Dixie Highway, Monday, at around 2:30 a.m.According to a witness, an after-party was taking place inside the crowded club, and that’s when a man got punched, pulled out a gun and began firing.A witness who was inside during the shooting said she is lucky to be alive after seeing two of her friends get shot.“Next thing you know, the boy pulled out the gun and – pow, pow, pow,” said witness Maya Hall. “One person punched him in the face, and after that he pulled out the gun and just started shooting.”Hall added, “I was like ‘God, just please watch over me at this point.’ I just heard the bullets, I seen them flash before my eyes. It could have hit me in the chest or anything. I was just on the ground, just praying not to let that happen to me or my people.”Four people were shot, one person in the elbow and another in the chest.“One of our homeboys got shot, and my cousin, she got cut up real bad,” said Hall, “and my other cousin got shot up in the elbow.”Paramedics transported the victims to Broward Health North. Their conditions are currently unknown.One of the victims underwent surgery Monday morning.This isn’t the first time authorities have responded to this club. Back in May 2017, a man was shot, and the subject fired at deputies. In 2015, three people were also shot.During a particular month, there were 15 calls about incidents at the nightclub.Area residents told 7News it’s time to shut down Tropicante.“Why are they shooting, anyway?” said a man who lives nearby. “They shouldn’t be shooting. People are working here and stuff.”Deerfield Beach officials are looking into the nightclub in an attempt to determine whether or not it is a nuisance, and if anything can be done.The shooter has yet to be identified.If you have any information on this shooting, call Broward County Crime Stoppers at 954-493-TIPS. Remember, you can always remain anonymous, and you may be eligible for a $3,000 reward.Copyright 2021 Sunbeam Television Corp. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.WASHINGTON (WUSA9) — Four men are injured and a portion of New York Ave. was shut down after an early morning drive-by shooting.According to Metropolitan Police, the violent night on the streets of northeast DC began when they received a report of a shooting in the 3600 block of New York Ave. around 1:57 a.m.  Police rushed to the scene where they found a sedan with windows shot out, and four men suffering from various gun shot wounds.  It was later determined that the men were all shot while traveling in the eastbound lanes of New York Avenue, by suspects in another vehicle.All four victims have been transported to a local hospital where they are expected to recover.So far there is no information available on possible suspects or motive in the shooting.A mile-long stretch of the eastbound lanes of New York Ave. was closed between Bladensburg Rd. and South Dakota Ave. while crime scene investigators collect evidence, but have since reopened.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Three men — one of them a former police officer — helped disarm a man who allegedly shot two of his neighbors with a handgun at an apartment complex in Wartburg, Tennessee, on Sunday evening, according to court records.The suspected shooter, 58-year-old Jerry Bell, was arrested and charged with four counts of aggravated assault and one count of reckless endangerment with a deadly weapon, according to arrest warrants.More news:4 wounded in Knoxville shootings over 2 days, police sayTennessee Bureau of Investigation agents, Wartburg police officers and Morgan County sheriff's deputies responded to Sunnyside Estates, 519 S. Kingston St., after the shooting was reported at 6:30 p.m.Wartburg Police Department Capt. Mike Wren spoke to former police officer Kevin Lively, who reported witnessing Bell leave his apartment and shoot 19-year-old Jacob Kimbro with a pistol, Wren wrote in a warrant.Several witnesses said Bell then walked into another apartment and shot resident Jason Stover, according to the warrant.Lively, along with Timothy Armes and Nicholas Cooper, both 30, entered the apartment and tried to disarm Bell, the warrant states.During the struggle, another shot was fired. The bullet grazed Armes and Cooper, burrowed through the ceiling and entered the apartment upstairs, according to the warrant.Kimbro and Stover were taken to the University of Tennessee Medical Center, where they were treated and released. Armes and Cooper had minor injuries, and they refused treatment.Police said the shots Bell fired exposed "numerous" people, including children, to "extreme danger."He was booked into the Morgan County jail in lieu of $150,000 bond.As of Monday evening, authorities had not released information on a possible motive for the shooting.Deondre Cabine, 24, and Charles Ray Justice, 35, each died of multiple gunshot wounds, according to the King County Medical Examiner's Office.The King County Sheriff’s Office is following multiple leads in a deadly early Sunday morning shooting in the parking lot near a motorcycle club in Skyway.Deondre Cabine, 24, and Charles Ray Justice, 35, were identified by the King County Medical Examiner’s Office as the men who died of multiple gunshot wounds.Five others were hurt — including two others with gunshot wounds — in an after-hours shooting, according to the King County Sheriff’s Office and media reports.Sheriff’s spokesman Sgt. Ryan Abbott said the two men were killed in a wild shootout in which the victims were driven from the scene in private cars before deputies arrived to find a parking lot strewn with shell casings. Cabine died in the parking lot of a nearby McDonald’s, where medics tried to save him, Abbott said.The driver of the car and another passenger were so traumatized by the incident they had to be hospitalized, as well.The other victim, Justice, was driven by private car to Valley Medical Center, where he died, Abbott said.“They are following up on a ton of leads and still in interviewing witnesses,” but the motive is still unknown, Abbott said.The Sheriff’s Office said the shooting occurred in a parking lot shared by the Skyway VFW Club and Tha Family Motorcycle Club about 4 a.m. in the 12600 block of Renton Avenue South.  The initial calls were that there was a large fight, followed shortly thereafter by several 911 reports of gunfire.The Renton Patchreported the parking lot is the frequent site of after-hours parties.A representative with Tha Family said while they had opened the club to the public and other motorcycle clubs Saturday night, but none of their members were involved in the shooting.“Tha Family members were inside the club when it happened,” said the club member, who didn’t want his name used. “No one involved was a family member. No one who got hurt was a family member.”“We take the precautionary steps to prevent this from ever happening,” including security, he said.Abbott confirmed there were four security guards working at the club, when the shooting started.The club member said people were dancing, listening to music and talking inside the clubhouse while a members of a Portland motorcycle club were hanging out in the far parking lot. That’s when he heard gunshots.“My security was huddled behind cars and … we stood by the gate making sure no one was coming inside,” the club, he said. “It was kind of mayhem.”UNION COUNTY, N.C. -- Police arrested a man wanted in connection with a shooting that left a man dead and three others hurt in Union County last month.Torey Brooks, 36, was taken into custody without incident on May 16 after tips led investigators to his location, according to authorities.Monroe Police responded to a call of a shooting in the 1500 block of Massey Street on April 29. Upon arrival, found the body of 22-year-old David Duncan Jr. inside the residence's kitchen area.During the investigation, three people showed up to area hospitals with gunshot wounds. According to police, 49-year-old Rene Lowery was treated and released from CMC Union and 41-year-old Joshua Robinson and 26-year-old Jessica Gibson were both transported to CMC Main. Police later determined that the three individuals were all shot at the same location on Massey Street.Following investigations, Monroe Police and the State Bureau of Investigation issued a warrant for Brooks. He was wanted for first-degree murder, three counts of assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill, inflicting serious injury and possession of firearm by felon, according to Monroe Police.As the investigation continues, the mother of one of the victims wants to know, "why?"Duncan's mother, Melissa Lee, was inside when shots rang out."I'm still in shock," Lee said. "Everyone liked David. He was always happy."After the shooting, Gibson was treated and released from the hospital and Robinson was in critical condition.NBC Charlotte's Richard DeVayne contributed to this story.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.MenuA suspect was arrested Thursday morning in southern Georgia in connection with thefatal shooting of a Greenacres mother at a Puerto Rican nightclub last month.The Palm Beach County Sheriff's Office said in a news release that Marcus Hull, 29, was taken into custody in Tifton, Ga.RELATED:Security guard shares story of deadly nightclub shootingKassandra Morales, 24, was killed April 29 at La Isla Del Encanto nightclub located at 1969 South Military Trail.Hull faces first-degree murder, three counts of attempted murder with a firearm and aggravated assault with a firearm.PBSO said their tactical team was able to track and locate Hull in southern Georgia.Hull was taken into custody without incident Thursday. He is currently awaiting extradition back to Palm Beach County.CBS17.comby:WBTWFive people were shot early Saturday morning at a party in Robeson County.According to Robeson County Sheriff Ken Sealey, the shooting occurred around 2 a.m. at a party off a private dirt road just off Modest Road in the Maxton area.Sealey said there were about 300 people at the party when an argument broke out.Five people were shot and are expected to recover. All five were taken to the hospital, one had to have surgery after being shot in the hand.The case is still being investigated. Anyone with information is asked to call the Robeson County Sheriff’s Office.WHAT OTHERS ARE CLICKING ON:TODDLER WHOSE PARENTS FOUGHT TO MAINTAIN LIFE SUPPORT DIESCHAPEL HILL MAN KILLED AFTER EXITING CAR FOLLOWING CARY MOTORCYCLE CRASH, OFFICIALS SAYMISSING HALIFAX WOMAN FOUND DEAD IN CREEK NEAR HER HOME; GRANDSON CHARGED WITH MURDERFORMER NASCAR DRIVER JAMES HYLTON AND SON KILLED CRASH3 RESCUED FROM NEUSE RIVER AFTER FALLING OUT OF CANOE, RALEIGH OFFICIALS SAYCopyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) -- St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were seven people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.LONDON (AP) — British authorities have implored people to stay away from royal palaces as they mourn the death of Prince Philip in this time of COVID-19, but they keep coming. Not just to honor him, but to support Queen Elizabeth II, who lost her husband of 73 years.The mix included children, seniors, Sikhs and the children of African immigrants. A cross-section of British society and admirers from abroad descended on Buckingham Palace and Windsor Castle on Saturday. They laid bouquets at the gates, offered prayers or just paused for a moment of reflection as they remembered a man who dedicated much of his life to public service.MOSCOW (AP) — Voters in Kyrgyzstan will cast ballots Sunday on whether to approve a new constitution that would substantially increase the president’s powers in this impoverished Central Asian nation.The referendum comes three months after Sadyr Zhaparov was elected president, following the ouster of the previous president amid protests, the third time in 15 years that a leader of Kyrgyzstan had been driven from office in a popular uprising.FOX 2by:Kelley Hoskins,Joe MillitzerST. LOUIS, MO — A suspect is now in custody after a triple murder in north St. Louis County. Demetrius Davis, 27, has been charged with three counts of Murder in the First Degree, one count of Assault in the First Degree, and four counts of Armed Criminal Action. He is being held without bond.Police saythe crime happened Wednesday nightat a house on Northdale Avenue in Spanish Lake. Police first found a 49-year-old woman shot in the street. She remains hospitalized. Family members identified her as Yolanda Solano.The murder victims have been positively identified as Timothy Solano, 20, who lived at the home, Brandon Stephenson, 36, or Florissant, and Melissa Tierney, 40, of St. Louis.Contact the St. Louis County Police Department at 636-529-8210 or CrimeStoppers at 1-866-371-TIPS(8477) if you have any information in this case.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.ReporterThe shooting happened at the Waffle House on Murfreesboro Pike. (Photo: Metro Nashville Police Department)Investigators are combing through dozens of electronics seized from Travis Reinking's home.In addition to cell phones, hard drives and mini video cameras, detectives found more than 1,000 gun cartridges.Detectives say Reinking also had scopes, cleaning rods and magazines.The search warrant was executed at noon Sunday, nine hours after police say Reinking went on a murder rampage inside an Antioch Waffle House.Inside Reinking's truck, investigators found a buck knife.News 4 is also learning more about the surviving victims' injuries.Police say James Shaw Jr. who wrestled Reinking to the ground was shot in the arm.Sharita Henderson was shot in both legs.Shantia Waggoner was shot in one leg.Kayla Shaw had cuts to her face and arms from the glass window that was shot out.Copyright 2018WSMV(Meredith Corporation). All rights reserved.Here's a timeline of events in the Travis Reinking/Waffle House shooting case.ReporterLiz Lohuis joined the News4 team as a general assignment reporter in January 2016.NORTH PHILADELPHIA (WTXF)-A man is facing murder charges accused of killing two people after police say he was tossed out of a party near the Temple University campus. As police make an arrest in this case, they still have another unsolved murder on their hands on the very same North Philadelphia street.MORE:Police ID man, woman fatally shot at North Philly partyIt's been a rough month for people who live on Diamond Street, but there was relief Friday just off Temple's campus after police announced an arrest in a double murder three weeks ago.Diamond Street has been the scene of serious gun violence with 3 murders in recent weeks. One on April 21st that left two young people dead and 2 others wounded. Then, last weekend 21-year-old Temple student Dan Duignam was shot and killed a block away.RELATED:Police: Temple University student called 911 himself after shooting, money takenHomicide detectives have now charged 19-year-old Sydear Green with the double homicide and double shooting outside a party that was promoted on social media.AdvertisementAs for the motive, "He was angry for getting kicked out--they did a very good--several week investigation lead us to him," Philadelphia Homicide Captain Jack Ryan said.Green lives right around the corner on Norris Street. He has no prior record.Captain Ryan says police are making progress in Duignam's murder. His apartment was ransacked and he was robbed. Police say there was a violent struggle and no signs of forced entry. This was not random."We're still looking at a number of different avenues. We have two or three different avenues that they're investigating at this point," Philadelphia Homicide Captain Jack Ryan said.Captain Ryan noted that the party was promoted on social media. He says anyone attending these open invitation parties should be careful.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsSAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) — Six men were shot Friday night in San Francisco and one of them has died, one other has life-threatening injuries and the other four victims’ injuries aren’t life-threatening, police said Saturday afternoon.One man died in the shooting, which happened around 11 p.m. Friday at the area of Third Street and Quesada Avenue, according to police. The man who died was a 20-year-old San Francisco resident, police said.Five other men suffered injuries in the shooting, according to police. One of the men sustained life-threatening injuries, while the injuries to the other four aren’t deemed life-threatening.All five of the surviving victims are San Francisco residents, according to police. The man with life-threatening injuries is 24 years old, police said.According to police, the injuries suffered by the remaining four men are not life-threatening. The remaining four men are 26, 23, 31 and 19 years old, respectively.Preliminary information is that the men were standing next to each other and six people were shot, police said.Anyone with information on the shooting is asked to call the SFPD 24-Hour Tip Line at (415) 575-4445.© Copyright 2018 CBS Broadcasting Inc. and Bay City News. All Rights Reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributedCoping with GriefWe would like to offer our sincere support to anyone coping with grief.  Enter your email below for our complimentary daily grief messages.  Messages run for up to one year and you can stop at any time.  Your email will not be used for any other purpose.Erica Nichelle Smith was born January 10, 1986 alongside her twin sister (Terica) to Kassandra Smith and Michael Johnson, Sr. She was a lifelong resident of Asheville, N.C. where she was a devoted mother of six beautiful children. Although she had many roles including being a mother, daughter, sister and friend to many, she took pride in spending quality time with her loved ones while encouraging others in their walk with the Lord.She was raised in the close-knit Hillcrest community where she was surrounded with infinite love, words of encouragement and endless support from her family and childhood friends.  Erica attended Asheville High School (Class of 2004) where she was an A-B honor roll student and track athlete.  She was hard working, caring, determined, laidback and loved by many. She was employed with Mission Health as a member of the food and nutrition team where she shined brightly and put a smile on the faces of others.Erica was a member of the Lord’s Church of Asheville where she was a participant on the praise dance team and where taught children’s church for the 2 to 7 year-old age group. She had future plans of mentoring young women and mothers and leading them to the Lord by creating a domestic abuse ministry. She always had a positive outlook on life and sought to find the good in everything and everyone. Erica’s light will continue to shine upon everyone that knew her, especially amongst her surviving children Zyrique Smith, Jayden Smith, Tyron Smith, and Kaleb Smith. Her kindness and compassion for others will always be remembered.Left to cherish her memory in addition to her beloved children are her mother Kassandra Smith and father Michael Johnson, Sr.; Grandmothers Mary Jo Johnson and Lucille Smith; sisters Tashea Smith, Shareka Smith, Terica Smith, Jonica Smith and Shunta Johnson and brother Michael Johnson, Jr; as well as a host of other relatives including aunts, uncles, cousins and numerous friends.To send flowers to the family or plant a tree in memory of Erica Nichelle Smith, please visit ourfloral store.Image: dan / FreeDigitalPhotos.netShreveport Police are investigating a Sunday morning shooting that left six people injured.On April 15 just before 4:45 am, Shreveport Police received reports that several people were shot at Trendsetters Tattoo Studio the 6900 block of Jewella Avenue. Upon arrival officers located 5 people suffering from gunshot wounds. All were transported to University Health Hospital suffering from varying degrees of injuries but all were described as non-life-threatening. Those injured were identified as 17-year-old Kevin Washington, 17-year-old De’Anthony Johnson, 21-year-old Lakyra Bonkin, 22-year-old Chantrevious Boykin, and a juvenile.Officers secured area and were in the process of getting investigators to the scene when they were informed of a 6th victim arriving at Willis Knighton North. That victim, 18-year-old Avontae Guiden, was suffering from a non-life threatening gunshot injury as well. He was treated and released a short time later.Investigators believe that the suspects arrived in front of the business in a dark colored four door pickup truck. Shots were fired from the driver’s side rear window and from the bed of the pickup.Investigators are asking anyone with information about this shooting to contact Shreveport Police at 318-673-7300 or Shreveport Caddo Crime Stoppers at 318-673-7373 or via the app, P3Tips. Crime Stoppers will pay up to $1,000 for information leading to the arrest of the people responsible for this crime.VALLEJO (CBS SF) – Four people suffered gunshot injuries outside an apartment complex in Vallejo late Monday night, a police lieutenant said.Police received reports of 10 to 15 gunshots at the Marina Vista Apartments at 201 Maine St. around 11:20 p.m., Vallejo police Lt. Herman Robinson said.There were no victims or suspects at the scene when police arrived and found a silver Chevrolet and Ford Focus parked next to each other and a dozen bullet shells in the parking lot, Robinson said.Police impounded the Ford that had several bullet holes on the passenger side and blood smears on the outside, and it’s believed the Chevrolet was not involved in the shooting, Robinson said.Two 27-year-old Vallejo men, a 23-year-old woman from Oakley and a 23-year-old woman from Oakland showed up at Sutter Solano Medical Center in Vallejo with gunshot injuries that were not life-threatening, Robinson said.All four did not cooperate with the shooting investigation and there have been no arrests in the case, Robinson said.© Copyright 2018 CBS Broadcasting Inc. and Bay City News Service. All Rights Reserved.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.CATAWBA COUNTY, NC (WBTV) - A third person was charged in connection with a deadly shooting that happened outside a bar in Catawba County last month.Over 100 rounds were fired by multiple shooters outside of The Vault Bar and Lounge located on 1st Avenue NW in Hickory on the morning of April 8. Police say 20-year-old Antonio Knoshjun Watts was killed and three others were injured.Caine Anthony Morrison, 24, was arrested Tuesday and charged with possession of a firearm by a felon in the shooting.Carlos Car'tre Ikard was arrested Thursday and Keon Rashan Scott was arrested Friday in connection with the deadly shooting. Ikard was charged with possessing a firearm by a felon and Scott was charged with possessing a firearm by a felon and probation violation.The victims were inside the bar prior to the shooting, officials say.PREVIOUS:Over 100 rounds of shots fired outside of Hickory bar killing one, injuring threePolice say they anticipate more arrests to be made.The bar surrendered their ABC permit to the North Carolina Alcohol Beverage Control Commission following the fatal shooting.If you have any information, you can call detectives at 828-261-2621.Copyright 2018 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Amanda Batchelor, Managing EditorLiane Morejon, ReporterAmanda Batchelor, Managing EditorLiane Morejon, ReporterMIAMI– Two men were released from jail Tuesday afternoon, a day after Miami Police Chief Jorge Colina admitted that the young men were wrongly accused of fatally shooting two teens in Liberty Square.Yaairnes Bryant's relatives waited outside the Turner Guilford Knight Correctional Center with balloons before Bryant, 21, was released.The men told reporters outside the jail that they were happy to be out.Bryant was also seen hugging his mother and daughter before walking to their car.Colina said a video given to authorities "appears to support an alibi" for Bryant and Anthony Clinch, 19.Colina said a warrant for Deondre McDuffy, 19, has also been canceled."While the Miami Police Department is committed to the pursuit of justice, it is equally committed to the protection of the innocent," Colina said in a statement. "We would like to assure the public that we will continue to maintain the highest possible ethical standards as we strive to keep our community safe."Bryant and Clinch were arrested Saturday on murder and attempted murder charges.Authorities said Kimson Green, 17, a National Honor Society student at Miami Northwestern Senior High School, and his friend, Rickey Dixon, 18, a Northwestern graduate, were killed in an April 8 shooting in Liberty Square.Two other teens were injured in the shooting.Colina said officers had a positive identification and circumstantial evidence, giving police probable cause to make the arrests over the weekend."A victim made an ID and that, I think, is what gave them probable cause to make the arrest," Miami Mayor Francis Suarez said.Bryant's parents told Local 10 News they are thankful for their son's release, but outraged by what they call a rush to judgment."I knew he ain't do it. That's why I ain't cry," Herman Bryant said."He was innocent, and I knew he was innocent," Yaairnes Bryant's mother, Rebecca Kearney, said.Police are now starting back at square one in their search for the shooters. Colina said detectives are trying to "find them before they kill again."Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-8477.Copyright 2018 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Amanda Batchelor is the managing editor for Local10.com.Liane Morejon is an Emmy-winning reporter who joined the Local 10 News family in January 2010. Born and raised in Coral Gables, Liane has a unique perspective on covering news in her own backyard.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Four people were hurt in a shooting in Jacksonville Friday night.A Jacksonville Sheriff's Office spokesperson said one man was in critical condition and three others had serious injuries after the shooting in the 6100 block of Transylvania Ave.Witnesses told Action News Jax reporterDanielle Avitablethey heard 12 to 15 gunshots just before 9 p.m.A dark-colored vehicle was seen fleeing the area, according to police.JSO said officers it was unknown if the shooting was related tothe death of 17-year-old Dontavious Joseph, whose family lives on Transylvania Avenue.Joseph died after a stolen car he was riding in hit a fence and flipped as JSO pursued it.Joseph was ejected from the car and three other people were trapped inside, officers said.JSO is asking anyone with information about the shooting on Transylvania Avenue to call JSO at 904-630-0500 or Crime Stoppers at 1-866-845-Tips.BREAKING UPDATE:#JSOsays FOUR people were hurt in shooting on the Westside.  LIVE report with @DanielleANjax from the scene on FOX30 & CBS47 at 11@ActionNewsJaxpic.twitter.com/ESjMyz8IkrWoman on scene says it happened halfway down Transylvania Ave. The whole road is blocked off@ActionNewsJaxpic.twitter.com/TwJuMJ4QpZWorking to get more information. People on scene say they heard gunshots just after 9pm from miles away@ActionNewsJaxpic.twitter.com/2PKvSKNYeBThere are at least 13 patrol vehicles on scene. Witnesses say they heard at least 15 gunshots and then a vehicle took off around the corner@ActionNewsJaxpic.twitter.com/pnhidPdoH2BREAKING:#JSOconfirm police activity in 6100 block of Translyvania Ave in Confederate Point neighborhood of Jacksonville.@ActionNewsJaxcrew is on the way. UPDATES ON FOX30 at 10pic.twitter.com/vtnuwGxNEZMenuVIRGINIA BEACH, Va. - The Virginia Beach Police Department is investigating a deadly quadruple shooting in the 5800 block of Pickering Street Friday night.The call came in shortly before 10 p.m.Police confirmed that there were four victims, one of whom was a man pronounced dead at the scene. The victim was later identified as 41-year-old Rakel Ramel Mason of Norfolk.One victim suffered non-life threatening injuries and refused rescue at the scene. Two of the injured victims also suffered non-life threatening injuries and took themselves to the hospital.This incident is being investigated by the VBPD's Homicide Unit.Anyone with information about this shooting is asked to call Virginia Beach Crime Solvers at 1-888-LOCK-U-UP (1-888-562-5887). Tips may also be submitted via P3Tips.com or through the P3Tips app.Stay with News 3 for updates.Report a typoNEW ORLEANS -  A second person has died in the quadruple shooting that killed one man and wounded a 1-year-old child.According to NOPD, a second adult male has died from his wounds. The Orleans Parish Coroner's Office identified him as 33-year-old Carlos Rodrique.A woman and 17-month-old child are the lone survivors.According to the New Orleans Police Department, the shooting happened around 6:43 p.m. in the 3300 block of Garden Oaks Drive. Officers arriving at the scene found a man, later identified by family members as 25-year-old Ryan Massey, with gunshot injuries. Massey later died at the scene.MORE: Family says man shot to death in Algiers was turning life aroundAnyone with information about this shooting is asked to contact NOPD homicide detectives at 504-658-5300. Residents can also report information to Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Lea WilsonLea WilsonHOUSTON– Four men were shot Tuesday in a drive-by in northwest Harris County.Investigators said the men were outside a house just after 11 p.m. in the 8500 block of Redcliff when someone drove by and opened fire.Two of the men went to a nearby gas station for help. They were taken by ambulance to a hospital.The other two men were taken to a hospital by a relative.One of the men was listed in critical condition and later died, deputies said.Update  HCSO Homicide have now taken over the scene from 8500 Red Cliff. The male victim that was upgraded to ICU has died from his injuries. Investigators are following leads more information to follow.No arrests have been made.Copyright 2018 by KPRC Click2Houston - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (713) 778-4745.ReporterJarmarkus Holifield (Photo: Mobile County Metro Jail)Investigators release new developments in a shooting case that injured several and took the life of a teenager at The Grand Hall on Easter Sunday.An innocent bystander, Anesa Baker, lost her life that night during a teen party and investigators revealed more information about the alleged shooter's intended target.Nineteen-year-old, Jamarkus Holified, is charged with assault and murder in connection to the shooting-death of 15-year-old Anesa Baker.Investigators say Holifield's target the night of the shooting was actually 18-year-old, Jay'Marcus Jefferson.Jefferson was shot and killed during a drive-by on Driftwood Drive a few weeks after The Grand Hall shooting.Investigators say the two cases are connected but not related.Prosecutors interviewed a witness who says they received a Facebook call and Facebook messages from Holifield after the Grand Hall shooting.The witness said Holifield stated he needed help getting rid of a gun that killed someone."The real issue here is that young people are trying to solve their problems with guns by shooting at each other. I think it's an epidemic in our community and in our country. There are groups of them that form gangs together and that seems to be what they're doing and innocent people are dying from it."The pain is still fresh for the loved ones of Baker.A group of people showed up to court wearing t-shirts with her name and face on it.Many of them sobbed inside the courtroom as the details of the shooting case were read aloud.The case will now move to a grand jury.The Mobile County District Attorney's office says The Grand Hall investigation is still ongoing, and they plan to process even more people in connection to the Easter shooting.All content © 2018, WALA; Mobile, AL. (A Meredith Corporation Station). All Rights Reserved. ?ReporterMOBILE, ALA. (WALA)- A local gymnast is flipping her way to the top. Brie Clark completed a move very few have ever done and it's getting her a lot of attention.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- Mobile Police said a man was shot and killed Tuesday night on Three Notch Road.FOX10 viewers are starting to send in photos and video clips of of big hail falling in south Baldwin County as a line of severe weather moves through the region.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- Police arrested a woman Sunday morning after the end of a high-speed chase through Theodore and Irvington.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- A Prichard police officer was arrested Tuesday night for ethics violations and computer tampering charges.MOBILE, ALA. (WALA)- Mobile Police arrested a woman accused of stealing mail in Midtown. It's an exclusive story we first told you about earlier this week.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) – A planned “logistics” development off of Interstate 10 could transform the way companies move products in and out of the Port of Mobile and create thousands of well-paying jobs.The Mobile Airport Authority is another step closer to relocating passenger air service from West Mobile to Downtown.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) --The Federal Aviation Administration approved a plan by the Mobile Airport Authority to move all passenger air service to a new international airport terminal at Brookley Field.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) – A federal database gathering reports of COVID-19 vaccine side effects shows almost 400 instances in Alabama, including 23 people who died shortly after getting the shots.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Would you like to receive breaking news?Signup today!The latest COVID-19 headlines delivered to your inbox every day.Would you like to receive our daily news?Signup today!Would you like to receive the daily weather Outlook?Signup today!(Bob Johnson | MLive.com)SAGINAW, MI-- Four women and one man was shot during a house party in the 600 block of Yale about 2:15 a.m. on Sunday morning.According to Saginaw Police Department Detective Sgt. Oscar Lopez, there was a large house party and shots were fired.The party was advertised on Facebook, according to Michigan State Police Lt. David Kaiser.All victims were transported to the hospital by private vehicles and are expected to live, Kaiser said.Anyone with any information about the shooting is asked to call Crime Stoppers at 1-800-422-JAIL.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesUPDATE: No arrests yet in connection with this shooting, the MCPO said Monday afternoon.ASBURY PARK — Five men were hospitalized early Sunday as a result of a drive-by shooting near Atlantic Avenue and Monmouth Avenue, said Charles Webster, spokesman for the Monmouth County Prosecutor's Office.Asbury Park Police were called to the scene at 11:31 p.m. Saturday and found three men with gunshot wounds, Webster said. Two other men with gunshot wounds went to the hospital in separate vehicles, he said."The five men were with a group of people when a car pulled up and fired several shots striking the victims before driving away from the scene," Webster said in an email.Three men — ages 25, 27 and 29 — remain hospitalized with non-life-threatening injuries, Webster said. Two more men — ages 27 and 31 — were treated and released, he said. The Prosecutor's Office did not release the names of the victims.The investigation is ongoing by the Monmouth County Prosecutor's Office and Asbury Park Police. Anyone with information is asked to call Detective Patrick Petruzziello of the Monmouth County Prosecutor’s Office at 1-800-533-7443 or Detective Gabriel Carrasquillo of the Asbury Park Police Department at 732-774-1300.Anonymous tips can also be left at Monmouth County Crime Stoppers confidential telephone tip-line at 1-800-671-4400; or by texting “MONMOUTH” plus their tip to 274637. Tips can also be emailed at www.monmouthcountycrimestoppers.com.In 2015, Asbury Park had the highest violent crime rate in Monmouth County, with 14.6 violent crimes per 1,000 residents, according to New Jersey State Police Uniform Crime Reports. Monmouth County, for comparison, had an average of 1.5 violent crimes per 1,000 residents.Yet, Asbury Park's violent crime rate is down from 10 years earlier, when the rate was 20.6 violent crimes per 1,000 residents, according to State Police reports.Amanda Oglesby: @OglesbyAPP; 732-557-5701; aoglesby@gannettnj.comnewsCrimeByClaire Ballor6:55 PM on Apr 6, 2018 CDTNewly released documents reveal what unfolded the day police said an18-year-old opened fire on four peoplelast month at a Plano apartment complex.Franklin Lee Barnes III remains in the Collin County Jail on charges of murder, attempted murder and aggravated assault in the March 29 rampage at the Cross Creek Apartments. His bail is set at $1.25 million.Police say Barnes appeared to target two victims — the dead man and his girlfriend — and wounded two others at random, shooting them all in the face, according to his arrest warrant affidavit."Oh, I didn't kill you," one victim heard the gunman say after wounding him. The shooter fired again into his face, and the man blacked out.Plano police were called about 9:30 a.m. after the shooting at 7401 Alma Drive. When they arrived, they found 29-year-old Quintarius Young dead and three other victims with gunshot wounds that weren't considered life-threatening.According to the affidavit,  Young's girlfriend told police she was in the bathroom drying her hair when she heard Young say something about letting his friend "Frank" into their home.Next she heard a loud noise, she said, and Barnes burst into the bathroom and shot her in the face. Although wounded, she was able to get out of the bathroom and saw Young lying on the floor, his eyes closed. He'd been shot, too.Police also interviewed the two other victims, both employees at the apartment complex, who survived their injuries.One of them told police he was walking up to an apartment in the same building as Young's when he passed by Barnes. He said the two shared a head nod before he set his gear down in front of the door of an apartment. He turned around and Barnes shot him in the face, he said.Another employee was in the area at the time and witnessed the man being shot. She told police she was helping him when Barnes approached her and shot her in the face. She also survived her wounds and watched Barnes jump into a gray vehicle and flee the scene, according to the affidavit.Arlington investigators believe Barnes is connected to two other deaths that occurred the morning of the Plano shooting, said Lt. Christopher Cook, a spokesman for Arlington police.Joshua Daniels and Winston Davis, both 25, were found shot to death the morning of March 29 in a car parked at an Arlington apartment complex at 1200 E. Lamar Blvd. Cook said Arlington police believe Barnes killed those men, both of whom he knew, before driving to Plano.Cook said he couldn't give any further details about what led investigators to connect the fatal shootings since they're still under investigation. But the deaths were "related to some high-risk activity," he said.Police in Plano arrested Barnes in McKinney hours after the Plano shootings.Claire Ballor, Special ContributorStay up-to-date with the crime and public safety news your neighbors are talking about.By signing up you agree to ourprivacy policyStand with us in our mission to discover and uncover the story of North TexasCAMDEN - Camden County police are investigating the shooting of four people inside a Parkside business.The victims, identified only as males, are expected to survive their wounds, said police spokesman Dan Keashen.More:Prosecutor: Jealous suspect stabbed woman 22 timesMore:Fatal overdoses bring jail term, indictmentHe said the shooting occurred around 4 p.m. Thursday on the 1200 block of Haddon Avenue, near Kaighn Avenue.Anyone with information is asked to call police at (856) 757-7042.More:Five-year term for Evesham man who shot at copMore:Former Maple Shade chief pleads guilty to theftMore:WATCH: Hearing for man accused of killing Camden womanSAN FRANCISCO (CBS SF) – The San Francisco District Attorney’s Office announced Thursday it will not charge two police officers for killing a young man duringa shootout inside an Excelsior District barbershop in 2018.An investigation by the district attorney’s Independent Investigations Bureau into the March 21, 2018 shooting, which killed 21-year-old Jehad Eid and wounded three other bystanders, one of which was a juvenile, found that the officers acted in self-defense or in defense of others, prosecutors said.The shooting at the Amazon Barber Shop at 949 Geneva Ave. unfolded when family members told police that an armed Eid was threatening them, police said.When officers arrived, they entered the crowded shop where Eid was at and Eid reportedly shot at them first, according to police.Two police officers identified as Kevin Endo and Tess Casey then fired back, striking Eid numerous times. Eid was taken to the hospital where he died.In addition to the injuries to the three bystanders, Endo suffered a gunshot wound to his leg when Eid allegedly shot at him.Back in December 2018, Eid’s familyfiled a wrongful death lawsuitin federal court against the city for the shooting.The suit, which names the city, the Police Department and Chief William Scott as plaintiffs, alleges officers Endo and Casey “used excessive and unnecessary force … because they lacked reasonable cause to believe that he posed a threat.”In addition to releasing their findings on the Eid case, prosecutors on Thursday also released their findings on two separate in-custody death cases.Regarding the Jan. 21, 2016 death of Jeremy Andrews, the medical examiner found that his death was accidental, stemming from a lethal cardiac arrhythmia due to acute methamphetamine intoxication.Because of the medical examiner’s ruling and the “lack of sufficient evidence to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that any officer was engaged in criminal conduct leading to Mr. Andrews’ death,” prosecutors found that no criminal charges were warranted.On Jan. 13, 2016, Andrews was taken into custody after he was found walking in and out of traffic near 14thAvenue and Fulton Street. When paramedics arrived on the scene, they found he had no pulse, wasn’t breathing and he died eight days later.Also, prosecutors cleared sheriff’s deputies in the May 23, 2018 in-custody death of Kyle Budner inside a San Francisco jail. The medical examiner found that he died of natural causes.In addition to the finding, the district attorney’s IIB determined there was no evidence to suggest that deputies at the jail committed any criminal misconduct.Andrews’ cellmate found him unresponsive and notified deputies, who then found him lying on his side in a fetal position.Although deputies pulled him from his bed and medical crews at the jail tried to revive him, he was pronounced dead 30 minutes later.© Copyright 2019 CBS Broadcasting Inc. and Bay City News Service. All Rights Reserved.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.Late one night at a crowded West End nightclub last March, a physical fight sparked gunfire.The bullets struck six people and sent clubgoers running out of Cole's Place, a popular spot in the Parkland neighborhood.Video surveillance captured the man with the gun, dressed in a white hoodie and white pants.That footage, prosecutors told a jury Thursday and Friday, is a key piece of evidence in their case against Kenneth Mattingly Jr.Mattingly, 32, was arrested nearly a week after the shooting and faces six assault charges.Background:Louisville man faces charges in connection with nightclub shootingAssistant Commonwealth's Attorney Doug Meisel asked jurors in opening arguments Thursday to draw a "logical inference" that Mattingly was the gunman.Meisel said Mattingly was dressed that day in white pants and a white hoodie, a distinct outfit.Meisel said he expects defense attorneys may point to other possible shooters who were similarly dressed in all white. But, Meisel said, these other suspects don't have the build or features of the man pulling the trigger.In his brief opening statement, defense attorney John Brittain said there are many reasonable doubts in the case, though he didn't elaborate.The prosecutor showed jurors a compilation of surveillance videos from March 17, showing the man in white outside the club, moving through the building and eventually raising his arm and unloading multiple shots.Some of the six were shot multiple times. An orthopedic doctor testified the bullets fractured bones, tore through muscles and damaged nerves.One of those victims, Antuan Sartin, was shot in the legs and back and is still in physical therapy each week. When he testified, he leaned on a cane to move across the courtroom.Meisel started his opening statements with Sartin, saying that he was at the club that night around 3 a.m. for some late-night food.Sartin and another man, Isiah Fugett, eventually got into a fight, and soon the man in white fired his gun. Both were wounded.Sartin felt a pain in his back. Something hit his leg. He remembers laying on the ground, feeling as though he may die. He couldn't see where the gunshots were coming from.More headlines:17-year-old arrested in connection with Hindu temple vandalismFugett, too, took the stand.In court, he repeatedly said he now doesn't remember his interview with Louisville Metro Police detectives last year in which he told them Mattingly was the shooter, because he was on drugs at the time.He also testified he doesn't recall seeing Mattingly at the club the night of the shooting."This man, right here, did not shoot me," he said, pointing at Mattingly, seated nearby.Meisel played a portion of that interview as well as a jailhouse phone call between Fugett and the mother of his child in which he told her that Mattingly was at the club that night."I was just going off what I heard in the streets," Fugett said. "I got locked up and had time to clear my mind. Wrong guy. I should had never said nothing in the first place."When questioning Fugett — now serving prison time on federal gun charges — defense attorney Kevin Glogower asked him about how detectives offered to help him with the gun charges for his help in the shooting.Meisel told jurors Thursday that police never did help. Fugett, in testimony, agreed.Related:Louisville nightclub Cole's Place is closing after multiple shootingsGlogower and Brittain attempted late last year to exclude from trial any evidence that they argued came from the "unnecessarily suggestive" use of a picture of their client. They said police showed a photo of Mattingly to witnesses who either weren't at the club or who had previously said they couldn't identify a suspect.Circuit Judge Brian Edwards denied that request.Mattingly is charged with four counts of first-degree assault, two counts of second-degree assault, possession of a handgun by a convicted felon and first-degree wanton endangerment.Assistant Commonwealth Attorney Andrew Reinhardt is also prosecuting the case.Besides the criminal case, Mattingly — along with the club and its owner — is named in a lawsuit filed by some shooting victims alleging assault and negligence.The trial is expected to continue Monday.Reporter Matthew Glowicki can be reached at 502-582-4989 or mglowicki@courier-journal.com. Support strong local journalism by subscribing today:courier-journal.com/mattg.Filed under:Four men were shot and seriously wounded early Saturday inside a strip club in south suburban Harvey.At 3:49 a.m., the male suspect entered The BOXXX Gentleman’s Club, 16700 S. Halsted St. in Harvey, and fired shots in the direction of the four victims, striking all of them, according to Harvey city spokesman Sean Howard. The shooting apparently stemmed from an earlier incident at another nightclub in another town.Two of the men were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn while another was taken to Ingalls Memorial Hospital in Harvey, all in serious condition, Howard said. The fourth was in surgery Saturday morning at the Intensive Care Unit at Stroger Hospital.No one was in custody Saturday morning, but investigators had identified a suspect in security camera footage. He was apparently accompanied by a woman when he entered the club.“We do have some good leads,” Howard said at a news conference outside the club. “We have reviewed the tapes and we know who we’re looking for.”Investigators were also trying to determine how the shooter got the gun into the club. While the club does not have metal detectors, Howard said the guards use scanning devices to check patrons as they enter.The club was shut down by order of the mayor’s office Saturday morning pending investigations by Harvey police and the city’s planning department, Howard said.“Historically, this club has relatively been quiet over the last 15 years,” Howard said. “It’s been well managed, as far as we know. There has been no specific, serious incident of crime here in the last 15 years.”Howard said the shooting was not random and appeared to be an isolated, targeted incident.http://www.suntimeswire.com/wp-content/uploads/2018/03/The-Boxx-Shooting.mp4Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Jack Roskopp, Digital Content Editor, Graham Media GroupJack Roskopp, Digital Content Editor, Graham Media GroupMACCLENNY, Fla– Two people have been arrested in connection with a drive-by shooting earlier this month in Macclenny, the Baker County Sheriff's Office announced Monday.On March 13, Baker County deputies said that they responded to the emergency room at Ed Fraser Memorial Hospital, where four people had arrived after suffering non-life-threatening injuries during a shooting.Deputies learned that the shooting happened on South Boulevard in Macclenny, where they said they found multiple cars riddled with bullet holes.Less than two weeks later, authorities said, a warrant was obtained Friday for the arrest of Kiara Shanice Williams.The next day, Williams, 25, turned herself in at the Baker County Sheriff's Office and she was booked into the Baker County Jail.Williams faces a series of charges related to being an accessory to the shooting, deputies said.On Sunday, the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office arrested Clement Burman Jr., who's accused of firing the shots.Burman is charged with attempted second-degree murder, three counts of aggravated assault, discharging a firearm in public, two counts of shooting deadly missiles into a vehicle and criminal mischief over $1,000.Deputies said Burman will be extradited to Baker County, where he will be held in the jail on $2,525,000 bond.Copyright 2018 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.Jack is a Digital Content Editor with a degree in creative writing and French from Western Michigan University. He specializes in writing about movies, food and the latest TV shows.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Four people were shot and wounded Monday night in a west Modesto neighborhood, police said.Three people suffered non-life-threatening injuries and one person is listed in serious condition, Modesto police said. All four victims, three men and a woman, were taken to the hospital for treatment.The shooting happened at a home in the 2000 block of Robertson Road. The victims were in the garage when the shooter, or shooters, fired through the closed garage door and hit the victims.Police do not have not information on the suspect, or suspects.The scene has been processed and reopened, police said.No other details were released.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Gerry ByrdA Mississippi man has been arrested in the July 2 shooting of a woman on Interstate 10, Baton Rouge police report.Gerry Byrd, 28, was booked Sunday into East Baton Rouge Parish Prison on attempted first-degree murder, armed robbery, theft of a firearm, theft of a motor vehicle and felon in possession of a firearm.The victim told police she had traveled to Baton Rouge on July 1 with Byrd, who was an old friend of hers, according to the arrest report. They stayed at a motel in Port Allen until the early hours of July 2, when, the victim said, Byrd started to act aggressively.They decided to return to their hometown of Natchez, Mississippi. The victim, however, took a wrong turn while she was driving down I-10, causing Byrd to become suspicious, she told police. He began to beat her in the face with one of two handguns she had in her purse in the back seat.She stopped the car, the report says, and began to defend herself, but Byrd shot her in the chest. The victim climbed out of the car and began to walk along the interstate until police found her at 1:55 a.m. Byrd took her car, both handguns, her cell phone and other valuables she had inside.The report says Byrd called 911 and told the dispatcher he killed the woman in Baton Rouge and was returning home to Mississippi. When he arrived in Woodville, Mississippi, just across the Louisiana-Mississippi border, he left the car armed with both of the victim's handguns and threatened to kill someone in a convenience store.Woodville Police apprehended Byrd after he left the store. The arrest report says Byrd was convicted of armed robbery in Mississippi in 2009.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?One of Editor & Publisher’s ‘10 That Do It Right 2021’Cloudy and windy with periods of rain. High 63F. Winds SSW at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 80%..Rain showers early will evolve into a more steady rain overnight. Low around 45F. Winds SSW at 15 to 25 mph. Chance of rain 80%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:07 pmReporterCHAMPAIGN — Police are seeking the public’s help in solving a shooting that killed one man and injured three others early Sunday in north Champaign.Champaign County Coroner Duane Northrup said that Montrez Vonner, 34, of Champaign, died just before 2 a.m. at Carle Foundation Hospital in Urbana, a victim of multiple gunshot wounds.The fatal shooting is Champaign's second of 2018. Police continue to look for Cornelius Freeman, 39, of Carbondale, for the first-degree murder of Micheal White, 26, of Chicago. He was gunned down about 1 p.m. Wednesday near the corner of Bloomington Road and Sunset Drive.The early morning shooting Sunday happened in the 700 block of North Hickory Street, near the intersection with Vine Street, said Champaign police detective Lt. Nate Rath.The location is just south of the American Legion Post, a popular club located a block east of Neil Street.Rath said police were sent there at 1:22 a.m. because multiple shots had been fired. He declined to say if police believe there was more than one shooter. He was not certain if Mr. Vonner was the intended target.What they do know is that Mr. Vonner was killed and two women from Rantoul, ages 18 and 23, and a 23-year-old Champaign man were also shot. Their injuries were described as non-life-threatening. Rath had no update on their conditions."There was at least a small crowd out there. We need help. We're slowly churning things up. It would go quicker if people out there would start saying what they saw," Rath said."They were all out at the intersection of Hickory and Vine. One of the injured might have been in a vehicle," he said.Preliminary information is that people in the area heard a verbal argument just before the shots started flying.Mr. Vonner's death comes on the heels of CU Fresh Start's latest "call-in" last week of identified violent offenders. It's the third attempt by program organizers to get certain young men to put guns down in exchange for receiving services to help them and hopefully, the community. Only five of 20 men from the previous call-ins are still working on self-improvement.Northrup has scheduled an autopsy for Monday afternoon in Urbana.Anyone with information or who was in the area is asked to contact Champaign Police at 217-351-4545.Callers who want to remain anonymous can also contact Champaign County Crime Stoppers at 217-373-TIPS,373tips.com, or through a free app for smart phones called P3 Tips. Tipsters are always completely anonymous when contacting Crime Stoppers.Cash rewards of up to $1,000 are paid for information leading to an arrest. Tipsters will never be asked their names and are given a secret code number to use when checking on a possible reward.ReporterMary Schenk is a reporter covering police, courts and breaking news at The News-Gazette. Her email is mschenk@news-gazette.com, and you can follow her on Twitter (@schenk).Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.We'll send breaking news and news alerts to you as they happen!Get the latest local and national news.Have the latest local news delivered every afternoon so you don't miss out on updates.Each day's obituaries, delivered to your inbox.Receive occasional local offers from our website and its advertisers.Get the latest headlines on local sports!Get our expert short-term forecast, summary of the weather details and news of any severe weather.Top trending stories from the week.(7/24/2019) - More than a year since a Saginaw man was shot, he died from his injuries on Monday.That changes the investigation into the shooting of 28-year old Damontae Fluellen and four other people into a murder case.Fluellen was shot outside his mother's Saginaw home on Hess Avenue in March of 2018. He survived, but lingered in a near vegetative state for months until he died this week."Damontae was a happy kid," said his mother, Rosetta Biggins. "Everywhere you see him he was always smiling, cracking jokes on everybody."She said the shooting that led to Fluellen's death in the early morning hours of March 11, 2018, happened when he and a number of other people were outside the house."Trying to break up a fight among friends, he got hit three times," Biggins said.Four other people were shot, but Fluellen got the worst of it. Michigan State Police say nobody has been arrested in connection with the case."He was in a vegetative state, so he couldn't do anything by himself anymore," Biggins said.An autopsy will be done to determine a cause of death to make sure there wasn't an unknown medical issue, but Biggins believes the cause of death is those gunshots."He had major complications after he got shot," she said.Fluellen's sister, Micahasia Biggins, said none of the violence that night was meant for him. She remembers he had "the biggest heart ever.""No matter what, my mom, me and my brother are going to have my mom's back through all of this and be strong for her," Micahasia Biggins said.Rosetta Biggins said her son often invited people to her house and she believes she knows the person who pulled the trigger that morning."We used to work together," she said. "I just ask that he do the right thing and turn himself in."The family is gathering for a funeral to remember a man who most likely will become the Saginaw's 18th homicide for 2018, the latest victim of gun violence."They most definitely need to put (the guns) down, Rosetta Biggins said. "We have so many babies out here. Who is going to be the example for them?"ANSON COUNTY, NC (WBTV) - The victims of a shooting at an Anson County bar late Friday night have been identified.Police said the shooting happened at Mr. D's Bar and Grill around 11:25 p.m. in the 1300 block of East Caswell Street.JA'Ques Kerreon McBryde, Thomas Maye III, and Mareco Lawilder McNair were identified Monday as the victims who were killed during the shooting. A fourth person was injured during the shooting. The fourth victim has been released from the hospital.Officials say two of the men were pronounced dead on the scene and a third man later died after being taken to the hospital.Robbie Harris was arrested and charged with three counts of first-degree murder and one count of assault with a deadly weapon inflicting serious injury with intent to kill.The news of the shooting shook the city of Wadesboro. Family members of the men who died showed a small look into their lives.Valerie Powe said her nephew, McNair, was a father of two little girls and loved to give back to his community. "He loved the girls, he really did and he loved helping the community. He would volunteer to help the schools," Powe said.She says McNair was shot in the face and taken to the hospital before dying from heart complications."It was really a blow to the family," Powe said.Police are asking anyone with information to contact officers at 704-694-2167.Copyright 2018 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Murder suspect Walker Frank Thomas shortly after being taken into custody. (Contributed photo/Russell County Sheriff's Office)A second man has died from gunshots fired in a Hurtsboro restaurant March 7, the Russell County Sheriff's Office said Saturday. John Williams, 74, died from gunshot wounds, the sheriff's office said.Williams was one of four men shotwhen a man entered the City Grill Cafewith a gun early on the morning of March 7, Sheriff Heath Taylor said on the day of the shooting. The gunman reportedly yelled the name of grill owner Donald Wayne Hughes before opening fire. Hughes, 69, died earlier from gunshot wounds.Two other men, Roy Donald Johnson, 70; and John William Harden, 74, both of Hurtsboro, were also shot.The alleged shooter, identified as Walker Frank Thomas, 64, was arrested at his home shortly after the shooting and charged with murder and attempted murder.Hurtsboro, population 590, is located about 30 miles south of Opelika in Russell County.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesPolice have identified a person of interest in their search for a gunman who killed one man and wounded three others during a Brooklyn shooting.Cops released a surveillance picture Saturday of a man they believe played a role in the March 3 shooting that left 33-year-old Jonathan Jackson dead.Jackson, of Brooklyn, was on Kings Highway near E. 53rd St. about 6 p.m. when the unidentified gunman opened fire, striking him in the chest and thigh. He died at the scene.Three other men — including a 26-year-old hit in the chest, a 34-year-old shot in the buttocks, and a 25-year-old grazed by a bullet in the chest — survived.Cops found surveillance footage of a possible suspect described as 5-feet-5 and 230 pounds, wearing a white hoodie with a black backpack. He fled the scene in a Dodge Durango SUV.Troy Blevins, Digital Content Editor, Graham Media GroupChristian De La Rosa, ReporterTroy Blevins, Digital Content Editor, Graham Media GroupChristian De La Rosa, ReporterMIAMI– Miami police are investigating after three teenagers and a man were shot Saturday night.Police were called to the 1300 block of Northwest 62nd Lane about 6:15 p.m. after learning shots were fired in the area.Miami police said a group of friends were outside when an unknown person or people began shooting in their direction, striking four people in the crowd.The victims were identified by police as a 13-year-old boy, a 16-year-old boy, a 19-year-old man and a 20-year-old man. Police said they did not suffer life-threatening injuries and were taken to Jackson Memorial Hospital's Ryder Trauma Center.The motive behind the shooting is unclear, and the investigation continues, police said.One home was struck by a bullet, but police said no one in the home was hurt.Anyone with information is asked to call the Miami Police Department's homicide unit at 305-603-6350. Police said tipsters who wish to remain anonymous can contact Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers by calling 305-471-TIPS.Copyright 2018 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Troy Blevins is a Digital Content Editor who has been with Graham Media Group since 2012.Christian De La Rosa joined Local 10 News in April 2017 after spending time as a reporter and anchor in Atlanta, San Diego, Orlando and Panama City Beach.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.We’ve detected that JavaScript is disabled in this browser. Please enable JavaScript or switch to a supported browser to continue using twitter.com. You can see a list of supported browsers in our Help Center.Help CenterTerms of ServicePrivacy PolicyCookie PolicyImprintAds info© 2021 Twitter, Inc.VAN BUREN TOWNSHIP, Mich. (WJBK)-A man wanted for four murders on Detroit's west side Monday morning has died after shooting himself after crashing a car he stole and trying to run from police on foot, police say.Police had been looking for George Davis Jr. since around 9 a.m. Monday, after a triple murder at a Sunoco gas station and a fourth murder at a nearby house. Van Buren Police say, Monday afternoon, Davis carjacked a driver in a 2014 black Ford Fusion on Belleville Road.The Ohio State Patrol told FOX 2 that Davis died from a self-inflicted gunshot wound.Authorities say Davis drove south into Ohio. WTOLreportsDavis's car became disabled in the area of I-280 and I-75. A police source says Davis crashed his car and then shot himself. He was rushed to the hospital and later died from his injuries.Earlier on Monday, two women in their 20s were fatally shot at a gas station at 22700 Fenkell Avenue, and a 60-year-old man was the third shooting victim, according to police. Police believe Davis left the gas station after shooting those three and drove to a home approximately two miles away on Faust Street, where he then shot and killed his cousin. He left the home in a blue Nissan Altima with temporary tags.3 killed in gas station shooting on Fenkell, 4th killed minutes later on FaustAdvertisementPolice have identified the male victim at the gas station as Deacon Raphael Hall from Citadel of Praise. Police say he was shot while pumping gas.MAP:Track the suspect's movement throughout Michigan and OhioFamily members tell FOX 2 one of the female victims was Hall's daughter, Ciera Bargaineer, 24, and that she has had a relationship with Davis for years and was the mother of his child. The other female victim has been identified as 21-year-old Kristin Thomas. She was getting a ride to her job at McDonalds.According to police, Davis had just been recently been paroled. A family member tells us Bargaineer and Davis had a child together after he got out of prison. The child is now two months old, and is safe at this time. The family member says she didn't think there were any problems in their relationship.Another family member tells us Davis had just been in the hospital for hallucinations, and that he may have been jealous of a possible relationship between the cousin and Bargaineer.Cornerstone Charter Academies in the Detroit area were on a precautionary lockdown Monday as Davis was on the loose.This is a developing story. Stay with FOX 2 for updates.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsRiviera Beach police believe the person who shot one man in the stomach is the same person who shot another in the hip and two in the head — leaving one dead — on Feb. 23, according to court documents. But a week after the gunfire, police continue to search for the shooter.Newly released court documents provide more details into the events that left 28-year-old William Burgess II dead and three others injured in the National Village community, off Blue Heron Boulevard and North Congress Avenue.On Feb. 23, officers were on the 2000 block of West Blue Heron Boulevard when they heard multiple gunshots, according to a search warrant.When officers got closer to the National Village community where they heard the shots, an officer noticed a gold Chevrolet Malibu with a passenger who was bleeding from his head. Officers followed the vehicle and stopped it on North Congress Avenue, just north of 45th Street. The man bleeding took off running to JFK Hospital North.That man, as well as another who was shot in the hip and in another vehicle, were treated at the hospital and detained for questioning, according to police.When police went back to the neighborhood, they found another man shot to death in the driver’s seat  of a black Toyota Camry on the 2700 block of West 28th Street. He was later identified as  Burgess.Video surveillance in the area shows a black Nissan Maxima pulling up to the driveway of a home on the 2700 block of West 28th Street where several men were inside an open garage. At some point, the driver and two others exited the car and went inside the garage.Eventually, the driver got back in the Nissan and drove off alone. Burgess then pulled up to the same home in the black Toyota and appeared to be involved in a “street level narcotic sale,” according to the court document.Soon after, the Nissan appeared back on the street and pulled up next to the Toyota’s passenger side door, police said. The driver of the Nissan shot through the Toyota’s passenger window and drove off.Burgess was shot in the head and two others were injured, according to police.Those in the garage ran out, none checking on Burgess, police noted. Two other men were shot in the hip and the head. It’s unclear where those two men were at the time of the shooting.One man, who police say was involved in the drug deal moments before the shooting and was the last to speak with Burgess, is seen on video surveillance dumping something into a nearby garbage can. Detectives later discovered it was a bag of pills and marijuana.Police wrote in the narrative that the shooter in the Nissan was connected to another shooting in the neighborhood earlier that day. According to the court document, another man was driven to St. Mary’s Medical Center with a gunshot wound to the stomach.“It is imperative to be noted this exact Nissan Maxima and driver were involved in another shooting that occurred,” officers wrote.Once the search warrant was executed, officers found ammunition, drugs, DNA and a gray sweater at the residence where the shooting happened.Police did not release any motive in the shooting or provide the name of the possible shooter.Burgess is one of 18 confirmed homicides in Palm Beach County this year, according to a Palm Beach Post database. He is the second reported homicide in Riviera Beach this year.Anyone information is asked to contact Riviera Beach Police at 561-845-4123 or Palm Beach County Crime Stoppers at 1-800-458-TIPS (8477.)?Staff writer Olivia Hitchcock contributed to this story.Riviera Beach police believe the person who shot one man in the stomach is the same person who shot another in the hip and two in the head — leaving one dead — on Feb. 23, according to court documents. But a week after the gunfire, police continue to search for the shooter.Newly released court documents provide more details into the events that left 28-year-old William Burgess II dead and three others injured in the National Village community, off Blue Heron Boulevard and North Congress Avenue.On Feb. 23, officers were on the 2000 block of West Blue Heron Boulevard when they heard multiple gunshots, according to a search warrant.When officers got closer to the National Village community where they heard the shots, an officer noticed a gold Chevrolet Malibu with a passenger who was bleeding from his head. Officers followed the vehicle and stopped it on North Congress Avenue, just north of 45th Street. The man bleeding took off running to JFK Hospital North.That man, as well as another who was shot in the hip and in another vehicle, were treated at the hospital and detained for questioning, according to police.When police went back to the neighborhood, they found another man shot to death in the driver’s seat  of a black Toyota Camry on the 2700 block of West 28th Street. He was later identified as  Burgess.Video surveillance in the area shows a black Nissan Maxima pulling up to the driveway of a home on the 2700 block of West 28th Street where several men were inside an open garage. At some point, the driver and two others exited the car and went inside the garage.Eventually, the driver got back in the Nissan and drove off alone. Burgess then pulled up to the same home in the black Toyota and appeared to be involved in a “street level narcotic sale,” according to the court document.Soon after, the Nissan appeared back on the street and pulled up next to the Toyota’s passenger side door, police said. The driver of the Nissan shot through the Toyota’s passenger window and drove off.Burgess was shot in the head and two others were injured, according to police.Those in the garage ran out, none checking on Burgess, police noted. Two other men were shot in the hip and the head. It’s unclear where those two men were at the time of the shooting.One man, who police say was involved in the drug deal moments before the shooting and was the last to speak with Burgess, is seen on video surveillance dumping something into a nearby garbage can. Detectives later discovered it was a bag of pills and marijuana.Police wrote in the narrative that the shooter in the Nissan was connected to another shooting in the neighborhood earlier that day. According to the court document, another man was driven to St. Mary’s Medical Center with a gunshot wound to the stomach.“It is imperative to be noted this exact Nissan Maxima and driver were involved in another shooting that occurred,” officers wrote.Once the search warrant was executed, officers found ammunition, drugs, DNA and a gray sweater at the residence where the shooting happened.Police did not release any motive in the shooting or provide the name of the possible shooter.Burgess is one of 18 confirmed homicides in Palm Beach County this year, according to a Palm Beach Post database. He is the second reported homicide in Riviera Beach this year.Anyone information is asked to contact Riviera Beach Police at 561-845-4123 or Palm Beach County Crime Stoppers at 1-800-458-TIPS (8477.)?Staff writer Olivia Hitchcock contributed to this story.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Palm Beach Post  ~ 2751 S. Dixie Highway, West Palm Beach, FL 33405~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKWREG.comby:Nina HarrelsonMEMPHIS, Tenn. — Police are investigating a mass shooting outside a Frayser nightclub that sent five people to the hospital.Investigators say it happened just after 2 a.m. Saturday at Club Bosses on North Watkins Avenue.Three men, ages 29, 31 and 37, are listed in critical condition and a 34-year-old man and 19-year-old woman are expected to survive, police say.“That’s scary. It is scary,” said Mohammed Alkabsh, who owns the Valero gas station next door.  “To me like, just crazy, you know? For something to just pop up like this. I couldn’t believe it.”The 24-hour gas station had about five customers at the time, and Alkabsh said they ran inside and hit the floor, terrified they could end up caught in the crossfire.“People came in here running and started laying down in here,” he said. “I mean, it sounded crazy to me.”There are four surveillance cameras outside Alkabsh’s store, which he hopes captured something.“I’ve been here for two years, cool with everybody, we never had no problem,” he said.The nightclub is rated 4.9 out of five stars among Facebook reviewers, and many have commented on the safe environment and security.But next door, Alkabsh said he’s not feeling quite as safe and secure anymore.“It’s kind of hard now just to feel good, you know what I mean?” he said.Police haven’t released the victims’ names.Investigators say the shooter took off northbound on Watkins Avenue in a black four-door car.If you know anything, you can call in an anonymous tip to Crime Stoppers at (901) 528-CASH.Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.The killer fired his AR-15 at them on that terrible afternoon at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School, and they survived.One lived after her friend, who would be killed, urged her to use a book to block the shots. Another was shot as he used his body to hold the door shut against Cruz. Others were hit as they crouched in classrooms and Cruz fired shot after shot through locked doors.A complete list of the wounded from the Parkland school shooting was released for the first time Wednesday, as part of the indictment of Nikolas Cruz for murder and attempted murder.The indictment, handed upby a grand juryin Fort Lauderdale, charges Cruz with 17 counts of premeditated first-degree murder and 17 counts of attempted first-degree murder in the Feb. 14 shooting at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School.Although authorities have previously said the number of wounded stood at 16, the indictment lists 17 victims of attempted murder and said all had been shot.Injuries ranged from bullet grazes to multiple gunshot wounds, with some victims released from the hospital within hours and others remaining there for weeks.Samantha Fuentes,18, was shot multiple times in both legs and sustained shrapnel wounds to her legs and face. Daniela Menescal, 17, was shot in the back and leg, after Cruz entered her classroom and opened fire, killing two students.Alexander Dworet, 15, whose brother Nicholas was killed by Cruz, was grazed on the back of the head by a bullet.Isabel Chequer, a junior, suffered two bullet wounds but was among the first released from the hospital.“They were non-life-threatening,” her father, Amin Chequer, told the South Florida Sun Sentinel on Wednesday. “She was home by 9 or 10 that night.”Stacey Lynn Lippel, 50, a language arts teacher, was grazed in the arm by a bullet inside the 1200 building. Lippel, of Coral Springs, told ABC News that she was teaching a creative writing class when she heard a “barrage of bullets” in the hallway, followed by a fire alarm. Lippel unlocked her classroom door as students flooded in. Lippel says she caught a glimpse of the shooter, and immediately locked the door behind her.Samantha Grady’s friend, Helena Ramsay, urged her to hold up a book to deflect the bullets, as Cruz fired through the locked door of their classroom. Samantha, a junior, said it may have saved her life, allowing her to escape with superficial wounds. Her friend was killed.Madeleine Wilford, a 17-year-old junior and player on Stoneman Douglas’ girls basketball team, was shot three times, the bullets piercing her chest, torso and right arm. After being listed in critical condition at Broward North Medical Center in Deerfield Beach, Wilford recovered, and doctors released her from the hospital on Feb. 24.President Donald Trump visited her in the hospital days after the shooting. A GoFundMe campaign titled “Support for Missy and Maddy,” created on behalf of Wilford and her mother, Missy, had reached its fundraising goal of $70,000 on Monday.Anthony Borges, 15, is credited with saving the lives of 20 students, holding his ground in doorway by using his body as a barricade.He was shot five times. He was struck twice in his right leg, once in his left leg and twice in his torso, Anthony’s attorney, Alex Arreaza, said.“By the grace of God, he’s not No. 18,” Arreaza said. “But it’s going to be a tough recovery. … It’s a miracle that we’re even talking about recovery.”The soccer club FC Barcelona sent a signed team jersey to the student, who spent two months playing at Barcelona's youth academy near Fort Lauderdale in 2016. Borges and his parents told Broward County Administrator Bertha Henry that the family intends to sue Broward County Public Schools, Marjory Stoneman Douglas’ principal and its school resource officer over the shooting.Another wounded student who plans to sue isKyle Laman, 15. He said Cruz looked him right in the eye before he started shooting, hitting him in the ankle and foot as he dove to the floor.The remaining names on the list of wounded: Ashley Baez, Justin Colton, Marian Kabachenko, Kheshava Managapuram, Samantha Mayor, William Olson, Genesis Valentin and Benjamin Wikander.Staff writer Anne Geggis contributed to this report.Like us on FacebookRecommendedNEW ORLEANS (WVUE) - Two men have been indicted for double-murder by the Orleans Parish District Attorney’s Office in connection to the shooting of five people at a Lower 9th Ward party on Mardi Gras of 2018.The indictment handed up Thursday by an Orleans Parish grand jury charges Kendall Barnes and Derrick "Woo" Groves identically with seven counts each related to the mass shooting on Feb. 13, 2018.The indictment was unsealed Friday, following Groves' early morning arrest in Slidell by the FBI’s Violent Crime Task Force.Barnes has been in federal custody for the past four months.Each is charged with two counts of second-degree murder for the slayings of 26-year-old Jamar Robinson and 21-year-old Byron Jackson, and with two counts of obstruction of justice in a homicide investigation.The indictment also charges the alleged gunmen with three counts of attempted second-degree murder, for the shootings of three other men in their mid-20s who survived the Fat Tuesday barrage at 8:18 p.m. in the 5400 block of St. Claude Avenue.Barnes, 22, and Groves, 21, face mandatory lifetime prison sentences if convicted of either murder charge, and 10 to 50 years each if found guilty on the attempted murder counts. Obstruction of justice in a homicide investigation is punishable by up to 40 years in prison upon conviction.New Orleans police believe Barnes and Groves opened fire with assault-style rifles upon the five victims outside the crowded party. Three victims were struck as they sat in a red Nissan Altima, while two others were wounded while on the sidewalk near the corner of St. Claude Avenue and Andry Street.Copyright 2019 WVUE. All rights reserved.844 Government StreetBaton Rouge, LA 70802(225) 383-9999A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A 32-year-old Boynton Beach man was Hugo Steven Selva’s first victim in the 24-hour crime spree that ended with a deputy killing the 22-year-old on Interstate 95 near Lantana Road.Charles Brown Jr. was shot Tuesday afternoon on South Dixie Highway, near the Dutchman Motor Lodge south of Forest Hill Boulevard. He was taken to St. Mary’s Medical Center in West Palm Beach with non-life threatening injuries.EXCLUSIVE PHOTOS: The mayhem that shut down I-95Police said at the time that Brown likely knew his shooter. Authorities have since linked Selva to that shooting, as well as one early Wednesday in Boynton Beach and his girlfriend’s later that morning in front of a Lake Worth grocery store. Anthony Fonti, 21, is expected to survive his wounds in the Boynton Beach shooting.Selva’s girlfriend and the mother of his child, 26-year-old Nicole Novak, died of her injuries.It’s unclear when Novak died, but authorities say she was in the car as Selva sped the wrong way down Interstate 95, causing three head-on crashes.A Florida Highway Patrol trooper deployed his Tazer at Selva, but Sheriff Ric Bradshaw said it misfired. Deputy Connor Haugh then shot and killed Selva.Bradshaw "said (Haugh) was in fear of his life and the life of the trooper."Bradshaw did not say if the Selva was armed, but said, "there was enough to let the deputy know he needed to do what he needed to do." His office has not commented on how many shots Haugh fired or where gunfire struck Selva.Haugh is on paid administrative leave while the Florida Department of Law Enforcement reviews the shooting.A 32-year-old Boynton Beach man was Hugo Steven Selva’s first victim in the 24-hour crime spree that ended with a deputy killing the 22-year-old on Interstate 95 near Lantana Road.Charles Brown Jr. was shot Tuesday afternoon on South Dixie Highway, near the Dutchman Motor Lodge south of Forest Hill Boulevard. He was taken to St. Mary’s Medical Center in West Palm Beach with non-life threatening injuries.EXCLUSIVE PHOTOS: The mayhem that shut down I-95Police said at the time that Brown likely knew his shooter. Authorities have since linked Selva to that shooting, as well as one early Wednesday in Boynton Beach and his girlfriend’s later that morning in front of a Lake Worth grocery store. Anthony Fonti, 21, is expected to survive his wounds in the Boynton Beach shooting.Selva’s girlfriend and the mother of his child, 26-year-old Nicole Novak, died of her injuries.It’s unclear when Novak died, but authorities say she was in the car as Selva sped the wrong way down Interstate 95, causing three head-on crashes.A Florida Highway Patrol trooper deployed his Tazer at Selva, but Sheriff Ric Bradshaw said it misfired. Deputy Connor Haugh then shot and killed Selva.Bradshaw "said (Haugh) was in fear of his life and the life of the trooper."Bradshaw did not say if the Selva was armed, but said, "there was enough to let the deputy know he needed to do what he needed to do." His office has not commented on how many shots Haugh fired or where gunfire struck Selva.Haugh is on paid administrative leave while the Florida Department of Law Enforcement reviews the shooting.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Palm Beach Post  ~ 2751 S. Dixie Highway, West Palm Beach, FL 33405~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKPolice say one man is dead and five others have been injured following a shooting at a Garfield Heights sports bar early Saturday morning.Around 1:10 a.m., officers say they responded to Topicz Sports Lounge on Broadway Ave. and found a man lying unresponsive on the sidewalk outside. That man—whom the Cuyahoga County Medical Examiner has since identified as 22-year-old Cleveland native Michael Jones Jr.—was taken to Marymount Hospital, where he later died.After securing the scene, investigators learned five other people had been shot at the bar and taken to both Marymount and MetroHealth Medical Center. Their exact conditions are unknown.An investigation is underway and authorities have not released any information on possible suspects at this time. The Ohio Bureau of Criminal Investigation is assisting the Garfield Heights Police Department in the matter.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.UpdatedThursday with more detailsST. LOUIS •A driver, his two passengers and a man standing at a bus stop were shot near Goodfellow Boulevard and Martin Luther King Drive here Wednesday evening.Each of the victims were taken to hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries after the shooting about 7 p.m., police said.Three of the victims, two men and one woman, were in a car driving down Martin Luther King when an occupant of a gray vehicle with tinted windows fire shots at them, police said. Two of them were shot in the lower extremities and the third was shot in the torso and arm.The fourth victim told police he was standing at the bus stop at the intersection when he was hit by the gunfire, police said. He was shot in the leg.Police had a section of Martin Luther King closed on both sides of Goodfellow as they investigated. Detectives were seen examining a black passenger car in the westbound lanes of Martin Luther King.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Reporter covering breaking news and crime by night. Born in Algeria but grew up in St. Louis. Previously reported for The Associated Press in Jackson, Mississippi and at the Wichita Eagle in Wichita, Kansas.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.The suspected gunman in a quadruple homicide in rural Pennsylvania car has died.Suspected gunman in quadruple homicide at rural Pennsylvania car wash dies— -- When Jenna Porterfield first heard through Facebook that her husband of just two months was one of four people shot dead at a western Pennsylvania car wash early Sunday, she says she jumped in her car and raced to the scene, praying it wasn't true."Now, I'm planning my husband's funeral," she told ABC News on Monday.Porterfield, who is pregnant, said she is frustrated that authorities have released so few answers on the circumstances that led a gunman to ambush her husband, Bill Porterfield, and three of his friends at 2:52 a.m. Sunday at Ed's Car Wash in the Pennsylvania hills town of Melcroft, about 55 miles southeast of Pittsburgh.The suspected gunman, Timothy Smith, 28, died late Sunday night at a hospital after hanging on for several hours with an apparent self-inflicted gunshot wound to the head, Fayette County District Attorney Richard Bower told ABC News on Monday.He said the investigation is in its early stages, and that Pennsylvania State Police will attempt to piece together what prompted Smith's killing spree and what drew the victims and Smith to the Melcroft car wash Sunday morning.Sierra Kolarik said her sister, Chelsie Lou Cline, 25, was one of the people killed, and that Smith was her ex-boyfriend.In an interview with ABC station WTAE in Pittsburgh, she described Smith as having "a very obsessive personality."Bower said Cline and Porterfield, 27, were the first two victims shot to death when they arrived together at the car wash. He said the other two victims, Courtney Sue Snyder, 23, and Seth William Cline, 21, were killed when Smith -- wearing a ballistic vest and wielding three guns, including an AR 15 assault rifle -- opened fire on them as soon as they drove up to the car wash in a pickup truck.A woman sitting in the rear seat of the extended cab truck survived, suffering only minor cuts from shattered glass, Bower said. Police have not identified that woman.Jenna Porterfield said she last spoke to her husband by phone just before midnight on Saturday, a few hours before he was killed."My husband was supposed to come home to me and he didn't. He didn't make it home," she said.She said her husband and Chelsie Cline were friends, adding that she had heard "rumors and pure speculation" that they were having an affair."I confirmed that was false," she told ABC News, adding that she had gone to school with Cline. "My husband only talked about me and making our family work. He was perfect."She said she and Bill Porterfield, a foreman for a tree trimming service, were married on Nov. 18 and were expecting their first child together in August."He was excited. He wanted it more than anything in the world," she said of the expectant baby.She said she knew Chelsie Cline had recently broken up with Smith, but added that neither she nor her husband had ever met Smith.She said she had no idea why they all went to the car wash early Sunday."I question that myself," she said. "That was one of the reasons I was angry. They have surveillance cameras all around there. They should have some answers."She said State Police have yet to speak to her and shed any light on why Smith targeted her husband and the others."It was definitely meant to be a massacre. That's what he (Smith) went there to do and that's what he did," Porterfield said."My husband was loved by everyone," she said. "I can't imagine anyone would want to hurt him. He was the kindest heart that you would ever meet."24/7 coverage of breaking news and live eventsUpdate, Oct. 31:Jerrick Whitley, 33, has been sentenced to 119 years in the Indiana Department of Correction for the January 2018 shooting outside the Sawmill Saloon that left two men dead, the Marion County prosecutor's office announced Thursday.Earlier this month, Whitley was convicted of two charges of murder and one count of aggravated battery, according to online court records. Deron Gray, 24, and James Ratcliffe, 50, were killed in the east-side shooting.Update, Oct. 10, 2019:After a three-day jury trial, Jerrick Whitley, 33, was found guilty of two counts of murder, one count of aggravated battery and one count of unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious felon, according to online court records.Prosecutors said Whitley fatally shot Deron Gray, 24, and James Ratcliffe, 50, outside the Sawmill Saloon in the 1300 block of North Sherman Drive in the early hours of Jan. 28, 2018. A third person was also seriously injured in the incident, prosecutors said.Whitley will be sentenced Oct. 31, according to online court records.Original story:Indianapolis police have arrested the man suspected of pulling the trigger in a shooting at an east-side saloon that left two men dead and multiple people wounded.Jerrick Whitley, 32, is facing murder, robbery and drug dealing charges after being taken into custody in connection to the January deaths of 24-year-old Deron Gray, and 50-year-old James Ratcliffe.Whitley is also accused of shooting a third man who survived the incidentreported during the early-morning hoursof Jan. 28 in the 1300 block of North Sherman Drive.On Saturday, investigators received information that Whitley was at a house in the 4100 block of Broadway. Police when to the home, located the suspect and took him into custody without further incident.The saloon shooting ended with five people being shot, including Gray and Ratcliffe. Police were interviewing about 30 witnesses shortly after the incident.Information about what happened in the moments leading up to the shooting has not been released.Call IndyStar reporter Justin L. Mack at 317-444-6138. Follow him on Twitter: @justinlmack.Partly cloudy. High 69F. Winds SW at 10 to 20 mph..Mainly clear. Low around 50F. Winds WSW at 10 to 15 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:59 pmBowling Green Police investigate the scene of a shooting on Saturday, January 27, 2018, at the 110 Club at 645 Pearl Street. (Austin Anthony/photo@bgdailynews.com)Bowling Green Police investigate a shooting Saturday, January 27, 2018,at the 110 Club at 645 Pearl St.Bowling Green Police investigate the scene of a shooting on Saturday, January 27, 2018, at the 110 Club at 645 Pearl Street. (Austin Anthony/photo@bgdailynews.com)Bowling Green Police investigate a shooting Saturday, January 27, 2018,at the 110 Club at 645 Pearl St.Bowling Green police continue to investigate an incident in which three Bowling Green men and a Memphis, Tenn., man were shot early Saturday at Club 110.“We are investigating this to determine who the shooters are and we’re trying to keep this community as safe as possible and would like to bring these folks to justice,” Bowling Green Police Department spokesman Officer Ronnie Ward said.Officers were called to the 645 Pearl St. event venue after someone reported shots being fired, according to police records.Police arrived and learned four people had been shot. Jeremy Winters, 23, of 1766 Avenue of Champions; Brendan Lewis, 24, of 110 Cole Court; Gerard L. Kelly, 29; and Crishawn Christopher, 20, of Memphis, all suffered gunshot wounds that were not considered life-threatening, records show.Police have not identified a suspect who was described by witnesses as a black man wearing all black clothing. While police were en route, a dispatcher advised police that he or she could hear shots being fired in the background during a call from a victim, records show.A woman who identified herself as the property owner gave police consent to search the property and said she rented it to someone for an event that night, records show.Event fliers posted to Facebook billed the event as a back-to-school party with performers Blocboy JB, DJ270 and DJReezy and referred to the space as Pyramid night club and ClubPyramids.A woman at the scene provided police with the name of a possible shooter who she said may have also been involved in other Bowling Green shooting calls, records show.Police recorded the numbers of all license plates parked in the parking lot and attempted to talk to several people still on the scene and those leaving the club. Police found shell casings in the parking lot, records show.A police officer overheard a woman who sounded as though she was talking on her cellphone about the incident, but she refused to talk to police and left, records show.Anyone with information about the incident is asked to call BGPD at 270-393-4000 or report anonymously through Crime Stoppers at 270-781-CLUE, Ward said.– Follow Night Editor and Senior Reporter Deborah Highland on Twitter @BGDNCrimebeat or visitbgdailynews.com.– Follow Night Editor and Senior Reporter Deborah Highland on Twitter @BGDNCrimebeat or visitbgdailynews.com.Night editor and senior writer Deborah Highland is a veteran journalist with 23 years of experience writing and editing both community and metropolitan newspapers. She has also developed websites and co-hosted a political talk show.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Would you like to receive a digest of each day's headlines & events from The Daily News by email?Signup today!Would you like to receive a weekly digest of headlines & events from The Amplifier by email?Signup today!The Daily News is a proud host of community enrichment events.  Join our Daily News Events mailing list to learn about the next event we are planning.Sign up now.WATCHVIDEOSPolice responded to a report of five people shot in South Los Angeles on Saturday, Jan. 27, 2018.Four adults were shot in NE DC on Thursday night, police say.The shooting occurred just past 9 p.m. on the 1600 block of Kenilworth Ave NE. One man was unconscious when police arrived.Police aren’t looking for a suspect at this time.Shooting at 2117 hours in the 1600 block of Kenilworth Ave NE. No lookout at this time.pic.twitter.com/kGnbFkmQTZThis NE shooting comes on the heels of anearlier, unrelated shooting in NE DC,which left a 16-year-old girl critically injured.This story is developing and will be updated as more information becomes available.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.This article was originally published in 2018. Jan. 23, 2021, marks the third anniversary of the Marshall County school shooting.BENTON, Ky. — Minutes before Friday night's season opener, Tyler Stevenson stepped to the front of a crowded Marshall County High School football locker room.The senior's booming voice reverberated off the walls and cut through the silence."Nobody really understands what we have gone through in the past six months," Stevenson said. "We have three people in this locker room right now that took bullets on this campus. ... They’re standing here right now. Play for them."Those players — juniors Devon Evans, Dalton Keeling and Gage Smock — were scattered at different ends of the locker room and didn't flinch despite the reminder of what they went through on Jan. 23.They were in the commons area of the high school whengunfire erupted before the morning bell. By the time it was over, they were among the 14 students who were injured.Their friends, Bailey Holt and Preston Cope, had been killed. Another student,Gabe Parker, was arrested.Back in the locker room, Stevenson continued."If you don’t play for Preston and Bailey tonight, then you ain’t playing for nothing," he said. "We have spilled blood, sweat and tears on this freaking campus. And it is time you take it to somebody else."The latest:As Marshall County preps for school, suspected shooter appears in courtThe Marshals jumped out of their seats and hurried out of the suddenly raucous locker room and under a doorway to the exit that featured the sign, "MC Pride."The players circled around their captains underneath the south-end goalpost and broke the huddle with "Marshall Strong."In front of thousands of friends, family and classmates, they headed out of an inflatable tunnel and onto the field.♦ ♦ ♦Keeling remembers thesound of the gunshots, but then his memory gets fuzzy.He knows he was standing in a crowd with Evans, Smock, Cope and Holt. The next thing he remembers was just trying to make it to an exit.“I just kind of froze," said Keeling, now 17. "I couldn’t really do anything. I was like, 'Is this real?'"As he was running, he noticed he was out of breath. He lifted up his shirt and found he had been shot through the chest. The bullet exited through his back and shattered his ribs.He was rushed to a hospital, where he stayed for three days. There, he was overcome with emotion."Just seeing somebody do that to us when we didn’t do nothing to him, there’s a lot of anger," Keeling said on Friday.He returned to school about two weeks later. He said it helped with the healing process, but it hasn't helped the recurring memories of the shooting."It’s something that is burnt into my brain," he said. "You got to learn how to grow and overcome it, but it’ll always be there."♦ ♦ ♦A bullet entered one side of Smock's face and exited the other, shattering his jaw. He wastaken to a Nashville hospital, where his jaw was wired shut for six weeks.Confined to a liquid diet, he lost 30 pounds. He stayed home from school the remainder of the semester while he recovered both emotionally and physically.Cope was a good friend and his baseball teammate, but Holt was his girlfriend. They had been dating for eight months.His favorite memories with her were hanging out after school and watching old movies, like "Ferris Bueller's Day Off" and the National Lampoon series. He loved her sense of humor.Marshall Co. teacher:NRA leader's visit after school shooting 'callous'"I miss her a lot," said Smock, 16. "That’s what's really has bothered me the most."He said the shooting made him grow up faster than he needed to and caused him to look at the world differently."You appreciate more things in life and you notice more things that you didn’t notice before, like things you took for granted before," he said. "Like just being able to drive, being able to see, being able to be with family.”♦ ♦ ♦The bullet that struck Evans exited his left arm.He was taken by a teacher to a classroom, where they stayed until authorities cleared the commons.As he left the school, they told him to his close eyes. He didn't listen."I saw everything that was out there," said Evans, 16.The doctors told him he wouldn't regain feeling in his arm for three months.But just days later, he was in the weight room working out with the football team. And he was back at school the first chance he could get."You’ve got to get on with life and show everyone that no matter what you can always push past it," he said, also acknowledging that he's always been hard-headed.On his left biceps, he's in the process of finishing a tattoo to commemorate the shooting. It features Bailey and Preston walking up the stairway to heaven. There's a clock with the time of the shooting; it's being shattered by his shooting scar.He acknowledged nothing is ever going to be the same. But he said the best thing you can do is just show you're OK."We’ve had a lot of curveballs thrown at us in life, but no matter what, you can always step up to the plate and show them what you got to go out with," Devon said.♦ ♦ ♦The school year started last Thursday and brought a few changes —metal detectors, aban on backpacksand an increased presence of student-resource officers.It also brought another update: the commons area is closed off, part of a renovation that was planned before the shooting and will be done by the end of the 2019 year.On Friday, Marshall County Superintendent Trent Lovett remembered how he and high school principal Patricia Greer were concerned whether the students would go back into the area when school reopened after the shooting.When they arrived that morning, they were greeted by the students in their same spots. So they decided to join them."Ms. Greer and I would go and try to stand in the area where the shooter stood," Lovett said. "If they turned around to see anything, I wanted them to see a friendly face. We did that for the rest of the year.”Lovett said the school is reaching what he called "a new normal." And he's been mostly impressed by the students, who he called "very, very resilient."Related:Gov. Matt Bevin blames school shootings on phones, psychotropic drugs“You will never forget what happened. That will be with them the rest of their lives," he said. "It’s going to be with all of us the rest of our lives."When asked to describe the community, the Marshall County native responded with "utopia" and "tight-knit.""Support has always been unbelievable but even more so after the event occurred in January," he said. “We may bicker among ourselves, but if you’re an outsider, you better not bicker with us because we’re going to have each other’s back.”♦ ♦ ♦In Marshall County, sports have played a role in the quest to move on from the tragedy.Football coach Evan Merrick said since the shooting, fans have filled up every sporting event from basketball to soccer to baseball."People were craving to get out and establish some type of normalcy," said Merrick, who is in his fifth season as head coach. "That was a big thing for us."He labeled the Friday night game as "another step toward healing."And then he turned his attention to Evans, Keeling and Smock.'Don't forget about us':Marshall County sheriff meets with Trump on school safetyHe remembered the moment they grew close, during a practice at the end of the eighth grade, the spring before they tried out for the high school team. They wore jersey numbers 51, 52 and 53.They've been best friends since."They got a great dynamic amongst them three, and they mesh really well in our locker room," Merrick said. "They’ve been a big part of what’s helped us push forward this offseason and have been leaders for us and leaders for our school."♦ ♦ ♦In the hours leading up to Friday's game, Keeling said he was looking forward to finally releasing all the anger he pent-up after the shooting."I’m not as mad as I was when I was laying in the hospital bed," said Keeling, an offensive lineman. "All the anger, yes, is still there, but I can control it all. ... It’s going to be a good night."He sat in the locker room alongside a scooter-bound Evans, a running back who broke his ankle during a scrimmage the previous week. An opponent landed on his leg while he was fighting for extra yards.He picked a purple cast for his ankle – Holt's favorite color. When he plays in his first game, he's going to wear Cope's baseball number – No. 5.The doctor told him it would take up to six weeks to return, but he planned on being on the practice field Monday."I got to get back out here," he said.Meanwhile, Smock received welcome news Wednesday. He was cleared to play his spot on the offensive line.When asked what he was most looking forward to about the season, he said playing for the entire Marshall County community."This whole entire county was a victim, really, cause everybody is so tight together. Everybody has kids that go to school," Smock said. "I just think that this year if we do really good, it’d be so awesome."♦ ♦ ♦In a county of roughly 31,000 people, at least one-sixth filled into the stadium Friday night for the Marshals' season opener against the Fort Campbell Falcons.On the humid night, the Marshals used a pair of long touchdowns from Stevenson to take an early lead.  After each touchdown, loud booms ripped through cheers, chants, and screams of the crowd — fireworks.More:Marshall County, other 'fed up' Kentucky students fill Capitol's steps to call for changeKeeling started at right guard and played on the defensive line. When he was on the sideline, he stood next to Smock and Evans, who both didn't get into the game.They joked around with their teammates as the Marshals held the Falcons scoreless in the second half en route to a 34-12 win, avenging a season-opening loss to Fort Campbell last season.After the post-game handshakes and a larger fireworks show, the Marshals returned to the south end zone and took a knee.Merrick addressed the team and pointed out that they were 1-0 for the first time since 2012."Set the tone," Merrick said. "That's what we wanted."Justin Sayers: 502-582-4252; jsayers@courierjournal.com; Twitter:@_JustinSayers. Support strong local journalism by subscribing today:courier-journal.com/justins.NORTH PHILADELPHIA (WTXF)-Philadelphia Police have released surveillance video of a vehicle believed to have been involved in a drive-by shooting that injured four people in North Philadelphia.The incident took place around 9:30 p.m. Tuesday on the 2400 block of Ridge Avenue.Officials believe suspects inside a dark-colored Chevy Impala fired shots while traveling south on Ridge Avenue.The shooting left two 13-year-old boys in stable condition with gunshot wounds to the legs, and a 22-year-old was stable after he was shot in the back and legs.MORE: Police investigate quadruple shooting in North PhiladelphiaA 52-year-old man was also struck by gunfire and was taken to Temple University Hospital where he was listed in crucial condition.AdvertisementFollowing the shooting, the car was last seen traveling on the 2400 block of Cecil B. Moore Avenue.Anyone with information about the vehicle or the incident is asked to contact police.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsORLANDO, Fla. — A 17-year-old was arrested Thursday and faces charges of attempted felony murder and possession of a firearm by a minor on suspicion of shooting and injuring four teens, Orlando police said.[Map: 2018 homicides in Orlando]Kenneth Hall is one of the teens accused of firing into a crowd at Willows Park near Silver Start Road in Pine Hills on Jan. 21, police said."I must say that it saddened me. Because as a mentor for children, and as an advocate for the Pine Hills Community Council and the Pine Hills community, it really saddened me, because safety first," said Sandra Fatmi, president of the Pine Hills Community Council.Jay Shepherd, 13, was arrested Jan. 25 in connection with the shooting,investigators said. He faces charges of attempted felony murder with a firearm and aggravated assaulted with a firearm.[Read: Police: 13-year-old arrested in shooting that injured 4 teens in Orlando]The teens' injuries were not life-threatening, investigators said.Police said they do not expect to make any more arrests in the shooting.Fatmi mentors teens in her after-school program and she's been urging teens to turn whispers about the shooting into information for police."I knew all along that you see something, say something would work and it would make a difference," Fatmi said. "It takes a while to build trust back again."A motive behind the shooting has not been released.[Read: Police: 4 children shot at Orlando park]Kenneth Hall, 17, was the second suspect arrested in the 1/21/2018 shooting of four juveniles at a park on Willow Bend Blvd.The other suspect is 13-year-old Jermaine Shepherd. OPD is not seeking any other suspects.pic.twitter.com/tAfX0bxftSI am extremely excited to call Central Florida home.Filed under:Two men and two women were wounded early Sunday in drive-by shooting at a party in the West Side Humboldt Park neighborhood.A 19-year-old woman was walking into the building through the front door about 1 a.m. when a car drove by and opened fire in the 3200 block of West Division, according to Chicago Police.The woman was struck in the neck, police said. Paramedics took her to Stroger Hospital in critical condition.Three other people who were standing inside near the entrance were also hit by gunfire, police said.A 30-year-old woman was shot in the forearm and taken to Norwegian American Hospital in good condition, according to police. A 24-year-old man was also taken to Norwegian American for treatment to a gunshot wound to the lower back. His condition stabilized.Another man, 21, was shot in the hand, police said. His condition was unknown and police didn’t know where he was receiving treatment.It wasn’t known if any of the four people knew each other, police said.Richard Karwowski said he’s been living in the neighborhood almost 20 years. He woke up to the sound of gunshots early Sunday.“I’m sleeping, and I hear six to eight shots,” Karwowski said. “I see people laying down across the street and people calling [inside for help].”Karwowski said shootings in the neighborhood are “frequent.”“There was a shooting that I reported here approximately six months ago,” he said. “It was the same thing. Somebody brought a gun and had a shootout right here.”The Chicago Sun-Times reported in July that a 22-year-old man was shot two blocks away from the scene of Sunday’s quadruple-shooting.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.D.C. police arrested two men Thursday in separate fatal shootings, alleging that one of them opened fire at people on a street corner because he was mad about the theft of his favorite pistol, and that the other suspect used a handgun during a drunken dispute among apartment residents after a Memorial Day weekend cookout.In each case, the person killed was not an intended target of the attack, police said.The first shooting, Jan. 17, occurred shortly after 11 a.m. at 16th and U streets SE. The suspect, Torey G. Stockton, 21, of District Heights, Md., allegedly opened fire with a 9mm automatic weapon at several people standing outside King Convenience Store.In an affidavit filed in D.C. Superior Court, a homicide detective wrote that Stockton was angry about the theft of his gold-plated Glock pistol, which he called “Glizzy.” He fired at least 15 shots from a moving car on 16th Street because he saw acquaintances of the suspected thief, the affidavit says.Police said Stockton, who is being held without bail on a first-degree murder charge, wounded four victims, including Jasmine Lashai Light, 23, of Southwest Washington, who died at a hospital. Light was not one of the people Stockton was intending to shoot, according to D.C. Police Chief Peter Newsham.“This was a young lady who, by all accounts, had turned her life around” after troubled teenage years, Newsham said Friday in announcing the arrests.‘When is it going to stop?’ A rise in homicides in the District brings grief and frustrationOn the morning of the shooting at 16th and U, Newsham and Mayor Muriel E. Bowser (D) were holding an outdoor news conference a few blocks away, talking about the shooting death of a 14-year-old in the same neighborhood a few days earlier.The sounds of a new homicide — the gunshots outside the store, followed by wailing police sirens — interrupted the chief as he was lamenting the previous killing.Speaking to reporters Friday, Newsham recalled viewing surveillance footage of bodies falling outside the store. “I can tell you as a police officer, the video in this case is something that will stay with me for the rest of my life,” he said.The police affidavit says Stockton posted photos of “Glizzy” on Instagram before the shooting and threatened to wreak violence if the Glock wasn’t returned. He went looking for the suspected gun thief, a former friend, in the vicinity of 16th and U, the affidavit said. When he couldn’t find the man, he allegedly vented his anger on people he knew were “associates” of the ex-friend.Afterward, Stockton boasted about the shooting on Instagram, according to the affidavit, which says that investigators were able to retrieve incriminating posts that had been deleted.In the other case, shots were fired about 1:50 a.m. on the Saturday before Memorial Day during a post-cookout dispute involving intoxicated men in the 2200 block of Savannah Terrace SE, police said. The victim, Alexander Mosby, 39, described by Newsham as “a beloved businessman,” was a lifelong resident of the neighborhood and the former owner of District Culture, a now-defunct clothing store in Southeast.D.C. police investigating fatal shooting of Anacostia entrepreneurMosby wasn’t the shooter’s intended victim, Newsham said. The suspect, Tywan S. Porter, 25, of Southeast, was jailed without bond and charged with second-degree murder.As police questioned witnesses at the scene, a person identified in a police affidavit as Witness 2 recalled having a conversation with another person in the neighborhood shortly after the shooting.“You know who done it?” the other person said, according to Witness 2.“Who?” asked Witness 2.“Fat boy that drives the gray Infiniti.”Witness 2 reported that “fat boy” had a bad reputation in the neighborhood. The affidavit says Witness 2 gave detectives the plate number of the car that “fat boy” drove. The witness, who couldn’t identify the suspect by name, had written down the number months earlier “in case something happened,” the affidavit says.Police traced the plate number to Porter, who stands 5-foot-11 and weighs 290 pounds, and they searched his 2008 Infiniti FX3, according to the affidavit.In the car were three spent 9mm shells, the affidavit says. It says that based on microscopic scratches on the shells, experts determined that the three had come from the same gun that ejected six shells at the crime scene.The most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy PolicyThe most important news stories of the day, curated by Post editors and delivered every morning.By signing up you agree to ourTerms of UseandPrivacy PolicyA second suspect in a January gang-related drive-by shooting that injured five and was believed to be retaliation for a murder the day before was apprehended in Palm Beach County early Saturday morning, said Alachua Police Sgt. Jesse Sandusky.McKenzly Alphae Edwards Jr., 24, was arrested on a warrant charging six counts of attempted murder and is being held in the Palm Beach County Jail.His brother, Kenzel Lashod Edwards, 22, was arrested in February on the charges and remains in the Alachua County Jail.Sandusky said Saturday that police had gotten information that McKenzly Edwards was possibly in South Florida. The U.S. Marshal’s Service, which has been assisting on the case, got information he was at a home in West Palm Beach early Saturday morning.“They responded to the residence and arrested him on our warrant,” Sandusky said. “He will be processed there and on Monday will they will process a transfer to Alachua County unless they have changes on him down there.”The brothers are accused of jumping out of a car and firing at people in and outside of an SUV at 14223 NW 156th Place on Jan. 15. Among the five injured were two children.Sandusky said at the time that at least 25 rounds were fired from an assault rifle.Police believe the gunfire was in retaliation for fatal shooting on Jan. 14 of Dana Walker Jr., 27, at Maude Lewis Park. Kamarri Latrell Hampton, 15, was charged with murder for the shooting of Walker.All of those involved are believed to be members of rival gangs in Alachua.Meanwhile, Alachua police continue to investigate the Monday shooting death Quantrale Gaskins, 19, in his home.Sandusky said Saturday police have learned that Gaskins had been affiliated with one of the gangs. But Sandusky added it has not been determined if the shooting of Gaskins is related to the January shootings.Anyone with information about the Gaskins case should call police at 386-462-1396. Anonymous tips can be made to Crime Stoppers at 352-372-STOP. Callers may be eligible for a reward.A second suspect in a January gang-related drive-by shooting that injured five and was believed to be retaliation for a murder the day before was apprehended in Palm Beach County early Saturday morning, said Alachua Police Sgt. Jesse Sandusky.McKenzly Alphae Edwards Jr., 24, was arrested on a warrant charging six counts of attempted murder and is being held in the Palm Beach County Jail.His brother, Kenzel Lashod Edwards, 22, was arrested in February on the charges and remains in the Alachua County Jail.Sandusky said Saturday that police had gotten information that McKenzly Edwards was possibly in South Florida. The U.S. Marshal’s Service, which has been assisting on the case, got information he was at a home in West Palm Beach early Saturday morning.“They responded to the residence and arrested him on our warrant,” Sandusky said. “He will be processed there and on Monday will they will process a transfer to Alachua County unless they have changes on him down there.”The brothers are accused of jumping out of a car and firing at people in and outside of an SUV at 14223 NW 156th Place on Jan. 15. Among the five injured were two children.Sandusky said at the time that at least 25 rounds were fired from an assault rifle.Police believe the gunfire was in retaliation for fatal shooting on Jan. 14 of Dana Walker Jr., 27, at Maude Lewis Park. Kamarri Latrell Hampton, 15, was charged with murder for the shooting of Walker.All of those involved are believed to be members of rival gangs in Alachua.Meanwhile, Alachua police continue to investigate the Monday shooting death Quantrale Gaskins, 19, in his home.Sandusky said Saturday police have learned that Gaskins had been affiliated with one of the gangs. But Sandusky added it has not been determined if the shooting of Gaskins is related to the January shootings.Anyone with information about the Gaskins case should call police at 386-462-1396. Anonymous tips can be made to Crime Stoppers at 352-372-STOP. Callers may be eligible for a reward.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Gainesville Sun  ~ 2700 SW 13th St., Gainesville, FL 32608~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Insane Throttle Biker NewsThe #1 Biker News Website Since 2011-Covering up to minute biker news motorcycle club news  and outlaw biker news2018 is shaping up to be the year that we all thought it would be. 14 days into the New Year, another club is in the news. The Sin City Deciples was holding a party down in Alabama. At the event over 100 shots were fired, resulting in 1 death and two more in critical condition. Barely into the New Year and we have bloodshed, something that will bring Motorcycle Clubs back into the National Spotlight.Yesterday we posted a video from Australia, it was about another law that was passed, this one so bad, a club member can face charges just for texting another club member. Currently, the Feds have a case going against the Mongols M/C, trying to revoke the clubs patents and copyright on their club designs. As you all know, the Feds win that case, they will have case precedent where they can use it to go after any club that is involved in a crime.As many know, I’ve been an outspoken supporter of 1%er clubs, I’ve been involved in support clubs of them, have many brothers and close friends in them. Guys, it’s time to wake the hell up, enough with all the gangster crap. Not only is the general public starting to turn on you, but other clubs, are starting to turn against you. Countless are floating the idea of an Independent Club Association that will rival the National Confederation of Clubs. Quite frankly, don’t blame them a bit.Everything going on with all the shooting, 1%er clubs going around trying to intimidate 99%er clubs, even as far as going after 1 pc patch clubs. People quite frankly are starting to turn against 1%er clubs. This is 2018, the bullshit that went on in the late 80’s and mid 90’s, even into the new century, doesn’t play well in the present days. If the leadership of the 1%er clubs hasn’t noticed, recruitment is down, interest is no longer in supporting clubs that will bring down the heat on them.Guys who join clubs now, do not have the backbone or heart to stand up and take the heat and time that come along with the bullshit that was the 80’s and 90’s. Club first, is no longer in the latest generations creed. People do not put the club first any longer. They have family and jobs that take up their time and priorities. Think about it, why would anyone risk doing a hard time over club beef anymore? That is now the thinking out there. It’s also why “Rats” abound in the clubs.Other suppose news sites play to a base, most of whom never rode with a club. These people are the people you will see get out there all over the internet trying to give their two cents on one subject or another when something pops off. Hey, if these suppose biker news sites want to play to that crowd, fine and dandy. This is America and it’s a free press, play to whatever audience that makes you so good about yourself. But now the disservice you are perpetuating on the biker culture when you take this type of approach. I will go as far as saying that you’re reporting causes even more tensions out there.A little off topic, but I just wanted to put this out there. For the last week I’ve been sitting on some highly explosive material, something that concerns another popular suppose biker news site. I’ve gone back and forth about whether I should put it out there, even went as far as having the article ready to go. This article and proof attached to it concerning the allegations and fraud perpetrated against the biker community is nothing less than disgusting. For years, this site has gone around acting as though it was an expert on what happens in our community, come to find out the site is a complete fraud. Clubs that this writer was supposedly are false. The experience the site claimed to have been again false. Statements giving in a court proceeding were again false, all based on lies and false pretense. Yeah, we had the authentic statements leaked to us, when we did, we verified much of the statement giving in this case as false. One thing about being in the business of biker news, we are fortunate to have contacts with all the major clubs to verify things that are put out there.Insane Throttle has not put out this information because we think that it would only do harm to our community. This is one thing that this lifestyle doesn’t need right now. What it truly needs is for brothers of all clubs to come together before crap like what is happening in OZ starts reaching our shores. Will we eventually put the information out there? Maybe. Nevertheless, at this point, if people were to find out this information, more bullshit from clubs that were reported on from this site in a bad way, would probably go in an uproar and kick some shit off. I wouldn’t blame them a damn bit either.There are two kinds of Biker News sites. The first one is like Insane Throttle. We have a staff that has ridden many years with motorcycle clubs. We’ve been in the club lifestyle for many years and have the references to prove our claims. This is very important because if you’re going to write about subjects that can get people hurt, you better damn well have been who you said you are. The second kind of site is for those who just copy and paste mainstream articles. Nothing wrong with those kinds of sites, it just aids those who want to read news about bikers a place to get the information in one place without searching for it. So when you’re reading these news sites, ensure that you have read some of their other work posted. This will help you decide as a reader if they are truly independent in their views, more than that, actually know what the hell they are talking about.Don’t Forget to Like our Facebook PageNow back to the club stuff. Territory and all that kind of bullshit was settled decades ago, wasn’t it? Yea the internet has brought opportunities for clubs to branch out like never before. Yes, even well known 1%er clubs are using it to grow into territories that might not have been possible. Nonetheless, let’s look at this logically, especially for those who wear the state bottom rockers. Can you truly say all the fighting is worth it over the notion that your club runs a whole state? It’s kinda outdated concept if you think of it, shit, no one club has superiority over clubs in an entire state. If it did, that club would be the only one in that state. So where is the logic fighting and killing over the state rocker anymore?Most 1%er clubs started with a 1pc patch, most didn’t go to a 3pc until that AMA bs. So is it worth taking another life over territory? I get it. Business has to be protected. Nevertheless, to start a war over another club coming to a nearby city is ludicrous. Brings nothing but heat on the entire club, when that happens business suffers and most of the time come to a grinding halt. So again, is it worth it? Losing members to the grave or long prison terms? That wasn’t what brotherhood or clubs was supposed to be about. Maybe it’s time to focus on a different model of doing business, or better yet, time to look to join forces with those you call enemies.One of the biggest wars between clubs was initiated off of a lie. A couple dudes set up another club just to hide the murder they committed. That lie has cost hundreds across the globe their lives. These clubs use to drink together, hang together. Think of the possibilities if they would combine forces again. Another war started because one club didn’t want the other to wear a state bottom rocker. That war has been ongoing for damn near 50 years. Again, if those clubs sat down and worked shit out, the possibilities would be unlimited.The National Coalition of Clubs was started to bring clubs together and stand for clubs rights. Boy has it failed in that mission. The lawyers who started it was the only ones that got any money out of it, they are the ones who prospered off of it because the mission sure the hell hasn’t worked. Might as well be the fucking United Nations where it’s just a figurehead and front to be used to make money. Let’s be honest, if the National Confederation of Clubs was for real, every national of the big clubs would come to the table at conventions and work the shit out. If that happened, the clubs would prosper and not the lawyers and feds.Follow us on TwitterDo I have any hope that clubs will come together? Nope, because the mentality is not there to see the bigger picture. If the mentality was there, you would recognize the political situation in this country and the effects it could have on motorcycle clubs. We are now living in a PC world, people sure the hell don’t have the stomach to be dealing with all the shootings and bombings. You can’t even call another country a “Shithole” without being called racist. That’s how pc the citizens of this country have become, some of whom ride in clubs. Don’t think for a minute if someone is facing a 25 year bit they won’t be running to the cops to tell their story. It’s the plain and simple truth of who we have become as a country.The WW2 and Vietnam era guys are slowly going onto better things. Those days of club life are over. It’s a whole different era out there. It’s time for clubs to evolve with it. If they don’t evolve, then clubs will not survive. Numbers are already down with those who ride motorcycles. Numbers are down with those who support 1%er clubs. To survive long term, it’s either evolve or go extinct. Plain and Simple.“Motorcycle Madhouse” Free Audio PodcastBy Stephanie Taylor TuscaloosanewsA party hosted by a biker club in Eutaw turned deadly during the early morning hours Sunday when gunfire erupted in the parking lot.One man was killed and four others were hospitalized with gunshot wounds.Mandel L. Pearson, 36, was fatally shot outside the National Guard Armory on Mesopotamia Street at 1:21 a.m. Sunday, Eutaw Police Chief Derick Coleman told WVTM-13. Another victim who suffered minor injuries was an off-duty Greene County Sheriff’s deputy working as a security guard at the event. The identities of the other victims have not been released.Law enforcement agents were interviewing several witnesses but had made no arrests as of Sunday afternoon. Investigators recovered about 100 shell casings in the parking lot of the armory where the Sin City Deciples motorcycle club held an event Saturday night.The Alabama Bureau of Investigation is assisting the Greene County Sheriff’s Office and Eutaw Police Department with the investigation. The Greene County Independent posted a video of a press conference held Sunday afternoon.Two of the four surviving victims suffered life-threatening injuries and were airlifted to UAB Hospital in Birmingham, ABI spokesman Special Agent Jason Ward said. The others suffered injuries that weren’t life-threatening and were transported to DCH Regional Medical Center in Tuscaloosa.Ward said it was still unclear Sunday afternoon what led to the shooting. Information released was limited, he said, because the investigation is still in the early stages. Residents have no reason to fear for their safety, he said.“People should feel safe; we are conducting an investigation, and I have full confidence in the sheriff’s office and also the police department here in Eutaw,” he said.Biker Madhouse-Totally Free Uncensored Biker Social Network by Insane Throttlewww.bikermadhouse.comTo Submit your Biker Story , News lead, Bitch us out, or even give us a compliment on a story : Email it toinsanethrottle@hdbikernews.com“Motorcycle Madhouse” Free Audio Podcast You can subscribe to our channel athttps://www.spreaker.com/show/2795835Insane Throttles Motorcycle Superstorehttps://cubbiesroc1973.wixsite.com/insanethrottleDon’t forget to go over to Insane Throttles YouTube Channel where the Madhouse will also be on for those who like Youtube You can subscribe to our channel athttps://www.youtube.com/c/InsaneThrottleHollywood, understand what your saying and totally agree.  As far as the other topic, you owe to your readers to let the truth out.  I think I know what your talking about and these lies have gone on for some time. And yes it does cause problems because unless you been in the life and paid your dues then you are led by so called “mentors” and that is costly if you believe it.  Books are covers and pages, makes for good reading. But if you want to experience what your reading and know it to be the truth then get on a ride and ride. Save your money until you know it to be the truth and then enjoy the book. Hope this makes sense. You heard the saying ” no matter where you go there your are”.LikeLikeComing from a ex 1%er there’s no brotherhood anymore it’s all about the green backs .. The club I was in they had a club inside a club and those who were in the inside club walked around at our party like they were the shits and better then the rest of the brothers ..Your total right on the numbers are down brothers do have family’s and jobs , you have to pay the outrageous dew’s . Not only paying your monthly dew’s you have to pay for lawyers fees for our ex president that’s in prison for murder and racketeering charger and other things , I was paying over 500 a month you can’t stay up on that and be expected to afford to make all the runs !!The comments you made on the COC about the money is wrong the 1%ers split the funds from what the club’s put in , I was told many times it’s free money ..When it comes to the 1% clubs we got along purity good one of the other clubs use to come to our clubhouse and party with us and when we see another club out and about they would drink with us , now these are the top 5 we are talking about ..Now I was just bending your ear , just sharing some stuff I seen and im not bitching well maybe on some stuff .. I’ll leave it there , be safe and see ya down the roadLikeLikeComments are closed.Outlaws Motorcycle ClubHells Angels Motorcycle ClubBandidos Motorcycle ClubMongols motorcycle clubChosen Few Motorcycle ClubSons of SilenceFull Motorcycle Club DirectoryInsane Throttle Biker NewsThe #1 Biker News Website Since 2011-Covering up to minute biker news motorcycle club news  and outlaw biker newsFollowing a Sunday incident in whichfour people were shot in a Madison hotel,police have arrested a suspect in the case.According to information released by the Madison Police Department, detectives on Monday arrested 18-year-old Amari Tivon Hurt of Huntsville. He has been booked into the Madison County Jail on charges of attempted murder and first-degree burglary.His total bond is set at $150,000.The investigation is ongoing and police do not plan to release additional information, they said.The incident occurred early Sunday morning in a guest room at the Country Inn and Suites on Westchester Drive in Madison. One of the victims had injuries considered to be life-threatening, according to police.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesTwo young sisters and an elderly man were killed Friday when a man on a shooting spree opened fire in two locations in North Nashville, injuring two others.Queshan Brooks, 24, was later arrested in West Nashville in connection with the fatal shootings, according to Metro police.Brooks is charged with three counts of murder for the killings of 5-year-old Samaii Daniel, 8-year-old Sammarre Daniel and 70-year-old Robert Payne.As the snow fell in Nashville, police say Brooks first opened fire on his stepmother Darnykka Daniel, 45, and her two daughters around 4:15 p.m. at a residence on Jenkins Court. Samaii and Sammarre Daniel died from gunshot wounds to the head.Daniel sustained non-life-threatening gunshot wounds and is being treated at Vanderbilt University Medical Center.Investigators are still attempting to determine a motive for the attack on the woman and children. Police say Brooks has refused to answer questions from detectives.Just over 20 minutes after police responded to the first shooting, North Precinct officers responded to a call involving a carjacking and shots fired in the 1800 block of 10th Avenue North.Payne, the driver of a gold Chevrolet Impala, had been fatally wounded. Payne's passenger, Patrick Hancock, 52, was pistol-whipped and shot in the arm as the Impala was stolen.At 5:10 p.m., West Precinct flex officers responded to a report from the fire department about a gold Chevrolet sedan that was disabled on Interstate 40 near 51st Avenue.Police say officers found that the car had been abandoned, but saw a man in the distance walking on 52nd Avenue toward Charlotte Avenue.The officers followed footprints in the snow to Brooks, where they took him into custody.Brooks has been out of jail after posting a $25,000 bond related to a pending felony aggravated assault charge from September.Court records indicate that on Aug. 30, Brooks assaulted his ex-girlfriend during an argument over child custody and, at the time, threatened to shoot her and others in the home.In May 2014, Brooks received a six-year sentence for an aggravated robbery conviction, according to police.Tennessee Department of Correction records show Brooks' sentence ended in May 2017.Reporter Adam Tamburin contributed to this story.PLANTATION, FLA. (WSVN) - Four people, including two minors, were injured after, officials said, shots were fired outside of a recreation hall in Plantation, Sunday morning.Police responded to the shooting at 5225 West Broward Boulevard, near East Acre Drive, just after 4:40 a.m.Investigators said the victims were leaving a private gathering when an unknown male assailant armed with a handgun approached them and opened fire. He then fled the scene and remains at large.Officials said the two injured adults suffered more serious injuries than the minors.According to Plantation Fire Rescue, one of the injured people was a security guard and was transported to Broward Health. Another person suffered minor injuries and was transported to Plantation General Hospital. A third person was also transported to Broward Health, officials said.Area residents said they’re scared for their safety. “You know, I live right down the street,” said Lawrence Wolk. “I have children at my house. I have my grandson at my house, so I am concerned about the crimes of violence.”The motive behind the shooting remains unknown, as the investigation continues.If you have any information on this shooting, call Broward County Crime Stoppers at 954-493-TIPS. Remember, you can always remain anonymous, and you may be eligible for a $3,000 reward.Copyright 2021 Sunbeam Television Corp. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.HATTIESBURG, Miss.(WHLT) – Hattiesburg Police Department says the suspect wanted in the La Fiesta Brava shooting has been apprehended in Texas.On January 19, the US Marshal’s Task Force gathered information that 26-year-old Rhakim James was staying with a relative in Dallas, TX.Around 9:45 a.m. January 19, authorities located and apprehended James at the residence of his relative.James is currently in custody at the Dallas County Jail.He is being charged with six counts of Aggravated Assault.This continues to be an ongoing investigation.Anyone with further information should contact the Hattiesburg Police Department or Metro Crime Stoppers.KARKBRINKLEY, Ark. – An early morning shooting left one man dead, a woman in critical condition, two bystanders with injuries, and the shooter in custody.Police say it started as a domestic situation in Monroe County in the town of Brinkley.It started in a breeze way at the Pinewood Apts. The Brinkley Police Chief actually lives in the area and said he heard the shots ring out this morning.Xavier Parker’s family is overcome with emotion after learning the 33-year-old was shot and killed Thursday morning at his apartment complex.“It’s just very unfortunate that we’re bringing in the new year this way,” Xavier’s sister said.His family says he had three kids and was known by many in the community.“He was well loved, everybody loved him. He was a good father. He’d help anybody,” she said.Arkansas State Police say around 7:15 Thursday morning James Frost shot Xavier, a female, and hurt two others. The Monroe County Sheriff says Frost turned himself in shortly after the shooting.“Having four people shot, that’s a lot for officers to deal with,” Monroe County Sheriff Michael Neal said.A friend of Frost’s said he can’t believe this happened, “I know James. It brings tears to my eyes to see something like this. I didn’t think he would do anything like this.”The Monroe County Circuit Clerk confirms Frost was convicted of 2nd degree murder in 1994.“He did his time and he came on out. I think he did 10 years. He came out and he was doing good for himself,” Frost’s friend said.Xavier’s family doesn’t know exactly what lead up to what happened on the other side of the caution tape, but says a loved one has tragically been taken away.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.CAMDEN, Ark. – Severe weather created havoc Friday night in parts of southern Arkansas, where a 5-year-old boy in Camden narrowly escaped being hit by a tree at an apartment complex.Ketrick Wilkins said his son was playing a video game when a tree fell through the roof into the child's bedroom.LITTLE ROCK, Ark. — Newly found records show a Little Rock police officer continued responding to calls for a month after being identified by his supervisors while allegedly committing a crime.Marcus Getter was charged earlier this year after authorities say he stole a woman’s purse at Bar Louie off Cantrell Road in November.LITTLE ROCK, Ark. — A mother is honoring her daughter four years after she died in a car crash in Lonoke County.Schantel Walker says she’s still grieving every day over the loss of her daughter, Bianca Withers.A Bartlesville man is dead following a shooting Friday night in the 700 block of SE Sooner Park Drive.Bartlesville Police Department Capt. Jay Hastings identified the victim as 29-year-old Kolton Joshua Edwards. His roommate, Shawn Saejin Lynch, 45, was arrested on a first degree murder complaint following the incident.Hastings said police responded to the home at approximately 10:16 p.m. Friday for a call in regards to the shooting. Edwards was transported by private vehicle to Jane Phillips Medical Center and then sent to a Tulsa hospital, where he later died.“Police began interviewing witnesses to the shooting and determined it occurred inside the residence,” Hastings said. “All parties involved knew each other and were living in the home.”Lynch fled the scene but was later contacted by law enforcement, and Lynch agreed to turn himself in.Hastings said details surrounding the shooting are still under investigation, however a search warrant for the residence was obtained. Detectives served the search warrant and recovered several items of evidence.No additional details are being released until the investigation is complete.“Investigators are working with the District Attorney who will review the case which is still under investigation,” Hastings said. “Anyone else with information about the case is encouraged to come forward and speak to investigators.”Lynch was booked into the Washington County Detention Center on one charge of first degree murder. He is expected to appear in Washington County District Court on Monday.A Go Fund Me account has been established for Edwards’ funeral costs and expenses.A Bartlesville man is dead following a shooting Friday night in the 700 block of SE Sooner Park Drive.Bartlesville Police Department Capt. Jay Hastings identified the victim as 29-year-old Kolton Joshua Edwards. His roommate, Shawn Saejin Lynch, 45, was arrested on a first degree murder complaint following the incident.Hastings said police responded to the home at approximately 10:16 p.m. Friday for a call in regards to the shooting. Edwards was transported by private vehicle to Jane Phillips Medical Center and then sent to a Tulsa hospital, where he later died.“Police began interviewing witnesses to the shooting and determined it occurred inside the residence,” Hastings said. “All parties involved knew each other and were living in the home.”Lynch fled the scene but was later contacted by law enforcement, and Lynch agreed to turn himself in.Hastings said details surrounding the shooting are still under investigation, however a search warrant for the residence was obtained. Detectives served the search warrant and recovered several items of evidence.No additional details are being released until the investigation is complete.“Investigators are working with the District Attorney who will review the case which is still under investigation,” Hastings said. “Anyone else with information about the case is encouraged to come forward and speak to investigators.”Lynch was booked into the Washington County Detention Center on one charge of first degree murder. He is expected to appear in Washington County District Court on Monday.A Go Fund Me account has been established for Edwards’ funeral costs and expenses.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Bartlesville Examiner-Enterprise  ~ 4125 Nowata Rd., Bartlesville, OK 74006~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.MenuBUFFALO, N.Y. (WKBW) — Buffalo police say one person is dead and three others were injured after an early morning shooting in the city's Riverside neighborhood.The shooting occurred on Henrietta Avenue between Esser Avenue and Ontario Street just after 1 a.m.Witnesses told police an argument began during some type of gathering outside a home.A 26-year-old Buffalo man was pronounced dead at ECMC after it was originally reported he was seriously injured.A 25-year-old Buffalo woman is listed in fair condition and two other Buffalo men, a 32-year-old and a 38-year-old, have been treated for their injuries and released.COBB COUNTY, Ga. — Five teenagers were reported hurt following a shooting incident at a party near Kennesaw Friday night, according to Cobb County Police.Spokesperson Sydney Melton said that officers responded to reports of a person shot at an address in the Ashford Ridenour apartment complex off of Barrett Parkway and US 41, shortly before 9:30 p.m.When they arrived, officers discovered five teens with injuries: a 17-year-old boy with a gunshot wound to his stomach, 18-year-old Leonard Cooper suffering a gunshot wound to his leg, 19-year-old Morgan Jackson suffering a gunshot wound to her shoulder, a 16-year-old girl with a gunshot wound to her finger and a 15-year-old girl with minor injuries from broken glass.Melton said that officers found that about 30 people were at a party being held inside one of the apartment units at the complex.According to Melton, shots were fired after an argument escalated between unknown individuals.Melton said that all of the victims were transported to Wellstar Kennestone Hospital in Marietta for treatment and that none of the injuries were life-threatening.No suspect was immediately available, but the police investigation remains ongoing, Melton said.MORE HEADLINESTwin sisters confess to brutal murder of motherSophie Speaks: How a Georgia mother allowed her boyfriend to impregnate her 10-year-oldA teacher is out of a job over what she wrote on the boardNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Cashout Ace, a 20-year-old rapper whose real name is Miguel Guajardo, is currently in stable condition at a local hospital after being shot during a video shoot attack.Gonzalo Gonzalez was among two people killed Friday while filming a music video for Houston rapper Cashout Ace. His mother said he was hired to film the video, and he was a passionate videographer.Members of the Houston Fire Dept. Little York Station wash blood from a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.Police crime scene tape is shown in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.Police crime scene tape is shown in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.One of five bullet holes in a bus stop shelter is shown outside a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.A bullet hole in a car is shown in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.Police crime scene tape is shown in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.People look at the area in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.Members of the Houston Fire Dept. Little York Station wash blood from a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.People look at the area in a parking lot Saturday, Dec. 28, 2019, in Houston in the 8500 block Sweetwater Lane where two people were shot and killed and at least seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video Friday night.Two people were shot and killed and seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video near Houston, Harris County Sheriff Ed Gonzalez said.Two people were shot and killed and seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video near Houston, Harris County Sheriff Ed Gonzalez said.Two people were shot and killed and seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video near Houston, Harris County Sheriff Ed Gonzalez said.Two people were shot and killed and seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video near Houston, Harris County Sheriff Ed Gonzalez said.Two people were shot and killed and seven others injured in a drive-by shooting while they were filming a music video near Houston, Harris County Sheriff Ed Gonzalez said.Houston rapper Cashout Ace wasamong nine people shot, two fatally, during his music video shoot Friday night at an industrial warehouse north of Houston, according to a family member.The 20-year-old rapper, whose real name is Miguel Guajardo, was in stable condition at a local hospital Sunday after being shot in the arm and near his eye, his mother Eliza Guajardo said.HOMICIDE REPORT:345 people have died by homicide in Harris County so far in 2019, only on HoustonChronicle.comShe said her son had been pursuing rap as a career in Houston for the last year and a half, and she didn’t know whether or why he might have been targeted. The Harris County Sheriff’s Office had not publicly identified a motive or possible suspects Sunday.“He was just trying to release videos because he was doing really good as an upcoming rapper,” Eliza Guajardo told the Houston Chronicle. “His dream was to make it in that field … we don’t know if there were other people who didn’t want him to be successful or who had any animosity.”The sheriff’s office said the group was ambushed in the parking lot of the industrial warehouse, about a quarter-mile east of Interstate 45 between West Little York and West Gulf Bank roads.The shooting killed Gonzalo Gonzalez, 20, and Jonathan Jimenez, 22. Gonzalez was hired to film the video and did not know Gaujardo personally, according to his mother Gloria Gonzalez.In a statement, Gloria described her son as a University of Houston student who had a passion and gift for photography and videography. He most recently lived in the Summerwood area in northeast Harris County, she said.BEHIND THE DATA:Within Houston’s homicide numbers, a story behind every death“All who knew him would agree that he was a great young man that had so much to offer to this world,” Gloria Gonzalez said. “Gonzalo was a true blessing in everyone’s life and will be greatly missed.”Eliza Guajardo said she didn’t know any details about the video shoot, including how many people were on the scene. She hasn’t been able to speak to her son since the attack, she said.She said one of the shooting victims, Abel Pesina, is Guajardo’s brother. Pesina is also expected to be OK, she said.“We have a large family and friends network, so we’re all here with them (at the hospital),” she said.She said her son’s friends were among the other wounded victims, identified as Jordan Diaz, 17; Jorge Gonzalez, 19; Moses Alvarez, 21; Miguel Martinez, 21, and Fabian Garza, 22.julian.gill@chron.comSTAY INFORMED:Sign up to receive breaking news alertsdelivered to your email here.Julian Gill is a reporter for the Houston Chronicle.ST. PETERSBURG — At least eight people were injured early Thursday during a shooting outside a nightclub that started as police investigated a hit-and-run crash nearby, police said.Five of the injured were shot outside the Cabana Sands nightclub, while three others were injured from glass or shrapnel. Most of the injured were treated and released from the hospital by Thursday afternoon, police said.Investigators did not make any arrests, but sought two people they believed may have been involved, according to St. Petersburg police spokeswoman Sandra Bentil.Details were scarce about what led to the shooting in the Coquina Key Shopping Plaza near the corner of Sixth Street and 45th Avenue S. Detectives said an altercation inside the club spilled outside to the parking lot just after midnight.Officers were already in the plaza investigating a hit-and-run crash. While they were looking into that incident, multiple gunshots were fired, dispersing a crowd.Theresa Garcia, who works at her father’s furniture business next to Cabana Sands, said people will often do doughnuts in the parking lot with their cars. Police did not say if the crash was connected to that sort of activity or if the crash was related to the shooting.“Obviously (the crash) investigation ground to a halt,” Bentil said.No officers were injured. No club security guards were harmed either, said manager Ralph Williams. None of those who were injured were taken to the hospital by ambulance. Police did not release their names.Twelve hours after the incident, the plaza still held clues of a shooting. Gold and silver-colored shell casings were in the parking lot, and a live round lay outside the club in a patch of dirt. St. Petersburg police forensic investigators returned to the scene to gather the remaining evidence Thursday afternoon.There also was what looked like a bullet hole through a CVS pharmacy window. A store worker said it wasn’t there on Wednesday.It’s not the first time the club has been the subject of police activity. Since it opened in September 2018, officers have been called to Cabana Sands more than 600 times, records show. Many of the calls were related to noise and crowds. Some have been related to battery and brawling. At least two were related to gunshots.Garcia said it can get rowdy at the club, sometimes by 9 p.m., even though there’s usually security outside.“This is where people come to shop,” she said while watching a movie with her daughter inside the furniture store. “You don’t want to be scared to come here.”Outside his club on Thursday, Williams said his sympathies were with those who were injured, and he lamented bad actors casting the club in a negative light. He said he wasn’t immediately sure if the club would open for business on Thursday. He said he would need to speak to his parents, with whom he owns the establishment.“They just put a magnifying glass on us,” he said.Police asked anyone who was present at the time, or anyone with information about the shooting, to contact detectives at (727) 893-7780.Digital ProducerSt. Petersburg City Hall ReporterEngagement ProducerWATCHVIDEOSQuadruple shooting at holiday party in OaklandCEDAR RAPIDS, Iowa (KCRG) -A criminal complaint shows the two men charged with murder in the fatal Christmas night shooting in Coralville killed the man who had attacked their father a few hours before the shooting.Authorities arrested 19-year-old Milton McAbee and 18-year-old Elijah McAbee in Kentucky back in April. Milton McAbee is charged with 1st degree murder and Elijah McAbee is charged with 1st degree murder and attempted murder. As of July 7 they are now in the Johnson County Jail.The shooting happened around 9:30 p.m. on Christmas at an apartment complex in the area of 954 Boston Way, a couple of blocks south of Coral Ridge Mall. 30-year-old Gregory Jackson of Iowa City died and two others were hurt. At the time police say everyone involved knew each other.During the investigation, the criminal complaint shows doctors at University of Iowa Hospitals and Clinics treated 56-year-old Phillip McAbee for a fractured jaw as a result of being “pistol whipped” just a few hours before the shooting. Documents show Phillip McAbee is the father of Milton and Elijah McAbee.The document goes on to show quote “it was determined during this altercation, {Gregory} Jackson had struck Phillip McAbee, possibly pistol-whipping him, knocking him unconscious and fracturing his jaw.”The documents explain after the attack on Phillip McAbee, people including the McAbee brothers were discussing what happened at a barbecue at the apartment complex and led to plans of retaliation against Jackson. Documents show people gathered with guns and it led to the shooting. One of the other shooting victims who survived suffered a gunshot wound to the right shoulder after he and Elijah McAbee fought over a gun, according to the documents. The same victim was also shot by someone in the right ankle as he ran away.Copyright 2020 KCRG. All rights reserved.MenuRICHMOND, Va. -- Kenneth Lawson, a 37-year-old father of five, wasshot and killed early Christmas morning in Richmond,according to his family members and Richmond Police.Lawson, who owned a landscaping company, was inside the Wing Bar on East Main Street in Shockoe Bottom when a gunman opened fire at about 12:50 a.m. on Christmas morning.Friends described him as caring, funny, and the kind of guy who made sure others around him were okay.Lawson was one of four people hit in the shooting.The victims included another man and two women, Crime Insider sources told Jon Burkett.Those sources also said the shooting stemmed from an earlier altercation inside the restaurant. They indicated the shooter left the business and returned with the gun.The shooter, according to witnesses, was outside the restaurant when a security guard attempted to check him for weapons, the man pulled out a gun, shot the guard, and fired rounds into the business.Lawson was pronounced dead at the scene.Two other victims were taken to the hospital with life-threatening injuries.A fourth shooting victim suffered non-life threatening injuries.At this time, police have not released any information about the shooter.Lawson leaves behind a wife, children ages 20, 19, 17, and 11, and a three-year-old granddaughter."I’m looking for justice.  Somebody knows who killed my son. "On Sunday, Lawson's friends and family gathered near where the shooting occured to pray and speak out against gun violence.Vanessa Winkler, Lawson's mother, said that she is looking for justice."I’m looking for justice.  Somebody knows who killed my son.  Somebody knows who killed my son, there was a whole club.  Just help me find out who killed my son," she said. "Like every Christmas my son came to see me.  It was Christmas morning, and I was going to wait for my son to come see me before I left my house, and I got a call at 1:38 in the morning saying my son had been shot."Lawson begged members of the community to not let the shooting - or search for the suspect - spur more violence. "Please don’t take nobody’s life.  Don’t look for him, don’t ask about it, let the police handle it.  Don’t give nobody else’s mother the opportunity to grieve," she said.Lawson's wife Robinette Fields described her husband as a man who loved his kids and life."I love how he loved our kids.  I loved how he loved them.  He loved our children.  He loved everybody though," she said. "He’s just so happy and full of life, always smiling.  Goofy, playing, singing dancing.  Just everything."This is a developing story. Witnesses cansend news tips here.Anyone with information about the shooting was asked to call Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000.NEW ORLEANS, La. (WVUE) - Police are investigating a shooting in the 6400 block of General Meyer Avenue where four victims were shot.Police say the suspects, wearing ski masks, got out of a dark-colored sedan and began shooting.One person was shot in the calf. Another person was shot to the shoulder.A third victim sustained multiple gunshot wounds to body and victim four was grazed. Some of the victims were transported via EMS to a local hospital and some via private conveyance.None of their injuries appear to be life-threatening.Fox 8 received the report at around 5:36 p.m. However, no additional information is available at this time.Updates will be posted here as we receive them.Copyright 2019 WVUE. All rights reserved.1025 S. Norman C. Francis Pkwy.New Orleans, LA 70125(504) 486-6161A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.HIGH POINT, N.C. — High Point police say they are investigating a shooting in the 5 Points area of High Point, North Carolina involving six victims.The shooting happened around 4:30 p.m. at 1226 Montlieu Avenue, officials said.Investigators believe this is a drive-by shooting, but police believe someone may have gotten out of the car and fired more shots.Bianca Ritchwood says she was in the parking lot as the incident unfolded and jumped into action when shots rang out."I got out the car and ran to the back of this vehicle over here and seen one of my friends just laying on the ground," said Ritchwood, "that’s when I ripped my shirt off and applied that pressure and just held him until the ambulance and the police came."Ritchwood says her car was shot, but she wasn't hurt."The only thing I could think of is just I’m praying. I’m praying as I’m sitting there with him," she said, "praying to god that they don’t come back through here and try to shoot again."High Point Police released an update Tuesday night stating all six victims, which are men, are now in stable condition.Police say they are still trying to nail down a description of the vehicle involved in the shooting, as they've received different descriptions. Police say they're looking for a light-colored SUV that was spotted near the scene during the time of the shooting for questioning.The cannot confirm whether this is a random or targeted shooting.Early indications point to the weapon used was a handgun, based on shell casings, officials said.Ritchwood says she hopes people will remember to spread joy, not hate, especially during the holidays."This is the day that people should be celebrating even though Christmas is tomorrow it’s supposed to be about joy and fun and love," she said.The investigation is still ongoing, and more updates will be available on WFMYNews2.com as they are reported.RELATED:2 killed in 24 hours in High PointRELATED:There were more U.S. mass shootings in 2019 than days on the calendarNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.BALTIMORE (WJZ) —Police in Baltimore are investigating after an overnight shooting outside of iVilla Lounge left seven people injured.Police were called to the 200 block of Park Avenue shortly after 2 a.m. on Sunday for a report of a shooting.When officers arrived, they found a 20-year-old man suffering from gunshot wounds to the shoulder and hip, an 18-year-old man suffering from gunshot wounds to both legs, a 27-year-old man suffering from a gunshot wound to the arm and a 17-year-old suffering from gunshot wounds to the back and leg.Police said officers were still at the scene when they were told a 22-year-old man and another 17-year-old walked into area hospitals for treatment for gunshot wounds.Police also said a seventh victim arrived at an area hospital shortly after 7:30 a.m. for treatment for a gunshot wound.Detectives are now looking for two shooters and three to four suspects who drove up to iVilla Lounge and fired 19 rounds.Police said they recovered the suspect’s burned-out car in Cherry Hill and are now trying to match up witness accounts with surveillance video to track down the people responsible.“The criminals are just brazen,” Baltimore Police Col. Rich Worley said. “This guy gets out of a car with a rifle, not even a handgun, and walks up the street and opens fire on a line of people.”This was one of eight shootings in the city this weekend. On Saturday, officers were called to North Milton Avenue to Madame D. Beauty Bar where someone walked inside the salon and fatally shot a woman.“We do know that there were people present at the time,” Baltimore Police Col. Sheree Briscoe said. “So, anyone that may have seen anything, anything at all, to please share that information.”The second fatal shooting was on North Linwood Avenue where a 21-year-old man was killed.Mayor Jack Young released a statement about the violent weekend in Baltimore:“The level of violence late into this weekend is completely unacceptable. We have teams of officers working non-stop to identify suspects and bring the shooters to justice. We can never get to a place where this type of bloodshed becomes normal. All of Baltimore stands committed to eliminating these horrific acts of violence. I beg anyone who might have information about these latest shootings to please reach out to the police. We must work together to end senseless shootings in our City. I’m also asking all of Baltimore to continue to pray for the victims and their friends and families.”Baltimore City Council President Brandon Scott also released a statement, saying in part:“These are stories of of young people whose lives were cut short too soon, of children who will grow up without their parents, and of families who will be spending time in the hospital this holiday season praying for the speedy recovery of their loved ones.”Central District Shooting detectives are asking anyone with information to contact them at 410-396-2411 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.Filed under:The police and ATF were able to show a ‘straw purchaser’ bought the 9mm weapon used in Englewood shooting from an Oak Forest store months before the shooting,  records show.This is the story of how a handgun that police recovered after a foot chase was linked to one of the biggest mass shootings in modern Chicago history.It starts late last year, when people gathered at a house in Englewood to celebrate the life of a slain young man. Someone started an argument over a woman, and that set off a shootout in the house that spilled outside, police said.Thirteen people were wounded at the house in the 5700 block of South May Street.After the Dec. 22 shooting, Mayor Lori Lightfoot spoke at a hospital where six of the shootings victims were treated. She called it a “terrible tragedy and frankly an incredible act of cowardice” and said, “We can’t normalize this kind of behavior and tragedy in our city.”On Dec. 30, Chicago police officers spotted a man walking on a sidewalk in Englewood with a black pistol grip sticking out of his coat pocket. The man ran, but the cops caught him after a short foot chase and said they recovered a loaded 9mm Smith & Wesson handgun.Kameron Irvin, 21, pleaded guilty to illegal possession of a weapon and was sentenced to probation and 50 hours of community service.He wasn’t charged in connection with the Dec. 22 shooting but was at the scene, according to police records. He was wounded during the mass shooting.Even though Irvin wasn’t accused of being one of the shooters, the police still wanted to know where he got the gun. So they worked with the U.S. Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives to trace the ownership of the Smith & Wesson, as they do with thousands of weapons they recover every year.They used a federal database called the National Integrated Ballistic Information Network to compare markings on bullets test-fired from the Smith & Wesson against millions of images of ballistic evidence from crime scenes across the country.And that linked the gun to 13 expended bullet cartridges found at the scene of the Englewood mass shooting, authorities say.According to ATF, the ballistics database has gotten more than 126,000 such “hits” across the country during its 23-year history.The serial number on the gun was obliterated. But investigators still were able to recover it.Criminals often use a grinder to erase the serial number from a gun. To recover it so the gun can be traced, lab technicians polish the surface and apply a corrosive solution, sometimes containing hydrochloric acid. That corrodes the area, now highlighting the previously vanished serial numbers because of the way they’d been punched into the metal.Using that unique identifier, ATF officials searched firearms purchase records and found that a man named Eric Blackman had bought the gun at Eagle Sports Range in Oak Forest.Authorities say Blackman went to Eagle Sports Range last July and returned 10 days later to pick up the gun and a box of 9mm bullets. He doesn’t have a criminal background and was authorized to buy the guns as a holder of an Illinois firearm owner’s identification card.Federal agents tracked down Blackman, who lived in Englewood. They interviewed him last Jan. 28, and he acknowledged he bought the gun for Irvin because Irvin didn’t have the FOID card needed to purchase one legally, according to an ATF affidavit.Blackman said he’d worked with Irvin at a business in downtown Chicago for about a year and that they became friends, according to the affidavit. Blackman had worked for Garrett Popcorn, according to a bankruptcy petition he filed last year.ATF agents got a search warrant for Blackman’s phone and found incriminating texts between him and Irvin, according to the affidavit. Blackman texted Irvin that he’d sell him the gun for $400, Irvin asked whether the guns were “good ones,” and Blackman responded, “Guns is guns,” according to the affidavit.In August, Blackman, 28, was charged with lying on a federal form when he affirmed that he was the legitimate buyer of the gun. Now free on bail, he is awaiting trial in U.S. District Court.Blackman also hasn’t been charged in the mass shooting.The federal court documents in Blackman’s case don’t identify who fired the Smith & Wesson at the May Street house or say how many guns were fired.RelatedThe shooting happened during a memorial for 22-year-old Lonell Irvin, who the police said was killed when while trying to carjack someone in the Loop in April 2019. The driver of a BMW, who was licensed to carry a concealed weapon, shot Irvin in the head, according to the police.People at the memorial were celebrating Lonell Irvin’s birthday, which had been the day before the mass shooting.Keilon Jones, 26, was one of the people at that memorial, according to the police, who said Jones and others at the party were patted down by the organizers of the memorial. He didn’t have a weapon during the pat-down but later got a gun and shot at two people standing near the front door of the apartment, according to the police. Both people fired back, and Jones ran out the back door and kept shooting, striking someone in the leg, police said.A police surveillance camera showed Jones circle back to the block in his girlfriend’s Mazda, aiming his gun at one of the shooting victims, who fired nine shots at Jones, police said.“The whole house is going to be a crime scene,” one officer said on the police radio. “There’s blood everywhere.”The 13 people who were shot ranged in age from 19 to 48.Jones, who was treated for a bullet wound, was arrested two weeks later on a charge of attempted murder in connection with the shooting. Jones, whose neck is tattooed with the words “Fear None,” is awaiting trial in Cook County criminal court.Court records don’t say what kind of gun Jones is accused of using that night.Marciano White, 37, was arrested the night of the shooting after he was found outside the Englewood house with a .357-caliber handgun, police said. He was charged with illegal possession of a handgun but wasn’t charged in the shooting. He’s now on home detention on electronic monitoring as he awaits trial, court records show.White told officers he found that gun on the stairs in the house and grabbed it “out of fear of the situation,” Cook County prosecutors said.Eagle Sports Range isn’t accused of any wrongdoing for selling the Smith & Wesson used in the mass shooting.But Cook County Commissioner Larry Suffredin says he’s concerned about the store’s connection to the straw-purchasing case and that a boy was accidentally shot inside the store last December. Earlier this month, Suffredin objected to the county giving a property tax break to the store, a measure that passed by a vote of 11-5.“Tax incentives are not rights,” Suffredin says. “We should give them to businesses that enhance the community. I don’t see a gun range helping the community.”Eagle Sports Range didn’t respond to a request for comment.In 2012, a University of Chicago Crime Lab study found that nearly half of the guns recovered by the Chicago police were bought in Cook County. The study looked at guns recovered within a year of their purchase — those most likely to be bought by straw purchasers.Few gun stores have been punished for selling to straw purchasers. Undercover stings largely have been unsuccessful in proving stores intentionally sell to customers who plan to turn over legally purchased guns to criminals.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.The St. John the Baptist Parish sheriff has made an arrest and is searching for another suspect in connection with a shooting at an after-hours party held at an elementary school.On Dec. 23, Marcus Isom, 34, of Edgard, was arrested and charged on suspicion of aggravated second-degree battery and illegal use of a weapon.Sheriff Mike Tregre is searching for Derrel Dibartolo, 31, of Kilona.According to the sheriff, Dibartolo is a suspect in the shooting at West St. John Elementary school on Dec. 23.Four people were shot, and all of them were treated and released.The night of the shooting, five cars were stuck by bullets, according to the sheriff.Tregre said there were several citizens who witnessed the shooting, but no one has come forward with any assistance at all. No motive is known at this time.Anyone with information regarding this incident is encouraged to call the Sheriff’s Office TIPS line at 985-359-TIPS, Crimestoppers at 504-822-1111, Det. Basil Trepagnier at 504-494-3592 or Detective Gilberto Castellanos at 504-494-4170.Citizens with information about this incident that call Crimestoppers do not have to testify in court and may qualify for a cash reward. Citizens can also submit tips on the Sheriff’s Office website athttp://stjohnsheriff.org.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Please log in, or sign up for a new account and purchase a subscription to continue reading.Please purchase a subscription to continue reading.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.Partly cloudy. High 79F. Winds W at 5 to 10 mph..Mainly clear skies. Low 52F. Winds NW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:10 pmAntonio Jazzane MitchellDeAnthony Donnel RayBonds set at $15 million and $5 million•Antonio Jazzane MitchellA Laurel man has been arrested for the shooting death of a 13-year-old in Waynesboro and a Waynesboro man has been arrested for the shooting death of a Laurel man.Antonio Jazzane Mitchell, 27, of South Garden Drive in Laurel is charged with first-degree murder and five counts of aggravated assault in the drive-by shooting that killed Zachary Benard Bishop Jr., 13, on Dec. 20 as he sat in his apartment playing video games.DeAnthony Donnel RayDeAnthony Donnel Ray, 30, of Court Street in Waynesboro is charged with first-degree murder in the Aug. 27 shooting death of former Laurel High School football star Justin Mack.Wayne County Justice Court Judge Charles Chapman set Mitchell’s bond at $15 million — $5 million for the murder, $5 million for the aggravated assaults ($1 million each), $4 million for shooting into an occupied dwelling ($2 million each) and $1 million for the drive-by shooting.The judge set Ray’s bond at $5 million for the murder.Thomas Morgan, 35, was charged with accessory of the fact of the murder that Mitchell is accused of. He is being held on $5 million bond.Other arrests are pending, Investigator Jerome Jackson of the Waynesboro Police Department told The Wayne County News. Both shootings are part of an ongoing battle between gangs in Laurel and Waynesboro, law enforcement officials have said.“A lot of hard work” and cooperation of individuals and agencies went into making the arrests, Jackson said, adding that both investigations are continuing and more arrests are expected.“We had enough evidence for arrest warrants on both,” said Jackson, a former lieutenant with the Laurel Police Department.The Jones, Wayne and Covington county sheriff’s departments and  LPD were among the outside agencies that assisted, Jackson said.“We thank all of those for reaching out, offering their resources,” he said.Mack was headed to work at Howard Industries around 5 a.m. on Aug. 27 when he was gunned down in the 700 block of Gray Street, near Waynesboro Apartments, referred to locally as the “High Rise.”Bishop was playing video games inside his apartment at the “High Rise” when he was shot and killed on Dec. 20. That shooting also wounded six other people.Ray was arrested Friday while at court on another matter and Mitchell was taken into custody the next day for questioning and charged on Monday, according to The Wayne County News. Mitchell was charged in a drive-by shooting in Laurel after a “rolling shootout” from North Pine Street to South Garden Drive with 26-year-old Christopher Applewhite on an August afternoon, LPD Chief Tommy Cox said. Mitchell was out on $110,000 bond from that charge.The arrests in the two murders come just days after Wayne County Sheriff Jody Ashley organized a meeting of local and federal law enforcement agencies to address the ongoing gang problem. There was an emphasis on cooperation between agencies and the Waynesboro-Laurel shootings were discussed, in particular.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.WRBLTUSKEGEE Ala. (WRBL) – A young Macon County mother and another person have been killed in a deadly Friday night shooting in Tuskegee. Two more were injured in the shooting.“At approximately 11:50 p.m., the Tuskegee Police Department responded to the 2900 block of Davison St., Tuskegee, AL in reference to a subject shot. At this time we are investigating a double homicide to which one victim 23-year-old, Quanisha Robinson of Shorter, AL was pronounced deceased,” said Sgt. Kimberly Johnson.The name of the other deceased victim is not being released at this time.Police say two additional victims suffered gunshots wounds in the shooting and were transported to area hospitals. Their names are not being released.News 3 is awaiting to see if a suspect or person of interest has been named or taken into custody in the shooting and the possible motive.If you have any information in the shooting you are asked to please contact the Tuskegee Police Department at 334-727-0200, the Secret Witness line at 334-727-9865, or Crime Stoppers at 334-215-STOP.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.SMITHS STATION, Ala. (WRBL) -- The Smiths Station Ruck Club in coordination with the city of Smiths Station and the high school track team will hold a memorial event commemorating the 79th anniversary of the Bataan Death March.The event will be held Saturday, April 17 at the Smiths Station Sports Complex beginning at 8 a.m.CHARLESTON, WV (WOWK) - Friends and family came out to remember and mourn the loss of shooting victim KJ Taylor Friday night.On the corner of Glenwood and Central Avenue on the west end of Charleston Wednesday, the 18-year-old Capital High School senior was shot and killed. A memorial vigil was held at the same location bringing in a huge crowd.DEATH VALLEY NATIONAL PARK, Calif. (AP) — An Arizona tourist has died and his wife has been rescued after their vehicle got two flat tires and they went missing in Death Valley National Park in California.The Inyo County Sheriff's Office says searchers on Friday reached 32-year-old Alexander Lofgren and 27-year-old Emily Henkel on a steep ledge in the California desert park.Suspects Jonangel Cervantes, 17, is escorted by San Antonio police at police headquarters downtown Monday night. Cervantes was arrested in connection with the Dec. 18 shooting of four people at South Park Mall.Markees Fanning, 17, is escorted out of San Antonio Police Department headquarters Monday after he was arrested in connection with the Dec. 18 shooting at South Park Mall that injured four people.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.Lawrence Frambs, 21, is facing four counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon in connection with a shooting at South Park Mall on Dec. 18 that injured four people. He said he is innocent.Daonte Johnson, 22, is facing four counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon in connection with a shooting at South Park Mall on Dec. 18 that injured four people. He said he is innocent.San Antonio police say four people were injured in a shooting Wednesday, Dec. 18, 2019 at South Park Mall.San Antonio police say four people were injured in a shooting Wednesday, Dec. 18, 2019 at South Park Mall.Google maps shows the area around South Park Mall in San Antonio.San Antonio Police personnel investigate the scene of a shooting at The Rim Shopping Center, Sunday, Dec. 8, 2019. According to police, a father and his son were shot while in their vehicle. One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.San Antonio Police personnel investigate the scene of a shooting at The Rim Shopping Center, Sunday, Dec. 8, 2019. One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.Savawn Kyle, 26, stands by his prized white Porsche in this undated family snapshot. Kyle was killed Dec. 8, 2019, in a drive-by shooting at The Rim shopping center; his 8-year-old son who was with him in the vehicle wasn’t injured, police said.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.One of the guns used in the South Park Mall shooting was also used during the recent murder at The Rim shopping center, according to an affidavit.Two more suspects were arrested Monday in connection with a Dec. 18 shooting at South Park Mall that injured four people.Markees Fanning, 17, and Jonangel Cervantes, 17, are facing four counts each of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, said Sgt. Michelle Ramos, a spokeswoman for the San Antonio Police Department.The two were together in a vehicle on San Antonio’s South Side when they were detained by police.“Right now, we’re very happy to get these individuals off the street,” said Ramos.On Dec. 22, police arrested Lawrence Frambs, 21, and Daonte Johnson, 22, in the case. Frambs and Johnson also are facing four counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon.“We do anticipate an additional arrest or arrests,” said Ramos. “The case is still very active and early on in the investigation.Four people — a 19-year-old woman, 17-year-old boy and two men, ages 26 and 41 — were shot near the entrance of the J.C. Penney store while leaving the mall on Southwest Military Drive just before 9 p.m. on Dec. 18, officials said. Police believe the victims were targeted.The suspects then fled in a black Dodge Charger, which was later recovered by police.The victims were taken to the hospital. The one victim who was in “critical condition” is now stable, Ramos said Monday. She did not provide information about the other victims.Marina Starleaf Riker is an investigative reporter for the San Antonio Express-News with extensive experience covering affordable housing, inequality and disaster recovery. Read her on ourfree site, mySA.com, and on oursubscriber site, ExpressNews.com. |marina.riker@express-news.net| Twitter:@MarinaStarleafMarina Starleaf Riker is a reporter on the investigative team at the San Antonio Express-News.She grew up in Hawaii and graduated from the University of Hawaii at Manoa in 2015. She worked for the nonprofit Honolulu Civil Beat, the Associated Press and the Bend Bulletin in Oregon before moving to Texas in June 2017 to join the staff of the Victoria Advocate.Less than three months later, Hurricane Harvey struck.Her reporting showed how a shortage of affordable housing reached crisis levels after the hurricane. Her work was honored by the Headliners Foundation and Texas Associated Press Managing Editors, which named herTexas Star Reporter of the Year for 2018. She joined the Express-News in February.The name of a suspect and the victims in a triple homicide at a Great Falls casino have been identified.Ricky Lee Gardipee, 41, of Great Falls was identified by Petroleum County Coroner Dick Brown as the man who was shot by police near Lincoln Elementary School on Tuesday morning hours after three people were found dead at the Emerald City Casino on 10th Avenue South, according to a release.The victims have been identified by Cascade County Sheriff Jesse Slaughter as Cheryl Ann Larsen, 53, Wendy Joanne Carlson, 60, and Steve Mitchell Hale, 61. All of the victims were from the Great Falls area and family notifications have been made. The victims have been transported to the Montana State Crime Lab in Missoula, where autopsies will be completed by the end of the week, Slaughter said.A fourth victim was later located at Benefis and was being treated for a gunshot wound. The man was reportedly in stable condition as of Tuesday, according to GFPD.Charging documents for two other individuals who were questioned by police prior to and after the incident at Emerald City indicate that Gardipee was suspected of robbery at the casino in addition to the homicides.They also state that police were searching for Gardipee the day before the incident occurred.Amanda Lynn Gilbreath was charged with obstruction of justice stemming from her involvement with Gardipee, and Johnny Komeotis was charged with evidence tampering and resisting arrest during a search warrant execution.Court documents don't indicate that they were involved with the alleged homicides or robbery, although the affidavit for Gilbreath alleges Gardipee was with her immediately before he left to commit the crimes.More:Court docs: Police were looking for Gardipee prior to triple homicideMore:Triple homicide overnight at Emerald City Casino in Great Falls; suspect killed by policeGardipee’s body was transported to the Montana Crime Lab in Billings for an autopsy Wednesday morning.The Montana Division of Criminal Investigation is continuing the investigation into the shooting of Gardipee, with assistance from Petroleum County Coroner’s Office.Gardipee had several convictions in Cascade and Lewis and Clark counties dating back to 1996, including charges for robbery, assault on a peace officer, burglary, possession of dangerous drugs and theft.According to the Lewis and Clark County Sheriff’s Office, Gardipee was convicted of felony burglary while a resident of East Helena in 2011 and sentenced to 15 years with 12 suspended.Gardipee was released from prison in May to serve out the 5-year suspended portion of a 10-year sentence in Cascade County for an assault on a peace officer charge in 2014.According to charging documents, police received a report that Gardipee and another woman were at the Greystone Inn in Great Falls and both had warrants for probation violations.Officers reported they found Gardipee in an elevator, and he refused to comply when they attempted to place him under arrest.The affidavit stated he appeared to be under the influence of methamphetamine, reached for what officers believed was a weapon and tried to shut the elevator doors to escape.Gardipee reportedly sprayed officers with pepper spray and had to be shot with a Taser twice before police could get him into custody.A petition was filed in November to revoke the suspended portion of Gardipee's sentence due to numerous compliance violations, including the possession and use of dangerous drugs.According to Cascade County Attorney Josh Racki, Gardipee was out on bond at the time of Tuesday's homicides, but police were seeking him for an alleged misdemeanor assault, and he had successfully eluded authorities multiple times.Gardipee was scheduled to appear before Cascade County District Judge Greg Pinski on Thursday for a hearing to answer to the allegations contained in the revocation petition.Authorities were dispatched to the Emerald City Casino on the 1700 block of 10th Avenue South around 2 a.m. Tuesday for a call of a man bleeding from the face.Officers with the Great Falls Police Department found three people dead inside the casino. The manner of death for the victims found in the casino has not been released as of 11 a.m. Wednesday.GFPD, the Cascade County Sheriff’s Office, Montana Probation and Parole, the U.S. Marshals and the FBI all searched for the suspect, now identified as Gardipee, and he was located just before 6 a.m. near Lincoln Elementary at 26th Street and 7th Avenue South.Gardipee, who was armed according to GFPD, was then shot by police after “engaging with law enforcement," GFPD Captain Jeff Newton said at a Tuesday media briefing.The name or names of officers involved in the shooting have not yet been released, but it was announced Wednesday that deputies from the U.S. Marshals were involved in the shooting.Grady Higgins is the News Now reporter for the Tribune and he can be reached at ghiggins@greatfallstribune.com.To support his coverage of northcentral Montana,subscribe today and receive a special offer.COLUMBUS, Ga. (WTVM) - An overnight shooting in Columbus has left four people injured and a fifth dead.Officers were dispatched to the 600 block of 32nd St. near the intersection of 7th Ave. to find 41-year-old Eric Devon Patterson deceased.Muscogee County Coroner Buddy Bryan says Patterson was declared dead on the scene at approximately 4:00 a.m.It was initially believed only three victims were injured in this case, but Columbus police have confirmed a fifth victim.The other four victims in the shooting were taken to local hospitals for treatment of their injuries.One of the victims is currently in surgery and is listed in critical condition. The remaining three are undergoing treatment for non-life threatening injuries.There is no word on any suspects in this case at this time.Anyone with information on this shooting should contact Columbus police.Copyright 2019 WTVM. All rights reserved.Alex joined the digital team in December 2017.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Four teenagers were shot in front of an Ivanhoe apartment complex Saturday night, according to Tulare County sheriff's deputies.In hopes of catching the wanted shooter, a video of the incident was released by sheriff's officials on Sunday.Just before 8:30 p.m., deputies were called to the 15700 block of Paradise Avenue in Ivanhoe for reports of a drive-by shooting.When deputies arrived, they found three 17-year-old boys and an 18-year-old boy suffering from gunshot wounds.The victims told deputies they were sitting in front of an apartment complex when someone drove by in a "dark-colored SUV" and fired several rounds at them.In the video, the victims can be seen running for cover as gunshots echoed out.The victims were all taken to a nearby hospital with "non-life threatening injuries," said Ashley Ritchie, spokeswoman for the sheriff.The victims were treated and released.Detectives are searching for the suspects and investigating a possible motive.If anyone has any information, they are urged to call the Tulare County Sheriff’s Department Ag Crimes Unit at 1-800-808-0488 or anonymously at tcso@tipnow.com or by text or voicemail at 725-4194.Sheyanne Romero covers Tulare County public safety, local government and business for the Visalia Times-Delta and Tulare Advance-Register newspapers. Follow her on Twitter@sheyanne_VTD.Get alerts and keep up on all things Tulare County for as little as $1 a month.Subscribe today.A Ferguson man is facing multiple charges in the December 12, 2019 shooting of 19-year-old Timothy Simmons.ST. LOUIS COUNTY, Mo. (KMOV.com) -- A man has been charged in a quadruple shooting that left one 19-year-old killed in Moline Acres.Anthony Tate Jr. was charged in the shooting that injured three and killed a 19-year-old on December 12, 2019.Anthony Tate Jr., 24, of Ferguson, was charged with first-degree murder, three counts of assault, five counts of armed criminal action, unlawful use of a weapon and unlawful possession of a firearm. He was arrested on January 29.According to St. Louis County police, the shooting happened just after 10 p.m. in the 9900 block of Lewis and Clark Boulevard, in the parking lot of a business on December 12, 2019.When officers responded to the scene, they found two people in a vehicle were shot and seriously injured and one person was shot and died at the scene.Police later identified Timothy Simmons, 19, of Collett Drive in St. Louis, as the person killed.Another person in a nearby car was struck by gunfire from the suspect's vehicle.Police say Tate was seen on surveillance approximately four minutes after the shooting pumping gas into the vehicle used in the shooting at a gas station.Tate plead guilty and was sentenced with second-degree assault.Copyright 2019 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reservedLog InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.New Jersey's Jewish community was shaken by reports that the suspects involved in thegun battlein Jersey City Tuesday had deliberately targeted a kosher deli where three bystanders were killed, although authorities stopped short of calling the incident an anti-Semitic attack.Video surveillance footage showed that the two suspects — identified as David N. Anderson, 47, and Francine Graham, 50, both of whom were killed — opened fire on the JC Kosher Supermarket with long rifles immediately after arriving across the street in a white U-Haul van deli at 12:21 p.m. Tuesday, authorities said. Both suspects then entered the store.The small deli, which was left in shambles from the attack and the suspects' roughly two-hour gun battle with police who swarmed the scene, is located next door to a Jewish synagogue and caters to a small enclave of Orthodox Jewish families in the city.Two of those killed inside the deli were Orthodox Jews: Leah Minda Ferencz, 32, whose family owned the business, and Moshe Hirsch Deutsh, 24. Douglas Miguel Rodriguez Barzola, 49, was also killed. A fourth person was wounded but managed to escape the store, New Jersey Attorney General Gurbir Grewal said.In a press conference Wednesday afternoon, New Jersey Gov. Phil Murphy expressed solidarity with the state's Jewish community, saying, "An attack on our Jewish community … is an attack on all 9 million of us who are proud to call ourselves New Jerseyans."But amid media reports linking Anderson to the Black Hebrew Israelites, considered an anti-Jewish hate group, Grewal and other law enforcement officials cautioned that the investigation into a motive for the attack was still ongoing.In the meantime, Jewish leaders said they were deeply disturbed by the emerging narrative of the attack.“The Jewish community is shaken,” said Evan Bernstein, the New York and New Jersey regional director of the Anti-Defamation League. “We want to get the details and understand what happened.”""This potentially may be the worst anti-Semitic incident in New Jersey, it is very possible," added Avi Schnall, the director for New Jersey's Office of Agudah Israel of America, an organization that represents the interests of the Orthodox Jewish community.The shootout coincides with a rising tide of anti-Semitism across the nation.It comes just over a year after the October 2018 shootings at the Tree of Life synagogue in Pittsburgh which killed 11 people and wounded seven. The incident was the deadliest attack on the Jewish community in the United States and the most anti-Semitic homicides in a single year in U.S. history, according to the FBI.New Jersey had the thirdmost anti-Semitic incidents in the countryin 2018, behind California and New York, according to an annual report by the Anti-Defamation League. The New York-based nonprofit organization tracks such incidents from police, school and other reports.The ADL had identified 76 anti-Semitic incidents in the state so far this year, as of October, the most recent count available. There were 200 such incidents in New Jersey in  2018, and 208 in 2017, according to the ADL.These statistics came from the organization's"heat map,"which tracks a variety of extremist incidents, including those involvingwhite supremacy and terrorism.The New Jersey Attorney General's Office provides a different set of statistics. According to areportit issued in August, there were 172 reported anti-Jewish bias incidents across the state in 2018. Those cases accounted for more than 30% of all reported bias incidents in New Jersey and more than 86 of all such incidents motivated by the victim’s religion."We must recognize the greater context in which this outrage occurred. Jews have been targeted in city streets, in their houses of worship and online," the Agudath Israel of America said in a statement Wednesday. "The increase in the number of anti-Semitic incidents is alarming and needs to be urgently addressed."Many of New Jersey's anti-Semitic incidents have targeted the state's growing Orthodox Jewish community, particularly in and around Lakewood, a booming Ocean County township of more than 100,000 residents where Orthodox Jews now account for the majority of the population.In 2018, 11 of New Jersey's reported anti-Semitic incidents took place in Lakewood, according to the ADL's count. The incidents included anti-Semitic graffiti, online threats, harassment and slurs..As of September, Lakewood police had investigated 47 bias incidents in the township, up from a total of 20 reported in 2018. The township police did not provide a breakdown of anti-Semitic incidents, however.“I think the rise is not just here, but it’s happening all around the country right now,” Lakewood Mayor Raymond Coles said.“I think one reason you’re seeing more anti-Semitic incidents (reported locally) is because we’re doing a good job of communicating to people to let us know when something like that happens," the mayor said. "We are trying to make sure that people report these incidents and let officials know because if you ignore the incident, it’s only going to get worse.” You can hear Schnall discuss the problem of anti-Semitism in the videos below.In August, police in Lakewood investigated the slashing of over100 car tires in the Old Pine Acres neighborhood. All of the vehicles were owned or operated by members of the Orthodox Jewish community, who were praying at a local synagogue at the time, police have said. Lakewood Police Capt. Gregory Staffordsmith said there are no new leads in the case but an investigation is continuing.“This incident happened exclusively in Jewish homes,” said Alex Rosemberg, the ADL's director of community affairs. “Basically, that meant someone had such an animosity towards a particular population that they decided to go do that, leaving all those families stranded to go to school and work. This created such a commotion of ‘why they are only targeting us.'”Another incident happened in September in neighboring Jackson Township, where the Orthodox Jewish community is also growing rapidly.A rabbi involved in that incident, who did not wish to be identified by name, said he was walking home from a prayer service when a car swerved toward him."'F*** you, go back to Lakewood,", the rabbi said he heard heard three young white men in the vehicle yell. Then they said "something about Hitler," the rabbi said."I really thought there was a strong possibility my life was in danger," he said.AJackson teenageraccused of driving the car and yelling insults was charged with bias intimidation and simple assault, Capt. Staffordsmith said. Police have not released the juvenile's name.In Central Jersey, a Hillsborough township employee discovered an anti-Semitic flier in the municipal building earlier this year, and racist and anti-Semitic graffiti was found on the side of the Scotch Plains-Fanwood High School in October 2018.“People are intimidated by cultures,” said Schnall of Agudath Israel of America. “For outsiders that don’t understand or don’t know what a certain culture is about, it will look intimidating to them especially if they see hundreds of men on a Friday night in dark suits, black ties and black hats marching to the synagogue.”Cheryl Makin contributed to this story.Joshua Chung is a breaking news reporter. A lifelong Jersey Shore resident, he  is a recent graduate of Michigan State University. Contact him at jchung@gannettnj.com, 732-870-7985, or on Twitter @JoshchungggTwo men were killed and three others seriously injured in a shooting in DeSoto Sunday night, police say.The shooting happened around 7:50 p.m. Sunday at an apartment complex
 in the 200 block of W. Wintergreen Road, DeSoto police said.Initially reported as a home invasion, police said detectives could 
not confirm the account and have been trying to determine the 
circumstances that led to the shooting.The latest news from around North Texas.Police identified Monday the men killed in the shooting as David Daniel Young Jr., 21, and William Leon Smith, 43.Police said the name of the other men injured in the shooting would not be released Monday.Anyone with information about the incident was asked to call police at 469-658-3050.The NOPD investigates a shooting that killed an 18-year-old woman and injured a 61-year-old man that happened in the 2100 block of North Rocheblave Street in New Orleans, La. Monday, Dec. 9, 2019. According to preliminary information from NOPD, the woman was in the back room of a house when six shots were fired through the window. She was hit and died at the scene.The Orleans Parish Coroner’s Office on Tuesday released the identity of the 18-year-old woman who wasfatally shot in a home in the 7th Wardon Sunday night.Raven Houff died from multiple bullet wounds in the 200 block of North Rocheblave Street, the coroner’s office said.The coroner also confirmed a prior report that 27-year-old Justin Hayes was the man who was killed in ashooting at a bar in Central Citywhich wounded four others on Sunday night.New Orleans police haven’t publicly named any suspects in either killing.Houff was in a room in the back of a house when someone fired six shots through a window about 11:15 p.m. She died at the scene while a 61-year-old man in a neighboring home was also shot and wounded. Paramedics took that man to a hospital, and updates on his condition haven’t been made available.In the quintuple shooting about 10 p.m. Sunday in the 3800 block of Washington Avenue, three men and two women were hit by gunfire at Fox III, a bar. Hayes died at the scene.Anyone with information can call Crimestoppers at (504) 822-1111. Tipsters may be eligible for a cash reward.In other matters recently handled by local authorities:• New Orleans police investigated two robberies at gunpoint on Monday.About 2 p.m. in the 1100 block of Annunciation Street in the Central Business District, two men robbed a 35-year-old man who was walking, police said.The other case involved two underage boys who approached a 23-year-old man, demanded his money and made him disrobe after the victim said he didn’t have any, police said. The pair of minors took the man’s wallet, which contained cash and credit cards, according to police.In an attempted armed robbery attempt, a man wielding a pickaxe charged at a 33-year-old woman whom he accompanied to a liquor store and demanded cash about 11:30 p.m. in the 2000 block of South Claiborne Avenue in Central City. The woman fled, and the man drove off in his car, said police, who noted that the two had been drinking together before the incident.• Another robbery on Monday didn’t involve weapons, New Orleans police said.About 4 p.m. at the corner of St. Louis and Dauphine streets in the French Quarter, a 42-year-old man surrendered his wallet, cash and cell phone to two men who attacked him, police said.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionEmail Ramon Antonio Vargas atrvargas@theadvocate.com.News Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?Five of the eight people injured in Friday's deadlyshooting at Naval Air Station Pensacolahave been released from the hospital, according to base officials.The three remaining injured were in stable condition, said base spokesman Jason Bortz in a news release issued at noon Monday.In addition to the eight people injured,three young men— all aviation students at the base — were killed in the attack, which the FBI has said is being investigated as an act of terrorism.Authorities have not officially released the names of those injured, including thetwo Escambia County Sheriff's Office deputies who exchanged gunfire with the suspectbefore he was killed.One deputy was shot in the arm, and the other was shot in the leg. Escambia County Sheriff David Morgan told the News Journal on Monday that both deputies have since been released from the hospital.A third law enforcement officer, a Navy police officer, was also injured in the shooting but was reportedly in good spirits over the weekend.Cameron Walters:'He was the team motivator': NAS Pensacola shooting victim impacted manyMohammed Sameh Haitham:19-year-old airman identified as second victim of NAS Pensacola shootingJoshua Kaleb Watson:Pensacola NAS shooting victim 'saved countless lives with his own'Late Saturday night, the Navy identified the three young aviation students who were killed in the attack as:Among those injured was27-year-old Ryan Blackwell, a Navy airman and assistant wrestling coach at Gulf Breeze High School, who was shot in his right arm and in his pelvis.As of Monday, the base was only open to current Department of Defense ID card holders. The National Naval Aviation Museum and the Pensacola Lighthouse, both located on the base, were also only open to DoD ID holders.SectionsSecondary MenuAlabama News NetworkbyAlabama News Network StaffThe Montgomery Police Department is conducting a double homicide investigation following the Wednesday night shooting deaths of Antuane Daniel Jr., 20, and Dylan White, 20, both of Montgomery. Two other males were also injured in the shooting.On Dec. 4, around 8:45 p.m., MPD and Fire Medics responded to Birchwood Apartments in 500 block of Eastdale Road South after receiving a report of subjects shot. There, they located two adult males, Daniel and White, who had sustained fatal gunshot wounds and were pronounced dead at the scene. A third teenage male also was located at the scene before beingtransported to Baptist Medical Center South, with a life-threatening gunshot wound.Prior to MPD’s arrival, a fourth adult male was transported by personal vehicle to a local hospital where he was found to have sustained a non-life-threatening gunshot wound.MPD’s initial investigation indicates this fatal shooting to be drug related.No arrests have been made at this time, and no additional information is available for release.Police ask individuals with knowledge of this fatal shooting to call CrimeStoppers at 215-STOP, Secret Witness at 625-4000, or MPD at 625-2831.The Morning PledgeGolden ApplePositively AlabamaWhat’s Right with Your CommunityFaith Matters© 2021 Alabama News.Plentiful sunshine. High 73F. Winds NW at 10 to 20 mph..Mainly clear skies. Low 49F. Winds WNW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:03 pmCOTTON VALLEY, La. — The suspected gunman in a pair of Sunday morning shooting deaths is under arrest as he undergoes treatment at Ochsner LSU Health.With an armed guard on watch near his hospital room, Mikel Tyrone Strickland, 22, of Plain Dealing faces two counts of second-degree murder.Authorities arrested Strickland Sunday afternoon after serving warrants on the murder charges.Webster Sheriff Gary Sexton said the shootings occurred at The Vibe nightclub in Cotton Valley around 1:15.“Apparently an altercation (argument) took place. I believe some of the victims could very well be innocent bystanders,” Sexton said.The died have been identified as LaJasmine Monique Jackson, 19, of Springhill and Vantrez Johnson, 24, of Cotton Valley. Three others were also shot during the melee, including Strickland and JaKyle Oliver. Sexton said Oliver was shot numerous times during the incident. The injured were all taken to area hospitals for treatment.Once released from the hospital, Strickland will be taken to Caddo Detention Center, where he will be booked as a fugitive from Webster Parish. He ten will be taken to the Bayou Dorcheat Correctional Center near Minden.ORIGINAL STORY:COTTON VALLEY, La. — Authorities have named a suspect in a Sunday morning shooting at a Cotton Valley club that left two Webster Parish residents dead.The victims have been identified as LaJasmine Monique Jackson, 19 of Springhill and Vantrez Johnson, 24, of Cotton Valley. Three others were also shot during the incident. They were taken to area hospitals for treatment. One of the three, Mikel Tyrone Strickland, 22 of Plain Dealing, has been identified  by authorities as the suspected gunman, according to Webster Sheriff Gary Sexton.Webster Parish deputies traveled to Ochsner LSU Health Hospital in Shreveport Sunday afternoon to serve Strickland with a pair of warrants for charges of second-degree murder.Sexton said there were multiple shots fired at That Vibe in the 100 block of Hawthorne Loop.“Apparently an altercation took place around 1 a.m. I believe some of the victims could very well be innocent bystanders,” Sexton said.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.If you have Closed Captioning issues or have disabilities and have issues and require assistance accessing the KTBS or KPXJ Public File,click herefor contact information.Advertising|EEO Public File|KTBS 3 Public File|KPXJ 21 Public FileNEW ORLEANS — Two people were killed and another two injured in a shooting reported in the Seventh Ward Sunday afternoon, police officials say.It comes hours after 10 people were wounded in a mass shooting on Canal Street.According to initial NOPD reports, two victims were pronounced dead in the 2000 block of N. Dorgenois Street, near Hardin Park and St. Augustine High School around 1 p.m.Two other victims were hurt and rushed to hospital via ambulance. There condition was not immediately listed.NOPD was on the scene investigating and no further details were immediately available.On Monday, the Orleans Parish Coroner identified the two deceased victims as 28-year-old Louis Morgan and 68-year-old Freddie DeJean.The incident brings the total number of gun violence victims in New Orleans Sunday to 14, with 12 injured and two killed.According to NOPD Superintendent Shaun Ferguson, the mass shooting that left 10 hurt occurred around 3:25 a.m. in the 700 block of Canal Street, between Bourbon and Royal Streets."We had officers on that very block that thought they were being fired upon," Ferguson said. "Unfortunately, there were so many people out here we were unable to determine who was actually firing shots at the time."NOPD and State Police had an increased presence in the French Quarter at the time for Bayou Classic weekend. A $5,000 dollar reward for information leading to an arrest was announced.RELATED:Mayor: 'New Orleans will not allow incidents like this to derail the progress we have made'RELATED:There have been 6 shootings in New Orleans with 10 or more victims since 2013RELATED:10 shot on Canal Street in New Orleans, 2 in critical conditionRELATED:$5,000 reward for information on Canal Street mass shooting, NOPD saysStay with WWL-TV and WWLTV.com for more on this developing story► Get breaking news from your neighborhood delivered directly to you by downloading the new FREE WWL-TV News app now in theIOS App StoreorGoogle Play.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Filed under:Juanya Booker was 3 years old when he and his 6-year-old brother were shot as they sat in the back of their family’s station wagon.A 20-year-old man killed Sunday in a shooting in Aurora survived a gunshot wound when he was 3 years old, according to media report.Juanya Booker, of Montgomery,was among five adults shotearly Sunday at a home in the 700 block of South 5th Street, Aurora police said.Booker was pronounced dead after the shooting, according to police spokesman Paris Lewbel. Four other men and women, between ages 18 and 25, were treated at hospitals, Lewbel said. All but one have since been released.Police said the shooting was an isolated incident and is under investigation. No arrests have been made.Booker was killed one week after15-year-old Jasmine Noble was shot to deathin the 400 block of Florida Avenue. Police are conducting a death investigation into that shooting, and trying to piece together its “suspicious circumstances,” Lewbel said.In 2002, Booker survived a gunshot wound when he was 3 years old,according to Aurora Beacon-News. He was wounded with his 6-year-old brother as they sat in the back of their family’s station wagon in the 400 block of North Harrison Avenue, the Beacon-News reported.At the time, the shooting sparked outrage in the community and calls for an end to gang violence, the Beacon-News reported.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Cops have arrested a homeless teen they say opened fire on a Bronx street five months ago, wounding five people, including two children, officials said Wednesday.Investigators finally nabbed 17-year-old Amari Rolle on Tuesday morning, charging him with five counts of attempted murder for the Nov. 27 4 p.m. gunfire on E. 151st St. and Courtlandt Ave. in the South Bronx.Rolle was captured on Harmony Lane in Monticello, N.Y., some 90 miles outside the Bronx, about 6:30 a.m. after detectives zeroed in on a cellphone the teen had been using, sources said.The alleged gunman spent the last five months moving from state to state to avoid capture, officials said.Two boys aged 10 and 14 were wounded scrambling for cover along with two women, ages 19 and 36, and a 20-year-old man, cops said. All of the victims survived gunshot wounds to their legs and buttocks.Rolle was with two friends when he allegedly fired at least six shots from a .40-caliber pistol, sparking a chaotic scene that sent people running for their lives and ducking for cover in nearby stores."The crowd from the street was running. Some came running into the store to avoid the firing,” Adam Lin, 32, the owner of Courtlandt Wine & Spirits told The Daily News at the time. “Three people who ran in were already shot before they came inside. The little boy was lying face-up on the floor bleeding and a woman was lying bleeding by the door.”The teen was last seen running from the scene, jumping fences and scrambling through several backyards as he made his getaway, officials said.Christina Vazquez, ReporterChristina Vazquez, ReporterMIAMI-DADE COUNTY, Fla.– Police in Miami-Dade County are still searching for shooters after a deadly attack Monday evening.Two men were killed and two others injured while standing along Northwest 44th Street and 29th Avenue.Police arrested one man, Johnson Oscar, on two counts of second degree murder and two counts of attempted second degree murder.Homicide detectives are still looking for additional subjects.The shooting took place just before 7 p.m. Monday. Officers nearby heard the gunshots and responded to the area, eventually pursuing a black sedan that was fleeing the scene.The driver of that sedan crashed into a marked police cruiser, injuring two officers inside.According to court documents, police found two assault rifles inside the sedan.Authorities found Oscar hiding in a nearby yard and took him into custody. He eventually confessed to being inside the sedan and fleeing after the crash.The two victims have been identified as 25-year-old Thomas Williams and 20-year-old Malik Rolle.Police said the sedan used in the shooting was reported stolen out of Polk County three months ago.Anyone with further information is urged to contact Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-TIPS (8477).Copyright 2019 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Christina returned to Local 10 in 2019 as a reporter after covering Hurricane Dorian for the station. She is an Edward R. Murrow Award-winning journalist and previously earned an Emmy Award while at WPLG for her investigative consumer protection segment "Call Christina."If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Fredrick AsherA man killed in a drive-by shooting at a west Birmingham club is said to have died the way he lived – protecting others.Fredrick Asher, 25, was a recent graduate of Lawson State Community College and had just bought his first home with his fiancé.He died Sunday morning when he and four others were shot when leaving Euphoria Sports Bar & Hookah, but not before pushing another victim out of the way when gunfire erupted.“He died a hero in my eyes,’’ said Birmingham DJ Kamm Bamm, who was shot in the hip. “I didn’t know him, and his actions saved my life.”That is not at all surprising to those who loved and knew him best. “That was just his demeanor,’’ said his father, Kelvin Asher. “He was a very protective and caring young man.”"He would sacrifice his last for anybody,'' said friend Lorenzo Webster.The shooting happened about 12:30 a.m. Sunday at the club on 15th Street West. Officers responded on a report of multiple people shot.5 shot, one fatally, outside west Birmingham clubThe shooting happened about 12:30 a.m. at Euphoria Sports Bar & Hookah Lounge on 15th Street West. Officers responded on a report of multiple people shot.When police arrived on the scene, they initially found three people suffering from non-life-threatening wounds, said Sgt. Johnny Williams. A fourth – Fredrick Asher - was critically wounded and taken to UAB Hospital’s Trauma Center. He was pronounced dead two hours later.Investigators later received additional information that a fifth victim arrived at the hospital suffering from a non-life-threatening gunshot wound. All remaining victims are expected to recover from their injuries.Williams said the shooting happened after patrons were made to leave the club after a fight. The suspects then drove past the club in a dark vehicle and began to fire at patrons as they stood in the parking lot.Kamm Bamm said she had decided late to go to club because there were several rappers from throughout the Birmingham area performing that she had not yet heard. “I wanted to go to this party I had been promoting,’’ she said.About midnight, she was talking with the DJ at the club when a fight broke out. First, a bottle was thrown. Next it was tables, chairs and even the portable heaters. “It was crazy,’’ she said.She said she heard gunshots outside. Moments later, the club owner ordered everyone inside to leave. “We were just outside the gate to the entrance when somebody drove by shooting,’’ Kamm Bamm said. “The dude in front of me turned and knocked me back. I fell and I saw him fall.”“I’m looking at him and he’s looking at me. He didn’t scream. He didn’t cry. He just gave me a look,’’ she said. “I couldn’t even crawl over to him. We just laid there on the floor together waiting for help.”It wasn’t until after Kamm Bamm was discharged from the hospital – the bullet travel from her hip and is lodged in her knee – that she learned Asher had died. She was trying to find him to thank him, and that’s when a club security guard delivered the tragic news. “I’m still in disbelief,’’ she said. “Every time I close my eyes, his face is all I see.”“It was like a scene out of a movie,’’ she said. “And we weren’t even the targets. We were just innocent bystanders.”Kelvin Asher said his son’s death has been devastating for the family. Originally from Michigan, the senior Asher moved to Florence years ago. After high school graduation, his son moved in with him with plans to attend college. “I told him I’ll do everything I can to get you into school,’’ he said.He told a story to illustrate his son’s concern for the well-being of others. Shortly after moving to Alabama, he pleaded with his father to also help him get one of his friend’s into school as well. “He wanted to get him out of that situation as well,’’ he said. “We had to drive 30 hours to and from Michigan to go get his friend and we did everything in our power to get him because Fred didn’t want his friend to be stuck in a situation where he couldn’t be there to protect him.”“Fred loved everything and everybody,’’ Kelvin Asher said. “He didn’t have a bad word to say about anybody. He loved meeting people, being around people. Fred was a good guy.”Fred Asher graduated from Lawson State in May with two associate degrees. He studied automotive mechanics and got a job building semi-trucks. He was about to be married.“He was a blessed individual,’’ Kelvin Asher said. “This has hurt us in so many ways. He touched many lives.”The elder Asher said he has repeatedly told all of his children to strive to be better, to be the best they can be. “If you’re doing that, I’ll be fine with whatever you do or become,’’ he told them. “If you’re striving, you’ve made me proud. By far he exceeded that. I’m a proud dad.”Birmingham police have not announced any arrests in the case. Kelvin Asher said he has thought about what he was say to those who cut short his son’s promising life.“The only thing I could say and the only I would do is pray,’’ he said. “I will pray for them because the Bible says vengeance is not mine.”“I don’t wish bad for anyone, but you know what you’ve done, and you know the penalty,’’ he said. “If you were man enough to do it, be man enough to accept the consequences.”Anyone with information is asked to call Birmingham police homicide detectives at 205-254-1764 or Crime Stoppers at 205-254-7777.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesKTLAby:Nouran Salahieh,Sara WelchSix people were injured after gunfire erupted at a downtown Los Angeles warehouse party early Sunday morning, the Los Angeles Police Department said.Officers responded to the 1100 block of East 11th Street at about 1:15 a.m to find that a fight had broken out and one person had pulled out a firearm and fired multiple rounds, striking several people, LAPD said.Three female and three male victims were all taken to hospitals, one of them in critical condition.Police only described the shooter as being male and said officers were still searching for him at about 6 a.m. Saturday.Video from the chaotic scene shows a large police response and crowds of partygoers gathered behind police tape as paramedics treated victims and transported them onto ambulances.The event, described by police as an  “underground party,” was taking place inside a  warehouse near the Fashion District.Less than 24 hours earlier, four people were injured when aman fired at a crowdoutside another downtown Los Angeles party after a fight broke out early Saturday morning at 833 S. Spring Street, about half a mile away from Sunday’s shooting.No further details were immediately available.Correction:A previous version of this story incorrectly described the location of the shooting. The story has been updated.SubmitThree children were fatally stabbed in Reseda Saturday morning and police are still searching for the killer, authorities said.The stabbings occurred in the 8000 block of Reseda Boulevard about 9:30 a.m., the Los Angeles Police Department told KTLA around noon. Officers are still searching for the suspect in the killings.Internal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.The 16-year-old suspect arrested after the fatal shooting at the New Beginnings Club near Cottonport was transferred to adult court after his continued custody hearing on Tuesday.Derrionte Boyer of Mansura is being charged as an adult with one count of first-degree murder and two counts of attempted first-degree murder.A grand jury trial will be held on December 19.The shooting took place around 2 a.m. Sunday at 3846 Hwy. 29 in Cottonport, the location of a club listed as New Beginnings.Two victims are deceased. One had multiple gunshot wounds and the other victim's death will be released after the autopsy. Two other victims were shot and survived - one underwent surgery on Sunday and is being treated, the other received treatment at a local hospital.See the Related Links section of the page for more information.KTLAby:Nouran SalahiehThe 800 block of South Spring Street in downtown Los Angeles is seen in a Google Maps Street View image.Four people were injured after a man fired at a crowd outside a downtown Los Angeles party early Saturday morning, authorities said.A party taking place at 833 S. Spring Street ended with a large crowd gathered outside when a fight broke out at around midnight, Los Angeles Police Department Officer Kristen Krikke said.A man then fired a dozen shots into the crowd, wounding four people, according to Krikke. Three were struck by bullets and the fourth was hit by a bullet fragment.The condition of the victims was unknown Saturday morning.The shooter was only described as a man believed to be in his 20s.It’s unclear if anyone was taken into custody in connection with the shooting.No further details were available.KTLA’s Alexis Lewis contributed to this report.SubmitThree children were fatally stabbed in Reseda Saturday morning and police are still searching for the killer, authorities said.The stabbings occurred in the 8000 block of Reseda Boulevard about 9:30 a.m., the Los Angeles Police Department told KTLA around noon. Officers are still searching for the suspect in the killings.Internal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.KLFYby:Jonathan FreemanMONROE, La. — A man wanted in Madison Parish in connection to anightclub shooting that killed one person and injured six othershas been arrested in a drug sting in Monroe.According to arrest reports, Louisiana State Police and Metro Narcotics agents arrested 28-year-old Jory Williams, Jr. on active warrants. Police took Williams back to his home in the 1300 block of Breard Street to execute a search warrant.When police arrived, 19-year-old Johnson Combs was seen jumping out of a window and running from the home. Combs was caught shortly after in the 1600 block of Pine Street. A warrant check showed that Combs is wanted in Madison Parish on one charge of Second Degree Murder and six charges of Attempted Second Degree Murder.When officers searched the Breard Street home, they found the following:Both Combs and Williams were arrested and taken to the Ouachita Correctional Center. Shortly after their arrest, Troopers who were still conducting surveillance on the Breard Street home witnessed a black BMW SUV pull into the driveway. The vehicle was registered to Williams but was being driven by 25-year-old Isaanekkia Minniefield. Reports say that Minniefield was also arrested and taken to OCC for booking.Williams bond is set at $238,750 and his charges include the following:Combs full bond has not been set as of yet and his charges include the following:Minniefield’s full bond has not been set as of yet and her charges include the following:Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.Bellard tells KLFY Jose Antonio Higareda was killed when the tornado struck the home he was living in.   He was 27 years old.METAIRIE, LA — 11-year old Lily Lopinto has a big heart and a real knack for selling lemonade.  The girl donated $2,400 that she raised from her lemonade stand to help cover the medical costs of a dog that was badly burned during a cold spell this past winter.Lily is the daughter of Jefferson Parish Sheriff Joe Lopinto.  She raised the money to help Sadie, a dog that was badly burned when a space heater caught some straw on fire inside her doghouse, says the Humane Society of Louisiana.NEW ORLEANS - NOPD believes carjackings across the city are becoming more dangerous as armed thieves are doing whatever they have to do to steal people's cars.In fact, a woman is in the hospital after getting run over in a carjacking earlier this week.KTLAby:Kristina Bravo,Ellina AbovianA shooter fled after opening fire and injuring five people “randomly” on the street in Long Beach, officials said Friday.Officers responded to the incident in the 1100 block of 10th Street at around 10 p.m. Thursday, Long Beach police Lt. Byron Blair said.Police arrived to find four people — two women and two men — with gunshot wounds to their lower extremities, Blair told KTLA. They were all taken to the hospital with injuries that were not life-threatening, according to the lieutenant.The officers then learned about a fifth shooting victim, a man, who took himself to the hospital after suffering injuries that were also not life-threatening, Blair said.Video from the scene shows officers investigating in what appears to be an alley.The shooter was described as a black man last seen driving a gray minivan, according to police.The motive is unclear, but Blair said that gang detectives are investigating the case.KTLA’s Alexis Lewis contributed to this report.SubmitThree children were fatally stabbed in Reseda Saturday morning and police are still searching for the killer, authorities said.The stabbings occurred in the 8000 block of Reseda Boulevard about 9:30 a.m., the Los Angeles Police Department told KTLA around noon. Officers are still searching for the suspect in the killings.Internal affairs investigators reviewing hundreds of allegations of misconduct and excessive force by other Los Angeles police officers during last summer’s mass protests against police brutality are ruling on the side of the officers in most cases.An internal report, submitted by LAPD Chief Michel Moore to the civilian Police Commission on Friday, noted the department had received more than 600 allegations against officers. Some of those were duplicate complaints about the same incident, and from those launched 210 investigations into 223 officers — 73 of which were related to the alleged use of non-deadly force, and five of which involved the alleged use of deadly force.The Marine Mammal Care Center in San Pedro has reopened to the public after a yearlong closure.Sea lion and seal lovers can make reservations online to book tours on Saturdays and Sundays from 10 a.m. to 2 p.m.Trending:RICHMOND — Four people were wounded in a shooting here Wednesday afternoon, police said.All four victims are all expected to survive. Some of them drove themselves to the hospital, in what officers briefly mistook for a car chase, police said.The shooting happened before 4 p.m. Wednesday, near 20th Street and Roosevelt Avenue. Dozens of shots were fired.Police have not released a motive for the shooting, and no arrests have been made.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersThe Essex County Prosecutor's Office has taken over the investigation into a quadruple shooting that left a man dead on a street in the city's West Ward on Monday evening.According to a preliminary statement released by Newark Police officials, a hail of gunfire rang out in the vicinity of 139 South 8th Street just before 5 p.m. sending over a dozen police officers to the scene where they found multiple people on the ground suffering injuries at that location.While police taped off the area and secured the scene, they began the process of separating victims that suffered gunshot wounds and those who were injured after falling to the ground after gunmen arrived in the area and started aimlessly blasting in the residential neighborhood.Initially, police believed that bullets injured five victims, but medical officials confirmed that four people were gunned down with one of the wounded sufferings fatally.Friends and family said the victim is 49-year-old Mr. Hassan Webb, who they believe was shot while attempting to return home from work.Residents in the area said it is a standard practice/procedure to get on the floor and under their beds when regular gunfire rang out in the heavy drug trafficked area that has not changed in over 30 years."Gun violence and drug trafficking has been consistently well past the days when nearby Bombers Barber Shop began cutting flat-top hairstyles for males in the area back in the mid-'80s."  Residents said very little has changed.Police say three victims were rushed the short distance to University Hospital for treatment and are expected to survive.Detectives investigating at the scene marked off over a dozen shell casings where they believe the suspects exchanged gunfire with individuals on South 8th Street.The motive for the shooting is under investigation and the suspects remain at-large.MenuFRESNO, Calif. — Charges have been filed against multiple Mongolian Boys Society gang members in both the Fresno County Superior Court and in the United States District Court related to the deaths of four people at a football watch party in Fresno.Ger Lee, 27, Anthony Montes, 27, Porge Kue, 26, and Billy Xiong, 25, have all been charged with four counts of murder, 12 counts of attempted murder and one count of conspiracy to commit murder.The charges also include two counts of special circumstance, meaning if the men are convicted they could face the death penalty or life in prison without the possibility of parole.The shooting happened back on Nov. 17 when gunmen entered the back of a Fresno home through an unlocked gate and used semiautomatic weapons to open fire on people watching a football game. Four people were killed, and six people were wounded.According toFresno Police Chief Andy Hall,the suspects are all self-admitted members of the Mongolian Boys Society gang and that they were retaliating against a rival gang called the Asian Crips that they believed was responsible for killing a member of their gang hours earlier.Hall said the gang member who was killed hours earlier was Billy Xiong's brother, Randy Xiong.Defendants Montes, Kue, and Xiong are currently in the Fresno County Jail and are expected to be arraigned Friday at 8:30 a.m.Defendant Ger Lee is currently in custody in the State of Minnesota pending an extradition hearing. His arraignment is yet to be scheduled.CLEVELAND, Ohio — A gunman in a vehicleopened fire on a home Sundayin the Detroit-Shoreway neighborhood, wounding four people, according to police.All of the victims, males ages 29, 33 and 36, and a 20-year-old female, were hospitalized, according to a police report. There were no arrests made Sunday.The report shows the shooting occurred just before 2 p.m. on the 7000 block of Lawn Avenue, which is west of West 65th Street and north of Interstate 90. A witness tells police he noticed a black vehicle with tinted windows, possibly a four-door Kia Optima, was driving slowly west on Lawn Avenue while approaching the house.Witnesses say gunshots erupted as the vehicle passed the home. A male fired from the passenger side of the car, armed with what appeared to be a rifle, witnesses tell police. Several people dove for cover when the shots were fired, the report says.The 36-year-old male victim tells police he was on the porch of the home talking with the 20-year-old female when the shots began. He was wounded in the back as he tried to run into the house. The female, who was not a resident at the home, was wounded in the right ankle as she ran back into the house.The 29-year-old male, who was in front of the home, was wounded in the leg while trying to run, while the 33-year-old male was shot in the buttocks. Three of the victims were taken to the MetroHealth Medical Center by EMS, while the 33-year-old was driven to the hospital by a friend, the report shows.Witnesses were unable to provide a good description of the shooting suspect. Two vehicles and the home were struck by gunfire.The shooting remains under investigation.If you’d like to comment on this post, please visit thecleveland.comcrime and courts comments section.Man stabbed to death in Cleveland’s Goodrich-Kirtland Park neighborhood, police sayMaple Heights police investigate bar shooting that left man critically injuredOhio man pleads to weapons charge after admitting to threatening U.S. Rep. Alexandria Ocasio-CortezAkron man accused of arranging to sell THC cartridge on Snapchat, robbing victim at gunpoint, police sayMedical examiner identifies homicide suspect dead after shootout with Cleveland policeNote to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesPublic SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accident in TalmadgePublic SafetyTwo seriously hurt in four-car hit-and-run accident in TalmadgeAccident occurred Friday night on Fairmount Avenue near Interstate 8CaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingCaliforniaFour extremist ‘Grizzly Scouts’ indicted for obstructing federal probe into Oakland shootingThe men, affiliated with the boogaloo movement, are accused of covering up their association with a man accused of murdering a federal security guardBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBooksJasmine Darznik’s historical novel ‘The Bohemians’ follows Dorothea Lange’s West Coast transformationBook chronicles Lange’s budding career, which shaped her into an influential Depression and World War II photographerPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingPeopleNew nonprofit CEO sees San Diego as ‘true leader’ in solutions for affordable housingSean Spear is the new president and CEO of Community HousingWorks, the San Diego nonprofit that develops, rehabilitates and operates affordable housing communities in the county and throughout California, while also offering programming, resources, and other forms of support to its residentsPoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadClassical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’Classical MusicBach Collegium San Diego commissions a Spanish version of Handel’s ‘Messiah’The world premiere of ‘El Mesías: Messiah for a New World’ is set to be performed in spring 2022 in San Diego and Baja CaliforniaHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversHome & GardenGarden Mastery: Planted tree is one of nature’s life preserversAdding one brings shade, home for creatures and psychological benefitsBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputeColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usColumnsColumn: Nickel Creek’s Sara Watkins has made a family album for all of usSara Watkins’ new ‘Under the Pepper Tree’ features a Nickel Creek reunion trackEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageThe only child to survive a Paradise Hills murder-suicide that claimed the lives of his mother and his three brothers has died, according to a family member.Nine-year-old Ezekiel  Valdivia had been hospitalized and on life support at Rady Children’s Hospital since the Nov. 16 shooting. He was pronounced dead Saturday at 11:23 p.m., said Karl Albright, the boy’s uncle.Police say 31-year-old Jose Valdivia shot his estranged wife, Sabrina Rosario, 29, and his sons — Zeth Valdivia, 11; Zuriel Valdivia, 5; and Enzi Valdivia, 3 — before turning the gun on himself. Only Ezekiel had survived the attack.Hundreds of mourners gathered for a candlelight vigil for the family on Friday night and implored community members to speak out against domestic violence.At the gathering at United Church of Christ in Paradise Hills, family members called Sabrina Rosario a “wonderful, charismatic, bright shining star” and a caring mother while a teacher recalled the Valdivia boys for their big smiles. The three oldest boys attended Paradise Hills Elementary School.“Big smiles on their face in the morning at my running program, they were the first ones out there,” Craig Volimas, a physical education teacher, told the crowd. “They were a light for me every single day.”Albright, who is married to Rosario’s sister, has said the couple’s difficulties began about a year ago, after Valdivia cheated on his wife for the second time. Albright said that Rosario and Valdivia had been married more than a decade, and Rosario worked to shield the children from their struggles.The couple had separated in December and Rosario filed for divorce in June. She had sought and obtained a restraining order against her husband the day before the killings, according to police and court records.Rosario said Valdivia had refused to leave her alone after she filed for divorce and had become obsessed with the idea that she was with someone new.Rosario said Valdivia called her repeatedly and showed up at her house unannounced. She endured months of harassing text messages, including one that included a photo of a handgun with beer cans and a bottle of alcohol in the background, according to court documents.In court documents, she talked of being frightened: “This threat really scared me and I can no longer handle his abuse and harassment,” she said.The morning of the shooting, police received a 911 call and could hear an argument in the background. A second 911 call came soon after, made by a relative who lives next door, who reported hearing what sounded like a nail gun being fired.When police arrived, officers spotted a bleeding child in the house and broke a front window to get inside. The parents and their youngest child died at the scene, while the other boys were rushed to a hospital.Those close to Valdivia had told reporters they were shocked to learn about the threatening messages he’d sent his estranged wife and didn’t know him to carry a gun.The family created aGoFundMe accountin the aftermath of the shooting to raise money for medical expenses and funeral costs; as of Sunday, donors had pledged more than $50,000.Sign up to get Breaking News email alertsGet alerts on severe weather, road closures and other major breaking news.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the San Diego Union-Tribune.Follow UsMore from this AuthorPublic SafetyPolice say man armed with crowbar arrested after threatening officerPublic SafetyPolice say man armed with crowbar arrested after threatening officerOfficers were called around 4:40 a.m. about a man threatening people with a crowbar around 20th Street and Market StreetPublic SafetyDetectives probe shooting of 18-year-old man in Spring ValleyPublic SafetyDetectives probe shooting of 18-year-old man in Spring ValleyThe victim told investigators that a man in a silver vehicle shot him on Elkelton Boulevard near Crestmore AvenuePublic SafetySan Diego police looking for hit-and-run driver who injured pedestrian in City HeightsPublic SafetySan Diego police looking for hit-and-run driver who injured pedestrian in City HeightsThe woman was hit by the car around 5:30 a.m. on University Avenue near Interstate 15Public SafetyOverturned semi blocks access to commercial truck border crossing in Otay MesaPublic SafetyOverturned semi blocks access to commercial truck border crossing in Otay MesaThe truck damaged a power pole along La Media Road around 6:20 a.m.Public SafetyBorder Patrol agent, off-duty firefighter come to aid of suicidal womanPublic SafetyBorder Patrol agent, off-duty firefighter come to aid of suicidal womanThe two helped prevent the woman from jumping off the Pine Valley BridgePublic Safety18 arrested after panga found near Mission BeachPublic Safety18 arrested after panga found near Mission BeachBorder Patrol officials said they found life vests and fuel cans on the vessel late MondayMore in this sectionPublic SafetyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleyPedestrian seriously injured in hit-and-run crash near Fashion ValleySan Diego police said the driver of a blue or black Chevrolet Blazer left the scene after badly injuring the 30-year-old man on Friars RoadPublic SafetySan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesSan Diego mayor proposes police reforms, lays out public safety prioritiesAmong 11 proposed reforms were recommendations to eliminate existing gang injunctions, explore alternatives to arresting low-level offendersPublic SafetyPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarPedestrian struck, killed just outside Del MarThe collision happened on Del Mar Heights Road and Durango Drive, west of I-5CourtsOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornOceanside mother to be freed without bail as details emerge in death of newbornRelease of Kelsey Carpenter comes after California Supreme Court ruling targeting cash bailPublic SafetyDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policeDomestic battery suspect flees into Clairemont Canyon, prompting standoff with policePolice said a woman reported a domestic violence incident on Lodi Street near Cole Street shortly before noon. The woman said her son had punched and kicked her, possibly carrying a firearm and a BB gun into San Clemente CanyonPublic SafetyDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensaryDeputies find $6 million of cannabis, 5 guns in raid of unlicensed Spring Valley dispensarySheriff’s officials said deputies found more than 3,000 pounds raw cannabis and marijuana-infused products at shop near Sweetwater Springs BoulevardBreakingPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatPoliticsDr. Akilah Weber will fill 79th Assembly seatWith nearly 52 percent of the vote, Weber is expected to take the Assembly seat formerly held by her mother, Shirley WeberNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HouseNation-WorldBiden returns prisoner-of-war flag to perch atop White HousePresident Joe Biden has restored the prisoner-of-war/missing-in-action flag to its former location atop the White HouseNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtNation-WorldGroup to study more justices, term limits for Supreme CourtPresident Joe Biden has ordered a study of adding seats to the Supreme Court, creating a commission that will spend the next 180 days examining the incendiary political issues of expanding the court and instituting term limits for its justicesMusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50MusicDMX, gravel-voiced hip-hop star who topped charts in late ‘90s, dead at 50Born Earl Simmons, the New York-based rapper and actor was hospitalized after having a heart attack following a drug overdoseNational EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99National EntertainmentPrince Philip, husband of Queen Elizabeth II, dies at 99Buckingham Palace says Prince Philip, the irascible and tough-minded husband of Queen Elizabeth II, has diedMost read news storiesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesBorder & BajaTrouble in paradise: Americans say they’ve lost access to their Baja resort homesCantamar residents, many of whom are U.S. retirees, are caught up in a complicated land disputePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battlePoliticsSan Diego ready to reverse Proposition B pension cuts, potentially ending 9-year legal battleStrong stock market returns have shrunk city’s costs because workers got 401(k)-style plans insteadEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyEnvironmentSan Diego’s soaring water rates have avocado, other growers eyeing break with countyFallbrook and Rainbow districts look to ditch the San Diego County Water Authority, as rates rise 8 percent a year on averageImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasImmigrationBiden expelling asylum-seeking families with young children to Tijuana after flights from TexasAfter Border Patrol apprehends the families in Texas, they are flown to San Diego and sent to Tijuana, a city they do not knowHealthCalifornia’s coronavirus vaccine supply will dip just as eligibility spikesHealthCalifornia’s coronavirus vaccine supply will dip just as eligibility spikesCountywide data show that major health systems and pharmacy chains have led San Diego’s immunization campaignLatestPadresPadres pregame: Wil Myers’ turn to DH; Profar playing third position in three gamesPadresPadres pregame: Wil Myers’ turn to DH; Profar playing third position in three gamesA look at the Padres’ and Rangers’ lineups, as well as the pitching matchup, ahead of Saturday’s 4:05 p.m. start at Globe Life FieldNational SportsPulisic scores 2, Chelsea beats Palace 4-1 in Premier LeagueNational SportsPulisic scores 2, Chelsea beats Palace 4-1 in Premier LeagueAmerican international Christian Pulisic scored twice for Chelsea in its 4-1 win at Crystal Palace that moved the team into fourth place in the Premier LeagueNational SportsHuff in on 3 TDs as Presbyterian defeats Davidson 29-24National SportsHuff in on 3 TDs as Presbyterian defeats Davidson 29-24Tyler Huff passed for two touchdowns, ran for another and Rod Haygood’s interception with 1:22 remaining sealed Presbyterian’s 29-24 win over Davidson, avenging an earlier loss to the WildcatsPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceSign Up For Our NewslettersFollow UsDigital ProducerKANSAS CITY, MO (KCTV) – Police are investigating after four people were shot outside an adult nightclub overnight.At about 2:40 a.m., officers went to the area of Independence and Van Brunt after someone called and said there was a disturbance outside the BP gas station there.The incident involved multiple cars that had come from the Baccala nightclub at 4707 Independence Ave.The involved parties left prior to police arriving, but the club then had a large crowd that was forming, so multiple officers were placed in the area to monitor things.Soon after, multiple shots were fired in front of the club. Officers quickly moved into the area and began to chase several people who were armed with rifles.One victim was found in front of the club and officers helped them while three other victims were taken to the hospital by other people.Multiple suspects were taken into custody and multiple firearms were recovered.According to police, are the victims are in stable condition. Initial reports said they appeared to have non-life-threatening injuries.KCTV5.comis now with you on the go! Get the latest news updates and video, StormTrack5 weather forecast, weather radar, special investigative reports, sports headlines and much more from KCTV5 News.>>Click/tap here to download our freemobile app. <<Copyright 2019KCTV(Meredith Corp.) All rights reserved.KANSAS CITY, MO (KCTV) -- A Kansas City Fire Department station was struck overnight during a shooting that injured four people in Kansas City.Kansas City police say Sunday night’s deadly shooting outside a club highlights a dangerous trend of gunmen willing to open fire no matter who is nearby. Armed security and police don’t stop them from pulling the trigger.Kansas City police say Sunday night’s deadly shooting outside a club highlights a dangerous trend of gunmen willing to open fire no matter who is nearby. Armed security and police don’t stop them from pulling the trigger.Digital ProducerLog InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Kansas City is about to expand temporary housing for those experiencing homelessness.The homeless camp in front of city hall has a notice to vacate by the end of the day tomorrow.Here's where people in the Kansas City area can find coronavirus vaccine information from the major hospital providers and county health departments.KANSAS CITY, MO (KCTV) --- One person has died following a crash that turned into a car fire on Sunday afternoon.Missouri State Highway Patrol Troop A found 88 pounds of meth in a VW Jetta today, according to their Twitter account. Three people were taken into custody.Tulsa police arrested a man accused of stalking a former coworker, trying to kidnap her, and shooting her husband, police officials said.An unoccupied pickup was hit by a train early Thursday morning outside of Spring Hill, according to the Johnson County Sheriff's Office.WREG.comby:Nina HarrelsonCorrection: Memphis Police on Monday revised their original information on the location of shootings and number of victims. Updated information is below.MEMPHIS, Tenn. — A 19-year-old mother is among eight people shot across the city in a span of less than four hours overnight.Police say the violence began around 2 a.m. Two men were shot at the Z Market convenience store on Perkins Road.Then around 3:30 a.m., police say five people were shot inside the Diamonds of Memphis strip club on East Brooks Road.A 19-year-old mother, Jermeisha Nance, was killed.“I got a call from my mom about 4:30. I thought I was dreaming. And she said, ‘I think Jermeisha has been killed,'” her father, Keland Nance, said. “And as I started getting an overload of phone calls, it was true.”Nance has spent his life trying to prevent violence in the city as part of the GRASSY program (Gang Resistance for Saving Society’s Youth) with Shelby County Schools, which is aimed at keeping kids out of gangs.“It’s tragic that I have to live with the fact that she’s no longer here for violence that I pretty much talk to high school students about every day,” he said. “She just got caught up with the wrong kind of people. She was at the wrong place at the wrong time, and I just wish she would have — I wish she wouldn’t have came to the club last night.”Nance says Jermeisha leaves behind a 3-year-old daughter.“She has a lot of love and she’s gonna need it, because like I said, it’s rough,” he said.Around 5 a.m., another man was shot at Fourth and Beale Street.Police say that shooting stemmed from an argument between the victim and a man who had been thrown out of Jerry Lee Lewis’ Café and Honky Tonk.Nance is now left questioning how guns ended up inside a strip club in the first place.“I never would have thought I would be the one on the news screen sharing my piece about my child in a shooting,” he said. “Not in a million years I would have thought this would happen.”But through his grief, he is vowing to continue his campaign against violence.“I’ll utilize it as a tool in her remembrance to let people know to stop the violence,” he said. “To, you know, think before you pull the trigger.”Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.Detroit— Between the 10 p.m. hour Saturday night and the 5 a.m. hour Sunday morning, seven people were shot at four separate crime scenes, police said.Two shooting scenes were on the city's east side, and two on the west side — and both west side shootings took place on Grand River.Late Saturday night, about 10:55 p.m., on the 3800 block of East McNichols, just east of Conant, four men in their 20s were victims of a mass drive-by shooting.Police say that as an unknown person drove an older, silver Ford Taurus, a passenger in the car opened fire on four victims, who were standing in a parking lot. Wounded in the gunfire were two-21-year-old men, and two-22-year-old men.While medics transported the victims to an area hospital, the silver Taurus continued east of McNichols. One of the 22-year-old men was left in critical condition, while the other 22-year-old and both 21-year-olds were listed in stable condition, police said.No suspect description was immediately offered. Police ask anyone with information on the quadruple shooting to share what they know anonymously with Crime Stoppers of Michigan at 800-SPEAK-UP.The next several hours were quiet, until a 24-year-old man was shot, at about 3:15 a.m., in the area of Marlborough and Frankfort. That's also on the east side, north of East Warren and west of Alter Road.Police say the circumstances of the shooting aren't immediately known, but the victim was hit "multiple times" by gunfire. After being privately conveyed to an area hospital, he was listed in temporary serious condition.Forty minutes later, now on Detroit's west side, in the area of Grand River and Wyoming, police say three men in a dark Jeep approached a 32-year-old man, who was sleeping in his vehicle.Police say one of the three men exited the Jeep, approached the victim, questioned him, and shot him. He got back in the Jeep, which fled in an unknown direction.Police have no suspect description to offer.An hour later, also on Grand River, less than a half-mile north and west of the previous shooting scene on the 12400 block, police say a 40-year-old man was "allegedly walking to his car with another person," whose age was not given, when he was shot.Police say the circumstances preceding the shooting are unclear, and offer no suspect description.VIDALIA, Ga. (WTOC) - Two suspects have been arrested and one is still on the loose in connection with a shooting that injured four people in Vidalia on Saturday, Nov. 9.Three adults and a 10-year-old child were shot that Saturday night while on Wiggins Street.According to the Vidalia Police Department, a dark-colored SUV involved in the shooting was located on Monday, Nov. 11. During the investigation, the police department and GBI identified the following people that are accused of being involved in the incident:Walker was arrested during a traffic stop on North Main Street on Tuesday, Nov. 12. Henderson was arrested at his job by U.S. Marshals on Friday, Nov. 15.Both are charged with four counts of aggravated assault, two counts of aggravated battery and one count of cruelty to children 2nd degree.Atkins has not been arrested at this time.Copyright 2019 WTOC. All rights reserved.P.O. Box 8086Savannah GA 31412(912) 234-1111A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.CBS17.comby:CBS 17 Digital DeskRALEIGH, N.C. (WNCN) – Two people suspected in a Nov. 8 shooting in Raleigh that killed one and injured two others were apprehended in Texas, police said.Stephon McQueen and Ivette Gonzalez Uriostegui are charged with murder and assault with a deadly weapon with intent to kill inflicting serious injury, according to a news release Thursday morning.Their capture was announced later Thursday afternoon.Officers responded to the 500 block of Bragg Street shortly after 9 p.m. on Nov. 8. They found 24-year-old Kimberly Irene Holder, 31-year-old Jean Onivogui, and 55-year-old Roy Chester Hyman at the scene.Police said Holder died from her injuries. Hyman’s and Onivogui’s injuries appeared to be non-life-threatening.Police arrested Kendrick Daquane Thomas, 27, of Raleigh around 10 p.m. Thursday. He is charged with murder and assault with a deadly weapon intent to kill inflicting serious injury.Thomas has a long criminal history in Wake County that dates back to 2008 when he was 16 years old and was charged with robbery with a dangerous weapon. Arrest records show he had been arrested at least 11 times in the county before Thursday’s arrest.McQueen’s arrest record dates back to 2008. He has been arrested 11 times in Wake County, records show. Wake County records show six arrests for Uriostegui, with the first coming back in 2007.More headlines from CBS17.com:Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.RALEIGH, N.C. (WNCN) -- Raleigh police Friday night announced an arrest after two men were shot at a Raleigh bar last week.The shooting was reported on April 1 just after 11:30 p.m. at The Bison Bar, which is located at 815 E. Whitaker Mill Road, according to Raleigh police.RALEIGH, N.C. (WNCN) -- Remnants of last year’s protests and riots in downtown Raleigh are slowly being removed.“I hope that it means moving forward, in general, you know. We’ll be in a better place not only economically, but socially,” said Ebonee Collins, who works in downtown Raleigh.CARY, N.C. (WNCN) -- In efforts to accommodate families who aren't comfortable with returning to in-person learning, Wake County Public Schools will provide a Virtual Academy program for grades K-12 during the 2021-22 school year.The 2021-22 school year is set to begin in July and August.ROCKDALE COUNTY, Ga. — The Rockdale County Sheriff's Office has released the names of the two officers who were wounded duringThursday's officer-involved shooting incident.The wounded Rockdale County deputies were identified as Cpl. Michael Moon and Investigator Travis Coble.In the incident, when deputies responded to a person-shot call early Thursday afternoon, they discovered two victims -- one had been killed, a second was wounded.The gunman was identified as 66-year-old Gerald Newton Allen. According to authorities, Allen retreated to his home, a short distance away, in the 1700 block of Spring Street, barricading himself inside.RELATED:2 deputies grazed, 2 dead, 1 hurt after SWAT standoff ends in Rockdale CountyAfter a tense, hours-long standoff, Rockdale SWAT team members entered the home, attempting to take Allen into custody. At that point, Allen allegedly shot at the SWAT team, wounding the two deputies.Both deputies were transported to hospitals, where they were treated and released.RELATED:SWAT situation unfolds in Rockdale CountyThe investigation of the incident has been turned over to the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, as is customary in officer-involved incidents. Once they complete their independent investigation, it will be turned over to the Rockdale County District Attorney's Office for review.The Rockdale County Sheriff's Office is continuing their investigation of the double shooting which resulted in the death of Robbie Daniel and the injury of the second individual earlier in the afternoon.MORE HEADLINES |Sophie's Nightmare: How a Georgia mother allowed her boyfriend to impregnate her 10-year-oldGang members sentenced in 'the most horrific death' in recent county historyHe had 76 bullet wounds from police guns. The DA is asking whyNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.HOUSTON — Eight people were shot Monday in three separate shootings in southeast Houston.Two of the eight people shot are dead.Houston police have confirmed that none of the shootings are related.All three shootings happened within five miles of each other and within an hour and a half.The first shooting happened at about 4:05 p.m. in the 7100 block of Schley Street.Chief Acevedo saidone person was killed and two others were taken to the hospital with gunshot wounds.Police are looking for two male suspects who were driving a four-door silver or gray sedan. Acevedo said it may be a newer model Ford.Houston Police Chief Art Acevedo said drugs were not involved, but police and neighbors suspect there was illegal activity happening inside the house.“All we’re interested in is getting the murderers off the street before anyone else gets hurt or killed,” he said.The second shooting happened in the 5000 block of Northridge near Jutland around 4:15 p.m., about 15 minutes after the shooting on Schley.Police said four people were shotduring a drive-by at the scene, which was about five miles away from the first shooting.Javier Chatman, 23, was shot to death, another man was shot in the leg, another man was shot in the abdomen and a woman was shot in the foot, police said. All of the injured victims were between the ages of 20 and 25.Authorities believe the shooting is gang-related.Police said the victims were in the driveway when a stolen Hyundai Sonata pulled up and at least one person opened fire on the group in the driveway.Authorities said they think at least one of the victims returned fire at the Hyundai.The suspects fled the location in the Hyundai and ditched the vehicle about three blocks east of the shooting scene.The suspects got out of the Hyundai and get into another vehicle, possibly an older-model gray or silver Honda sedan with rust spots, police said.Blood and other evidence was found in the ditched Hyundai, and police said they think one or more of the suspects was wounded when the victims returned fire.The third shooting happened at about 5:12 p.m. in the8400 block of Broadway, about an hour after the Northridge shooting.Police said a man was shot in the arm and the chest in a parking lot. The motive for the shooting is not known.If you have any information on these shootings police urge you to call Crime Stoppers at 713-222-8477.ALSO POPULAR ON KHOU.COMNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.KETK.com | FOX51.comby:Patrick CunninghamNACOGDOCHES, Texas (KETK) – The Nacogdoches man charged with murder for a Sunday morning shooting has confessed to police he is the killer and has been arraigned on more charges, according to Officer Jeff Bridges.Bridges said that Victor Torres, 19, has been charged with four counts of Aggravated Assault with a Deadly Weapon, in addition to his first-degree murder charge. He also revealed that Torres used a .22 caliber semi-automatic rifle during the shooting.He arrived wearing all camouflage and as he fled Torres tossed the gun and the camo in an attempt to throw police off his trail. However, a witness saw him running through a wooded area.Torres shot at five men who were working on a barn in Nacogdoches early Sunday morning. 34-year-old Jose Rojo-Velasco was pronounced dead at the scene. The other four men were able to escape with one still in the hospital.Torres told police that he had an ongoing problem with one of the victims, but Bridges says that investigators can find no concrete evidence of underlying issues.Bridges says that police have not ruled out mistaken identity as a motive for the attacks.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.BRYAN, Texas (KXAN) — In addition to an existing murder charge, the man accused of shooting up a Bryan cabinet business, hurting several people and killing one in the process, is facing more charges.Larry Bollin, 27, was charged with five counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon in addition to an existing murder charge related to the Thursday shooting. If convicted, he could face two to 20 years in prison for each aggravated assault charge and a fine.AUSTIN (KXAN) — More than 20 people from in and around Austin were arrested Thursday on federal drug trafficking charges, according to the Department of Justice.The charges, which include conspiracy to possess with intent to distribute methamphetamine, where handed down in two separate federal grand jury indictments, the DOJ said. Fourteen others connected to the drug crimes were already in custody prior to yesterday's arrests.LUFKIN, Texas (KETK)- Two brothers were detained in Lufkin after one of the men was caught trying to steal a vehicle stereo.The burglary happened at the Deerwood I Apartments in the 100 block of Champions Drive.Follow @KETKBATON ROUGE, La. (WAFB) - First responders were called to the 100 block of Taylor Street where multiple people were injured after a shooting Saturday, Nov. 2.Calls about the shooting went out just after 4 p.m. Saturday.A spokesperson for the Baton Rouge Police Department said three patients suffered non-life-threatening injuries in connection with the shooting. At least one of those patients was able to flee the scene and went to a nearby medical facility after being shot. They were later transported to an emergency room.This is a developing story. Check back for updates.Copyright 2019 WAFB. All rights reserved.Kevin Foster is a Digital Content Producer for WAFB. He writes local, national, breaking and viral news, and copy edits written reports, contributing to digital platforms.844 Government StreetBaton Rouge, LA 70802(225) 383-9999A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MenuDETROIT (WXYZ) — Police are investigating a fatal shooting during an after party in Detroit overnight.Around 4:55 a.m. in the 7000 block of E. Kirby, it is alleged that a suspect entered the location and fired shots into the crowd. A 26-year-old male victim was fatally struck, and four others were shot, according to police.One 20-year-old male victim has been listed in critical, 30-year-old and 21-year-old male victims stable and a 31-year-old female victim also stable, police say.Right now, police believe the deceased victim may have been the target.The shooting remains under investigation.NewsMenuPHOENIX —Five teenagers were shot early Friday morning at a party near 83rd Avenue and Lower Buckeye Road.Officials on scene confirmed that five young people were shot, including two 16-year-old boys.ABC15 crews saw multiple ambulances leaving from a Halloween party at a vacant house after 1 a.m., as well as apparent evidence of a shooting along 86th Lane.Police say someone in a dark-colored, possibly gray, Dodge Charger drove up to the house and began randomly shooting at the party-goers. The vehicle then sped off, headed southbound from the area.Police say one of the 16-year-old boys is in critical condition after the shooting. The other four victims, a 16-year-old boy, an 18-year-old man, 18-year-old woman, and 19-year-old woman, have non-life-threatening injuries.ABC15 learned Friday the vacant house was listed for sale on Opendoor. The company released a statement Friday saying:"Ensuring the safety of our customers, our neighbors, and our communities is one of the most important things we do every day at Opendoor. When Opendoor receives reports of unauthorized or suspicious activity in our homes, we immediately investigate and refer matters to law enforcement when appropriate. We are aware of police activity at an Opendoor home in Phoenix. Police have let us know that this is an open and ongoing investigation, with which we’re fully cooperating."There is no known motive for the shooting and no further information has been released.Anyone who may have information is encouraged to contact the Phoenix Police Department at 602-262-6141 or if individuals with information would like to remain anonymous, they can contact Silent Witness at 480-WITNESS or 480-TESTIGO for Spanish.Report a typoSAN ANGELO — An 18-year-old San Angelo man was arrested in connection to a drive-by shooting at a nightclub in the pre-dawn hours Friday.Around 2:45 a.m. Nov. 1, 2019,San Angelo police responded to a drive-by shootingwith multiple victims at nightclub in the 1600 block of South Chadbourne.The drive-by shooting began when an 18-year-old San Angelo man drove through a nearby parking lot and struck two parked vehicles, according to the release.When bystanders alerted him to what he did, he responded with gunfire.Feature story:How gun violence is changing TexasThree people were injured with gunshot wounds to their lower extremities and transported to the hospital, according to the release. The fourth person was shot in the shoulder and driven to the hospital in a private vehicle before the officers' arrival.The gunshot victims were two 21-year-old men, a 22-year-old man and a 22-year-old woman. The 21-year-old men were treated and released. The other two victims required emergency surgery and are in stable condition, according to the release.Officers found the 18-year-old at a residence in the 700 block of Era Street, according to the release. They also found four firearms, one of which was reported stolen.Anthony Eugene Rodriguez, 18, was arrested around 6:30 a.m. Friday on suspicion of four counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon. He remained in Tom Green County Jail with no bond listed at of 3:51 p.m. Friday.Other charges may be filed, according to the release.Alana Edgin is a journalist covering Crime and Courts in West Texas. Send her a news tip ataedgin@gannett.com. Consider supporting West Texas journalismwith a subscription to GoSanAngelo.com.Four of five men arrested in connection with a shooting that killed five people at a California Halloween party have been freed from custody after prosecutors declined to file criminal charges.ORINDA, Calif. (AP) -The Latest on no charges being filed in California Halloween shooting (all times local):10:20 p.m.Four of five men arrested in connection with a shooting that killed five people at a California Halloween party have been freed from custody after prosecutors declined to file criminal charges.The Contra Costa County district attorney’s office announced it wasn’t charging the five men before the Monday deadline expired but charges could be filed later if more evidence is received. The men were arrested Thursday.The San Francisco Chronicle says jail records Monday night showed that four of the men were no longer in custody.Authorities say rival gang members and people armed with guns were among about 100 people at an Oct. 31 party at an Airbnb rental home in Orinda.___6:39 p.m.Prosecutors say they won’t file criminal charges against five men arrested on suspicion of shooting up a San Francisco Bay Area Halloween party, killing five people.The Contra Costa County district attorney’s office announced Monday that it won’t immediately charge the men.Four men were arrested Thursday on suspicion of murder. The party promoter was arrested on suspicion of being an accessory.They could be released from custody Monday night unless they have warrants.The DA’s office didn’t specify its reasoning but spokesman Scott Alonso says the office couldn’t meet the standard for filing charges by Monday’s deadline. However, charges can be filed later.Alonso says prosecutors will consider any new evidence it receives.Authorities say rival gang members were at the party at an Airbnb rental home in Orinda.3460 Silverbell Rd.Chico, CA 95973 USA(530) 342-0141All content © copyright KHSL. Copyright © 2021 Allen Media Broadcasting, LLC All Rights Reserved. Generated: 2020-12-31 11:00:02pmPHILADELPHIA (CBS) — Neighbors have identified a woman who was amongfour family members killed inside a home in West Philadelphia. Janet Woodson, 51, along with her husband and 17-year-old and 6-year-old sons, were shot to death inside their home on the 5000 block of Walton Avenue.(credit: CBS3)Police say the suspect, Janet’s 29-year-old son Maurice Louis, pulled the trigger and is in custody. Acting Philadelphia Police Commissioner Christine Coulter confirms he has confessed to the killings of Janet and Leslie Woodson, as well as 17-year-old Sayeed and 6-year-old Leslie Jr.“He just obviously had some kind of hatred for family members or in that moment did and made a decision to kill them,” Coulter said.Police say Janet and her family were all shot sometime in the last 24 hours.Neighbors shared her photo while expressing the shocking news of her death.“She texts me every morning. She didn’t text me this morning and I was wondering why,” Bernadine Mills said.Credit: CBS3Police suspect Louis shot his four family members with a shotgun, sources say, was purchased on Tuesday.Those sources say the shooter was lying in wait and shot the victims individually on the first and second floors of the home.Police sources say the suspect suffers from a mental illness.Neighbors say they witnessed warning signs.“I kept saying all summer that something was wrong with him. He went away to school and when he came back he just wasn’t the same. He went to school in Virginia and when he came back he was just out of it, but he would always speak. He would nod his head and say, ‘Hey, ladies,’ and he would just keep going,” Regina Jones said.Officials with the Philadelphia District Attorney’s Office are also on the scene.Police say the incident is domestic related.BALTIMORE (WJZ)–Three people were killed in four separate shootings of each other in northwest Baltimore Monday night and early Tuesday morning.There was a non-fatal shooting earlier in the evening at around 5 p.m., in the 4400 block of Garrison BoulevardAround 7:30 p.m. on Monday, four people wereshotin the 4200 block of Park Heights Avenue.A 25-year-old man was found dead at the scene with a gunshot wound to the head.Police later identified the man as Darius Roary.Three other people, a 26-year-old woman, a 17-year-old boy and a 22-year-old man, suffered non-life-threatening injuries. All three walked into area hospitals.Police are searching for two suspects in that shooting.Later, a 22-year-old woman —  identified as Keiosha Moore — walked into the hospital with a gunshot wound to the chest. She died from her injuries.Police believe she was shot in the 5200 block of Fairlawn Avenue around 7:48 p.m. on Monday. Investigators are looking for an unknown shooter in connection to that case.Monday night, police had originally said they thought she was hurt in the Park Heights shooting.Finally, around 1:06 a.m. Tuesday, police responded to the 4700 block of Liberty Heights Avenue where they found three victims with gunshot wounds.All three were taken to local hospitals. One of them, a 19-year-old man identified as Donell Dixon, later died from his wounds.There’s no word on the condition of the other two victims.Anyone with information on any of these investigations is asked to call Baltimore City police at (410) 396-2100 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP.This post was updated on November 5.Found onOct. 28, 2019at 7:33 p.m.Quadruple shooting; one killedReminder: Police disclosures of homicide information are almost always limited to the block level. Markers in fine-detail or street-level zooms are likely to imply precision that is not actually present.© 2021Baltimore Sun Media Group.

          Data current as ofApril 10, 2021.Credits|Terms of Service|Privacy PolicyDETROIT– Four men were shot on Detroit's east side Sunday night when a gunman opened fire on a crowd of around 40 people, according to officials.The incident occurred near East Outer Drive and Van Dyke.Two of the victims are in critical condition and two are in serious condition, according to officials.Police are searching for the shooter who they think may be driving a Ford Explorer.Copyright 2019 by WDIV ClickOnDetroit - All rights reserved.If you need help with the Public File, call (313) 222-0566.Lansing– One man has been slain and four other people wounded during a shooting at a party at a Lansing home.Lansing police say 22-year-old Tayveon Williams of Jackson died at a hospital following the early Sunday morning shooting.Victims were found inside and outside the home. An 18-year-old Lansing woman and a 22-year-old Jackson man were listed in stable condition at a hospital. A 21-year-old Lansing man and 29-year-old Lansing woman have been treated at hospitals and released.Police say the shooting does not appear to be random. No arrests have been made as of Monday morning.The man arrested and accused ofkilling two people and injuring a half dozen others in a shooting at a Greenville party Oct. 26was released from jail Tuesday, the Hunt County Sheriff's Office says.Sheriff's deputies arrested Brandon Ray Gonzales, 23, Oct. 28, charged him with capital murder of multiple persons and held him on $1 million bond.Tuesday, the sheriff's office released Gonzales and requested the Hunt County District Attorney's Office take no action against him, Hunt County Sheriff Randy Meeks said.The latest news from around North Texas.In a statement, Meeks said the information in the initial probable cause arrest warrant contained credible information and statements given to law enforcement. However, in the days since, the sheriff's office said it has experienced a lack of cooperation from witnesses and discovered exculpatory evidence.Meanwhile, with Gonzales cleared, the question of who killed Byron Craven Jr. and Kevin Berry, and injured six others, remains unanswered.One of Gonzales' attorneys, Andrew W. Wilkerson, said Gonzales would be filing a civil suit against the Hunt County Sheriff's Office. But what the legal team can try to fix in court, won't heal what Gonzales said he felt while he spent nine days in jail."When I heard people come through, as I was in my cell like, 'Hey, that's the shooter, that's the shooter,' it killed me because that's not my image," Gonzales said Tuesday night. "That's not who I am. That's not who I've ever been, and it messed me up."Wilkerson emphasized that the person who carried out the shooting has still not been caught."The killer is still out there," he said. "I think that the sheriff's office thought that they silenced the community with an arrest of whoever they could possibly arrest. What's ironic is, once they find out who the real killer is, it'll prove our case."The shooting happened at about 11:45 p.m. Oct. 26 at an off-campus party at the Party Venue in Greenville. Two people were killed and 12 others injured -- six by gunfire.The party was not sanctioned by nearby Texas A&M University-Commerce.Meeks said on Oct. 28 that Gonzales admitted to attending the party, but did not admit to carrying out the shooting. Tuesday night, Gonzales said he was in his car on Facebook Live when the shooting began and never heard the gunfire.Sheriff's deputies arrested Gonzales the morning of Oct. 28 when he reported to work as a mechanic at a local auto dealer.A probable cause affidavit obtained by NBC 5 said a witness told investigators they saw Gonzales in the restroom of the Party Venue playing dice with a group of people. The witness said within 15 seconds of leaving the restroom, Gonzales pulled a handgun from his waistband and began to shoot.But Wilkerson said four people saw Gonzales in a car in the Party Venue's parking lot at the time of the shooting, and several others caught a glimpse of the shooter long enough to tell authorities it was not Gonzales.Shortly after Gonzales' arrest, his brother defended him to media gathered in the parking lot of the Hunt County Jail."Who is he?" Gabriel Gonzales asked, talking about his older brother. "He's not that person they're making him out to be. That's not him. I know my brother. It's not him."Gonzales said he wrote a letter while he was in jail, and read it in front of cameras Tuesday night.“Lord I know you've put me through many tests and obstacles in my life and I have overcame (sic) and achieved all, so I will do the same with this test. And I will come out and do the right things, as I was. Lord, everything in my life was falling into place. Now I feel like I have been pushed down a cliff, but I know you, Lord. You will throw me a rope to help me back on the cliff. Lord, as I am under this cliff, I ask you to guide my family and friends into the right directions to help us overcome this darkness. Lord, I am your child and I did no such thing, as they are trying to ruin my image on the outside, but even then, while I'm here, I will remain the same kind, humble and loving person because I know I'm coming home.”Both Gonzales' friend, Zach Bowen, and his brother insisted at the time that authorities arrested the wrong person for the shooting. Bowen said Gonzales wore a tactical vest to the party for fashion, but said it did not have bullet shielding plates in it.Despite eight people being killed or injured by gunfire, Meeks said he would not call the incident a mass shooting."I would describe this as a capital murder case, I wouldn't describe it as a mass shooting. We believe one person was targeted and for some unknown reason to us he decided to go ahead and shoot other folks," the Hunt County Sheriff said. "I wouldn't classify that as a mass shooting."The Hunt County Sheriff's Office asked anyone who was at the Party Venue Oct. 26 or has information in relation to the shooting to contact them at 903-408-6800. If a caller wishes to stay anonymous, they can call Hunt County Crime Stoppers at 903-457-2929.KFOR.com Oklahoma Cityby:K. ButcherOne person is dead and three others are injured after a shooting in northwest Oklahoma City.OKLAHOMA CITY (KFOR) – Authorities are releasing more information about a deadly shooting that claimed two lives and injured two others in northwest Oklahoma City.Shortly before midnight on Thursday night, Oklahoma City officers were called to a shooting at a home in the 1900 block of N.W. 12th St.When crews arrived, they realized four people had been shot.Investigators say 33-year-old Ashton Wilson’s body was found inside the home, and 40-year-old Dwan Scott was taken to a local hospital where he later died.Officials say 37-year-old Joe Liles was rushed to a local hospital in critical condition. A female victim was also found at the scene and is currently listed in critical condition.So far, no arrests have been made and the investigation is still ongoing.If you have any information on the shooting, call the Homicide Tip Line at (405) 297-1200.SubmitDEATH VALLEY NATIONAL PARK, Calif. (AP) — An Arizona tourist has died and his wife has been rescued after their vehicle got two flat tires and they went missing in Death Valley National Park in California.The Inyo County Sheriff's Office says searchers on Friday reached 32-year-old Alexander Lofgren and 27-year-old Emily Henkel on a steep ledge in the California desert park.WASHINGTON (AP) — From a secure room in the Capitol on Jan. 6, as rioters pummeled police and vandalized the building, Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand.“Clear the Capitol,” Pence said.(KTVX) -- Millions of vaccine shots have been given across the U.S., and as that number grows, there is the potential for researchers to learn more about how the vaccine affects people's health.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is currently tracking any side effects of receiving the vaccine through a tool called v-safe.SUMTER, S.C. — Four people were shot in Sumter in what the police chief says was 'active shooter' situation where random people were targeted by a lone gunman.Chief Russell Roark spoke late Monday afternoon about the shooting, which they believe was conducted by a one man, identified as 25-year-old Ozzy Alexander Mooneyham, formerly Mindy Mooneyham, at two separate locations: an apartment complex and a tire shop."Make no mistake, this was an active shooter situation," the chief said."The individual was determined to cause chaos and harm to members of our community."According to Roark, the situation began just before 7:30 a.m., when emergency dispatch got a call of shots fired at the Chestnut Pointe Apartments on Roxbury Court. Officers say a man armed with a gun and wearing a camo hat began shooting inside the complex.One woman was hit by gunfire, and went to Palmetto Health Tuomey for treatment. An off-duty deputy was at the complex too and was fired at by the shooter, but was not hurt, investigators said.At 7:45 a.m., Roark said the Mooneyham went to Palmetto Tires on Wesmark Boulevard and started firing at people who were there. The bullets struck one woman and two men. Those victims were also taken to the hospital.Less than five minutes later, two Sumter County deputies pulled over Mooneyham's car on Miller Road, after getting a vehicle description from dispatch. The suspect was taken into custody without incident.Inside the car, officers said they found a .22 caliber rifle with an extended magazine that officers believe he used during the crime.Roark said while Mooneyham did live at the apartment complex, the suspect had no intended targets, either there or at the tire shop."These people were merely minding their own business," he said. "They were just there at the wrong place at the wrong time."The chief also ruled out any idea that this was gang-related. The suspect has no prior criminal history.The chief praised the actions of his officers, which he said may have saved lives. "[The supsect] was intent on causing harm to others."Mooneyham faces seven charges of attempted murder, was well as gun possession charges.News19 spoke to tire store employees who were outside at the time, who say they witnessed the suspect."Got in his car and he backed out just like a normal customer," one employee said. "How did he pick us out randomly? Look at all these places out here and he picked us."One man who works next door to Palmetto Tire says he saw a mechanic, with the auto shop, helping a woman."He was putting pressure on her front and back," says Mark House. "We didn't know she had been shot."House says he was surprised he didn't hear the gunshots."Having somebody shot near you and knowing that it could've been you or your coworkers," says House. "It wouldn't have been so bad if we had heard something. So that we could get into the mindset of 'okay, we need to protect ourselves.'"Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.PORT ARTHUR, Texas — An innocent bystander and mother of two died and three other people were hit in a shooting early Sunday morning.Jasmine Newman, 22, was the area's third person killed in a matter of days.It happened around 2:30 a.m. Sunday, Oct. 20 in the 1100 block of Vicksburg Avenue, Port Arthur Police Sgt. Timothy Dinger said in a news release. Port Arthur Police said the other gunshot victims were taken to the hospital.Investigators said Newman had multiple gunshot wounds and was pronounced dead at the scene."[The] Initial investigation revealed that Jasmine Newman was an innocent bystander in this cowardly act of violence," Port Arthur Police Detective Mike Hebert said in a news release.All of the other gunshot victims were treated and released, police said.This shooting death follows a deadly Friday in which a Port Arthur man was shot and killed around 3:30 p.m. at the Avery Trace Apartments on Hwy. 365 in Port Arthur and 57-year-old Billy Joe Hays of Beaumont was shot to death in the 600 block of Elgie Street just before midnight.It is not known if any of the shootings are related.Police in Beaumont and Port Arthur ask anyone with information to call Southeast Texas Crime Stoppers at 409-833-TIPS (8477).Anyone with information about Sunday's shooting can Port Arthur Police Department at 409-983-8600 and request to speak with Detective Eric Thomason.RELATED:Police looking for suspect after man found shot inside home in Beaumont's South EndRELATED:Port Arthur Police investigating fatal shooting at Avery Trace ApartmentsRELATED:Man stabbed in the chest, found dead near Port Arthur apartmentsRELATED:Beaumont has more violent crimes than Houston per capita, FBI report saysNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Shooting happened around 10:30 p.m. FridayShooting happened around 10:30 p.m. FridaySign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Shooting happened around 10:30 p.m. FridayPolice are searching for two suspects after a man was shot in front of the McDonald's on Wood Street in downtown Pittsburgh on Friday night.Police said the shooting happened just before 10:30 p.m. on Wood Street between Liberty Avenue and 6th Avenue.Officers said the victim, who is in his 20s, was shot in the side and in the leg. Police said he was conscious and told them he had been in an argument with two men on the street when one of them pulled out a gun and shot him.The victim was taken to an area hospital in stable condition.Police said the two suspects fled on foot toward Liberty Avenue.Police continue to investigate.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.KTSM 9 Newsby:Andrea ChaconEL PASO, Texas (KTSM)- A bond hearing has been rescheduled for the teenager suspected of the murder of a Fort Bliss Soldier.As previously reported, Joseph Anthony Rocha, 17, is accused of shooting and killing 21-year-old DeAngelo Merriweather at a house party in the 3800 block of Truman October 19.Court records show Rocha’s bond hearing has been canceled four times for various reasons.Rocha’s defense attorney, Justin Underwood, was expected to present at least one witness at today’s hearing to prove his client acted in self-defense when he fired at Meriweather.Today Underwood says, “I have about nine people that we have met with who are going to give statements to the police department indicating that the deceased in this case, pulled a firearm on my client and his brother and threatened their lives leading to my client responding with deadly force.”Rocha has been in the El Paso County Detention Center on a $3 million dollar bond for Murder since his October arrest.Underwood says he is now working on making his nine witnesses available to give statements to the police department before a judge can make a decision on the case.Rocha is also accused of shooting and injuring Asia Knight, 21; Juan Mata, 18; Kevin Marincuellar, 19; and Markendy Dessources, 22 in the melee.According to records, Rocha fled the scene of the house party and was apprehended after an hours-long SWAT standoff he live-streamed on Facebook.The defense attorney has requested a rescheduling of the bond reduction hearing until sometime next month.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.EL PASO, Texas (KTSM) — Officials with the University of Texas at El Paso are still investigating an unauthorized intrusion in its digital network in early March. The intrusion caused a campus-wide network outage for three days, disrupting access to online services for students, faculty and staff."The University’s investigation is ongoing and we should have more concrete information to share in the next few days," Victor R. Martinez, assistant public information officer at UTEP, shared in an email to KTSM 9 News on Friday.EL PASO, Texas (KTSM) — The El Paso Department of Health reported nine new COVID-related deaths on Saturday. The deaths occurred over a period of nearly nine months.All nine patients had underlying health conditions. They include one man in his 50s, one man and one woman in their 60s, one man and one woman in their 70s, one man and one woman in their 80s and one man and one woman in their 90s.EL PASO, Texas (KTSM) — A girl was taken to a local hospital with life-threatening injuries on Saturday morning after a shooting in Northeast El Paso.According to the El Paso Police Department's Crimes Against Persons Unit, the shooting happened at a residence at the 5200 block of Kodiak Avenue in the Northeast.COLUMBUS, Ohio—Columbus police are investigating a shooting that happened in the Linden area on Tuesday evening.According to police, three teens and a 20-year-old man were shot in the 1600 block of Manchester Avenue around 6:30 p.m.According to victim accounts, all four of the victims were sitting on a porch when two unknown individuals started shooting at them.All four people were taken to the hospital. All victims are listed in stable condition.Police are looking for two male suspects. No further description was given.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.WATCHVIDEOSFamily members speak out after shooting of 6 youths this weekendFour people were shot early Sunday during an incident at a South Main Street bar in Akron’s Firestone Park neighborhood.Akron police officers responding to a shots-fired call about 1:47 a.m. found a woman on the ground outside the establishment bleeding from a gunshot wound to the leg.She was transported by EMS to Summa Akron City Hospital for a nonlife-threatening injury.During investigation of the incident, officers discovered that a fight inside the bar led to the woman getting shot and the shooting of three men in their 20s.All three men were taken to area hospitals by private vehicles.It was not immediately clear if the shootings took place inside or outside the business.Four people were shot early Sunday during an incident at a South Main Street bar in Akron’s Firestone Park neighborhood.Akron police officers responding to a shots-fired call about 1:47 a.m. found a woman on the ground outside the establishment bleeding from a gunshot wound to the leg.She was transported by EMS to Summa Akron City Hospital for a nonlife-threatening injury.During investigation of the incident, officers discovered that a fight inside the bar led to the woman getting shot and the shooting of three men in their 20s.All three men were taken to area hospitals by private vehicles.It was not immediately clear if the shootings took place inside or outside the business.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Akron Beacon Journal  ~ 388 S. Main St. Suite 720 Akron, OH 44311~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKAdvertisementSupported byThe 37-year-old man was among the four people killed at an unlicensed social club in Brooklyn, a police official said on Sunday.ByAshley SouthallChester Goode might have been holding a grudge after a fight last year at an unlicensed social club tucked in a row of townhouses in Brooklyn. Or perhaps he was losing a game of poker and wanted to rob other gamblers at the illicit operation that drew patrons in flashy cars — and complaints from neighbors.Investigators were looking at those possibilities on Sunday to explain what led to a shooting that leftMr. Goode and three others deadaftera gunfight inside the Triple A Aces Private & Social Rental Place in Crown Heights, said a police official, who requested anonymity to discuss an investigation in its early stages.Witnesses told the police that Mr. Goode, 37, pulled a gun inside the club just before 7 a.m. on Saturday and told everyone to get down, the official said. He fired a warning shot into the ceiling, and then turned the gun on fellow gamblers packed into the small space.Before he was shot by a bouncer standing guard, Mr. Goode had killed two of his own acquaintances, the official said.The bouncer, Dominick Wimbush, 47, was shot and killed in the crossfire, as were Terrence Bishop, 36, and John Thomas, 32. All the men lived inBedford-Stuyvesantexcept for Mr. Goode, whose last known address was in Canarsie. It was thesecond quadruple homicidein New York City in a week.Mr. Bishop’s brother, Eddie Baldwin, told reportersgathered at Triple A Aceson Sunday that investigators think Mr. Goode believed he was losing the card game because his competitors were cheating.“The detectives told us a guy at the club was cheated and wanted his money back,” Mr. Baldwin, 35, said.The police said investigators were still trying to pin down a precise motive for the shooting and to figure out how the social club operated. There were no arrests on Sunday, the police said, and it was still unclear whether anyone would be charged with a crime.On Sunday afternoon police tape still hung from the edges of the compact wood frame townhouse at 74 Utica Avenue, less than two blocks from the local precinct, where the shooting occurred. Two uniformed police officers kept watch on the sidewalk as lights flashed from their patrol car parked at the curb.Inside, investigators recovered shell casings indicating that Mr. Goode had fired 15 rounds from a 9-millimeter handgun, the police official said. Mr. Wimbush returned four rounds from a revolver before he was killed. The police said on Saturday that crime-scene investigators recovered both guns.Neighbors had complained the club was a nuisance. The police had been there just once in response to a call for aid, but no crime was reported at the time, the official said.The police chief of patrol, Rodney Harrison, said he was bothered by the fact that the club seemed to be a known problem in the neighborhood, but had not been reported to the police.“I need the community to work with us and stop these operations, because if you don’t, unfortunate things may happen,” Chief Harrison said.On Sunday, the building’s owner, Samuel Revells, stood outside and waited for the police to give him permission to go inside and inspect the damage.Mr. Revells said he had owned the building for more than 20 years and rented it to the operator of the social club for the last two years. But he said he did not know anything about the establishment or any of the people who congregated there.“Let him be the one that speaks on this,” he said of the cluboperator, whose name he refused to share.Mr. Baldwin, Mr. Bishop’s brother, said the killing compounded the grief the family was dealing with after the recent death of their father from cancer. The brothers had planned to meet on Sunday, Mr. Baldwin’s birthday.Instead, he said, he was questioning why his brother had died. “Money has been here before you and been here after you,” he said. “I mean what’s the whole purpose?”On Sunday afternoon, three votive candles and a bow-tied bouquet in plastic wrap sat in the doorway of the apartment building in Bedford-Stuyvesant where the police said Mr. Wimbush lived.“May you find faith and peace in your time of need,” read a handwritten note on the bouquet’s card. Family members entering and leaving the building declined to comment. A neighbor, Eddie Williams, 36, said he knew the slain guard as “Nick,” and said he last saw him, as usual, on Friday getting coffee.“I see him every morning,” Mr. Williams said. “We always have our talk and drink a little coffee, and I never in my life heard nothing bad about Nick.”Sharon Otterman, Sean Piccoli and Nate Schweber contributed reporting.AdvertisementFiled under:‘What I just heard is evil on steroids,’ judge declares after details of the charges against Krysztof Marek are heard in court; Marek faces five counts of first-degree murder.Krysztof Marek pledged that he’d show “no mercy.”During a Saturday evening outburst of gun violence — the likes of which are rarely seen in the city — Marek stayed true to his word, according to Cook County prosecutors.Marek, 66, is charged with five counts of first-degree murder in connection with the shooting rampage that left five people dead in a condo building in the 6700 block of West Irving Park.Cook County Judge John Lyke ordered Marek held without bail during Marek’s bond court appearance Monday. Marek showed little emotion during the hearing, standing next to his attorney and keeping his eyes trained forward.According to Assistant Cook County State’s Attorney James Murphy, the five left dead were: Tsvetanka Kostadinova and her husband Ivaylo Popov, both 43; David Hanik, 61, and his girlfriend Iskra Pourel-Popova, 65, who was Kostadinova’s mother; and Jolanta Topolska, 53, a neighbor who lived in a unit one floor above.RelatedKostadinova, Popov, Hanik and Pourel-Popova were settling down for a family dinner in unit 2D shortly before 5:30 p.m., though they were waiting for a fifth family member to join them, Murphy said. Dinner was on the table.But instead of the last guest, Marek walked into the unit with a .40-caliber handgun and opened fire, killing all four as they were in the kitchen, Murphy said.One floor up, in unit 3C, Topolska was with her son, who walked out the back to door to investigate the commotion while his mother remained on the couch, according to Murphy. The front door of the unit was unlocked.After Topolska’s son left, Marek made his way up the stairs, walked in the front door to 3C and pointed the gun at Topolska, Murphy said. At that moment, her son walked back in, saw his mother being held at gunpoint and ran off. Marek then shot Topolska once in the abdomen.After she was shot, Murphy said, Topolska was able to make her way out the back door of 3C and down a flight of stairs to the second floor. Marek caught up to her by following the blood trail. He shot her once more in the back of the head.Murphy said another witness who lives in the building — an off-duty police officer — saw Marek enter unit 3C with a gun in his hand. The officer saw Marek follow Topolska and “knowing what was about to happen, [the officer] looked away, but then heard a gunshot,” according to the state’s attorney’s office proffer.From there, Marek returned to his unit and put the gun on a coffee table. He walked outside toward Oak Park Avenue and greeted responding officers by telling them, “I think you’re looking for me, I did it,” Murphy said.During a search of Marek’s unit, Murphy said, police found a note taped to his door, written in Polish, that translated to: “No Mercy!!! Remember, whatever s--- they do to you, you control it yourself not them!! Enough!! They have to pay for it!!”Another note in his home, found Sunday, read: “Tomorrow!! No Mercy. Without any stupid hesitation!!! Remember who you are!! Remember what this piece of s--- is doing to you!! Enough!!”According to the proffer, police also found “multiple cryptic letters” in his condo that addressed “issues with his neighbors.”Before ordering Marek held without bail, Lyke said of the state’s attorney’s office proffer: “What I just heard is evil on steroids.”Marek’s public defender said his client has lived in the condo building for the last 25 years and worked more than two decades as a cross-country truck driver. Marek has three adult children and six grandchildren.Officers responded to the same condo building two months before the deadly encounter when Marek was accused of assaulting the son of one shooting victim. Police left without arresting Marek.His neighbors described Marek’s behavior before the shooting as “spooky” and “unstable.”A woman who lives in a neighboring condominium building said the man “was always very friendly” until about six months ago, when his demeanor changed dramatically. The woman, who asked to remain anonymous, said “he snapped.”Court records show that Marek was in deep debt, and that his finances had grown dire in recent years.Records show that Marek had no criminal background before his arrest Saturday.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.PHILADELPHIA (CBS) — Police believe they are searching for two suspects after a shooting left a 22-year-old dead and three others in the Franklinville section of Philadelphia. The shooting happened on the 700 block of West Russel Street just after 3 a.m. Saturday.Police say a 22-year-old man was shot in the hip and the bullet ended up hitting his abdomen. He was transported to an area hospital where he succumbed to his injuries.A woman believed to be in her 50s was shot in the legs, another man was shot in the neck and back, and a teenager was also injured in the shooting. They are all in stable condition.Police say what stands out in this shooting is the fact that some of the shell casings match a military-style rifle. They believe there was two shooters because shell casings from another weapon were also found on the scene.“It looks like about 14 but were still processing the scene,” acting Commissioner Christine Coulter said. ” There’s a vehicle that is shot out on the scene. Looks like they were firing all the way through the block, because the locations the victims were picked up was staggered. It doesn’t necessarily mean they were together at the time of the shooting.”Police tell CBS3 at least one of the victims may have been enjoying a meal when the shots rang out because they found food and alcohol at the scene.An investigation is ongoing.Stay with CBSPhilly.com for updates to this developing story.The barrage of rapid-fire gunshots that killed a 20-year-old man and injured three other people near the Poe Homes public housing complex in West Baltimore on Saturday “sounded like firing practice,” a neighbor said.Homicide detectives in gray suits canvassed the neighborhood Monday after the quadruple shooting, which killed Deontae Taylor just three days after a 30-year-old, Brandon Hill, was shot to death in the same block of West Lexington Street with a gun in his hand, according to Baltimore police.Just as city leaders had begun to hint at a trendof crime slowing, a staggering 17 people were shot — four of them fatally — in Baltimore over one of its most brutal weekends on record.Residents are under no delusions about the pace of the violence.“It’s not like there isn’t going to be another shooting,” said the neighbor, Keya, a 40-year-old woman who declined to give her last name because of safety concerns.Most of the shootings took place Saturday, with 15 people shot, includinga 2-year-old toddler in what police said was a road-rage incident.On Monday,police charged Javon Johnson, 33, with attempted murder, assault and various handgun related charges in the shooting of the young boy, officials said.Saturday’s violence spilled into Sunday, with a 40-year-old man shot to death just before 10 p.m. in the 500 block of Tunbridge Road on the city’s north side. Police found the victim with gunshot wounds to his body, and he died at a hospital, police said.Just before midnight, a 22-year-old man was shot in the back in the 1900 block of W. Mulberry Street on the city’s west side. He was taken to an area hospital for treatment.When it comes to tracking record-setting crime incidents, Baltimore police’s public data is recorded in such a way that makes it difficult to pinpoint the city’s most violent days.But according to police data posted onOpen Baltimore, which contains crime statistics dating back to 2012, the grisly record for most people shot in one day was previously 12 people.In 2016, at least19 people were hurt by gunfirein one weekend. And in 2009, before police published crime statistics online,18 people were struck in multiple shootingsspanning a Sunday night into Monday morning.The violent crime is “sad and incredible sickening," Republican Gov. Larry Hogan said, "especially when innocent children are caught in the middle.”“As I have said repeatedly, enough is enough," Hogan said in a statement. "We will continue working closely with city leaders and urging members of the legislature to do more to get these repeat violent offenders off our streets.”A spokesman for Democratic Mayor Bernard C. “Jack” Young did not respond to a request for comment.City Council President Brandon Scott, a Democrat who is running for mayor, called the weekend’s bloodshed “unacceptable” and said he intends to increase pressure on Baltimore police and Commissioner Michael Harrison to address the violence.“We have to start to push a little harder on how they’re dealing with the violence day to day,” he said.Harrison said in a statement that the men and women of the police department are focused on deterring violent crime in Baltimore.“Prior to this weekend, as I mentioned to the City Council last week, I was encouraged by the overall trends in homicides and shootings over the past several weeks," he said. "I think we all recognize that the issues driving spikes in violence must be addressed by a wide range of people and organizations, not just the police department, in order to make Baltimore the city we all want it to be.”Amid the mounting violence, a poll commissioned by a prominent local pastorfound widespread supportfor the return of crime-fighting surveillance planes above Baltimore.Another mayoral candidate, Thiru Vignarajah, called for the city to resume the surveillance flights at a news conference outside City Hall on Monday.Vignarajah proposed the city sign a memorandum of understanding with plane owner Ross McNutt that ensured the protection of civil liberties by limiting its usage to investigations into homicides, shootings and carjackings; requiring a warrant to obtain the footage; and establishing a civilian oversight board to monitor the program.“We are not solving murders at anything resembling an acceptable rate,” Vignarajah said. “It is time to act. People are fed up and frustrated. How many more lives must we lose before our city politicians hear us say, ‘Enough is enough?’”Vignarajah was joined by former Baltimore NAACP president Marvin “Doc” Cheatham; former City Councilwoman Rochelle “Rikki” Spector; and Victory Swift, mother of Victorious Swift, a 19-year-old Baltimore Design School student and amateur boxerwho was killed in 2017.“Since Victorious was murdered in March 2017, there have been over 800 more homicides and over 2,000 attempted murders in this city,” Swift said.“How can we continue to make weak excuses for the mounting homicides?” she asked, breaking into tears. “If this project can save one police officer’s life, one child’s life, one grandparent’s life, one mother’s son’s life, if it could save your family’s life, what would it be worth?”Derrick Owens, a Mondawmin resident whose wife lives in a unit at the Poe Homes, said the gun violence is a symptom of "our society crying out.”Owens, 51, acknowledged having spent time in prison on various charges, including assault and illegal handgun possession, when he was younger.“I had a nice temper,” he said. “But God gave me control.”Now a part-time roofer, the 51-year-old washes cars and fixes bicycles at the public housing complex in his spare time. He showed off nine different bicycles at his unit on Monday, including children’s bikes decorated with Spider-Man and Elsa from Disney’s “Frozen.”When kids bring Owens a bicycle with a flat tire or broken chain, he tries to gently remind them that their lives are valuable, their choices have consequences and thoughtlessly pulling a trigger is easier than being a peacemaker, he said.“It’s kids getting their brains blew out,” he said. “A bullet don’t know your age.”The people living in the city’s impoverished communities are sick of hearing how bad the crime is, he said. They want to see leaders come to their communities and implement real change.“Stop talking, start walking,” Owens said. “When you want to do something about it instead of talking about it, just do it. At least make an attempt.”James Gaines, 42, another neighbor, said two factors would make an immediate, noticeable difference: offering jobs and re-opening more recreation centers.“Jobs, jobs, jobs,” Gaines said. “Recreation centers and jobs have to be opened up, or it’s not going to stop."The lack of investment in generations of the city’s youth is more harmful than the blighted, vacant homes and ancient infrastructure, Keya said.“When it comes down to it, if they’re not going to invest money in the houses, the streets, these old, corroded pipes," she said, "at least invest it in these kids.”Baltimore Sun reporters Luke Broadwater, Christina Tkacik and data journalist Christine Zhang contributed to this article.RecommendedMenuEASTPOINTE, Mich. (WXYZ) — A man who was shot Saturday morning at a bar in Eastpointe has died, family sources confirmed Tuesday.Jared Alan Glenn, 34, was on life support after being shot in the head at Last Call Bar & Grill in Eastpointe. Witnesses say a suspect, who is now in custody, returned to the bar after being put out and opened fire on people as they were leaving. Glenn was struck in the head when running outside to help a friend, according to witnesses.According to police, 47-year-old Lenny Whitfield was charged with five counts of assault with intent to murder, five counts of felony firearm – second offense, and one count of felon in possession of a firearm. He was arraigned on those charges Tuesday afternoon.Jared not only donated his organs, he also donated his tissue to help#WilliamsSyndromeresearch. Here's a close family friend, who works for@TheWSA, an organization Jared was very involved with as well@wxyzdetroitpic.twitter.com/s5eZ0z9feSFamily and friends of Glenn gathered Sunday to pray for his recovery. Unfortunately, late Tuesday, sources told 7 Action News that the 34-year-old had died.No further details have been released.Eastpointe police are still looking to get in contact with an acquaintance of the suspect. The man, who is being described by police as a person of interest, was with the shooter at the bar Saturday evening, according to witnesses. That man may have even left with the suspect.NewsGet the best experience and stay connected to your community with our Spectrum News app.Learn MoreGet the best experience and stay connected to your community with our Spectrum News app.Learn MoreContinue in BrowserBRANDON, Fla.— Hillsborough County authorities are searching for suspects in a double homicide that happened at an east Tampa mobile home park.According to the sheriff's office, deputies were called to the Carousel Mobile Home Park at 5410 N Falkenburg Road just after 1 a.m.Once they arrived, deputies found a man dead in a common area of the mobile home park. They located another man dead inside one of the mobile homes.Inside the same mobile home was a female in her 60s with a gunshot wound. She was transported to a local hospital where she is alert and talking to detectives.A fourth victim, who is a male in his 20s, was also transported to the hospital with a gunshot wound. Both the female and male are in critical but stable condition.Several people were believed to be inside the mobile home when the shooting occurred. The female victim is the only known resident of the home.Resident Rafael Martinez said he heard five to six shots. He lives next door to the mobile home that was shot up."My window was right there. I didn't even want to look out because of the sound. It was right there. I didn't see anything but I heard everything," Martinez said.Detectives are currently searching for suspects, conducting interviews with witnesses and preparing a search warrant in order to enter the mobile home and collect additional evidence.There does not appear to be any risk to the public or other residents living within the area.The names of the victims have not been released.Anyone with information related to this incident is asked to contact the Hillsborough County Sheriff's Office at 813-247-8200.In order to be eligible for a cash reward, call Crime Stoppers at 1-800-873-TIPS (8477), report anonymously online atwww.crimestopperstb.comor send a mobile tip using our P3 Tips Mobile application, which is a free download for all cell phones.You must call Crime Stoppers first to be eligible for a reward.&amp;amp;nbsp;PHILADELPHIA (CBS)– Five men were shot overnight at a courtyard in Queen Village. It all happened in the middle of what police believe was a game of dice.Police tell Eyewitness News a car pulled up on the street on the 900 block of South 5th Street, just before midnight Thursday, where the driver and a passenger got out and began firing into a courtyard. At least 17 rounds were fired, according to police.Philadelphia Police Commissioner Christine Coulter says the preliminary information is that the people initially being shot at were playing a game of dice when it all started.“The people at the hospital just said they were gambling when someone pulled up and started shooting,” Coulter said. “They didn’t say that there was anything that precipitated in anything that happened earlier in the night. According to the video, it doesn’t look like there is any confrontation. They just report that they get out of the vehicle and start shooting.”The five gunshot victims range in age from 19 to 57. All are in stable condition.A neighbor says the people involved in that dice game play all the time.Police have yet to determine what sort of role that may have had in connection to the shootings.CBS3’s Dan Koob contributed to this report.Five students at a Lowell elementary school were shot by BB guns Wednesday afternoon, and police are looking for two suspects, authorities said.Two of the children were injured and taken by ambulance from the Greenhalge School Elementary School to a local hospital, according to a statement from Lowell police.The extent of their injuries was not released. Their conditions were not known.Officers responded to the school on Ennell Street at 1:34 p.m. for a report of students shot by BB guns, the statement said.They were told three Asian males were circling the school on bicycles, and two entered the school playground with BB guns and randomly shot at the students, who were part of an after-school program, the statement said.AdvertisementNo further information was immediately available Wednesday night.Jordan Frias can be reached atjordan.frias@globe.com.Digital AccessHome DeliveryGift SubscriptionsLog InManage My AccountCustomer ServiceHelp & FAQsGlobe NewsroomAdvertiseNewslettersView the ePaperOrder Back IssuesNews in EducationSearch the ArchivesPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceTerms of PurchaseWork at Boston Globe MediaA man was killed in a quadruple shooting in West Baltimore Wednesday, and another was killed in a separate shooting in the city Thursday, police said.A 24-year-old man was pronounced dead in the quadruple shooting about 10:15 p.m. in the 1700 block of W. North Ave. on the city’s west side that also injured a 15-year-old boy, a 39-year-old woman, and another 24-year-old man, according to Baltimore police spokesman detective Jeremy Silbert.The homicide victim was declared dead at the scene; the other victims’ injuries were not expected to be life-threatening, police said. The woman was shot in the leg, the other 24-year-old was shot in the lower back, and the 15-year-old, who turned up at a hospital shortly afterward, was shot in the stomach, Silbert said.None of the victims were identified, and the motive for the shooting remains under investigation.A giant wad of balled-up crime scene tape remained on the sidewalk, and a police patrol car idled on the block on Thursday.Down the street, Carlos Porcher, who owns North & Carey Convenience Store, shook his head in disgust at the violence as $1.25 hot dogs and $2.50 hamburgers sizzled on the charcoal grill outside his store.More investment is needed in the city’s underserved neighborhoods, he said, where rampant drugs outnumber legitimate job opportunities by a wide margin, and violence inevitably follows.One of the first shootingsafter the riot following the death in 2015 of Freddie Gray of injuries suffered in police custody happened just outside his store.“If there wasn’t no drugs,” he said, “there wouldn’t be no shootings.”He described the situation of many West Baltimore residents as that of “crabs in a barrel.”“Nobody’s helping nobody," he said. “Drugs run everything.”A 52-year-old woman who works nearby but declined to give her name out of fear for her safety gazed out at the construction work happening on North Avenue while she took a drag on a cigarette.“This, right here, is what needs fixing,” she said, gesturing around at the vacant homes and businesses along the blighted block . “There’s got to be something they can do.”She said she was not surprised by the quadruple shooting near her workplace.“How does it get better?” she wondered aloud. “What’s going to become of these young people? Most of them aren’t even 21 years old. They don’t know anything else to do.”A man who lives on Fulton Avenue nearby but also declined to give his name, said he was picking up Chinese food from a nearby carryout when he saw a light-colored car turn onto North Avenue, then back up toward the victims and unleash a barrage of as many as 10 gunshots.“It was five, and then another five,” he said.Police were called to a hospital more than an hour later, about 11:30 p.m., to interview a 28-year-old man who had been shot in the 5700 block of Chinquapin Parkway in the Glen Oaks neighborhood of North Baltimore, police said.A man was killed in one of a pair of separate shootings in East Baltimore Thursday morning.Officers responded to a ShotSpotter alert just before 9:30 a.m. in the 1900 block of Oakhill Ave., where the homicide victim had been shot, police said. The victim was taken to a hospital, where he died. Police did not release the victim’s age.A 35-year-old man was shot in the hand just after 11:30 a.m. in the 1500 block of North Broadway, police said.Anyone with any information in any of these shootings may call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP.RecommendedA family of five found fatally shot in their Abington home Monday were killed in a murder-suicide, prosecutors said Wednesday.In a statement, Plymouth District Attorney Timothy J. Cruz said the state medical examiner’s office had determined that Deirdre Zaccardi, 40, and her three children — 11-year-old Alexis and 9-year-old twins, Nathaniel and Kathryn — died from “shooting by firearm and the manner of the deaths were determined to be homicide.”Deirdre’s husband, Joseph Zaccardi, 43, died by suicide from a gunshot wound, according to the medical examiner’s office.State and local police are investigating the killings. Investigators haven’t commented on a potential motive.AdvertisementThe grim announcement came as friends of the family continued to grieve the tragic loss. On Facebook, Sarah Gregonis Wall of Whitman posted a photograph of a smiling Deirdre Zaccardi standing with other members of Keeping Pace with Multiple Miracles, a support group for parents with multi-birth children.“There’s a photo that keeps coming up in our memories with Deirdre,” Wall wrote. “It is a picture of all of my KPMM moms surrounding me after they came to see me play M’Lynn in ‘Steel Magnolias.’ ”“This morning we prayed together as a sisterhood and while the why’s are plaguing us, we are choosing to lift each other up and focus our prayers on comfort, peace, and healing. I keep hearing Deirdre’s laugh. It’s my go-to right now. I choose to hear her joy ringing in my ears. We promise you, Deirdre, we won’t stop laughing. It just might take some time before it can truly happen.”In an interview, Wall said she often told a mutual friend, “ ‘I just wish I could be more like Deirdre.’ She was so unapologetically herself. She just had this way about her.. . .  She was full of humor and sarcasm, and I just keep hearing her laugh.”AdvertisementShe recalled Zaccardi as “an incredible advocate for her children and for the school district” who was active in School Committee issues and parent-teacher groups.“If you needed something, she wouldn’t even bat an eyelash,” Wall said. “She would be there in a heartbeat.”Wall, a mother of two sets of twins, said she often turned to Zaccardi for advice because her twins were older.“I really looked up to her in that way,” Wall said.A memorial at the crime scene has swelled to include a number of flower bouquets and stuffed animals, according to footage that WCVB-TV tweeted Wednesday. A handwritten note left at the memorial says, “I love the family. I’m going to miss you guys forever. I will never forget you guys.”On Wednesday, a number of people responded to Wall’s Facebook post, including one woman who wrote, “I‘m struggling today with the Why’s but I won’t anymore. I will focus on her holding my babies and all the babies of KPMM that she loved on as her own.”Travis Andersen can be reached attravis.andersen@globe.com. Follow him on Twitter@TAGlobe.Digital AccessHome DeliveryGift SubscriptionsLog InManage My AccountCustomer ServiceHelp & FAQsGlobe NewsroomAdvertiseNewslettersView the ePaperOrder Back IssuesNews in EducationSearch the ArchivesPrivacy PolicyTerms of ServiceTerms of PurchaseWork at Boston Globe MediaWANE 15by:Web DeskEVANSVILLE, Ind. (AP) — A southwestern Indiana man convicted of shooting five people last year outside an American Legion post has been sentenced to 43 years in prison for the attack.Keymo Johnson, 38, was sentenced Monday in the shooting, which authorities said came shortly after the Evansville man got into a fight with one of the later shooting victims inside the American Legion post’s bar, theEvansville Courier & Pressreported.ADVERTISEMENTA Vanderburgh Countyjury convicted Johnson in Novemberon six felony counts, including aggravated battery and battery by means of a deadly weapon, and two misdemeanors in the shooting early on Oct. 6, 2019, at the legion hall near downtown Evansville.Prosecutors said Johnson was told to leave the Legion post’s bar after he got into a fight with one of the people he later shot. He was in the post’s parking lot when that person exited the bar with several others and Johnson allegedly drew a gun from his waistband and began firing.Five people were wounded, with three of them suffering serious injuries. The two others had minor injuries and refused medical care.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.FORT WAYNE, Ind. (WANE) - Save the date for April 24, the Sister Cities International Gala is happening virtually. Throughout the event there will be entertainment, a silent auction, and a greeting from Mayor Tom Henry.Gala tickets are $100 and with that you will receive a Sister Cities cookbook with authentic recipes from Japan, Germany, and more.CHICAGO (NewsNationNow) – One mom's battle with picky eaters won her millions of views and followers on social media.Meet Jessica Woo, a normal mom who went viral on TikTok for creating bento box lunches for her children. She told NewsNation's Nichole Berlie that she wanted to foster good memories for her kids by creating the boxed lunches.LOS ANGELES (AP) — Los Angeles County plans to return prime beachfront property to descendants of a Black couple who built a seaside resort for African Americans but suffered racist harassment and were stripped of it by local city leaders a century ago, a county official said Friday.“It is the county’s intention to return this property,” Janice Hahn, a member of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors, told a news conference at what was known as Bruce’s Beach in the city of Manhattan Beach.MenuADAMS COUNTY, Colo. – Four people were shot and taken to hospitals in Adams County early Sunday morning, officials said.Sheriff's deputies responded about 1:45 a.m. to a home in the 7100 block of Ruth Way, where shots fired had been reported.Upon arrival, deputies said they encountered over a hundred people fleeing from a large gathering at a residence.Deputies found that four people had been shot — two of the victims sustained life-threatening injuries, according to the sheriff's office.Deputies said a preliminary investigation revealed that the shots were fired after an argument or several arguments broke out.Detectives are currently interviewing witnesses, victims and others. The investigation is preliminary and ongoing, the sheriff's office said.Authorities are asking anyone with information about the incident to call Crime Stoppers at 720-913-STOP.KSNT NewsKANSAS CITY, Kan. (WDAF) — The man police say is responsible in part for the mass shooting at Tequila KC on October 6 has been captured.Hugo Villanueva-Morales was arrested Thursday. He is one of two men charged in the shooting, which killed four people and injured five more. The other, Javier Alatorre, wasarrested right after the shootingat 26th and Quincy in Kansas City, Missouri.Police have been actively searching for Villanueva-Morales since the shooting. Large-scaleraids on two KCK homes turned up emptyon Oct. 8.Investigations revealed that an earlier dispute occurred inside the bar which later led to the shooting. The suspects were armed with handguns and fled the scene, according to police.This is an ongoing story and will be updated as more information is confirmed.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.OVERLAND PARK, Kan. (WDAF) — The old Kanza Hall at One Block South in Overland Park has a new purpose.It’s the third largest esports arena in the nation and the only one with a dedicated education program. The 15,000-square-foot facility has 100 gaming computers and consoles.BERRYTON, Kan. (KSNT) - Terry Clay, of Berryton, and Prestige Contracting Services LLC., has been banned from doing business in Kansas.Clay has been banned for business transactions and violations of the Kansas Consumer Protection Act Attorney General Derek Schmidt said Friday.VALLEY CENTER, Kan. (KSNW) - Staying with the status quo, Kansas' Valley Center Schools USD 262 will be keeping their COVID protocols in place, despite a parent's complaint.The school board met Thursday night for a quick and unanimous vote in favor of keeping masks and social distancing in place.FOX 2by:Jasmine HudaST. LOUIS – A family is asking for prayers after a St. Louis police officer was shot while attending a high school reunion.Detective Shawn Cleveland, 28, was among five people shot when a fight broke out at Normandy High School in early October.“He looked at his mom and said, ‘I’ve been shot.’ Because she was there, probably about 10 feet away from him,” said Michael Cleveland, the detective’s father.Cleveland’s son was trying to break up a fight, but his calls were ignored.Shots rang out and he was shot. The bullet went through Det. Cleveland’s chest, and exited his back, his father said.“I stopped and I prayed to the Lord before I even walked out of the house. And I said, ‘Lord, this is in your hands. And please help my son. Save my son’s life,’” his father said.The father’s prayers were answered. Detective Cleveland survived. Recovery has been slow but the response has been immediate.“How they’ve looked after my son. How they’ve called on him, how they’ve made errands on him, and how they’ve also checked on the family. It’s outstanding. Chief Hayden was there the night of. Captain Moore was there the night of,” Michael Cleveland said.Michael Cleveland said he is grateful for the extended family from the department, as well as the one at the family’s Florissant church, where he is a pastor.“Our relationship with Jesus Christ as our Lord and savior has been the anchor during this whole time,” Cleveland said. “It allows us to forgive the perpetrator who shot our son. It allows us to have hope for our son going forward. And being there for him. It also allows us to see things through a wider lens.”It is unclear when Detective Cleveland will return to work. His family said he can walk and handle basic tasks, but it is too early to say whether he is ready to return.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.CBS17.comby:CBS 17 Digital DeskROXBORO, N.C. (WNCN) – A 36-year-old Roxboro man was killed and three others were injured in what police say was a “senseless act.”“The senseless act of this shooting left a couple of people suffering from critical injuries.  It is heartbreaking to tell you one person died on the scene from this shooting,” Police Chief David Hess said.Hess said officers were called to Foushee Street around 8:30 p.m. on Thursday in reference to a shooting.Responding officers found the body of Edgar Dewayne Yancey at the scene. Yancey had been shot multiple times, police said.Two other shooting victims were also at the scene.Terry Yellock Junior, 33, and H.T. Bass, 66, were transported to Duke University Hospital for their injuries.One of the victims is in stable condition and the other was treated and released.A fourth victim,  Shawn Shewdel Satterfield, later went to Person Memorial Hospital for treatment of a gunshot wound. He was later released.No one has been arrested and no suspect information was released.Police are working to determine if there were multiple
shooters involved and if the victims knew the who shot them.  Police are asking anyone with information in
this case contact the police department at 336-599-8345.More headlines from CBS17.com:Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.RALEIGH, NC -- People are packing the North Carolina State Fairgrounds looking to cure a common side effect of the pandemic with the return of the Southern Ideal Home Show."We've all been sitting home for the past year looking at our houses seeing all of the different things we'd like to fix," said Tina Robinson, manager of the Southern Ideal Home Show.DURHAM, N.C (WNCN) - An investigation is underway following an early morning shooting at Waffle House located in the 1600 block of TW Alexander Drive.Authorities say a woman was injured in the shooting. She was transported to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.DURHAM, N.C. (WNCN) -- Recently, grassroots political organization, Durham For All, sent a letter to Durham City Council.In it, was a demand for change.FOX 4 Kansas City WDAF-TV | News, Weather, Sportsby:Karra SmallMARSHALL, Mo. — The manhunt for a suspect wanted in connection with two shootings that injured four people and killed one in Saline County has been captured in Mississippi.Terrelle Palmer is in custody in Mississippi, according to the Marshall Police Department.Palmer is a suspect in two shootings that happened in Marshall where four people were shot, and one was killed.The first shooting happened just after 11 a.m. Oct. 3 at a house on South Olson Avenue. The second shooting happened at about 12:15 p.m. at a house on West Vest Street.52-year-old Calvin Bosley was killed and three others were wounded.Palmer is awaiting an extradition hearing to determine if he will be taken back to Missouri.SubmitOLATHE, Kan. -- The Olathe Police Department is asking the public help finding 14-year-old, Kimberlinn Max Chadwick.  Kimberlinn is approximately five feet and seven inches tall, she weighs 140 pounds, with brown hair, and brown eyes.She was last seen in Kansas City, Missouri on Saturday morning about 7 a.m.  She was wearing a dark colored hooded shirt, black pants, and black and clear slide style sandals.KANSAS CITY, Mo. -- A standoff with police ended just before 1:30 p.m. when the suspect surrendered to police without further incident.  The kids that were in the house with the shooting suspect were rescued by police.  After the kids were rescued the suspect remained in the house and continued to fire shots at officers."The officers and commanders involved in this incident showed tremendous bravery and professionalism.  The suspect was taken into custody without further violence," Police spokesman David  Jackson said.HARRISONVILLE, Mo. -- Day 6 of the Kylr Yust trial is expected to continue with testimony.On day 5, prosecutors moved into the timeline after Jessica Runions was last seen through witnesses' testimony and evidence. Jessep Carter's wife, Crystal Taylor, testified that Yust summoned her husband up to Raytown in early September 2016 and recounted the hours up until Kylr Yust was arrested.FOX 2by:Derrion HendersonST. LOUIS, Mo. – St. Louis police are searching for a suspect in an late night shooting along the riverfront that left two men hospitalized.When officers arrived, they found a 23-year-old man just after 11:30 p.m. at the intersection of Leonor K. Sullivan Boulevard and Poplar Street suffering from a gunshot wound to the abdomen.The victim told investigators he was standing on Leonor K. Sullivan with three other men when two cars approached and fired gunshots into the crowd. All four men were wounded.The other victims, two 27-year-olds and a 26-year-old, left and went to a local hospital before police arrived.Anyone who might have seen or heard something or has information about the case is asked to call the St. Louis Metropolitan Police Department at 314-444-5371.Violent night downtown St Louis near the riverfront— multiple people shot —details on Fox2 News In the morning starting at 4am.pic.twitter.com/kfSC6jF9tQ— FOX 2 Rogue Runner (@RogueRunnerSTL)October 2, 2019SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.One man was killed and three others injured when a man opened fire at a family party early Sunday morning at a home in Round Lake Park.Courtesy of Round Lake Park PoliceOne man is dead and three others injured after gunfire erupted early Sunday morning during a family gathering in Round Lake Park, police said.Two of men shot are hospitalized in critical condition, Round Lake Park Police Chief George Filenko said. Another is being treated for a nonlife-threatening wound.Nobody is in custody, but Round Lake Park police and the Lake County Major Crime Task Force are pursuing several leads, Filenko said.The identity of the man fatally shot has not be disclosed. The Lake County Coroner's Office will conduct an autopsy Monday.The shooting occurred about 1:15 a.m. at a home in the 500 block of Fairlawn Avenue, authorities said. According to police, a family was hosting a party when people the hosts did not know arrived and were turned away.A short time later, a man opened fire outside from the home's driveway."The man then entered the home through a back entrance into a kitchen area, where the shootings (of the four men) took place," Filenko said.The shooting sent several others inside the home scrambling for cover. A former school employee attending the party ushered guests into a closet for safety, as if she were leading a school shooting drill, Filenko said.Authorities have not released a description of the suspected shooter.Police had no prior complaints about the home or its residents before Sunday morning's shooting, Filenko said.MILWAUKEE -- Four women were being treated for injuries following a house party shooting near 29th and Cherry early Sunday, Sept. 29.According to police, the victims were 18, 19, 19 and 23 years of age. The women were attending a house party when multiple shots were fired into the residence, striking the victims.The women were taken to the hospital for treatment.Police were seeking the shooter.Shooting near 29th and CherryShooting near 29th and CherryThis material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsThe Barton County Sheriff's Office investigates a disturbance where someone fired a shotgun round into a crowd.The sheriff's office says no one suffered serious injures, but at least four people were struck by birdshot in the early-Sunday-morning call at a residence in the 1500 block of Northeast 100th Road, near Claflin.At about 2:35 a.m. Sunday, deputies responded to a report of shots fired at a group of people."Initial investigation indicates there was a disturbance at the residence during a social gathering," the sheriff's office says. "During the course of the disturbance, at least one round from a handgun was fired into the air."The sheriff's office says the person who fired at least one round into the air left the area, but returned a short time later."It was at this point an occupant of (a) vehicle fired a shotgun round into the crowd," the sheriff's office says.The sheriff's office identified possible suspects and says arrests are pending further investigation.BEAUMONT, Texas — As he was dying, one of four men shot and killed on Sunday identified the suspected shooter to a Beaumont Police officer, according to newly obtained court documents.In the probable cause affidavit obtained by 12News, a Beaumont patrol officer reported hearing shots fired while on patrol in the 4100 block of Highland Ave. at 12:10 p.m. Sunday.When the officer walked up the stairs to the apartment, he said he could hear someone moaning from inside, according to the affidavit.The officer found four men shot inside a bedroom of the apartment -- Bobby Wyatt, 39, Shannon Sutton, 23, Alvin Lee Bellard, 32, and Elijah Rideau, 33.Police say Sutton and Bellard were pronounced dead at the scene. Wyatt and Rideau were still hanging on to life.The police officer who entered the apartment asked Rideau who shot him. Rideau responded, "Lively," in what police described as a "dying declaration" in the affidavit.Lively James Stratton, a 22-year-old Beaumont man, was arrested and charged with four counts of murder. His bond is set at $4 million, $1 million per victim, Beaumont Police Officer Carol Riley said.Beaumont Police originally referenced Stratton as a person of interest in the case.As detectives investigated, witnesses told them that Stratton had been at the apartment before the shooting and had been having problems with the victims.Witnesses told police that Stratton had been threatening the men in the apartment and even some witnesses at the scene.History of ProblemsThe apartment is no stranger to police, according to BPD call data obtained by 12News.The call logs show that Beaumont Police had nine calls for service before the quadruple shooting on September 29. Among the most serious calls to police was one for shots fired on Oct. 5, 2018.The log also shows three calls reporting disturbances on Aug. 17, 2018, Feb. 8, 2018, and on June 9, 2019. There were also two thefts reported on April 12, 2018 and June 9, 2019.Officer Riley said that Stratton lived with the four men and shots were fired as a result of a disturbance between the roommates.However, the owner of the apartment complex, who asked to remain anonymous, told 12News that only Rideau and Stratton were listed on the lease. The complex's owner said he is not sure why the other men were apparently living there."I just want him back"Shannon Sutton's mother, Roslyn Sutton, spoke to 12News about her son."He's not here. I'm just so hurt," she said.He was the youngest victim in Sunday's deadly shooting at just 23 years old.His family said he would have turned 24 on Tuesday."Like right now, he would probably want to see me smiling, but it hurts cause he is not here. He was young," said Sutton's sister Nagee Sutton.Sutton fought back tears telling 12News about the moments she found out her brother was one of the victims."When they said it might have looked like a body like him, my heart dropped because he didn't answer the phone. And when they came out and told me, I just kept thinking he wasn't there but he was there," said Nagee Sutton.Shannon Sutton leaves behind a young daughter.Roslyn said his legacy will now live on through her."She is just 3 years old. My son didn't get a chance to see her grow up. It's just hard, It's just hard," said Roslyn Sutton."It's just really hard for the community and my heart really goes out to their family," neighbor Cynthia Flowers said."We all just need to come as a community, we all need to come together and just stop the violence," Beaumont resident Tonya Frank said. "We have children growing up here in this world."Usually, Beaumont Police Department sees a decrease in violent crimes after a natural disaster, Riley said."After Hurricane Harvey and the flooding then, people were just busy taking care of each other," she said. "This is sad. People don't realize that this is just adding so much misery to people who have lost so much."RELATED:'I just want him back,' Mother, sister speak of youngest victim killed in Sunday's quadruple homicideRELATED:Daughter charged in murder of former Mid County restaurant owner, Port Arthur Police investigatingCRIME STOPPERS |Submit a tip @ 833Tips.comIf you have information about this crime you could earn a cash reward of up to $1000 by providing an ANONYMOUS tip to Crime Stoppers of Southeast Texas.Call 833-TIPS (8477) or text “BMT” followed by your tip information to CRIMES (274637) from your mobile phone.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Filed under:They were walking in the 2000 block of South Hoyne Avenue when they were shot, police said.A teenage boy was killed and three other people were wounded Tuesday in a shooting in Heart of Chicago on the Southwest Side.They were walking about 8:26 p.m. in the 2000 block of South Hoyne Avenue when they were struck by gunfire, Chicago police said.Gino Abasta, 17, was shot in the groin and pronounced dead at Stroger Hospital, police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said.  He lived in the same neighborhood he was shot.An autopsy released Wednesday ruled Abasta’s death a homicide, the medical examiner’s office said.An 18-year-old man was hit in the leg, and his condition was stabilized at Stroger Hospital, police said. A 25-year-old man who was shot in the arm and leg had his condition stabilized at the same hospital, police said.An 18-year-old man was taken to Mt. Sinai Hospital in critical condition with two gunshot wounds to the chest, police said.Area Central detectives are investigating.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Michael Sherrod SmithA 35-year-old man tossed a gun while running from U.S. Marshals Service task force members Tuesday in Oakland, California, who arrested him on charges alleging he killed a Gary police officer's son and another man last year in Gary, officials said.Michael Sherrod Smith, who had an address in Gary as recently as June 2019, was wanted on two counts of murder and two counts of attempted murder, said Inspector Nicolas Gonzalez, of the U.S. Marshals Service Great Lakes Regional Fugitive Task Force.Smith is accused offiring a semi-automatic pistol into a vehicle occupied by Kerry Rice Jr., 32, Aaron Scott, 30, a third man and a woman Sept. 23near the 1600 block of Connecticut Street.Rice, the son of Gary police Sgt. Kerry Rice Sr., and Scott were killed. The other two people, including Kerry Rice Jr.'s brother Steven Rice, suffered gunshot wounds, police said.Sgt. Rice lost a second son July 1, when Steven Rice, 30, was fatally shot in the area of Cleveland Street and 15th Avenue, records show.Smith was arrested Tuesday by the U.S. Marshals Pacific Southwest Fugitive Task Force after leaving a home in Oakland, Gonzalez said. When investigators approached him, he ran and discarded a firearm.Smith was safely arrested and the gun was recovered, he said. Smith will face extradition proceedings in a California court before being brought before a Lake Criminal Court judge.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Lake County Courts and Social Justice ReporterSarah covers crime, courts and public safety. She began her career at The Times in 2004. Contact her at sarah.reese@nwi.com or 219-933-3351.Here's a look at some of The Times' most-read stories from yesterday.Police responded to two shootings Wednesday, including one that took the life of a Gary man.Police responded to two shootings Wednesday, including one that took the life of a Gary man.GARY — A shooting early Monday claimed the life of a city police officer's son and another man and wounded two other people, officials said.President Trump announced he will send federal agents to Chicago and Albuquerque, New Mexico, expanding the administration’s intervention into local enforcement as he runs for reelection under a “law and order” mantle.President Trump announced he will send federal agents to Chicago and Albuquerque, New Mexico, expanding the administration’s intervention into local enforcement as he runs for reelection under a “law and order” mantle.The man told police he was sitting in the passenger seat on his phone when he heard a loud pop and saw he shot himself, records state.The man told police he was sitting in the passenger seat on his phone when he heard a loud pop and saw he shot himself, records state.Darryl A. Fields Jr., 35, has been charged with attempted murder and aggravated battery among others in connection to the shooting.Darryl A. Fields Jr., 35, has been charged with attempted murder and aggravated battery among others in connection to the shooting.A 27-year-old Merrillville man is accused of firing a gun at a motorist during a road rage incident on Tuesday along Interstate 80 near Illinois Route 394.A 27-year-old Merrillville man is accused of firing a gun at a motorist during a road rage incident on Tuesday along Interstate 80 near Illinois Route 394.Lake Criminal Court Judge Salvador Vasquez canceled a trial, scheduled to begin this week, for Michael Sherrod Smith, 35, of Gary, after the state dropped the charges earlier this month.Lake Criminal Court Judge Salvador Vasquez canceled a trial, scheduled to begin this week, for Michael Sherrod Smith, 35, of Gary, after the state dropped the charges earlier this month.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Four people were shot at the intersection of Poland and St. Claude avenues on Saturday morning, bringing the total number of New Orleans shooting victims to 11 in less than 24 hours.The medical conditions of the four victims wasn't released.According to the New Orleans Police Department, the shooting started as a rolling gun fight between two cars. A gray Pontiac, the car containing the victims, eventually crashed at the corner of St. Claude Avenue and North Rampart Street.Last night, one person was fatally shot in the Pines Village neighborhood of New Orleans East, and six, including five juveniles, were shot at City Park Ave. with one fatality.A 17-year-old was killed Friday night on City Park Avenue when the car he was riding in with friends was struck by a hail of bullets that also…Six people, including five teenagers, were shot Friday evening at the intersection of Canal Boulevard and City Park Avenue. One of the teens was killed.Six people, including five teenagers, were shot Friday evening at the intersection of Canal Boulevard and City Park Avenue. One of the teens was killed.The investigation is ongoing, and this story is developing.A particularly violent weekend in New Orleans bled into Monday, when a man was shot to death in Mid-City and two others were wounded in a sepa…© Copyright 2021NOLA.com, 840 St. Charles Avenue New Orleans, LA |Terms of Use|Privacy PolicyPowered byBLOX Content Management SystemfromTownNews.com.LANCASTER COUNTY, S.C. — A man wanted in connection with a Lancaster nightclub shooting that killed two people and wounded eight others earlier this month has been arrested in Florida, deputies announced Monday.Breante Deon Stevens was taken into custody on September 29 and charged with murder for the September 21 killings of 39-year-old Henry Lee Colvin and 38-year-old Aaron Harris outside the Ole Skool Sports Bar & Grill.Stevens waived extradition on October 10 and was brought to Lancaster County where he was denied bond.Eight other people were shot, four of whom were airlifted to Atrium Health's Carolilnas Medical Center in Charlotte for treatment.Stevens was arrested in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, according to the Lancaster County Sheriff's Office. He will appear before a judge to decide whether to waive extradition to South Carolina. It is unclear when he will be returned to South Carolina.“We are pleased Stevens is in custody and look forward to having him back in Lancaster County to face his charges,” said Sheriff Buddy Faile.  “His arrest is the culmination of non-stop efforts and cooperation among multiple law enforcement agencies.  I want to thank our investigators and agents and officers of SLED, the Florida Department of Law Enforcement, the Broward County Sheriff’s Office, and the United States Marshals Service.  Although Stevens is in custody, the investigation continues.”On Friday, deputies announced the arrest of 30-year-old Antonia Emmanuel Champion in relation to the shooting. Champion is facing several charges, including two counts of murder and one count of possession of a firearm during the commission of a violent crime.Champion remained in the York County Detention Center on a probation violation charge.Anyone with information on the case is asked to call the Lancaster County Sheriff’s Office at 803-283-3388 or contact Midlands Crimestoppers at dial 888-CRIME-SC (888-274-6372).RELATED:First arrest made in Lancaster nightclub shooting that killed 2, injured 9RELATED:2 dead, 9 injured in South Carolina night club shootingNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Outside of the Steak 'n Shake in Downtown Indianapolis on Saturday night, an interaction between two groups of youths got ugly and resulted in six people shot — three of them bystanders.One of the bystanders, a 30-year-old man, suffered a gunshot wound to the abdomen and remains in the hospital in serious condition, police said. A 16-year-old boy not believed to be a bystander is also in the hospital in serious condition.Police believe the shooting happened when two groups of minors had a fight near the intersection of Maryland and Illinois streets around 11:20 p.m.What we know:About the Downtown shooting that wounded sixMany Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department officers were in the Downtown area at the time. Some officers heard the gunshots and responded to the scene before 911 calls had even been made, IMPD spokesman Kendale Adams said.Officers found six people shot in multiple locations along Maryland Street. In addition to the two victims hospitalized in serious condition, a 32-year-old man, a 61-year-old woman, a 15-year-old boy and a 14-year-old were also shot.It is believed the shooter fled the scene, police said. Detectives are looking for a person of interest, a male wearing a dark sweatshirt with light stripes on the sleeves and dark jeans who might be able to provide more information on the case.IMPD’s Aggravated Assault team is investigating the shooting."The disregard for human life and inability to emotionally handle conflict last night is past feeling," IMPD Chief Bryan Roach said in a statement. "Constant monitoring and community involvement of our youth Downtown was successful all summer. Individual decisions last night are reflective of few of our youth. Let's celebrate our youth and address those unable to process the importance of their own young lives. Let's all do our part."The shooting prompted Republican state Sen. Jim Merritt, who's running for mayor of Indianapolis, to hold a press conference Sunday morning. Merritt called for more IMPD officers, adding that if he were the mayor, there would have been more officers in the area when the shooting happened.“If I were mayor last night, there would have been officers everywhere," Merritt said.Adams said there were about 40 police officers working Downtown at the time of the shooting, which is typical for a weekend shift.Mayoral election:How Merritt's plan to fight crime compares to Hogsett'sHeather Sager, a spokeswoman for Mayor Joe Hogsett's re-election campaign, issued a statement saying the shooting was "not partisan or political.""Last night's shooting is a tragic example of thoughtless, violent conduct that has no place in our city," Sager said in the statement. "But it also reveals how important it is that work continues to address the root causes of such senseless acts, which far too often appear far away in time and place from the moment a trigger is pulled."The shooting took place at a major intersection the night before Downtown was flooded with football fans heading to the Indianapolis Colts home opener. Merritt said he fears visiting fans will wonder if they can safely walk around or have dinner in the area."That is not the Indianapolis we want," Merritt said.IMPD hiring:Indianapolis police hired 110 people in 2018. It also lost 110.Colts fan Sandy Bradbury was visiting the city from Columbus, Indiana, and said the violence in Indianapolis makes her nervous.“People are trying here to curb the violence, I know they are. I don’t know what the answer is," Bradbury said. "But it does make you apprehensive.”Police ask that anyone with information on the shooting call IMPD at 317-327-3475 or Crime Stoppers of Central Indiana at 317-262-8477. Citizens can also download the P3tips app to submit a mobile tip or go to CrimeTips.org to submit a tip online.Contact IndyStar reporter London Gibson at 317-444-6043 or lbgibson@gannett.com. Follow her on Twitter @londongibson.CHICAGO (CBS)–Four people were shot in the West Garfield Park neighborhood Wednesday afternoon, and three of them later died.According to police, shots were fired from a white sedan at individuals standing on the sidewalk in front of a store in the 4200 block of West Madison Street, near Keeler Avenue, just before 3 p.m.Police said three male victims were transported to Mount Sinai Hospital with gunshot wounds in critical condition. All three were later pronounced dead.The Cook County Medical Examiner’s office identified the three men who died as 23-year-old Quashun Nolton, 19-year-old Charles Boston, and 22-year-old Tion Lewis. All three lived in the Austin neighborhood.Another male victim, according to police, found his own way to Loretto Hospital and will be transferred to Stroger Hospital of Cook County in critical condition. That victim is 22 years old.There were no offenders in custody Wednesday evening and Area North detectives were investigating.Trending:The 24-year-old man and 16-year-old girl who were shot dead in Wilmington on Wednesday afternoon, Sept. 18, were identified as Melissa Lourdes Lopez of Wilmington and Alex Gutierrez.Police did not have a description of the suspect other than saying the suspect had on a dark hoodie sweater, Sgt. Bradley Hearn said, and that police believe the suspect was a man.It was unclear what community Gutierrez was from.The shooter walked up to a group in the 800 block of North Bayview Avenue near Anaheim Street just before 3:15 p.m. and opened fire, Hearn said.Besides the two who were killed, a woman went to the hospital with a gunshot wound to her leg, and an elderly woman was grazed by a bullet and bandaged at the scene, Hearn said.Officers said the shooting may have been gang-related.Anyone with information about the shooting was asked to call detectives at 310-726-7889. Anonymous tips can be submitted by calling LA Crime Stoppers at 1-800-222-TIPS (8477).Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.Andrew WeaverCHEYENNE – A Cheyenne man charged in a fatal shooting earlier this week was released from custody five days earlier because prosecutors declined to move forward with a pending case of misdemeanor theft and misdemeanor possession of methamphetamine.Andrew Weaver, 25, had his initial appearance on the newest charges Thursday afternoon in Laramie County Circuit Court. He faces two counts of second-degree murder, one count of attempted second-degree murder, and two counts of aggravated assault and battery with bodily injury with a weapon.After being arrested Sept. 8 on the two misdemeanor charges, he was released Sept. 11 because Laramie County District Attorney Leigh Anne Manlove’s office declined to press charges, said Linda Gesell, spokeswoman for the Laramie County Sheriff’s Department. Officials from the DA’s office didn’t return calls from the Wyoming Tribune Eagle seeking comment on why they declined to prosecute the earlier case.Circuit Judge Denise Nau referenced the Sept. 8 case during Weaver’s initial appearance Thursday. His bond was set at $1 million cash, and Nau told Weaver he had to fill out an affidavit for a public defender if he wanted a court-appointed attorney.Earlier in the day, there was some confusion because Weaver was allegedly refusing to fill out an affidavit because he thought he already had an attorney.According to court documents:On Sept. 8, Weaver stole a Century Arms 9mm handgun from William Pharoah. Weaver had been staying with Pharoah, and one morning, when Pharoah woke up, Weaver and the gun were gone.When Weaver was located, officers also found methamphetamine in Weaver’s wallet. During this incident, Weaver told law enforcement he was under the influence of methamphetamine and was suicidal.On Sept. 16, Weaver went to 3436 E. 11th St. and shot four people, killing two. Shaline Wymer was found dead at the residence with a gunshot wound to her head, and Adrien Butler was also shot in the head and declared dead at Cheyenne Regional Medical Center.One 14-year-old boy was shot in the hand, head and stomach and airlifted to Children’s Hospital Colorado for his wounds. Another 14-year-old was shot in the face, but didn’t suffer life-threatening injuries because he was shot through the cheek.A fifth person, Armando Butler, was shot at but was able to avoid being shot by falling to the floor. While he was lying on the floor, Adrien Butler was shot and fell on top of him.When officers found Weaver in a field by Ashley Furniture on Nationway, he was in possession of a silver-and-black Smith and Wesson 9mm semiautomatic handgun.Weaver went to the residence to trade a gun for drugs, a different handgun or money, according to court documents. He told officers he had bought methamphetamine from Adrien Butler in the past.Weaver told officers he started shooting because he felt threatened at the residence when people asked him why he unloaded the gun. He said he loaded the gun after people started asking him questions, and when people started moving, he began shooting.Weaver said he shot the two boys when they tried to run from the bedroom, and he knew they were children.He told officers he had “always wanted to shoot someone, and that he had wanted to kill Adrien (Butler) for a while.” Officers said Weaver also told them he wanted to be a killer.Earlier that day, Weaver was driving around with two witnesses and told them “he wanted to know what it felt like to murder someone.” The witnesses dropped Weaver off near the residence where the shooting occurred and, a short while later, they heard gunshots.Get the latest in local public safety news with this weekly email.Police suspect illegal drugs played a role in a shooting that has killed two adults and seriously injured two children in Cheyenne.Police suspect illegal drugs played a role in a shooting that has killed two adults and seriously injured two children in Cheyenne.Two adults died and two children suffered grave injuries after being shot Monday in Cheyenne, police there said.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Patricia Sellers, 49, walks past the 5200 block of Tennessee Avenue with her two grandchildren, Hazel, 6, and Nazir, 10, and a load of laundry. The area was taped off by police several hours earlier Saturday, Sept. 14, 2019, for a shooting that killed two people and injured two others. "It's really crazy to know that we can't go outside and not worry about somebody driving by and shooting," Sellers said. Photo by Jesse Bogan,Jbogan@Post-Dispatch.comEDITOR'S NOTE:This story was updated Sunday to correct the number of people fatally shot, following conflicting information from police.ST. LOUIS — One person was fatally shot and three others injured early Saturday in south St. Louis, police said.Police on Sunday identified the dead man as Tajuan Green, 25, of St. Louis. Two men and a woman were wounded in the shooting. All were taken to the hospital. One of the men was in critical/unstable condition, police said, and the others were stable.Police were called to the scene about 4:55 a.m. with the report that four adults had been shot in the 5200 block of Tennessee Avenue.Neighbors said a white SUV had numerous bullet holes in it and one dead man in the back seat. They said the vehicle belonged to a woman who lived on the block.Neighbors said they didn't hear gunshots and suspected the shooting happened elsewhere."The neighborhood is still relatively safe, but it has changed, unfortunately," said Lisa Early, 62, who has lived in the area of Carondelet since 1995.She said police taped off the whole block to process the crime scene, then came back later to tow an additional vehicle that somebody passing by tried getting into down the street.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Jesse Bogan is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Trending:OAKLAND — A Richmond man arrested in a shooting early Saturday outside a Laurel district bar that left one man dead and the suspect’s brother among four other people wounded, has been charged with murder and multiple counts of assault with a semi-automatic firearm, according to authorities and court records.Peter Travenia, 34, was charged Tuesday in the shootings that happened about 12:50 a.m. Saturday outside the Laurel Lounge at 38th Avenue and MacArthur Boulevard.Killed was Mario Perez, 46, of San Leandro, who was at the bar with other family members after earlier celebrating a relative’s birthday at a restaurant. Perez’s brother and sister-in-law were among those wounded as was Travenia’s brother, who worked at the bar, and the bar owner, authorities said.Authorities said for some reason Peter Travenia was angry and was being unruly outside the bar and that the victims had been trying to defuse the situation that had started to get physical before he pulled a gun and started shooting at them.He fled on foot but was arrested a few blocks away and the gun was recovered.Perez, an electrician and maintenance worker at St. Felicitas Catholic School in San Leandro, and his family were well known and well liked at the bar.A  GoFundMe account set up for the education of his two sons said in part he was “an amazing family man and a great friend.  Our lives will never be the same again. Mario was the kind of person that was the life of every party, made everyone feel like they mattered in his life, would take the shirt off his back to help a friend, was extremely hardworking, and loved everyone, no matter where they came from or who they were.”Father Jayson Landeza, a former associate pastor at St. Felicitas and a family friend,  said Perez “had the biggest heart in the world.  He was fun loving, generous and giving.  He was just a great guy.”Meghan Jorgensen, principal at the pre-kindergarten to eighth grade school that both of Perez’s sons graduated from,  called Perez “amazing” and said he was more than an employee.  She said he would be a DJ at school events and help anyone, including students and their families, faculty members and parish members with any issues they had.  “Anyone who needed him could count on him,” Jorgensen said. “He was a friend and a colleague. He was one of us.”As of Wednesday afternoon. the GofFundMe account had raised  $23,489 toward  a $27,000 goal. It can be accessed at https://www.gofundme.com › mario-perez-sr-memorial-education-fundGet Morning Report and other email newslettersLaGrange police arrested a man Friday in connection to a quadruple shooting last weekend.Maceo Foster, 31, was taken to the Troup County jail after he was arrested during a traffic stop, LaGrange police said in a news release.The shooting happened about 10:30 p.m. Saturday on Elm Street, and it  left four people with gunshot wounds, the release said. James Davis, Melva Moore, Xavier Cofiled and Shelby Jenkins were the people injured.Moore, who was shot in the shoulder and hand, was flown to WellStar West Georgia Medical Center for emergency treatment, the release said. The other victims were also treated at the hospital. Their conditions were not provided.It is also unclear what led up to the shooting.Foster has been charged with with four counts of aggravated assault, possession of a firearm by a convicted felon, and possession of a firearm during the commission of certain crimes, jail records show.AJC.com has reached out to the Troup County Sheriff’s Office for more information on his booking.In other news:Brittany CostelloSeptember 15, 2019 05:29 PMALBUQUERQUE, N.M.- Police released the identity of the person who was shot and killed outside an apartment near Unser and Ladera.Noah Tafoya, 17, died and three others were wounded during the incident.Police responded to the Rio Volcan Apartments after getting calls about gunfire and a loud party.Neighbors said they heard multiple gunshots before a man began to call out for help.“We were kind of concerned but we weren't that concerned because stuff like this happens all the time in this area,” said Alyssa Perea.People who live in the area said they saw two cars leaving the area around the time shots were fired.Police were eventually called to the Walmart near Coors and I-40, where they found a gunshot victim.Eventually, officers learned two more people, who were believed to be involved in the shooting, arrived at Presbyterian Hospital.Police said the three people in the hospital are in critical condition.Brittany CostelloUpdated: September 15, 2019 05:29 PMCreated: September 13, 2019 04:15 PMCopyright 2019 KOB-TV LLC, a Hubbard Broadcasting Company. All rights reservedShare a News Tip, Story Idea, Photo, VideoContact|Public Files & EEO|Careers|AdvertisingFCC Public Inspection Files:|KOB|KOBF|KOBRAny person with disabilities who needs help accessing the content of the FCC Public File may contact KOB via our online form or call 505-243-4411.FCC Applications|Privacy Policy|Terms of Use|DMCA Notice|Do Not Sell My Info|Contest Rules|Site MapThis website is not intended for users located within the European Economic Area.©KOB-TV, LLCA Hubbard Broadcasting CompanyKRQE News 13 Albuquerque - Santa Feby:KRQE MediaALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (KRQE)- On Sunday, the Albuquerque Police Department released the identities of the five victims who were killed in two separate shootings in that took place in the city on Thursday night.Southwest AlbuquerqueAPD says thefour victims who were killed following a shootingat Lura Pl. near Bridge and Goff have been identified as 16-year-old Victoria Cereceres, 17-year-old Daniel Alexis Baca,  36-year-old Christine Baca, and 77-year-old Manuelita Sotelo. Police say they responded to a mobile home park after receiving a call reporting shots fired.When officers arrived at the scene, they found three victims dead at the scene while a fourth was transported to the hospital where they died. Two others suffered non-life threatening injuries.Northwest AlbuquerqueAPD also released the name of the victim who was killed in Thursday’s shooting near Ladera and Unser. Police say they received reports of a shooting at the Rio Volcan Apartments around 8:44 p.m. and received another call stating there was a second victim who had been shot at the Walmart at Coors and I-40.Two additional men arrived at Presbyterian Hospital stating they had been shot near Unser and Central Ave. Police have identified 17-year-old Noah Tafoya as the victim killed in the shooting.The three other individuals were hospitalized with gunshot wounds. Authorities stated all four people were involved in the shooting at the apartment.Police have yet to identify any suspects in either of the shootings. Homicide detectives continue to investigate both cases.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (KRQE) – Explora is working to build the next generation of New Mexico scientists, engineers, and more with a new scholarship. The STEM Scholars program is aimed at high school seniors who are Black, Indigenous, or Hispanic and plan to pursue a STEM subject at a New Mexico college or trade school.If selected, they will get $2,500 toward their education. It comes as Explora gets ready to launch X-Studio, a teen activity center expected to open in the fall. Explora says the goal is to cultivate homegrown talent and hopefully keep bright minds right here in New Mexico. The deadline to apply is April 30. Community members who want to support the program can also donate.ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (KRQE) - An Albuquerque man known for causing trouble with the police is back at it after getting off the hook twice in the past year. A police chase with an officer-involved shooting, aggravated assault, and battery, and breaking and entering are just some of the recent charges on Daniel Franco's lengthy rap sheet."Mr. Franco is a dangerous person. This evening, New Mexico State Police was able to take a violent person off of the street," New Mexico State Police Lt. Mark Soriano told us back in 2019 after a SWAT standoff.ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. (KRQE) – Concerts are back, but for now, music fans can only enjoy a live show outside. One of Albuquerque's biggest concert venues already has some big names lined up for summer. People say live music is something they've been missing and they are excited to have some options this year. "There's an energy, just really a connection that people feel to the artists that they like," says James Bongard, Owner of We Buy Music.It won't be long before New Mexicans can once again experience the thrill of a big concert in person. "I'd love to see more artists live. You don't get that same experience from Instagram live or Zoom or anything like that," says Nicholas Duron.Filed under:All four victims, males in their late teens, are expected to survive their injuries, Chicago police said.Four people were wounded Tuesday in a shooting in West Town.About 9:30 p.m., the group was hanging out behind a building in the 2200 block of West Maypole Avenue when someone opened fire on them as they ran from the scene, according to Chicago police.A 17-year-old boy was shot in the leg and taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. Two men, 18 and 19 years old, were also taken to Stroger Hospital with gunshot wounds to the buttocks and legs, respectively. The fourth man, 18, was shot in the leg and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital.All four have been stabilized and are expected to live, police said. Officers were not given a description of the shooter.Area Central detectives are investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.COLUMBIA, S.C. (WIS) - Investigators with the Sumter Police Department are searching for two men who may be connected to adeadly shooting that happened in September.Officials said 22-year-old Sheldon Benjamin and 25-year-old Jay McBride are both wanted for attempted murder, possession of a weapon during a violent crime, and unlawful carrying of a pistol.Benjamin and McBride are believed to be involved with a shooting that took place in Sumter on Sept. 8, which killed two people and injured at least three others.Investigators believe the deadly shooting was gang-related.Sumter Police arrested Ellquin Williams and Devante Wilson just days after the shooting occurred.Both men were denied bond.Diontrae Epps, one of the three injured in the shooting, was also charged with murder, unlawful carry of a firearm, and possession of a weapon during a violent crime.Two other men, Perry Vanburen and Kendall Dow, turned themselves in one week after the shooting occurred. Meanwhile, officials are also still searching for Keyonte McGee on an unrelated family court bench warrant.If you have any information, please contact Crimestoppers by calling 1-888-CRIME SC (888-274-6372) or visitingwww.midlandscrimestoppers.comorwww.p3tips.comand click on the “submit a tip” tab. Your identity will be kept anonymous, and if your tip leads to an arrest, you could be eligible for a cash reward of up to $1,000.Copyright 2019 WIS. All rights reserved.1111 Bull St.Columbia, SC 29201(803) 799-1010A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.One woman is dead after an early Sunday shooting that wounded three others, according to police.Alexandria Police Department officers were called to a local hospital around 3:45 a.m. Sunday because two people with gunshot wounds had been admitted, reads a release.Officers learned that a total of four people were shot and that one, an unidentified 26-year-old woman, had died.An investigation was started, and it was determined that the shooting happened in the 2900 block of Cypress Street. The shooting was the culmination of a fight from "the night before," reads the release."The altercation had progressed over several hours and multiple locations, including the 2800 block of Harris Street, a bar outside the city limits in the 7500 block of US-71, and a convenience store in the 4400 block of Lee Street," it reads.Natashia Nichelle Jackson, 27, of the 5900 block of Dixie Lane, was identified as a suspect. After an interview at police headquarters, Jackson was arrested on a charge of second-degree murder and booked into the Rapides Parish Detention Center.Bond has been set at $100,000. She was released from jail on Monday afternoon.The name of the victim has not been released. An investigation is continuing.COLUMBUS COUNTY, N.C. (WECT) - Two people have been arrested in connection with a triple killing in Columbus County in Sept. 2019.According to the N.C. State Bureau of Investigation, Prentis Deshawne McDuffie, 30, and a 17-year-old juvenile were arrested and charged in the case this week.First responders were called to a home on Brittany Lane outside of Whiteville just before 7 a.m. on Saturday, Sept. 7, 2019.When they arrived, they found four family members suffering from gunshot wounds.Despite crew’s efforts to save the victims, Leonel Ciprian Noyola, his wife, Nancy Trujillo Espinoza, and his 5-year-old son, Alexis Trujillo, died. The child’s grandmother, Rafaela Noyola Jaramillo, was wounded in the shootings but survived.The sheriff’s office later said that the shootings were a targeted attack and not a random act of violence.The suspects reportedly stole the family’s 2011 silver Ford Fusion which was later located nearby on Twin Pines Road.McDuffie, also known as “Chopper,” and the 17-year-old have been charged with:McDuffie is being held without bond while the teen’s bond has been set at $5.4 million.The SBI said the investigation is still ongoing.McDuffiewas previously chargedwith attempted murder following a Christmas Eve shooting in Horry County, SC in 2016. He was arrested in Columbus County a month later. The status of the S.C. case is not immediately available.According to online records with the N.C. Department of Public Safety, McDuffie has prior convictions in Columbus County of second-degree kidnapping, assault and battery, and communicating threats.Copyright 2020 WECT. All rights reserved.322 Shipyard Blvd.Wilmington, NC 28412(910) 791-8070A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Everette Campbell (left) and Malik McGinnis (right)Mekia Smith, 7, and her brother, Ronald Eddington III, 21, were shot and killed in their Marrero home on Sept. 4, 2019.A small memorial of stuff animals, balloons and flowers outside the front door of the Marrero home where Mekia Smith, 7, and her brother, Ronald Eddington III, 21, were shot and killed on Sept. 4, 2019.An undated photo of Mekia Smith, 7.Michelle Smith, in front, takes a selfie with her son, Ronald Eddington III, and her son's girlfriend, Gisselle Barrientos.Everette Campbell (left) and Malik McGinnis (right)Mekia Smith, 7, and her brother, Ronald Eddington III, 21, were shot and killed in their Marrero home on Sept. 4, 2019.A small memorial of stuff animals, balloons and flowers outside the front door of the Marrero home where Mekia Smith, 7, and her brother, Ronald Eddington III, 21, were shot and killed on Sept. 4, 2019.An undated photo of Mekia Smith, 7.Michelle Smith, in front, takes a selfie with her son, Ronald Eddington III, and her son's girlfriend, Gisselle Barrientos.A Jefferson Parish grand jury has handed up indictments charging two men in a Marrero shooting that left a 7-year-old girl and her older brother dead and injured the siblings' 11-year-old sister and a friend.Malik McGinnis, 22, was charged with two counts of first-degree murder, two counts of attempted first-degree murder and obstruction of justice.His alleged accomplice, Everette Campbell, 23, of Terrytown, was charged with two counts of second-degree murder, obstruction of justice and cultivation of less than 2.5 pounds of marijuana.No word was available Friday on whether the Jefferson Parish District Attorney's Office would pursue the death penalty if McGinnis is convicted of first-degree murder.The pair are accused in the deaths of McGinnis' friend Ronald Eddington III, 21, and Eddington's sister, Mekia Smith.McGinnis was staying with Eddington's family at a home inthe 3000 block of Sorbonne Drive in Marrero on the night of Sept. 4 when Jefferson Parish Sheriff's Office investigators say an argument erupted into gunfire.Deputies called to the house found Mekia lying dead in a pool of blood in the hallway and Eddington fatally wounded near the front door, according to the Sheriff's Office.Mekia and Eddington's 11-year-old sister had been shot in the arm, and an 18-year-old boy suffered a gunshot wound to his abdomen, authorities said. Both survived.McGinnis and Campbell were arrested the next day.Investigators have not revealed a motive in the case. Relatives of the victims aren't sure why the shootings occurred, but have said they were shocked because of the friendship between Eddington and McGinnis.McGinnis is being held without bail on the two counts of first-degree murder. Bail was set at $600,000 on his other charges. Campbell was being held in lieu of posting $1.6 million bail.They are scheduled to be arraigned Jan. 6.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionThe Jefferson Parish District Attorney's Office will not seek the death penalty against a man charged in a quadruple shooting at a Marrero hom…News Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?Four people, including one minor, were injured in a shooting on the Northside Wednesday night, according to the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.Police said the shooting happened at 8 p.m. at 400 W. 62nd St.None of the injuries were life-threatening.JSO said details of the shooting remain unknown and detectives with the aggravated battery unit are investigating.If you have any information regarding the shooting, call JSO at 904-630-0500 or call Crime Stoppers at 1-866-845-TIPS.Read more at First Coast News.Four people, including one minor, were injured in a shooting on the Northside Wednesday night, according to the Jacksonville Sheriff's Office.Police said the shooting happened at 8 p.m. at 400 W. 62nd St.None of the injuries were life-threatening.JSO said details of the shooting remain unknown and detectives with the aggravated battery unit are investigating.If you have any information regarding the shooting, call JSO at 904-630-0500 or call Crime Stoppers at 1-866-845-TIPS.Read more at First Coast News.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Florida Times-Union  ~ 1 Independent Drive, Suite 200, Jacksonville, FL 32202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.GREENSBORO, N.C. — We now know the names of the men killed in today's shooting.Greensboro Police Officers were called to the scene of a shooting early Monday morning. Dispatch says officers found four victims with gunshot wounds, just after 2 a.m. in the 5500 block of West Market StreetA crime scene was quickly roped off at an apartment on the lower level of a building at the Morehead Apartment complex.Detectives say 24-year-olds Christopher Savalas Parson and Kendrick Rondell Gilbert Junior both died from their injuries. A woman is still in critical condition, and a child was treated for minor injuries.Tony Tyqhawn said the child is his 1-month-old niece, and she was hit by a bullet in her thumb.Stay current, stay informed and stay safe with theWFMY mobile app.Download the WFMY News 2iPhone app|Android app|Sign up for the WFMY 'Let's Get 2 It' NewsletterInvestigators currently believe the shooting was the result of a home invasion. Greensboro Police dispatchers say the suspect drove off after the shooting, but no other description is available at this time.This is the third shooting investigation for Greensboro Police in the past 24 hours. If you have any information on the shooting, call CrimeStoppers at 336-373-1000.RELATED:Greensboro Police Investigating Shooting at Great StopsRELATED:One Person Injured In Overnight ShootingNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Filed under:Dozens of shell casings littered the ground at the scene of the shooting, with several vehicles and the entrance to the Green Line station showing bullet damage.Four men were shot near the King Drive Green Line station Monday in Washington Park on the South Side.A group of people were outside about 11:05 p.m. in the 6200 block of South King Drive when two males hopped out of a white Ford Explorer and opened fire on them, Chicago police said.A 22-year-old man was shot in the back while another man, 32, was shot in the lower backside, police said. They were taken to to University of Chicago Medical Center in good condition.A third man, 51, was grazed in the lower backside but refused medical treatment, police said. The fourth person shot, a 34-year-old man, was driven to St. Bernard Hospital with a gunshot wound to the back. He was transferred to The University of Chicago Medical Center in good condition, police said.Dozens of shell casings were seen littering the ground at the scene of the shooting. Bullets also pierced the entrance to the King Drive Green Line station as well as several vehicles in the area.No one is in custody as Area Central detectives investigate.Contributing: Tyler LaRiviereKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.CBS 42by:The Associated PressA judge’s gavel is shown in a file photo. (Credit: iStock / Getty Images Plus)ELKMONT, Ala. (AP) — A 15-year-old boy charged with killing five members of his family, including  three younger siblings, is being charged as an adult.Mason Sisk, of Elkmont, faces four counts of capital murder, the Limestone County Sheriff’s Office said. Authorities released his name for the first time following the decision to charge him as an adult.He is being held in the county jail without bond. Sisk was 14 at the time of the slayings.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.BIRMINGHAM, Ala. (WIAT) -- Due to the rise of gun violence in Jefferson County, a local 9th grader took matters into his own hands by creating a film to bring more awareness to the subject.The Birmingham area has seen a rise in gun violence over the last year. In 2020 the murder rate climbed nearly 16%.BIRMINGHAM, Ala. (WIAT) -- The Birmingham Police Department is conducting a homicide investigation after a man was found dead inside a home early Saturday morning.According to BPD, officers responded to a call of a person shot in the 2700 block of Avenue J in Ensley just before 4 a.m. Once on the scene, authorities discovered a man lying unresponsive on the floor suffering from a gunshot wound.WASHINGTON (AP) — Despite the strongest public support and the most sympathetic president in years, the American labor movement just suffered a stinging defeat -- again.Amazon warehouse workers in Bessemer, Alabama, overwhelmingly voted against joining the Retail, Wholesale and Department Store Union in much-anticipated election results announced Friday.A third person has been arrested and charged in the murder of 17-year-old Usher Hanns, who was killed a year ago in Hartford when drive-by shooters opened fire on a crowded outdoor party.The suspect was 17 years old at the time of the shooting, so police would not immediately release information about the suspect or their alleged involvement in the shooting that also wounded three other people.The teen, now 18, was charged with conspiracy to commit murder, criminal liability murder, criminal liability first-degree assault and possession of a pistol without a permit, police said. He expected to appear Thursday morning for a juvenile hearing before being charged as an adult and transferred to Hartford Superior Court, where their name and case would be made public, police said.This summer, detectives also charged Diondre Johnson, 19, and Jaden Davis, 20, with Usher’s killing. They were both charged with murder, conspiracy to commit murder, first-degree assault and carrying a pistol without a permit.They presented a case that tied Usher’s death to a series of retaliatory shootings last year between rival groups of teens, including the daytime shootout and car chase that ended in the death of bystander and 71-year-old grandmother Yvonne Smith last October.Usher was killed just after 9:20 p.m. Sept. 1, 2019, when a car pulled up alongside a crowded outdoor party near 86 Edgewood St. and opened fire. Usher was hit in the head, another man in the leg, another man in the ankle and another teen in the hand, constituting a mass shooting.Johnson and Davis were arrested weeks later on unrelated felony weapons charges and police have said they are suspects in at least 11 other shootings, including two that injured people.Zach Murdock can be reached atzmurdock@courant.com.RecommendedMostly cloudy skies. High 79F. Winds S at 5 to 10 mph..Cloudy with showers. Thunder possible. Low 62F. Winds S at 10 to 15 mph. Chance of rain 60%.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 3:16 pmAuthorities are trying to find out who is responsible for gunfire that wounded four people who were at a weekend private party late at night at a local fraternal organization.The shooting occurred on Sunday on the grounds of the Moose Lodge of Rocky Mount, which is along Country Club Road on the northwest side of the city.Emergency radio traffic, obtained via the websitebroadcastify.com, showed the incident was first reported shortly before 11:45 p.m., with a dispatcher advising of multiple gunshot victims in the 500 block of Country Club.Rocky Mount police Sgt. Brad Summerlin, in a brief press release issued on Monday afternoon, said arriving officers found two victims in the Moose Lodge parking lot.Summerlin said one victim was taken to Nash UNC Health Care and the other was treated and released at the scene.Summerlin added that the other two victims had already been taken by other people in personal vehicles to the hospital.Citing the ongoing investigation, Summerlin did not release any additional details.Anyone with additional information about the shooting or any crimes in the area is asked to contact police at 252-972-1411, Crime Stoppers at 252-977-1111orcrimestoppers@rockymountnc.govTips also can be texted to police at 274637 by beginning messages with RMPOL to direct the tip to the Rocky Mount Police Department and typing up to 155 characters about the information.All texts are kept completely anonymous.www.RockyMountTelegram.com1151 Falls Road Suite 2008Rocky Mount, NC 27804Main Phone:252-366-8190Customer Care Phone:252-329-9505VALLEY, Ala. (WTVM) - The Valley Police Department has taken a man into custody in connection to a shooting that left seven people injured.20-year-old Montavious Demetrel Dawson of Opelika has been arrested on two counts of first degree assault in connection tothe shooting in the parking lot of Fairfax Kindergartenon Sept. 1.The investigation of the shooting revealed there was some type of party being held at Fairfax Kindergarten when an argument occurred between some of the men present. They went out to the parking lot where at least one man began shooting.Police say the investigation is ongoing and more charges are pending.Copyright 2019 WTVM. All rights reserved.Alex joined the digital team in December 2017.1909 Wynnton RoadColumbus, GA 31906(706) 494-5400A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.TOLEDO, Ohio — According to Toledo police, four people were shot in north Toledo early Sunday morning.This happened at an illegal after-hours club on Stickney Avenue around 4 a.m.When police arrived on the scene, they found no victims. However, while they were securing the area, local boxer Roy Barringer, 29, walked into Toledo Hospital with a gunshot wound. Three other victims, Ebony Jackson, 24, Daniel Garth, 42, and Laren Watkins, 20, showed up to St. Vincent's also with gunshot wounds.The details of the incident are still being determined, but a crime scene was established inside the building and in the vicinity outside of it.All victims are expected to survive.At this time, no arrests have been made and no suspect information is available.This investigation is ongoing. We will continue to bring you updates.RELATED:1 shot near Central Catholic High School following Friday night football gameRELATED:1 person shot in the leg in central ToledoNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.CHARLOTTE, N.C. — The mother of a man who was killed when gunfire erupted at a party near the University of North Carolina at Charlotte is asking for the shooter to come forward.Officials said 19-year-old Christian Malik Estes was killed and three others were injured in a shooting that happened just before 1 a.m. on Aug 31 at the 49 North Apartments, right off University City Boulevard.[ALSO READ: 2 teenagers charged with shooting at CMPD officers in Steele Creek]The Charlotte-Mecklenburg Police Department held a news conference Thursday asking for the public's help to solve Estes' murder."If you're man enough to shoot a gun then you should be man enough to come forward," Estes' mother Latoya Woodward said.(Estes)Woodward said her son, who had a 10-month-old daughter, was a motivator and always made time for others.She said she's already forgiven the person who killed him and just wants anyone involved to come forward to take accountability for their actions.CMPD is now currently investigating a homicide on Rebecca Bailey Dr. in University City. 1 of the 4 victims who had been shot was pronounced deceased at the hospital.@wsoctvpic.twitter.com/9E1rMPuEjVPolice said there were about 60 people at a party inside one of the apartments when an argument led to gunfire.Two men and two women were shot.Officials said Estes died at the hospital, another man was seriously hurt after being shot in the chest and both women are expected to be OK.[[ALSO READ: Police say new task force aimed to reduce violent crime in Charlotte making progress]]Police confirmed to Channel 9 that both women who were shot attend UNCC.No arrests have been made.Police are asking anyone with information about the shooting to call 704-432-TIPS and speak directly to a homicide unit detective. Detective Pack is the lead detective assigned to the case. The public can also call Crime Stoppers at 704-334-1600.There is also a $5,000 reward for anyone who helps make an arrest.Check back withwsoctv.comfor more information.Read more top trending stories onwsoctv.com:BERKELEY COUNTY, S.C. (WCSC) - Authorities say four people have been transported to the hospital following a shooting at a bar in Moncks Corner early Saturday morning.Officials with the Berkeley County Sheriff’s Office say it happened at the L&M Social Bar on Maplewood Road.The victims were transported to area hospitals.BCSO officials say detectives are working to identify the suspects involved in the incident which happened around midnight.The sheriff’s office is continuing the investigation.Viewers reported law enforcement units along Maplewood Road and a helicopter assisting in the area.Copyright 2019 WCSC. All rights reserved.2126 Charlie Hall BoulevardCharleston SC 29414(843) 402-5555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Two days after being shot and killed by police officers in the parking lot of the Cinergy Odessa movie theater, the body of the man who had gone on a killing spree in Odessa for more than an hour on that August 31st was taken to the Tarrant County Medical Examiner's Office.He arrived in an orange body bag, still in handcuffs. He had on the green pants, orange shirt, gray socks and boots he had put on that Saturday morning. That's according to John Tufts at the San Angelo Standard-Times, who received a copy of the autopsy report,The medical examiner described him as being 5-feet 9-inches and nearly 202 pounds - saying he was "a normally developed white male."A toxicology report said he had no alcohol, methamphetamines, cocaine, oxycodone, benzodiazepine, fentanyl, opiates, or marijuana in his system.But his body was riddled with dozens of bullets - from his shins to his head. They hit his knees, thighs, ribs and neck and shredded his lungs, liver and bowels. While multiple bullet fragments hit him in the face and head, the ME said in the report none of the bullets went through his skull.One round hit his left forearm and came out near a tattoo that said "ROCK" and the symbol of a star, which was near the word "ILLUMINATI."The ME said the shooter had a total of 18 tattoos on his body. One was a "Lucky 13" on his upper abdomen - a horseshoe on his right arm - a "Star of David" — mangled by multiple shell fragments — on his upper chest.He had the word "ODESSA" on his right forearm. Strangely, the bullets didn't destroy that tattoo.By the time police officers cornered and killed him, he had killed seven people and hurt 25 more.At least six people are dead and 19 others are injured after multiple shootings and stabbings across Philadelphia during Labor Day weekend.PHILADELPHIA-Police are investigating after multiple shootings and stabbings across Philadelphia left at least six people dead and 19 others injured over Labor Day weekend.Around 4:30 p.m. Sunday, 25-year-old Talisha McLeod was shot and killed in North Philadelphia. The incident occurred on the 2500 block of North Adler Street when McLeod was shot in the chest. She was rushed to Temple University Hospital, where she died a short time later.A 25-year-old woman has died after being shot on the 2500 block of North Adler Street in North Philadelphia.Another shooting in Southwest Philadelphia left a 28-year-old man dead around 12:30 a.m. Sunday. The victim, identified as Amin Abel Rodriguez Cedeno, was shot multiple times on the 7500 block of Brewster Avenue. At least 40 pieces of ballistic evidence were recovered from the scene.Authorities described the suspect as a heavyset white male who is 6 feet tall and was wearing all black. The suspect reportedly fled in a red Nissan with a plastic bag covering the rear windshield.Forty pieces of ballistic evidence were recovered from the scene of a Southwest Philadelphia shooting that left a 28-year-old man dead.AdvertisementOn Saturday morning, two men were killed and two others were injured after being shot in North Philadelphia. Police say 25-year-old Felix Moda-Montilla and 31-year-old Jeffrey Otero were both shot in the head on the 4600 block of North 4th Street. Both victims were transported to Temple University Hospital, where they succumbed to their injuries.An 18-year-old man, who was also shot in the head, was hospitalized in critical condition. A 21-year-old who was shot in the leg is listed as stable.Two men are dead and two others are injured following a quadruple shooting in North Philadelphia.Shortly after 1:30 a.m., 32-year-old Christopher Williams was fatally shot while sitting inside a Jeep Cherokee in West Philadelphia. Police say the victim was shot four times on the 900 block of Fallon Street.An hour earlier, a different shooting left one woman dead and another injured in Southwest Philadelphia. Both women were shot several times while sitting in a car on the 2900 block of South Robinson Street. Charnae Mercedes Smith, 23, succumbed to her injuries a short time later. The other woman, a 26-year-old, remains in critical condition.A 24-year-old woman is dead and a 26-year-old woman is injured after a double shooting in Southwest Philadelphia.RELATED:2 men killed, 2 injured in North Philadelphia shooting|Woman killed, another critical after being shot in car in Southwest Philadelphia|9-year-old shot while playing outside in Southwest PhiladelphiaOn Friday night, a 9-year-old boy was playing outside in Southwest Philadelphia when he was shot. The incident occurred around 9:30 p.m. on the 5200 block of Upland Street. The victim was hospitalized in stable condition.A 9-year-old boy was injured after being shot while playing outside in Southwest PhiladelphiaOther victims of weekend violence included:– a 19-year-old man who was critically injured after being shot in the back while riding a bike on the 1100 block of York Street in North Philadelphia;– a 42-year-old man who was critically wounded after being shot in the back on the 3200 block of H Street in Kensington;– a 19-year-old man who was critically injured after being shot five times while sitting inside a car on the 1400 block of West Lehigh Avenue in North Philadelphia;– a 25-year-old man who was critically wounded after being stabbed multiple times by a known doer on the 2400 block of West Allegheny Avenue;– a man in his 20s who was stabbed in the neck on the 2700 block of North Hemberger Street in North Philadelphia;– a 28-year-old man who was shot in the leg on the 4900 block of Frankford Avenue in Frankford;– a 36-year-old man who was shot in the foot on Wishart Street in North Philadelphia;– a 38-year-old man who was shot in the ankle on the 2900 block of Morris Street in South Philadelphia;– a 23-year-old man who was shot in the leg on the 2200 block of South 68th Street in Southwest Philadelphia;– a 25-year-old man who was shot in the buttocks on the 2700 block of North Hope Street in North Philadelphia;– a 24-year-old woman who was stabbed in the shoulder on the 100 block of North Dewey Street in West Philadelphia;– a 30-year-old woman who was bitten on her left ear on the 100 block of North Dewey Street in West Philadelphia;– a 25-year-old man who was shot in the abdomen on the 100 block of East Indiana Avenue in Kensington;– and a 26-year-old man who was shot in the hand and foot on the 1400 block of North 22nd Street in North Philadelphia;A 42-year-old man was critically wounded after being shot in the back in Kensington.Authorities have yet to identify the deceased.An arrest was made in connection with the stabbing on North Dewey Street as well as the stabbing on West Allegheny Aenue. Police are still searching for suspects in connection with the remaining incidents. These are ongoing investigations.Tips can be submitted by calling 215-686-TIPS (8477) or texting PPD TIP (773847). Tips can also be submitted anonymouslyonline. All tips are confidential.------For resources for victims of violence in Philadelphia, seehere.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsBALTIMORE (WJZ) —Baltimore Police are investigating a quadruple shooting that occurred on the 900 block of North Monroe Street Saturday night.At approximately 11:35 pm, police were called to a reported shooting on the 900 block of North Monroe Street. When police arrived, they discovered four males ages 15,17,19 and 23 years old, all suffering from gunshot wounds.Residents Worry For Their Kids After 3 Quadruple Shootings Reported In Baltimore Over Labor Day WeekendThree of the men had been shot in their legs, while the fourth was shot in the chest. The victims were transported to area hospitals by medics.Western District Shooting detectives were sent to the scene and have assumed control of the investigation.This shooting marks the third quadruple shooting that has occurred this week.Woman Killed In Quadruple Shooting Inside Baltimore HomeAnyone with information is urged to contact Baltimore Police Department Southwest District Shooting detectives, at 410-396-2477.Those who wish to remain anonymous can utilize the Metro Crime Stoppers tip line, at 1-866-7LOCKUP.You can also submit a tip by texting 443-902-4824.Frederick police look for evidence after two people were shot June 27 in a parking lot on Columbine Drive off Fairview Avenue.NashWellsNashWellsFrederick police look for evidence after two people were shot June 27 in a parking lot on Columbine Drive off Fairview Avenue.A Frederick man already accused of drug offenses was charged with murder Thursday after police and prosecutors said he was linked to the shooting death of a man who was to testify against him.Lavonte Darnell Nash, 27, was arrested in September with four other people police identified as members of a drug distribution network, but the murder charge was handed up Jan. 24 by a Frederick County grand jury and announced publicly Thursday in a joint press release from Frederick police and the state’s attorney’s office.In addition to the drug counts Nash was charged with previously, prosecutors filed charges of first-degree murder and attempted first-degree murder in a shooting that took place June 27 in the parking lot of the Apartments at Sunset in the 1000 block of Columbine Drive, as well as other charges ranging from assault to gang involvement.Prosecutors say the shooting happened when Nash, who prosecutors allege is a member of a Frederick-based street gang called “PA-32,” learned that 30-year-old Gregory Allen Bair Knight was going to be called as a witness against him at Nash’s trial in a previous drug case, according to Thursday’s release. Knight was killed and a woman who was with him in his car in the parking lot was injured in the shooting, according to Thursday’s release and previous stories published by The Frederick News-Post.Knight wasn’t identified as a witness in Nash’s case before the shooting, but police referred to him in court documents as a “confidential informant” who bought $50 worth of crack cocaine from Nash at the direction of police in 2017, according to previous stories. Nash was arrested in connection with that offense on May 4, 2017, but was out of jail on $7,500 bail by the time of the shooting, which was referenced only indirectly at the time of Nash’s arrest on further drug charges in September.“Obviously we couldn’t make comment back then, we didn’t want to compromise the investigation, but I think as you can see from today’s indictment he was charged with that first-degree murder of Mr. Knight,” said Frederick County State’s Attorney Charlie Smith, speaking of the shooting and subsequent investigation on Thursday.Despite Knight’s death, Smith maintained that detectives and prosecutors handled Knight’s identity as an informant according to best practices established and followed by law enforcement agencies all over the country.“We refer to them as confidential informants and, should they be called to testify, at that point in time we have to identify them, but the law allows us to keep them confidential until that point,” Smith said, adding that he did not believe either the police department or his office would change how they handle informants as a result of Knight’s death. “... I’ve never had that occur in the 30 years that I’ve been doing this. We’ve had plenty of incidents of witness intimidation, but we’ve never had a witness that was actually murdered because they were going to testify.”Nash’s indictment also linked him to two other shootings on Market Street in downtown Frederick in August and September 2019, both of which police believe were gang-related, according to Thursday’s press release.The first shooting happened just after 1:30 a.m. Aug. 31 in the 600 block of North Market and four people were wounded, according to previous stories. Police recovered a total of 30 shell casings from three different weapons at the scene, indicating that multiple people were involved in the exchange of gunfire, according to charging documents filed this week against 17-year-old Nazir Rashad Wells, who was arrested Wednesday in relation to the shooting.While Wells and Nash were charged at about the same time in connection with the August shooting, police appear to have developed Wells as a suspect separately.Along with the shell casings, police also recovered a 9 mm Smith & Wesson handgun that was dropped down a nearby storm drain, according to Wells’ charging documents. An examination of DNA found on the gun was returned as a partial match for Wells in December by the state police’s DNA database, which already had a profile of Wells’ DNA from two criminal convictions in 2017 and 2019, the documents state.“Once we got information that Mr. Wells was involved in the shooting back in August, we conducted some further investigation that eventually led to us serving that search warrant on his residence yesterday morning,” said Lt. Kirk Henneberry, commander of the Frederick Police Department’s Criminal Investigations Division.In total, Wells was charged with illegal possession of a regulated firearm, possession of a firearm by a minor, carrying a handgun on his person, having a loaded firearm on his person and discharge of a firearm, according to court records. He was denied bail at an initial hearing before a District Court judge Thursday afternoon.A third man, 35-year-old Bryant Helon McMillan Jr., was charged previously in relation to the Aug. 31 shooting, making Wells and Nash the second and third suspects to be charged in connection with the crime to date. McMillan was also denied bail at his initial bail review hearing after his arrest in August, court records indicate. He was again denied bail in a second hearing in October, the records state.While neither Wells nor McMillan was facing any assault charges or other offenses related to the shooting, the investigations of their alleged involvement in the violence remained open as of Thursday, meaning more charges could be filed later, Henneberry said.As of Thursday, none of the other suspects charged alongside Nash in September was facing any charges in relation to the June 27 homicide or either of the other shootings Nash was linked to, according to Smith, who also indicated that those investigations remained ongoing.Nash, of the 1400 block of Key Parkway, has remained held without bail in the Frederick County Adult Detention Center since his initial arrest on drug charges in September, according to online court records. Nash waived his bail review hearing Thursday afternoon in Frederick County Circuit Court.Follow Jeremy Arias on Twitter: @Jarias_Prime.NashWellsFrederick police charged a woman with two counts of being an accessory to the brutal, ambush-style shooting death of a Frederick man in June 2…Jeremy Arias is the Frederick city and government reporter for The Frederick News-Post.Yep, because Stop and Frisk dont work, right. CheersYep, because Stop and Frisk dont work, right. CheersSo, the gang issue was supposedly being taken care of over 10 years ago. It's great that this POS is currently off the grid.... only because he is linked to murder. Why is there still the allowance of gang activity in Frederick today?So, the gang issue was supposedly being taken care of over 10 years ago. It's great that this POS is currently off the grid.... only because he is linked to murder. Why is there still the allowance of gang activity in Frederick today?As I read thisFNPnews story I noticed it alleged the suspect is a local gang member.I vividly recall back when Sherf Jenkins initially campaigned for Sheriff, one of his campaign promises was to "go after the gangs". Not only was this one of his promises, it was one of his top three core promises.I can hear the responses now "Kelly, this is in the city, not the county, don't you know anything". And my response in anticipation to that is: hey, this was the Sherf's promise. His promise. His campaign. He owns it. And last I checked, the city is in the county and the city residents and property owners pay county taxes and vote in the county elections.To this day, the sherf has not coordinated with the city to implement any activity to going after the gangs. As I read the story at hand, I can not help buy wonder would this killing, would this drug dealing, have taken place had the sherf fulfilled his promise from his initial campaign?Note: anyone not aware of the sherf making such a promise, there is video from Frederick Cablevision of the sherf talking about this. Or, feel free to ask the Sherf himself. Feel free to ask the FNP to dig through their files.[copy made]As I read thisFNPnews story I noticed it alleged the suspect is a local gang member.I vividly recall back when Sherf Jenkins initially campaigned for Sheriff, one of his campaign promises was to "go after the gangs". Not only was this one of his promises, it was one of his top three core promises.I can hear the responses now "Kelly, this is in the city, not the county, don't you know anything". And my response in anticipation to that is: hey, this was the Sherf's promise. His promise. His campaign. He owns it. And last I checked, the city is in the county and the city residents and property owners pay county taxes and vote in the county elections.To this day, the sherf has not coordinated with the city to implement any activity to going after the gangs. As I read the story at hand, I can not help buy wonder would this killing, would this drug dealing, have taken place had the sherf fulfilled his promise from his initial campaign?Note: anyone not aware of the sherf making such a promise, there is video from Frederick Cablevision of the sherf talking about this. Or, feel free to ask the Sherf himself. Feel free to ask the FNP to dig through their files.[copy made]Thank you legislators for doing away with the death penalty.Thank you legislators for doing away with the death penalty.Awesome work City PD!Awesome work City PD!Finally, a positive comment fromYou, you must of had some nice company last night 👍🏻Finally, a positive comment fromYou, you must of had some nice company last night 👍🏻nice company last night?nice company last night?Rewarding Informants encourages criminals i to partake in criminal activity.Rewarding Informants encourages criminals i to partake in criminal activity.I'm not quite sure I understand the reasoning behind why a confidant in a court case is eventually identified to those who may cause harm to that individual. As recently as yesterday I read about a court case in NY where a confidant was murdered after his name was released prior to an MS-13 trial. According to the FNP article this is a practice across the country. It isn't any wonder why people are often reluctant to be a cooperating witness.I'm not quite sure I understand the reasoning behind why a confidant in a court case is eventually identified to those who may cause harm to that individual. As recently as yesterday I read about a court case in NY where a confidant was murdered after his name was released prior to an MS-13 trial. According to the FNP article this is a practice across the country. It isn't any wonder why people are often reluctant to be a cooperating witness.Exactly dcmetro, great point.Prosecutors seem too focused on winning the case at all costs -- even if it means the death of witnesses.Exactly dcmetro, great point.Prosecutors seem too focused on winning the case at all costs -- even if it means the death of witnesses.Great reporting FNP. Sad to learn of this underbelly of our community.Great reporting FNP. Sad to learn of this underbelly of our community.Thanks police officers. But it is high time Charlie Smith be put out to pasture. He's not tough on criminals.Thanks police officers. But it is high time Charlie Smith be put out to pasture. He's not tough on criminals.As long as drugs, prostitution, & gambling are illegal or inconvenient, there will be organized crime associated with these rackets. I get it people don’t want these things in their communities...I don’t either. Guess what? They are already in our community. Plus we get to have the associated violence that comes along with the prohibition policy. We’ve been doing things the same way so long people don’t even remember that there used to be a different, more effective way. Time for a change.As long as drugs, prostitution, & gambling are illegal or inconvenient, there will be organized crime associated with these rackets. I get it people don’t want these things in their communities...I don’t either. Guess what? They are already in our community. Plus we get to have the associated violence that comes along with the prohibition policy. We’ve been doing things the same way so long people don’t even remember that there used to be a different, more effective way. Time for a change.Plumbum, Terms of Use Rule #5:Be truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone or anything.The Sheriff never said what you claimed he did. Please link to one article that you claimed was in the FNP where he said that.Plumbum, Terms of Use Rule #5:Be truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone or anything.The Sheriff never said what you claimed he did. Please link to one article that you claimed was in the FNP where he said that.You are 200% incorrect.The sheriff based his initialCampaign on a few different promises. And one of them he was hard and heavy in promising to “go after the gangs”. There is video of him on camera at Frederick Cablevision making this promise.I am sorry that you do not like me.We have never met.I am sorry that my posts make you upset. So much that you trollMy every post. It’s gotten to you very deep.But, charles a Jenkins certainly made that promise. It was one of his core promises. And I bet someone put here still has one of his campaign pamphlets, with that stated.The news story mentions “gang”.And the Sherf’s initial campaign promised, and i quote word from word “to go after the gangs”.His exact words.And since my post was deleted (but will be resubmitted because it pertains to the FNP story - yes, I realize this crime was in the city. And yes, the city is in the county. And yes, the city residents vote for county officials, too.Copy madeYou are 200% incorrect.The sheriff based his initialCampaign on a few different promises. And one of them he was hard and heavy in promising to “go after the gangs”. There is video of him on camera at Frederick Cablevision making this promise.I am sorry that you do not like me.We have never met.I am sorry that my posts make you upset. So much that you trollMy every post. It’s gotten to you very deep.But, charles a Jenkins certainly made that promise. It was one of his core promises. And I bet someone put here still has one of his campaign pamphlets, with that stated.The news story mentions “gang”.And the Sherf’s initial campaign promised, and i quote word from word “to go after the gangs”.His exact words.And since my post was deleted (but will be resubmitted because it pertains to the FNP story - yes, I realize this crime was in the city. And yes, the city is in the county. And yes, the city residents vote for county officials, too.Copy madePlumbum, I have nothing against you personally at all, and your posts don't upset me. What I do object to is your constant, clearly personal tirades against the Sheriff. You said that he said that "only illegal immigrants commit these kinds of crimes", which was the lie that I called you on. Unfortunately, your post was deleted, and will be again if you post it again without documentation. If it's in this paper, provide the link. As for trolling, that is exactly what you are doing with such posts. Look up the definition. I am merely responding to you. Don't like responses? Dont post such stuff. Simple right? There are lots of things that I agree with you on, and have given you 👍many times.Plumbum, I have nothing against you personally at all, and your posts don't upset me. What I do object to is your constant, clearly personal tirades against the Sheriff. You said that he said that "only illegal immigrants commit these kinds of crimes", which was the lie that I called you on. Unfortunately, your post was deleted, and will be again if you post it again without documentation. If it's in this paper, provide the link. As for trolling, that is exactly what you are doing with such posts. Look up the definition. I am merely responding to you. Don't like responses? Dont post such stuff. Simple right? There are lots of things that I agree with you on, and have given you 👍many times.No way will I read all that.Bottom line If you don’t like my comments - don’t read them. You’re the only one here who hasn’t figured out that you can’t change meNo way will I read all that.Bottom line If you don’t like my comments - don’t read them. You’re the only one here who hasn’t figured out that you can’t change meNot trying to change you Plumbum. Just don't lie. Simple, right? Apparently the FNP agrees, because they deleted your post containing your lie It's a pity that you are unable to read six lines.Not trying to change you Plumbum. Just don't lie. Simple, right? Apparently the FNP agrees, because they deleted your post containing your lie It's a pity that you are unable to read six lines.I didn’t lie. Trumpkins based his initial campaign on the aforementioned promise. It’s not debatable, because he did.Look - no one cares what you think. You think people care, but no one does.No one cares what I think. The differences between you and me is that I know no one cares. You don’t.You are irrelevant to me. This is cyberspace, not a side by side work place. Not a church. Not a social gathering. Not family. Just cyber space. And that’s it. Do as you want with your time, but understand, you are not relevant.I didn’t lie. Trumpkins based his initial campaign on the aforementioned promise. It’s not debatable, because he did.Look - no one cares what you think. You think people care, but no one does.No one cares what I think. The differences between you and me is that I know no one cares. You don’t.You are irrelevant to me. This is cyberspace, not a side by side work place. Not a church. Not a social gathering. Not family. Just cyber space. And that’s it. Do as you want with your time, but understand, you are not relevant.That is not what I am calling you on Plumbum, and you know it. Let's try again, you wrote last night that the Sheriff said"only illegal immigrants commit these kinds of crimes", and your post was promptly removed because the FNP saw the lie for what it was...libel. Nobody cares? You apparently have a problem with people that can provide a rational argument, disproving your tirades, and I will keep doing just that. Yes, you care, because you just provided a six line response to my two-line response, and the reason for my post was stated several times here already. If you didn't want others to care about what you write, why do you write it in such a public space after all, for others to read? Send your complaints directly to the Sheriff for consideration. Cognitive dissonance.That is not what I am calling you on Plumbum, and you know it. Let's try again, you wrote last night that the Sheriff said"only illegal immigrants commit these kinds of crimes", and your post was promptly removed because the FNP saw the lie for what it was...libel. Nobody cares? You apparently have a problem with people that can provide a rational argument, disproving your tirades, and I will keep doing just that. Yes, you care, because you just provided a six line response to my two-line response, and the reason for my post was stated several times here already. If you didn't want others to care about what you write, why do you write it in such a public space after all, for others to read? Send your complaints directly to the Sheriff for consideration. Cognitive dissonance.But you must admit that the Sheriff generally means "MS-13" when he says gangs. I've never heard him mention this one. But I've heard him mention "MS-13" a lot. It is similar to the way many right-wingers view terrorism; they define it to themselves as "muslims" so any right-wing domestic terrorism doesn't count as terrorism to them.But you must admit that the Sheriff generally means "MS-13" when he says gangs. I've never heard him mention this one. But I've heard him mention "MS-13" a lot. It is similar to the way many right-wingers view terrorism; they define it to themselves as "muslims" so any right-wing domestic terrorism doesn't count as terrorism to them.Shiftless, oh, absolutely agreed. He uses MS-13 as shorthand for gangs. Fact is, we have several operating gangs in this area, including MS-13, 18th Street, PA-32, and a few others to a lesser extent. See links below. Also agreed about who participates in terrorism. We have many, many domestic terrorists here of all religious, ethnic, and cultural stripe.https://www.justice.gov/usao-md/gangshttp://www.mcac.maryland.gov/newsroom/Gang%20Newshttps://www.nationalgangcenter.gov/gang-related-news?st=mdShiftless, oh, absolutely agreed. He uses MS-13 as shorthand for gangs. Fact is, we have several operating gangs in this area, including MS-13, 18th Street, PA-32, and a few others to a lesser extent. See links below. Also agreed about who participates in terrorism. We have many, many domestic terrorists here of all religious, ethnic, and cultural stripe.https://www.justice.gov/usao-md/gangshttp://www.mcac.maryland.gov/newsroom/Gang%20Newshttps://www.nationalgangcenter.gov/gang-related-news?st=mdGabe; I finally figured out your nickname for Kelly! I knew what Pb was but hadn't really paid attention to her avatar. Clever!Gabe; I finally figured out your nickname for Kelly! I knew what Pb was but hadn't really paid attention to her avatar. Clever!Thanks shiftless. I never could understand why they would choose lead. Gold, silver, bronze, etc. OK. But lead? [wink]Thanks shiftless. I never could understand why they would choose lead. Gold, silver, bronze, etc. OK. But lead? [wink]Great comments to Kelly Q. gabe, absolutely great! And yeah, lead is very, very dull..... [lol]Great comments to Kelly Q. gabe, absolutely great! And yeah, lead is very, very dull..... [lol]Quote"""We refer to them as confidential informants and, should they be called to testify, at that point in time we have to identify them, but the law allows us to keep them confidential until that point," Smith said, adding that he did not believe either the police department or his office would change how they handle informants as a result of Knight's death."~~~With this murder and the above statement in mind, why would anyone agree to be a CI and/or a witness against someone who is clearly capable of murder?!The ONLY way I can see a person even considering being a CI is if a) the prosecutor has a lot on them and they are willing to drop it all, and b) they have a signed document confirming that they will be placed into WITSEC immediately.Outside of that, it's clear that the CI's are just being used. A means to and end. Their lives are put in danger because, hey, why not? They're criminals themselves, so if they are murdered, well, they had it coming, right?Quote"""We refer to them as confidential informants and, should they be called to testify, at that point in time we have to identify them, but the law allows us to keep them confidential until that point," Smith said, adding that he did not believe either the police department or his office would change how they handle informants as a result of Knight's death."~~~With this murder and the above statement in mind, why would anyone agree to be a CI and/or a witness against someone who is clearly capable of murder?!The ONLY way I can see a person even considering being a CI is if a) the prosecutor has a lot on them and they are willing to drop it all, and b) they have a signed document confirming that they will be placed into WITSEC immediately.Outside of that, it's clear that the CI's are just being used. A means to and end. Their lives are put in danger because, hey, why not? They're criminals themselves, so if they are murdered, well, they had it coming, right?I have to agree mrnatural. If there is to be a working relationship between law enforcement and the citizenry, citizens must have confidence that law enforcement will be there to protect them, and not be there to clean up a crime scene. This is one of the major reasons for the continued murders in Baltimore. People are afraid to come forward because the police can't, and the justice system won't, protect them.I have to agree mrnatural. If there is to be a working relationship between law enforcement and the citizenry, citizens must have confidence that law enforcement will be there to protect them, and not be there to clean up a crime scene. This is one of the major reasons for the continued murders in Baltimore. People are afraid to come forward because the police can't, and the justice system won't, protect them.Log InKeep it clean.No vulgar, racist, sexist or
sexually-oriented language.Engage ideas.This forum is for the exchange of
ideas, not personal attacks or ad hominem criticisms.TURN OFF CAPS LOCK.Be civil.Don't threaten. Don't lie.
Don't bait. Don't degrade others.No trolling.Stay on topic.No spamming.This is not the place to sell miracle
cures.No deceptive names.Apparently misleading
usernames are not allowed.Say it once.No repetitive posts, please.Help us.Use the 'Report' link for abusive
posts.We have used your information to see if you have a subscription with us, but did not find one. Please use the button below to verify an existing account or to purchase a new subscription.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content. Please use the button below to manage your account.Looking to hire in Frederick? Reach jobseekers in print and online. Email recruitment@newspost.com.Keep the conversation about local news & events going by joining us on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram. Recent updates from The News-Post and also from News-Post staff members are compiled below.Our local business directory includes detailed information for featured businesses as well as customer reviews and direct links to related events.Stay informed of daily news & events in your community for as little as $1.99 a week.Become a MemberThe Frederick News-Post is printed byFNP Printing and Publishing.Filed under:They were on the front porch in the 7100 block of South Paulina Street when they heard gunshots, police said.Two people were killed, and three others wounded Saturday when they were shot in Englewood on the South Side.They were on the front porch of a home about 5:51 p.m. in the 7100 block of South Paulina Street when they heard gunfire, Chicago police said.Jintel Cutler, 32, and 26-year-old Mack D. Dickson were killed, police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said. Cutler, who lived in Lawndale, was shot in the chest and thigh and pronounced dead at the University of Chicago Medical Center.Dickson was hit in the chest and pronounced at Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, authorities said. He lived in the Back of the Yards.An autopsy Sunday ruled both of their deaths to be homicides, the medical examiner’s office said.A 38-year-old man who was shot in the lower back had his condition stabilized at the same hospital, police said.A woman, 25, was struck in the abdomen and taken to St. Bernard Hospital in critical condition, police said. She was to be transferred to Stroger Hospital.A 27-year-old man was shot in the arm, and his condition was stabilized at St. Bernard Hospital, police said.Witnesses told police they did not see who fired the shots, but one told investigators a dark-colored vehicle drove off from the scene, police said.No arrests have been made. Area South detectives are investigating.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Investigative ReporterDeangelo Parnell ... charged with attempted murder.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) – A teenageraccused of shooting nine peopleat a high schoolfootball game at Ladd-Peebles Stadiumtwo years got some help Thursday from an unlikely witness – the mother of the one of the victims.Sharonda Pettway, one of the victims of the Aug. 30, 2019, mass shooting, testified in support of Deangelo Dejuan Parnell’s bid for “youthful offender” status. If granted, court records in the case would be sealed and the defendant’s punishment would be limited to no more than three years in prison.Pettway said her son was shot in the back of the neck. But she testified that she does not believe Parnell, 19, should be treated as an adult.“Kids, they make dumb decisions. … Every child does deserve an opportunity,” Pettway said from the witness stand.Mobile County Assistant District Attorney Jennifer Wright argued that Pettway’s testimony is irrelevant because her opinion is not at issue. She also argued in court that Pettway does not have access to the defendant’s school records and jail disciplinary reports that demonstrate his “propensity for fighting.”Mobile County Circuit Judge James Patterson did not rule in the case in order to give attorneys on both sides a chance to submit written arguments about whether the media should be allowed at the hearing and about whether to accept the school and jail records in to evidence.Parnell was 17 when police charged him with nine counts of attempted murder in what Mobile Police Chief Lawrence Battiste at the time called a “cowardly act.”The incident prompted the Mobile County Public School System totighten securityat its football games.Police have said they believe there was a second shooter that evening, but no one else has been arrested.Authorities have said that the shooting resulted when Parnell, a LeFlore High School student,intervened in an argumentbetween two other people during the game between LeFlore and Williamson High School.The hearing will resume April 15.All content © 2021, WALA; Mobile, AL. (A Meredith Corporation Station). All Rights Reserved.Deangelo Parnell ... charged with attempted murder.Investigative ReporterLog InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.MOBILE, ALA. (WALA)- A local gymnast is flipping her way to the top. Brie Clark completed a move very few have ever done and it's getting her a lot of attention.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- Mobile Police said a man was shot and killed Tuesday night on Three Notch Road.FOX10 viewers are starting to send in photos and video clips of of big hail falling in south Baldwin County as a line of severe weather moves through the region.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- Police arrested a woman Sunday morning after the end of a high-speed chase through Theodore and Irvington.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) -- A Prichard police officer was arrested Tuesday night for ethics violations and computer tampering charges.MOBILE, ALA. (WALA)- Mobile Police arrested a woman accused of stealing mail in Midtown. It's an exclusive story we first told you about earlier this week.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) – A planned “logistics” development off of Interstate 10 could transform the way companies move products in and out of the Port of Mobile and create thousands of well-paying jobs.The Mobile Airport Authority is another step closer to relocating passenger air service from West Mobile to Downtown.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) --The Federal Aviation Administration approved a plan by the Mobile Airport Authority to move all passenger air service to a new international airport terminal at Brookley Field.MOBILE, Ala. (WALA) – A federal database gathering reports of COVID-19 vaccine side effects shows almost 400 instances in Alabama, including 23 people who died shortly after getting the shots.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Would you like to receive breaking news?Signup today!The latest COVID-19 headlines delivered to your inbox every day.Would you like to receive our daily news?Signup today!Would you like to receive the daily weather Outlook?Signup today!KOB Web StaffCreated: January 15, 2020 05:26 PMALBUQUERQUE, N.M.- The man who police saypulled the trigger at a house party in Hobbsis facing charges for the murders of three people.Initially, Bishop Henderson was charged with assault after witnesses told police they saw him shoot a man in the face.However, Henderson is now charged with three counts of first-degree murder for the deaths of Kristal Avena, Khalil Carter and Lamar Lee-Kane.Court documents do not indicate why investigators now believe Henderson fired the deadly shots.At his initial arraignment, witnesses described seeing shots come from a nearby alley.Copyright 2020 - KOB-TV LLC, A Hubbard Broadcasting CompanyShare a News Tip, Story Idea, Photo, VideoContact|Public Files & EEO|Careers|AdvertisingFCC Public Inspection Files:|KOB|KOBF|KOBRAny person with disabilities who needs help accessing the content of the FCC Public File may contact KOB via our online form or call 505-243-4411.FCC Applications|Privacy Policy|Terms of Use|DMCA Notice|Do Not Sell My Info|Contest Rules|Site MapThis website is not intended for users located within the European Economic Area.©KOB-TV, LLCA Hubbard Broadcasting CompanyCHICAGO (CBS)— Gun violence left at last five people dead and 19 more wounded around the city this weekend as of late Sunday afternoon, according to police reports.The first deadly shooting happened at 8:16 p.m. Friday in the 4200 block of West Iowa Street on the city’s West Side. A 34-year-old man and a 28-year-old woman were approached by someone who fired shots, police said.The man was struck seven times and was pronounced dead at Mount Sinai Hospital, police said. The woman was struck once in the chest, back, and arm, and was taken to the same hospital in critical condition, police said.Around 12:05 a.m. Sunday, a 60-year-old man was shot in the head while walking in the alleybehind the 9500 block of South University Avenue, police said. Police said they had not identified any witnesses to the actual shooting, but someone saw an unknown number of people running down the alley after the shots were fired.The victim was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in critical condition, and was later pronounced dead at the hospital, police said. He was identified as Donald Ruben of the Park Manor neighborhood.Another man was shot and killed in broad daylight Saturday in the East Garfield Park neighborhood. The 22-year-old man was standing on the sidewalk in the 3700 block of West Ohio Street around 4:38 p.m., when a silver Infinity zoomed by heading east on Ohio Street from Ridgeway Avenue and someone inside fired shots.The man suffered gunshot wounds around his body and was pronounced dead a Stroger Hospital of Cook County, police said.A third man was shot dead Saturday evening in the 200 block of East 41st Street, police said. The 27-year-old man was traveling in a vehicle when a black sport-utility vehicle pulled up next to him and someone inside fired shots, police said.The man was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center where he was later pronounced dead, police said. The black SUV fled west on 41st Street, police said.And just after 3:30 a.m. Sunday, shots were fired into a crowd of 30 to 40 people inthe 8200 block of South Maryland Avenue– striking four people. A 17-year-old boy suffered gunshot wounds to the neck and was pronounced dead a short time afterward at the University of Chicago Medical Center, police said.The boy who was killed was identified as Dontevon Gates. He lived a few blocks away, according to the Cook County Medical Examiner’s office.A 20-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the hand in the incident, a 24-year-old woman suffered a gunshot to the face, and lastly, an adult woman who was uncooperative with police and would not identify herself suffered a graze wound to the arm, police said.The three surviving victims were also taken to the U of C Medical Center, where their conditions were stabilized.Victims and witnesses have given varying accounts of what happened, police said.Other incidents included a shooting that spilled intoa Washington Heights flower shopin daylight hours Saturday. The gunfire erupted in the 9300 block of South Halsted Street around 11:30 a.m., and the 36-year-old owner of the Roses Are Red Flower Boutique was shot in the foot while inside his business, police said.At least one bullet hole was left in the flower shop, and spent shell casings were seen lying on the sidewalk. The motive for the shooting was not clear late Saturday afternoon.Earlier, two men were wounded in a shooting around 8:27 p.m. Friday in the 1800 block of South Keeler Avenue. The men, both 26, were on the sidewalk when one was shot in the right thigh and the other in the elbow. Both were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital – the first in good condition, the second in an unknown condition, police said.At 9:44 a.m. Saturday, a 38-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the head in the 2200 block of South Kirkland Avenue and was rushed to Mount Sinai in critical condition, police said. The circumstances of the shooting remained unclear Sunday afternoon.A 29-year-old man was also left in critical condition after being shot around the body around 2:40 p.m. Saturday in the 6700 block of South Ada Street, police said. The man was shot by someone in a gray vehicle that headed north on Ada Street from the location, police said. The victim found his own way to St. Bernard Hospital and was later transferred to Stroger Hospital of Cook County, police said.A gathering at an apartment that apparently went sour left two men shot and wounded around 1:36 a.m. Sunday in the 7900 block of South Wood Street. The men, ages 26 and 37, were shot by the male friend of a relative who had just been asked to leave the apartment following a quarrel, police said. The gunman fired shots from the back porch into the apartment, police said.The younger man who was shot was taken to Advocate Christ Medical Center with two gunshot wounds to the abdomen, and his condition was stabilized, police said. The older man was shot in the leg and was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in good condition, police said.And while no one was injured,shots were fired by an offender and an off-duty police officerin an incident at 91st Street and Ellis Avenue around 2:30 a.m. Saturday, police said.According to police, someone driving a blue KIA sedan was accosted at 91st Street and Ellis Avenue by three men in two different cars around 2:30 a.m. That someone happened to be an off-duty Chicago Police officer, who had just parked his car when vehicles rolled up and the men got out, police said.Police said when the officer showed the offenders his weapon, they fired, and he fired back. No one was struck, and the three men ran back to their cars and sped off, police said.Bullet holes were left in several cars parked outside as evidence of the intense shootout. Shell casings were also left strewn on the ground. Neighbors were especially distraught, since just last weekend, the intersection of 92nd and Ellis just a block away was also covered in police tape.Lakiya Charleston, 12, had been struck twice by bullets not meant for her.Neighbor Melita Gordon told CBS 2’s Eric Cox she has had to talk to her granddaughter about gun violence.“I have to explain to her what gun casings are and why these yellow things are here,” she said.News and Information from the Prince George's County Police DepartmentPost a CommentYou have 4 free articles left this month.LYNN — A third person has been charged with murder in connection with afatal quadruple shooting at Warren Street Playgroundin August, prosecutors said.Kenneil Hammond, 31, was arrested New Jersey State Police on Sept. 18 and brought back to the city to be booked by Lynn Police last Friday.Hammond andtwo suspects arrested days after the shooting, Rogelleo Morrison, 43, of Lynn, and Luis Falcon, 25, of Dorchester, were indicted by an Essex County Grand Jury on Thursday for an Aug. 24 shooting that left a man dead and injured three others, according to the Essex County District Attorney’s office.Hammond and Morrison were indicted for murder, three counts of assault and battery by discharging a firearm and three counts of armed assault with intent to murder. Falcon was indicted for murder, prosecutors said.The men are charged in connection with opening fire at Warren Street Playground around 7:30 p.m., when more than 100 people were attending a youth basketball tournament.Brandon Jesurum, 34, died after he was shot multiple times at close range, including in the head. Two women, 18 and 20 years old, and a 49-year-old man were also shot, but survived their injuries.Prosecutors said there were two active shooters that evening. Morrison was identified by authorities as the unmasked shooter, and the second, masked shooter remained at large for more than a month. Authorities allege Hammond is that second shooter. Falcon was allegedly the getaway driver.The three suspects will be arraigned at Salem Superior Court at a date that has not been scheduled yet.The Winthrop football team was able to check one goal off of its list Friday night, battling back and forth© 2021 Copyright Itemlive. Website designed and developed bySperling Interactive.UsernamePasswordRemember MeRose-Ann Aragon, ReporterAaron Barker, Senior Digital EditorRose-Ann Aragon, ReporterAaron Barker, Senior Digital EditorHOUSTON– Three people have been killed and two others have been injured in a pair of shootings in southeast Houston, police said.The first shooting was reported about 12:30 p.m. on Southwind Street, near Calhoun Road. Police said two people were killed and two others were injured in that shooting.Investigators said they got a call about shots being fired from a white Chevy Impala. Within six minutes, police arrived to find a dead man's body on the ground with multiple gunshot wounds.Police said was a man shot in the head area, possibly the ear, was found in the back seat of a Pontiac Grand Prix. Also in the car was another man and a woman who were both shot. The three wounded victims were taken to a hospital. While the woman and the man who was shot in the head area survived, the other man died.As far as evidence, no weapons were found, but several 9mm rounds were found at the scene. A witness, who is not cooperating with police, is a documented gang member, according to Chief Pete Lopez. Lopez said they are treating the case as an act of gang violence.The second shooting happened about a half-hour later on Clearway Drive, about 3 miles away from the first shooting scene. Police said the same Chevy Impala which was spotted at the first scene was found on the 9300 block of Clearway. When police arrived, they said they found one man shot in the chest. That person was taken to the hospital and later died. There was another person found in the car."Inside the car was another black male who is being detained but is not being cooperative, so we're going to process him as a potential suspect. There were no weapons recovered at the scene on Clearway but there were several .223 mm rifle rounds found at that scene," Lopez said.Police said the two shootings are related."At this time we believe it's possibly gang-related. One of the witnesses here at this scene [on Southwind] is a documented gang member, so that's how we're going to treat this scene," Lopez said. "We're also going to help out and put more resources in this area and tactical teams to make sure that we avoid any possible retaliation shootings."Copyright 2019 by KPRC Click2Houston - All rights reserved.Aaron Barker has been a senior digital editor at KPRC 2 since 2016. As a meteorologist, he specializes in stories about the weather. He has covered Hurricane Harvey, the Astros first World Series win, the Santa Fe High School shooting, the ITC fire and Tropical Storm Imelda.If you need help with the Public File, call (713) 778-4745.ST. LOUIS — In the 24 hours since a Friday evening quadruple shooting killed an 8-year-old girl, at least six more people were shot in the city, bringing the total number of victims to 10.RELATED:8-year-old girl killed in shooting near Soldan High School identifiedThe victims include a female who was shot fatally in the head and a 16-year-old boy who was shot in the face.Here's a breakdown of all the shootings the St. Louis Police Department has responded between 8 p.m. Friday and 8 p.m. Saturday:RELATED:8-year-old killed, 2 teens and an adult injured in shooting near Soldan High School after football jamboreeThree people were also found dead in an apartment in the Downtown West neighborhood at around 2:30 p.m. on Saturday. Police said they had injuries but did not say how they died. A homicide investigation is underway.RELATED:Police: 3 found dead in apartment in Downtown West neighborhoodNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.COLUMBIA, S.C. — A man has been arrested in connection with a double homicide at McCary’s Bar and Grill in Columbia.Ernest Condre Bethel, 26, was arrested on two counts of murder, two counts of attempted murder, and possession of a firearm during the commission of a violent crime in Thomasville, N.C.RELATED:Second man killed at Columbia bar identifiedAccording to the Richland County Sheriff's Department, Bethel was captured after failing to stop for a traffic checkpoint conducted by the Thomasville Police Department. Officers initiated a chase and Bethel crashed the vehicle, which he had stolen earlier in the day from Rowan County N.C., and took officers on a foot chase before surrendering. He was not armed when he was captured.RELATED:'Nobody deserved any of this': Friend remembers victim in Columbia bar shootingBethel will be extradited to Richland County. He was wanted for shooting at McCary’s Bar and Grill on Aug. 22, after he was told to leave the establishment. Four people were injured in the shooting; two died from their injuries.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.LOS ANGELES (CBSLA)— A social worker and a security guard were among four people who were injured in a shooting near Skid Row in downtown Los Angeles Thursday afternoon.Police responded to shots fired near Fifth and San Julian Street around 12:15 p.m.According to investigators, a white SUV with a female and male inside pulled up to a park where homeless people gather and at least one of the occupants called out before shots were fired.“There was some sort of altercation between the occupants of that vehicle and a person inside the park. All four victims were inside of the park. What we believe to be our intended victim was struck with non-life-threatening wounds to the upper leg,” said LAPD Capt. Scott Harrelson.The four victims were taken to a hospital in serious but stable condition.The Los Angeles Fire Department later described the victims as two 28-year-old women, a 45-year-old woman, and a 65-year-old man.One person shot was later described as a social worker and another was working as a security guard.The LAPD was searching for the two suspects who were seen fleeing the area in the white SUV.It was not immediately clear what led up to the shooting.ATLANTA (CBS46) – Atlanta Police arrested the man they believe was the second gunman responsible for a shooting at a late-night block party at Clark Atlanta University that left four people injured.APD said Monday authorities arrested Ahmad Coleman, 25, in Mississippi last Thursday. The arrest was made with assistance from U.S. Marshals. Coleman is currently in Mississippi awaiting an extradition hearing on charges including: attempted murder, aggravated assault, aggravated battery, possession of a firearm during commission of a felony and reckless conduct.On August 20th, two Spelman College students and two Clark Atlanta University students were injured by stray bullets near the AUC library. Police previously released a video showing the person they believe was Coleman. In the video, a black male is seen wearing a black jacket with a white stripe on the sleeve. The man is also wearing what police believe are green camouflage pants and dark sneakers.The first suspect, Isaiah Williams, surrendered to police on Sept. 4. The 20-year-old is charged with aggravated assault, aggravated battery, possession of a firearm during the commission of a felony, and criminal attempt to commit murder. A judge denied bond in the case.Police said Coleman was out on a signature bond from the Fulton County jail for another shooting incident when he allegedly used an assault rifle to shoot up an apartment complex over two consecutive days.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.KANSAS CITY, MO (KCTV) - Police are investigating after four teens were found shot in a Plaza hotel room.At about 3:20 a.m. on Sunday morning, police were dispatched to the Sheraton Hotel on the Plaza, 770 W. 47th St., on a shooting call on a floor of the hotel in a room.When they arrived, they found four teens shot inside a hotel room. Two of the teens are in life-threatening condition, the other two have non-life threatening injuries.According to police, there was a gathering of teens in the room and at some point, an argument broke out that led to gunfire, at least one suspect firing multiple rounds.Numerous officers worked with hotel staff to search the hotel for any suspects and ensure the safety of the guests.After an extensive search, it is believed the suspect or suspects left the hotel in an unknown direction after the shooting.Detectives and crime scene personnel were processing the scene in the hotel room and interviewing any potential witnesses at the time.If anyone has any information about who may be responsible for this shooting, call the TIPS Hotline at 816-474-TIPS.KCTV5.comis now with you on the go! Get the latest news updates and video, StormTrack5 weather forecast, weather radar, special investigative reports, sports headlines and much more from KCTV5 News.>>Click/tap here to download our freemobile app. <<Copyright 2019KCTV(Meredith Corp.) All rights reserved.Authorities say four teens have been wounded in a shooting at hotel at an upscale shopping and dining district in Kansas City.Authorities say four teens have been wounded in a shooting at hotel at an upscale shopping and dining district in Kansas City.Log InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Kansas City is about to expand temporary housing for those experiencing homelessness.The homeless camp in front of city hall has a notice to vacate by the end of the day tomorrow.Here's where people in the Kansas City area can find coronavirus vaccine information from the major hospital providers and county health departments.KANSAS CITY, MO (KCTV) --- One person has died following a crash that turned into a car fire on Sunday afternoon.Missouri State Highway Patrol Troop A found 88 pounds of meth in a VW Jetta today, according to their Twitter account. Three people were taken into custody.Tulsa police arrested a man accused of stalking a former coworker, trying to kidnap her, and shooting her husband, police officials said.An unoccupied pickup was hit by a train early Thursday morning outside of Spring Hill, according to the Johnson County Sheriff's Office.VHS/JFC 8-19-19Inc #106072419Home•311 Help & Info•Contact Us•FAQs•Privacy Policy•CitizensNetA 16-year-old has been arrested and charged with multiple counts of murder in an Aug. 15 shooting just off the campus of Alabama State University.Montgomery Police say Charlie “CJ” Jackson, 16, was taken into custody Tuesday morning by the U.S. Marshals Fugitive Task Force. He faces two counts of murder and two counts of second-degree assault. MPD said he was taken to the Montgomery County Detention Facility and is being held on bonds totaling $333,000.He’s the second suspect arrested in the incident. Police charged Anthony Thomas, 27, on Sept. 24. Thomas was out on bond in a 2017 murder case at the time of the shooting, which happened days after the school semester began.Jacquez Hall, a 21-year-old student at Alabama State, and 24-year-old Justin Martin died at the off-campus gathering on North University Drive between the Paterson Court housing complex and the old football stadium.Police said after the initial investigation that the shooting happened during a drug transaction, and they identified Jackson and Thomas as the suspects.Bro Krift contributed to this report.WATCHVIDEOSMore Philly violence saw chase, 5 people shot@PPDCommishon scene of quintuple shooting on the 5800 block of North 15th Street@6abcpic.twitter.com/drZrAD0rxfAppears shooting may have happened in the middle of the street. Detectives outlined bullets in white chalk.@6abcpic.twitter.com/onIZNNfj6iTwo men were killed and three women were injured in a shooting late Tuesday night in Tacoma.Police were called to reports of gunshots in the 2100 block of East 38th Street and East Roosevelt Avenue around 11:40 p.m."He went like this, ‘boom, boom, boom, boom, boom,’ and then he was over there and he said, ‘boom, boom, boom, boom, boom,’ like that,” said William Satiacum.Satiacum is angry and upset.His nephew, Rigoberto Villagomez-Dillon, was shot and killed Tuesday night in east Tacoma."It hurts. I was crying most of the morning. I'm sorry, I'm just frustrated, overwhelmed, if you could say. It hurts, he was my nephew,” he said.Satiacum said the shooting happened just feet from his home."[My nephew] was on this side of the Jeep and that's where he got shot, right here,” he said.KIRO 7 crews spotted bullet holes in the side of the Jeep.Tacoma police said five people were shot.The Pierce County Medical Examiner’s Office said Antonie Holmes, 26, and Villagomez-Dillon, 19, died from multiple gunshot wounds. Their deaths are being investigated as homicides.Villagomez-Dillon's aunt said her nephew was kind."He was a good kid and he was loved by many, by many, and he didn't deserve it, not at all,” said Ara Hoptowit.People in the neighborhood said they’re used to hearing gunshots.“It's hard, I grew up on the east side, a lot of violence happens here,” said Satiacum.Tuesday night was the first time it's hit this close to home."It's cruel, it's evil, the shooting and the guns have got to stop. Stop killing each other. It's not good to us family members who have to suffer in the end,” said Hoptowit.The three woman who were shot went to the hospital to be treated. Police said they will fully recover from their injuries.Police are still searching for the suspect.More news from KIRO 7DOWNLOAD OUR FREE NEWS APPFiled under:Someone in a vehicle fired shots as a crowd of people gathered in the 3500 block of West Lake Street.At least six people, including five women, were wounded in a shooting Sunday in Garfield Park on the West Side.They were standing on the street with a large group of people about 2:47 a.m. in the 3500 block of West Lake Street when someone in a light-colored sedan unleashed gunfire, Chicago police said.A man, 25, was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in critical condition with a gunshot wound to the back, police said.Three women were taken to the same hospital, police said. A 32-year-old was hit in the shoulder, and another 32-year-old was struck in the neck and face. The third woman, 27, was shot in the leg. All their conditions were stabilized.Two other women were taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The women, 37 and 38, had their conditions stabilized. The older woman was shot in the arm, and the younger one was struck in the shoulder.The crime scene stretched across almost a block, from St. Louis Avenue to Central Park Avenue.A group of people stood on a corner just past the yellow tape waiting for the scene to clear to get their vehicle.They said a large crowd was gathered on Lake and playing music.A woman who didn't want to give her name said she wasn't close enough to hear the shots but saw a multitude of people running. “They shootin’,” she heard someone exclaim.No one is in custody as Area North detectives investigate.RelatedRead more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.8Newsby:Synclaire CruelRichmond, Va (WRIC) — Richmond Police said four people arrived at a local hospital with gunshot wounds early Saturday morning.Units responded to a call for a shooting around 1:45 a.m. in the 6300 block of Midlothian Turnpike.Police tape blocked off the parking lots outside of the Richmond Inn and Suites and Novus Room Sports Bar for several hours.According to an 8News crew,  at least a dozen Richmond Police units and a K-9 unit were on scene. Our crew also reported that more than 80 evidence markers were scattered throughout the crime scene.Investigators said the four shooting victims — two men and two women — all suffered non-life threatening injuries.Anyone with information is asked to call Crime Stoppers at 804-780-1000.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.VICTORIA, Va. (WRIC) -- Victoria Fire and Rescue responded to a single crash early Saturday morning.The crash happened on Nottoway Blvd and the person involved was assessed but not transported to the hospital.NORFOLK, Va. (AP) — A federal grand jury has indicted four people for their roles in a scheme to use the identities of 35 Virginia prison inmates to secure more than $300,000 in pandemic-related unemployment benefits, federal authorities said Friday.Two women worked with two inmates at correctional institutions to collect information of other inmates to apply for the unemployment benefits, according to a news release from the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Eastern District of Virginia. The two men who were serving time were accused of providing information for inmates where they were incarcerated, according to the news release.RICHMOND, Va. (WRIC) -- Here’s the latest coronavirus update from the Virginia Department of Health for Saturday, April 10:Virginia is getting 77,847 doses into arms each day on average, an increase of nearly 20,000 from this time last month. According to the state’s health department, 98.4% of the doses Virginia has received have been administered.Trending:One person died and five others were hospitalized Saturday following three separate shootings throughout San Francisco, police said Monday.• The first shooting occurred around 1:40 a.m. near Post and Fillmore streets, when an attacker allegedly shot a victim, described as a 20-year-old man.The shooter then grabbed the victim’s wallet and fled the scene, police said.The victim was taken to a hospital with life-threatening injuries, according to police. A description of the assailant was not immediately available.• The second shooting was reported around 9:30 p.m. at the corner of Griffith Street and Oakdale Avenue, police said.In that shooting, officers found the victim with multiple gunshot wounds to his chest. He was pronounced dead at the scene.The city’s medical examiner’s office has identified him as 34-year-old Dietrich Whitley of San Francisco.No arrests have been made in connection with the homicide, according to police.• In a third shooting, around 11:35 p.m., officers responding to Fillmore Street and Golden Gate Avenue learned that a vehicle had driven into a parking lot and its occupant had opened fire on four people.The victims were described as a 26-year-old man, a 25-year-old woman and two 22-year-old men.The woman suffered life-threatening injuries, while the three male victims suffered injuries not considered life-threatening, police said.Police did not give a description of the vehicle, which fled the scene immediately after the shooting.Copyright  2019 by Bay City News, Inc. — Republication, Rebroadcast or any other Reusewithout the express written consent of Bay City News, Inc. is prohibited.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersFiled under:They were in the 7400 block of South Artesian Avenue when someone in a vehicle opened fire.At least four people were wounded Friday in a drive-by in Marquette Park on the Southwest Side.They were standing on the sidewalk about 11:30 p.m. in the 7300 block of South Artesian Avenue when someone in a vehicle fired shots, Chicago police said.All four were taken to Holy Cross Hospital, police said. A 24-year-old man shot in the back was in critical condition. Two other men, 23 and 29, were hit in their leg, and their condition was stabilized. A 20-year-old woman who was struck in the leg also had her condition stabilized.A person who lived in the neighborhood and declined to be named told a Sun-Times photographer on scene that there was a party going on, and that he doesn’t think the shooters were from the neighborhood. He said the neighborhood has been relatively peaceful, and there wasn’t any conflicts among locals.No one is in custody as Area Central detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Police investigate part of the scene of a shooting on Plover Avenue where two men with gunshot wounds were found dead near where their SUV that crashed through a concrete barrier and then burst into flames on Interstate 70 West in St. Louis on Wednesday, Aug. 7, 2019. About two blocks away another man was found near a car in the 4900 block of Plover Avenue who was also suffering gunshot wounds. Photo by David Carson,dcarson@post-dispatch.comUPDATEDwith death of third manST. LOUIS• Police say a third man has died of injuries related to a fiery crash andshooting in the Walnut Park East neighborhood in August.The first two men who died are Justin Kibble, 20, of the 2900 block of University Street, and Deshawn McGee, 24, of the 2800 block of North Kingshighway Boulevard.Weeks later, police released the name of the third man who died. He is Maurice East, 29, of the 1400 block of East Gano Avenue. Police said East died Aug. 9.Nearby residents pulled Kibble and McGee from an SUV that had smashed through a concrete barrier and onto the shoulder of Interstate 70 near Bircher Boulevard. The SUV burst into flames. Both men had gunshot wounds and died at the scene. A man who escaped the burning SUV was critically injured. Police say he had been shot in the back.Police said East was found in a sedan in the 4900 block of Plover Avenue.Police arrived at about 4:30 p.m. and found East inside the sedan on Plover. He had been shot and was taken to a hospital in critical but unstable condition. On Sept. 19, the St. Louis Police Department announced that East had died but didn't say when.Police didn't release any other details about the crime.Police asked anyone with information about the shooting to call homicide detectives at 314-444-5371, or to remain anonymous call CrimeStoppers at 866-371-8477.Kim Bell of the Post-Dispatch contributed to this report.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Kim Bell is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByBen FeuerherdSubmitAugust 6, 2019|2:27am|UpdatedAugust 6, 2019 | 9:16amSurveillance video taken near the scene of a quadruple shooting at a Brooklyn street vigil early Monday shows several suspects running away while shielding their faces.The video shows six suspects — wearing hooded sweatshirts and bandannas to hide their faces — running from the scene of the shootingnear the corner of Sterling Street and Buffalo Avenuein Crown Heights just before 2 a.m.They’re wanted for questioning in the quadruple shooting that wounded Rasheen Stewart, 24, Jeff McCall, 33, Syeitha Lomax, 49, and Regina Sherrod, 33, police and sources said.The group of victims had gathered at the corner to hold a vigil for a family and neighborhood friend who had recently died of Hodgkins lymphoma, the brother of one of the victims told The Post.The attack happened near a corner known as a hub for drug dealing, which may have been linked to the crime, police sources told The Post.The victims are recovering at Brooklyn hospitals, but two of them remain in critical condition, police said.Read NextChief judge caught berating female cop at City Hall retire...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 118,332 times.118,332This story has been shared 108,921 times.108,921This story has been shared 67,864 times.67,864© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationMenuLAKE CHARLES, La. - After a two week investigation, five people have been arrested in a drive-by-shooting.On August 4, at 12:57 am, Lake Charles Police responded to the 100 block of Pryce Street in regards to a shooting.The shooting resulted in four victims with gunshot wounds, including one man in the face, one man in the left thigh, one man in the left wrist and a woman in the back. All victims survived their injuries, according to Capt. Kevin Kirkum, spokesperson for the Lake Charles Police Dept.A description of a vehicle involved in the shooting was given to police and at 1:04 am Calcasieu Parish Sheriff's Office deputies conducted a traffic stop on a 2005 silver Impala in Westlake, which fit the description of the suspect vehicle.When Deputies stopped the vehicle two subjects fled on foot. The other occupants were detained and a stolen firearm was later recovered from that vehicle, stated the spokesperson. The Lake Charles Police were notified.Lake Charles detectives were able to match evidence in the suspect vehicle to the crime scene and it was determined that occupants of the Impala, using multiple firearms, shot from the vehicle into the crowd in front of 110 Pryce St. It is not known if there was an intended target or if it was just a random firing of weapons into a crowd.Identities of the suspects were obtained, leading to the arrests of five people. Arrest warrants were issued for the following:21 year old Michael R. Dantley, Lake Charles20 year old Christopher J. Williams, Lake Charles18 year old Anthony Ray Jenkins, Lake Charles19 year old Jacorey Jamal Murray, Lake Charles17 year old Devonte Marcel Stephens, Lake CharlesAll suspects were arrested on multiple days last week for assault by drive by shooting and negligent injuring.Each suspect's bond was set at $1,010,000.April To DateShot & Killed:19Shot & Wounded:83Total Shot:102Total Homicides:19Week in Progress (4/4 – 4/10)Shot & Killed:18Shot & Wounded:64Total Shot:82Total Homicides:18Year to DateShot & Killed:154Shot & Wounded:685Total Shot:839Total Homicides:162We’ll be taking a little time off for the next couple of days which means minimal updates, unless the wheels come off. We’ll be back late Sunday for the usual mostly peaceful weekend round-up.YearHomicidesWounded2020165628201915154320181576142017197868201619395720151245622014110472Previous year data is reflective of the year-to-date total through the end of April.While we consider ourselves one of the smallest and non-consequential minnows in sea of much larger jagoffs, we do illustrate what could be considered uncomfortable facts for Non-Essentials. In light of recent wrongthink purges (including two of our videos on YouTube and a post on FB) we’ll look to expand our minuscule alternative social media footprints over the coming months. You can find us atParler(it’s back),MeWe,Odysee,Minds,DLiveandTelegramSince so many of you asked, we went ahead and ordered up a new round of Chalkie tees. We expect these to show up at HQ in a couple of weeks but can be preordered now. In the meantime, browse our otherframable sarcasm and tees.YearKilledWounded2021352020713201966201861520171112201611142015916201417282013133020128492011233720101333200919422021 POs042009-2012 stats account for CPD incidents only. 2013-2021 may include other police forces within Chicago, such as the Illinois State Police, Cook County Sheriff, various 3 lettered state/federal agencies, suburban departments or university police forces. On-duty as well as off-duty LEOs are included. Historical data pulled from theCivilian Office of Police Accountability.Stats doNOTinclude on/off-duty police or other law enforcement and are not limited to firearm related incidents; fatal stabbings are also included. Previous years’ stats reflect totals for entire year.Warning: some of the images found within the Gallery may be graphic.View full GalleryCarjacking data comes directly from theCPD’s own data set, so add 20% to obtain the true numbers. Carjacking and arrest tallies are directly related to either the IUCR codes of 0325 & 0326 only. Other auto related crimes are not included. Previous year data sets represent the entire year’s tally.MayorTermHomicidesRichard J. Daley1955-197610,910Michael Bilandic1976-19792,408Jane Byrne1979-19833,202Harold Washington1983-19873,295Eugene Sawyer1987-1989978Richard M. Daley1989-201114,653Rahm Emanuel2011-20194,535Lori Lightfoot2019-2020*1,133*Lightfoot’s tally is May 20, 2019 – Dec 31, 2020.If you’re interested in listening to Chicago mayhem,invest in a quality scanner or a cheaper two-way radio and tune into the frequencies below. If you’re not local, head over to either the Apple or Google app store and download a scanner app or better yet, check outCrimeIsDown’s Live Audio Feeds.Sites we like.As a small percentage of idiots ventilate one another with reckless abandon, we diligently record, document and illustrate every blame-it-on-______ event. Your support in any amount is greatly appreciated.Cash App: $heyjackassIf you’d like to support others in the Chicago Scanner community, we ask that you please support those who provide everyone with up to the minute news and information by supporting –Spot News,Chicago Scanner,CrimeIsDown.com&Solutions & Resources Street PastorsAd Blockers:We do make a few pennies from ad revenue, so if you wouldn’t mind whitelisting us if you run an ad blocker that would be super.Brave Users:click on the BAT triangle in the address bar to either send a tip or make a monthly standing contribution. If you’re not using the Brave browser, you should be.We compile our own dataset using the following sources:Chicago Tribune,Chicago Sun-Times,Homicide Watch Chicago(no longer updated),DNAInfo Chicago(out of business),Chicago Redeye Homicide Tracker(no longer updated),NBC5 Chicago, Chicago Tribune’sShooting Tracker&Homicide Tracker,Cook County Medical Examiner,CPD’s Historical Data Set,City of Chicago Data Portal,Chicago Police Department Arrest Record SearchandCPD CLEARMAP.Community areas and neighborhoods are determined by theChicago Tribune’s Boundaries Appand/orCrimeisdown.com’s most excellent Incident Map.Editor’s note: All murders are homicides, but not all homicides are murders.We count homicides, whereas the CPD counts murders. A homicide, or a non-fatal shooting, regardless of type or by whom, within the city limits of Chicago counts towards our total metric, including anything on the expressways. CPD-involved, ISP-involved and justifiable homicides all count. Reckless homicides may count if the Medical Examiner rules that the cause of death was a homicide. Suicides do not count. Additional definitions can be found on theGlossary page.Copyright © 2021 HeyJackass All Rights ReservedPowered bySarcasm, Stats & BoozeMEMPHIS, Tenn. — Memphis Police are searching for a suspect after four people were shot on Shelby Dr.Officers were called to the 400 block of E. Shelby Dr. around 12:45 Sunday morning.Investigators told FOX13 four people were shot on the parking lot of the gas station.Two victims were taken to the hospital in critical condition, the third victim was killed, and the fourth victim was located in the 4600 block of Vega in non-critical condition.The victims have not been identified by police. It's also unclear if the suspect knew the victims.No suspect information is available at this time.If you have any information on this case, please call Crime Stoppers at 528-CASH.This is a developing story. Check back for updates on the investigation.Download the FOX13 Memphis app to receive alerts from breaking news in your neighborhood.[CLICK HERE TO DOWNLOAD]Trending stories:Filed under:A group was gathered in the West Side park when someone opened fire from a black Camaro, police said.Seven people were wounded in a shooting Sunday as they gathered in Douglas Park on the West Side.About 1:20 a.m., they were standing in the park in the 2900 block of West Roosevelt Road when someone opened fire from a black Camaro, Chicago police said.A 21-year-old man was hit in the groin and taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in critical condition, police said. A woman, 25, was struck in the arm, leg and taken to the same hospital where her condition was stabilizedAnother woman, 22, was also hit and taken to Mount Sinai, police said. Her condition was stabilized.A 20-year-old man and a woman, 19, were taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The man was hit in the right side of the body and the woman was struck in the leg. Their conditions were stabilized.Two men, 23 and 21, took themselves to Mount Sinai with gunshot wounds, police said.People were seen walking in the park just past the perimeter of the crime scene tape with their phone lights activated looking for things they left behind as they ran from the bullets.No arrests have been reported. Area Central detectives are investigating.A couple of hours later,a separate shooting left two woundeda few blocks away.A similar incident occurred in Sept. 2013 when 13 people, including a 3-year-old boy, were wounded in ashooting at Cornell Square Parknear 51st and Wood streets in Back of the Yards on the South Side.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.EL PASO, Texas — Nearly nine months after he was shot alongside his wife outside the El Paso Walmart where they and their children were raising funds for their daughter’s soccer team, the last hospitalized victim of the racially-motivated massacre has died.Guillermo “Memo” Garcia, 36, died Saturday night at Del Sol Medical Center in El Paso, where he continued to be treated for multiple gunshot wounds, according to hospital CEO David Shimp.“After a nearly nine-month fight, our hearts are heavy as we report Guillermo ‘Memo’ Garcia, our last remaining patient being treated from the El Paso shooting, has passed away,” Shimp said in a statement Sunday,according to CNN. “His courage, his strength and his story have touched many lives, including those of our caregivers, who tirelessly fought with him and for him every step of the way. We are grieving with his family and with our community.”I am heartbroken!!! I just received news that Coach Guillermo Garcia from El Paso Fusion has passed away!! This image says it all, apart from being a great coach to his young girls, he was an amazing father and husband to his wife Jessica!! Rest In Peace Memo!!#ElPasoStrong😢💪🏼pic.twitter.com/f6upiEDp9oGarcia’s passing brings the death toll of the Aug. 3, 2019, mass shooting to 23, making it the deadliest anti-Latino attack in modern U.S. history. He is survived by his wife, Jessica Coca Garcia, and their two children.The couple’s children, Karina, 10, and little Memo, 6, were uninjured in the mass shooting,according to the Houston Chronicle. Garcia, known affectionately as “Tank” because of his size, shielded his wife and young son from the gunfire.Coca Garcia suffered gunshot wounds to her legs but little Memo was unhurt.Garcia was struck multiple times in the back, the bullets causing extensive damage to his organs,the Chronicle reported.The New York Times reportedthat Garcia, whose injuries were among the most extensive suffered that day, underwent more than 17 surgeries and remained hospitalized the entire nine months since the attack.El Paso Walmart mass shootingA man prays at a makeshift memorial for 22 people gunned down Aug. 3, 2019, at a Walmart in El Paso, Texas. The gunman's 23rd victim, Guillermo “Memo” Garcia, died Saturday, April 25, 2020, nearly nine months after the massacre.(Mark Ralston/AFP via Getty Images)>> Read more trending newsGarcia’s friend and fellow soccer coach, Luis Calvillo, confirmed hisdeath Sunday in a Facebook post.“I will like to take this time to let everyone know that my dear friend Memo Garcia has been called to heaven,”Calvillo wrote. “On behalf of Jessica Coca Garcia, and with her permission, I would like to ask everyone to keep her and her kids on your prayers. Also if we can give her some time to herself and her family to grieve, I will really appreciate it.Calvillo thanked the public for their support of the family.Hello everyone, I will like to take this time let everyone know that my dear friend Memo Garcia has been called to...Coca Garcia latersaid in a statement to ABC7 in El Pasothat her family has “lost a warrior but gained an angel.”“He fought long and hard (and) with the help of all his troops, he won many battles but lost the war,”her statement to the news station said.She wrote that the family would hold a public memorial and Mass for the community to pay its respects to her husband once the social distancing orders due to the COVID-19 pandemic has been lifted.“We would like to ask the community to continue to lift Memo in prayer and allow us to grief this tremendous loss,” she said. “We are asking for privacy during this time.”Calvillo, who is also a survivor of the shooting, told CNN last year that a group of parents was holding a fundraiser for El Paso Fusion Soccer Club, which Calvillo and Garcia coached together. Garcia’s daughter is a member of the team.The coaches and parents were selling drinks and snacks outside the store to fund the girls’ way to a soccer tournament when a gunman opened fire.More than four dozen Walmart patrons were shot, including Calvillo’s father, who died.According to El Paso police officials, the dead ranged in age from 15 to 90.Watch Calvillo talk to CNN about the shooting below. Warning: The video contains footage from the scene of the shooting.The alleged gunman, Patrick Wood Crusius, 21, of Allen, was spotted at a nearby intersection by Texas Rangers rushing to the scene, his arrest affidavit said. Crusius exited the vehicle with his hands raised in the air.“I’m the shooter,” he told the agents, according to the affidavit.The document stated that Crusius admitted to going into the store with an assault rifle and multiple magazines of ammunition. According to authorities, the weapon was a GP WASR-10, a Romanian-made semi-automatic rifle that is a variant of an AK-47.Once inside, he opened fire on customers.His target were “Mexicans,” Crusius told police.El Paso Walmart mass shootingSuspected El Paso Walmart mass shooter Patrick Crusius is arraigned Thursday, Oct., 10, 2019, in an El Paso, Texas, courtroom. Crusius, 21, is charged with capital murder in the massacre, which killed 23 people. The 23rd victim, Guillermo “Memo” Garcia, 36, died Saturday, April 25, 2020, nearly nine months after the Aug. 3, 2019, massacre.(Mark Lambie/The El Paso Times via AP)>> Related story: Suspected El Paso Walmart gunman said he was targeting Mexicans, police sayHe drove about 10 hours from his home in Allen, a Dallas suburb, to carry out the crime in El Paso. According to data from the 2010 Census, about 11% of the population of Allen is Hispanic or Latino compared to 81% of the population of El Paso.Crusius is awaiting trial in state court for capital murder of more than one person, according to court records. Prosecutors are seeking the death penalty.Crusius also faces a possible death penalty in federal court, where prosecutors in February obtained a 90-count indictment against him. The charges include 22 counts of a hate crime resulting in death, 23 counts of hate crimes involving an attempt to kill and 45 counts of discharging a firearm in relation to hate crimes,according to the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Western District of Texas.Read the federal indictment against Patrick Crusius below.Patrick Crusius Federal Ind...byNational Content Deskon ScribdThe federal indictment alleges that on the day of the shooting, Crusius uploaded to the internet a document he called “The Inconvenient Truth,”federal prosecutors said in a news release.“The document opened by stating, ‘This attack is a response to the Hispanic invasion of Texas. They are the instigators, not me. I am simply defending my country from cultural and ethnic replacement brought on by the invasion,’”the news release said.According to the federal indictment, Crusius purchased the GP WASR-10 and 1,000 rounds of ammunition on the internet less than two months before the massacre at Walmart.The indictment accuses Crusius of willfully causing bodily injury to the victims because of their actual or perceived national origin.El Paso police officials reportedin August that of the 22 initial victims of the massacre, 13 were natives of the U.S. Seven were from Mexico, one was German and one, 15-year-old Javier Rodriguez, was listed as undetermined.According to his Facebook page, Garcia was from Ciudad Juarez, Mexico.El Paso mass shootingMourners hold up their cellphones during an Aug. 4, 2019, candlelight vigil for the victims of a mass shooting at an El Paso, Texas, Walmart the day before. The 23rd victim of the shooting, Guillermo “Memo” Garcia, died Saturday, April 25, 2020, nearly nine months after the massacre.(Mark Ralston/AFP via Getty Images)A week after the shooting, a recovering Coca Garcia rose from a wheelchair to speak to a crowd gathered across the street from the El Paso County Jail, where Crusius sat in a cell. The attendees marched through El Paso on the way to the jail, denouncing racism and demanding stricter gun laws,according to the AP.“Racism is something I always wanted to think didn’t exist. Obviously, it does,”Coca Garcia said.In September, the Garcias filed a lawsuit against Walmart, alleging the company failed to have adequate security in place to prevent the shooting. Like the criminal cases against Crusius, the lawsuit is ongoing.El Paso Walmart mass shootingEl Paso police and Texas state troopers are positioned outside a Walmart where accused mass shooter Patrick Wood Crusius, right, is accused of fatally wounding 23 people Aug. 3, 2019. The 23rd victim, Guillermo “Memo” Garcia, 36, died Saturday, April 25, 2020, nearly nine months after the massacre. Crusius, 21, is charged with capital murder and faces federal hate crime charges.(Mark Ralston/AFP via Getty Images, El Paso Police Department via Getty Images)Two men were killed and three other people, including a toddler, were injured in shootings Friday night in the downtown area of the city.Suffolk police said one of the men killed, Davante Wilson, 24, was shot while sitting in the passenger seat of a parked car on the 200 block of North Broad Street, according to a city news release. The car's driver, Lamekka Porter, 26, and a 2-year-old girl who sitting in the back seat, were among the injured — Porter sustained multiple gunshot wounds and the girl was struck once.Around the corner in the area of Second Avenue and Bute Street, Leronta Horton was walking with a friend when they heard gunshots and began to run, according to the news release. Horton, 19, sustained multiple gunshot wounds.Porter, Horton and the toddler were taken to local hospitals and remain hospitalized with non-life threatening injuries.Suffolk police say Aaron Porter, 22, was the shooter in both incidents. Police found him a block away on First Avenue, deceased from a single gunshot wound.Police were called to the scene, which spanned two city blocks, around 9:22 p.m. Friday. Police found the two men and pronounced them dead, according to the news release.An investigation is underway but police say the shootings were "primarily domestic in nature." Anyone with information is asked to contact police at 1-888-LOCK-U-UP.Five people were shot but are expected to recover after a shooting early Tuesday on the Near East Side, Columbus police said.Police first received a call about shots being fired around 12:40 a.m. Tuesday at a home at 1280 E. Long St. Responding police and Columbus Fire medics found three people with gunshot wounds, who were all taken to area hospitals.Around the same time police were responding to the Long Street address, the Ohio State University Wexner Medical Center called police and reported that two people had walked in with gunshot wounds.Police said a birthday party had been taking place at the house and two groups of young men got into an altercation. The incident escalated into gunfire and the injuries, none of which were believed to be life-threatening.Detectives are continuing to investigate how the dispute began and how many weapons were fired during the shooting.A person who told WBNS-10TV that she was the owner of the home said she had rented it through Airbnb to a group of four people. A surveillance camera at the residence showed more than four people were there, she told the television station, and the camera was eventually covered up or turned off.Get the news delivered to your inbox: Sign up for our morning, afternoon and evening newslettersAccording to the city of Columbus' licensing department, there was no Airbnb or other short-term rental registered at the Long Street address where the shooting occurred.Columbus city ordinances require any short term rentals that are listed through Airbnb or similar websites to be registered with the city and the permit number to be included in the online posting.A spokesperson for Airbnb said Tuesday afternoon that the listing has been deactivated and the guest who made the reservation for the Long Street home has been suspended."Unauthorized parties represent a clear breach of trust, and the violence stemming from this incident has no place in the Airbnb community," spokesperson Charlie Urbancic said in an email to The Dispatch. "We have reached out to Columbus PD to offer our support in their investigation."Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact the Columbus police assault unit at 614-645-4141 or leave an anonymous tip with Central Ohio Crime Stoppers at 614-461-8477.bbruner@dispatch.com@Bethany_BrunerFive people were shot but are expected to recover after a shooting early Tuesday on the Near East Side, Columbus police said.Police first received a call about shots being fired around 12:40 a.m. Tuesday at a home at 1280 E. Long St. Responding police and Columbus Fire medics found three people with gunshot wounds, who were all taken to area hospitals.Around the same time police were responding to the Long Street address, the Ohio State University Wexner Medical Center called police and reported that two people had walked in with gunshot wounds.Police said a birthday party had been taking place at the house and two groups of young men got into an altercation. The incident escalated into gunfire and the injuries, none of which were believed to be life-threatening.Detectives are continuing to investigate how the dispute began and how many weapons were fired during the shooting.A person who told WBNS-10TV that she was the owner of the home said she had rented it through Airbnb to a group of four people. A surveillance camera at the residence showed more than four people were there, she told the television station, and the camera was eventually covered up or turned off.According to the city of Columbus' licensing department, there was no Airbnb or other short-term rental registered at the Long Street address where the shooting occurred.Columbus city ordinances require any short term rentals that are listed through Airbnb or similar websites to be registered with the city and the permit number to be included in the online posting.A spokesperson for Airbnb said Tuesday afternoon that the listing has been deactivated and the guest who made the reservation for the Long Street home has been suspended."Unauthorized parties represent a clear breach of trust, and the violence stemming from this incident has no place in the Airbnb community," spokesperson Charlie Urbancic said in an email to The Dispatch. "We have reached out to Columbus PD to offer our support in their investigation."Anyone with information about the shooting is asked to contact the Columbus police assault unit at 614-645-4141 or leave an anonymous tip with Central Ohio Crime Stoppers at 614-461-8477.bbruner@dispatch.com@Bethany_Bruner© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.The Columbus Dispatch  ~ 62 E. Broad St. Columbus OH 43215~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.WATCHVIDEOSGunfire at video shoot in Southwest Philly kills rapper, injures 5Police: 1 dead, 5 injured after shooting in Southwest Philly. George Solis has more on Action News at 11 p.m. on July 28, 2019.1 killed, 5 injured in shooting; Katie Katro reports on Action News Mornings, July 29, 2019For release on March 10, 2020Contact:Rob BakerDeputy District Attorney(408) 792-2873DA Report: Gilroy Officers Lawfully Shot Gilroy Shooter, “Undoubtedly Saved Lives”Three Gilroy Police officers lawfully shot the Garlic Festival shooter before he killed himself, the Santa Clara County District Attorney’s Office has determined.The officers shot 19-year-old Santino Legan numerous times as he was firing an assault weapon into the crowd and at the officers at the annual family fair on July 28, 2019. Before he was stopped, Legan killed three people and wounded 17. Detective Eric Cryar, Officer Robert Basuino and Officer Hugo Del Moral confronted the killer less than a minute after he began shooting.Deputy District Attorney Rob Baker, who authored the DA’s26-page report​, wrote: “Placing themselves, literally, in the line of fire to stop a mass murderer undoubtedly saved lives and prevented further bloodshed. In light of the grave circumstances of this case, their actions were unquestionably lawful and justified.”The District Attorney’s Office investigates all fatal law enforcement encounters to determine if the force was legal. By law, officers are allowed to use deadly force when they or others are faced with imminent danger.Around 6:30 p.m. Legan entered the Gilroy Garlic Festival through a locked access gate wearing a bullet-proof vest and armed with a loaded AK-47 assault rifle with dozens of rounds of ammunition. After making his way to an inflatable slide play structure centrally located among several vendor booths and picnic tables, he opened fire on the surrounding visitors who were enjoying the late afternoon festival activities. In all, Legan fired at least 36 rounds of ammunition and hit 20 men, women and children. Three died: a 13-year-old girl, a 25-year-old man and a six-year-old boy.Once Legan began shooting, Detective Cryar and Officers Basuino and Del Moral rushed to the area. When they arrived, Legan turned his gun on them. The three officers returned fire, striking Legan multiple times in his chest, back, hands and legs. The wounded Legan put the muzzle of his assault rifle to the roof of his mouth and pulled the trigger, taking his own life.Detective Cryar, a military veteran, explained to investigators when asked why he engaged Legan with gunfire: “if we didn’t take the action that we took there could be a lot of dead people.”The shooting is still being investigated by the FBI and the Gilroy Police.###The search for answers continues after four people were shot and killed in Chippewa County.Authorities found five bodies in two separate locations on July 29th. Ritchie German Jr. is identified as the shooter. Officials say he murdered his mother, brother, and nephew before heading to a home in Lake Hallie where he killed a woman and injured her parents, all before turning the gun on himself.The Chippewa County Sheriff's Office is providing an update on the investigation and authorities say there is still much they don't know.Officials continue to search for evidence, including a vehicle of interest registered to the shooter.Chippewa County Sheriff James Kowalczyk says with the exception of two paper documents, investigators have yet to find any items belonging to Ritchie German. They hope finding the vehicle his name is registered to will provide some answers."We don’t know what happened to that vehicle, the registration expired a year ago. We know that it was last serviced here in Chippewa Falls by a local garage,” said Kowalczyk.The vehicle of interest is a blue 1999 Pontiac SE Sunfire with a license plate of 627-MUK. Investigators hope the vehicle will lead them to more evidence in the case. This vehicle of interest is not the same vehicle authorities found running outside the crime scene where Richie German's body was found. That vehicle belonged to Ritchie’s Brother. It’s unclear why he was driving it the day of the murders.On July 29th, authorities discovered five bodies. Ritchie German's mother, brother, and nephew, 8, were found shot to death in their Lafayette home. Another victim, Lailie Vang was found dead inside her Lake Hallie home. Her parents were also shot but survived.Investigators identified Ritchie German as the shooter. His body was also found in the Lake Hallie home, dead from a self-inflicted gun-shot wound. "He lived at home with his mother, his brother, and his nephew...they were the people that if they were alive today we would be talking to if the incident only involved the shooting in Lake Hallie...the family was not close...the father was not close with his son...the siblings of Ritchie were not close," said Kowalcyk.The sheriff’s office says these circumstances make it difficult to determine a motive. "The information that we've obtained in regards to Ritchie is that he was a loner. He didn’t have friends, employment was sparse he didn’t go anywhere and again we don’t know when he last used that Pontiac Sunfire," said Kowalcyk.Investigators are still going through phone records hoping to learn more about Ritchie’s relationship to the victims shot in the Lake Hallie home.CHIPPEWA FALLS, Wis. (WEAU) -- The Chippewa County Sheriff’s Office is looking for information of the vehicle registered to Ritchie German Jr.Law enforcement says it is a blue 1999 Pontiac SE Sunfire, with a VIN of 1G2JB5246X7520155 and a license plate of 627-MUK.Officials are asking if you have seen his vehicle, possibly abandoned or if you have purchased this vehicle please call 715-726-7714.The Chippewa County Sheriff's Department and Lake Hallie Police Department identified Ritchie German Jr has the shooter in the Chippewa County homicides.German Jr., 33, died due to a self-inflicted gunshot wound.Filed under:A CPD officer was heard asking a gas station employee if bullet holes in a wall were from this weeks shooting or last.Four people were shot in front of a gas station in Lawndalea week after a shooting occurred in the same location.Similar to the shooting July 21, about 9:50 p.m., the group was gathered in front of a Shell gas station, 3942 W. Roosevelt Rd., when someone in an unknown vehicle opened fire, Chicago police said.An 18-year-old woman and 23-year-old man were struck in the right legs, a 23-year-old man was struck in the left leg and a 27-year-old man was struck in the groin area, police said.They all were taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The 27-year-old man is in critical condition. The other three victims have had their conditions stabilized.A CPD officer was heard asking a gas station employee if bullet holes in a wall were from this weeks shooting or last.No one is in custody as Area North detectives investigate.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Thanks for contacting us. We've received your submission.MetroByRuth WeissmannandTamar LapinSubmitOctober 17, 2019|4:27pm|UpdatedOctober 17, 2019 | 9:20pmThe man accused of the murder that sparked a summertime mass shooting in Brooklyn gave a “full confession” — and was only brought down thanks to community tipsters, police said Thursday.Kyle Williams, 20, was arrested Wednesday and later admitted toshooting dead 38-year-old Jason PaganJuly 27 at the Old Timer’s Day block party in Mendoza Park in Brownsville, Deputy Chief Michael Kemper said.A second suspected shooter was taken into custody Thursday, though he hasn’t yet been charged, police said.The NYPD finally got their big break in the months-old case two weeks agowhen they released a video of two womenwanted for questioning.That’s when “tips started coming in,” said Kemper, adding: “The identity of those two females, along with other evidence that we already had, led us to the murderer.”Williams shot Pagan — a rival Bloods gang member — in the head after the pair got into an argument about an old beef at the community fair, police said.Investigators believe a friend of Pagan — who was in custody Thursday — returned fire, sparking a shootout that injured 11 other people at the party.A semi-automatic weapon used to fire into the crowd was recovered in a building in Brownsville after a tip from a neighbor — leading police to Pagan’s pal, they said.He is likely to be charged with felony assault and attempted murder, police said.“This case is still very active,” Kemper said, thanking the Brownsville community for their help.“It’s very rewarding for [detectives] to be in the position right now to let Jason Pagan’s family… know that the murderer of her son was apprehended and arrested and confessed. It’s justice.”Read NextBronx man sues NBC Universal over 'unlimited' soda refills...Share SelectionThis story has been shared 118,332 times.118,332This story has been shared 108,921 times.108,921This story has been shared 67,864 times.67,864© 2021 NYP Holdings, Inc. All Rights ReservedTerms of UsePrivacy NoticeYour Ad ChoicesSitemapYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationYour California Privacy RightsDo Not Sell My Personal InformationPolice were struggling Friday to answer a key question a day after they captured a man they say fatally shot his father, brother and two other people during a 12-hour rampage across Los Angeles' sprawling San Fernando Valley.What set him off?Police spent hours Thursday tracking 26-year-old Gerry Dean Zaragoza from one end of the valley to the other before taking him into custody not far from the site where the rampage began before dawn."We don't know exactly what the motive was or why," police Lt. Kirk Kelley told KABC-TV.Michael Ramia, who employed Zaragoza's father, Carlos, as a carpet cleaning technician, said the father had confided in him that his son was battling drug problems.The father had tried to help his son by pushing him to come to work with him, Ramia said, but the younger Zaragoza seemed to have "no motivation.""He was a father just trying to protect his son," Ramia said. "He did it to his last day. He wouldn't give up on his son."Gerry Zaragoza was captured by plainclothes officers surveilling the area, police Capt. William Hayes said."There was a small use of force," he said.Television footage showed Zaragoza sitting in a wheelchair and appearing alert as he was loaded into an ambulance.Authorities said he killed his father and brother and wounded his mother at an apartment complex in Canoga Park, a modest, aging neighborhood tucked into the southwest corner of the valley, home to nearly 2 million people..From there, he traveled several miles to North Hollywood in the valley's southeast area. There, police said, he gunned down two people. A woman believed to be an acquaintance was killed and a man was critically wounded.Hours later, police said, Zaragoza shot and killed a stranger on a bus in Van Nuys, in the center of the valley.Zaragoza is also suspected of an attempted robbery outside a Canoga Park bank, although nothing was taken and no one was hurt.The rampage ended back in Canoga Park in a commercial section of the neighborhood. Police said a firearm was recovered during the arrest.___Associated Press writer John Rogers contributed to this story.Filed under:The men were congregating outside a gas station in the 3900 block of West Roosevelt Road when someone got out of a vehicle and opened fire.Four men were wounded in a shooting Sunday in Lawndale on the West Side.About 3:25 a.m., they were gathered outside of a gas station in the 3900 block of Roosevelt Road when someone in a gray or silver-colored sedan unleashed gunfire at the group, Chicago police said.Three men — 35, 19 and 20 — were taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The 35-year-old was hit in the leg, hip and lower backside and is in critical condition.The 19-year-old was struck in the leg and is in good condition, while the 20-year-old suffered gunshot wounds to the arm and leg, police said. His condition was stabilized.A fourth man, 21, was hit in the face, arm and foot, police said. He took himself to Mount Sinai Hospital where his condition was stabilized.No arrests have been reported. Area North detectives are investigating.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Several people were shot, one fatally, in three separate shooting incidents in D.C. on Sunday.A victim suffered from gunshot wounds in the 2600 block of Sherman Avenue NW at 1 a.m. Sunday. He is in critical condition at an area hospital, police said.Two other victims were shot at about 7:30 p.m. in Southeast D.C. Police were called to the 1300 block of Congress Street SE, where they found the victims, both men, and encountered a large crowd. More officers were called in to get the crowd under control.One of the victims suffered multiple gunshot wounds and died of his injuries. He has been identified as 27-year-old Jamal Bandy.The other victim had a single gunshot wound to an extremity and was being treated for non-life-threatening injuries, police said.The third incident happened about 90 minutes later in Northeast D.C. and involved four victims.Police were called shortly before 9 p.m. to the 2300 block of 15th Street NE, where they found three of the victims, all men, suffering from gunshot wounds. A fourth victim was later taken to a hospital in a private vehicle, police said.None of those victims' injuries were life-threatening, police said.It wasn't immediately known what led up to either shooting. Police have not yet released more details.Eight people have been fatally shot in the District in recent days, includingan 11-year-old boy, Karon Brown, who was slain Thursday eveningwhile in a car near the intersection of Naylor Road and Alabama Avenue SE."You don't know how much you've taken away from us," his mother said, addressing the shooter.At least 93 people have been killed in D.C. this year.D.C. officials are planning to speak Monday about the violence and will share information on how people who live and work in the District can help police fight crime.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Four men were shot Saturday night in northwest Baltim0re, city police said.Police said officers were called around 10:28 p.m. to the 2800 block of Boarman Avenue.Police said a 27-year-old man died at Shock Trauma, and a 26-year-old man and a 25-year-old man remain hospitalized.Sometime later, a fourth victim, a 31-year-old man, walked into a hospital seeking treatment for a gunshot wound. Detectives determined he was also shot during the Boarman Avenue shooting.No further information was immediately released.Anyone with information is asked to call detectives at 410-396-2100, or Metro Crime Stoppers at 866-7LOCKUP, or text a tip to 443-902-4824.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.CHICAGO (CBS)–Seven people were shot in Lincoln Park near Fullerton Beach early Saturday morning.UPDATE: seven people were shot overnight near Fullerton and Lake Shore Drive. Five women and two men are being treated at area hospitals in good to serious condition. The victims are between 24 and 46 years old. Here’s a breakdown from Chicago police.pic.twitter.com/YqlFrgyO2U— Vi Nguyen (@ViNguyen)July 20, 2019At least three adult victims were taken to Illinois Masonic Hospital in critical condition, according to the Chicago Fire Department. The seventh victim self transported to a local hospital.Officers arrived at Fullerton and Lake Shore Drive to find six victims just after 3 a.m.Evidence technicians found shell casings right in front of Theater on the Lake at Fullerton and Lake Shore Drive where six people were shot. Police say it started as an argument between two groups.@cbschicagopic.twitter.com/EoWfZIxFsg— Vi Nguyen (@ViNguyen)July 20, 2019Evidence technicians found multiple shell casings at the scene just steps from the Theater on the Lake.Police said the shooting began as an argument between two groups. One group was leaving the lake front and another was arriving when words were exchanged.Police said a person in each group started shooting.Police have license plate reader cameras along the lake front, but a suspect has not yet been identified.This shooting was just one of several shootings that happened overnight across the city. Nineteen people were shot and two killed.This is a developing story.Filed under:A 28-year-old woman died in the shooting.Four people were shot, one of them fatally, Thursday while they stood on a porch in Garfield Park on the West Side.They outside about 12:15 a.m. in the 3400 block of West Fulton Boulevard when someone emerged from a gangway and fired shots, Chicago police said.Sharemaine Pinnicks, 28, was shot in the head and taken to Stroger Hospital, where she died four hours later, police and the Cook County medical examiner’s office said.Two other women, 30 and 32, were taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition, police said. The 30-year-old was shot in the chest while the 32-year-old was shot in the left arm and leg.A 42-year-old man was struck in the hand and taken to Stroger Hospital, where his condition was stabilized, police said.Area North detectives are conducting a homicide investigation.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.LUBBOCK, Texas (KCBD) - A police report by the Lubbock Police Department details the quarrels between several people that led up to two connected shootings in East Lubbock on July 16 and 17. Several people were hospitalized and one person was killed as a result of the shootings.A joint investigation by several law enforcement agencies made it possible to arrest five people involved in the shootings; 18-year-old Tyson Isaac, 18-year-old Jakiyre Linzsey, 21-year-old Devonte Jones, 18-year-old Tavion Dickson and 18-year-old Isaiah Taylor, according to LPD.The report by LPD states police responded to the first shooting just after 10 p.m. July 16 at Zenith Avenue and Parkway Drive and found Jaquan Johnson with a gunshot wound outside of a vehicle. An investigation found Isaac and Linzsey drove up to the vehicle Johnson was in and shot at it, hitting him.The police report also stated Isaac was the one who was trying to get back at Johnson. This was because hours before the shooting, Isaac said he was being shot at by people in the same vehicle Johnson was driving, according to the police report.Isaac told police he and Linzsey waited for Johnson by a car wash later that night. As soon as Johnson passed by, the two drove up to the car and shot at him, according to the report.They were able to leave the scene.Isaac also told police his mother called about three hours later and said people shot at her house. He, along with Linzsey, went to find the people who shot at her house.The report states Isaac found the people he believed shot at his mother’s house, and they began to shoot at him. Isaac began to chase the people in that blue passenger car and shot back at them.The car continued until it stopped in the 2700 block of East Colgate Street. Police were called to that area around 2:18 a.m. and found the car and the five people who were in it.Police brought four of the car’s passengers to a local hospital, where one passenger – 18-year-old Antwan Wilson – later died, Lubbock police said in a news release the following day.The police report states Jones, Dickson and Taylor were in the blue passenger car that shot at Isaac and Linzsey.All five have been charged with aggravated assault charges.RELATED STORY: Lubbock police respond to shooting in East LubbockRELATED STORY: 1 dead, 3 injured after targeted shooting in northeast LubbockCopyright 2019 KCBD. All rights reserved.Michael A. Cantu is a digital content producer that has been with KCBD-TV since April of 2017. He is a graduate of Texas Tech University and formerly wrote for its college newspaper, The Daily Toreador.5600 Avenue ALubbock, TX. 79404(806) 744-1414A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A 24 year old man is held on bonds totaling $900,000 in connection with a shooting spree at a north side moving company Tuesday night that left five people injured, News Radio 1200 WOAI reports.Police say Kwenton Thomas had a disagreement with the staff and began firing inside the office, and then he went outside and started shooting at vehicles in the parking lot of the business at Oblate and San Pedro.Four people were shot.  A fifth was injured by flying glass when a bullet hit his car.Thomas then tried to run away, but ran right into Police Chief Bill McManus.Thomas is charged with five counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon.So far the gun used in the incident has not been located.One shooting victim remains in critical condition.Officials said the argument stemmed from money being owed.IMAGE: GETTYWOAIWOAIWOAIWOAINews Radio 1200 WOAI·San Antonio's News, Traffic and WeatherListen Now on iHeartRadioCBS46 ReporterATLANTA, Ga. (CBS46) -- He saved three lives when he loaded three shooting victims into his FedEx truck, then rushed them to the hospital.On Tuesday, just a day after the incident, he spoke exclusively to CBS46 News.The contracted FedEx driver turned hero said he delivered the three bleeding men to the front door of Grady’s emergency room.“I’ve never been through anything like that either, so that was kinda like some movie stuff,” Erick Richardson said.Erick Richardson is a hero even though he won’t accept the title. He told CBS46 his actions weren’t for recognition.“I was in a position to help them and that’s what I did,” Richardson explained.Richardson said he was in the back of his FedEx truck prepping his next delivery when everything changed.“The first guy comes out of nowhere and just lets me know he’s been shot, asks can I help him,” explained Richardson.Moments later two more men arrive, even more bloodied than the first victim.“They were bleeding out bad so it wasn’t like I didn’t want to just sit there and just wait for an ambulance and they were just bleeding out bad because you never know what could happen within the next moment,” he explained.So he helped all three men in his truck, then hightailed it to Grady Memorial Hospital, even speeding through red lights."I was pretty much just driving and honking my horn. I did have to slow down for the cars that were just kind of speeding through the lights going in the opposite direction because I don’t want to cause any accidents,” Richardson said.Luckily, he got the victims to Grady in time. All three men survived.Richardson says all three men thanked him for getting them to the hospital in time.CBS46 ReporterLog InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Filed under:They were in the 4600 block of West Erie Street when a male fired shots from across the street.Four men were wounded in a shooting Sunday in Garfield Park on the West Side.They were congregating on a corner about 1:43 a.m. in the 4600 block of West Erie Street when a male unleashed gunfire from across the street, Chicago police said.Two men, 27 and 25, were taken to Stroger Hospital where their conditions were stabilized. The older man was struck in the leg and foot, and the younger man was hit in the back and legs.A 34-year-old man shot twice in the leg took himself to Mount Sinai Hospital where his condition was stabilized, police said. A fourth man, 30, took himself to West Suburban Medical Center in Oak Lawn with a gunshot wound to the leg. His condition was stabilized.No one is in custody as Area North detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:A man was shot and killed Saturday on the back porch of a home in Pilsen.Shootings within city limits over the weekend left at least 9 people dead and 32 others wounded.The latest fatal gun violence incidenthappened Sunday in South Shore.About 1:55 p.m., two vehicles were northbound side by side in an alley in the 2000 block of East 69th Street when someone in one vehicle began firing at the other, Chicago police said.A 26-year-old was struck in the back and was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center where he was pronounced dead, police said. The Cook County medical examiner’s office hasn’t released details of his death.The other man, 32, was struck in the abdomen and thigh and taken to the same hospital in critical condition, police said.Hours earliera 22-year-old man was killed in Austinon the West Side.Jessie L. Curry was found unresponsive with a gunshot wound to the head about 6:15 a.m. in an alley in the 800 block of North LeClaire Avenue, police and the medical examiner’s office said.Curry was pronounced dead at West Suburban Medical Center, authorities said. He lived in Homan Square.On the West Side,a man was killed and a woman wounded in Lawndale.They were outside about 3:35 a.m. in the 1500 block of South Drake Avenue  when a male on foot fired shots at them, police said.Jermaine King, 26, was hit in the chest and pronounced dead at Mount Sinai Hospital, authorities said. The 29-year-old woman was hit in the arm and taken to Stroger Hospital in good condition.Saturday, two men were killed in a double shooting in South Chicago.They were in a vehicle about 11 p.m. in the8500 block of South Escanaba Avenue, police said. Shots rang out from two males who were on foot.Matthew Mason, 26, was struck in the head and body, and 31-year-old Maurice Jackson was hit in the neck, police and the medical examiner’s office said. Both were taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center where they were pronounced.Hours earlier, a man was shot to death while outside on the back porch of a home in Pilsen.About 3:33 a.m., a witness heard gunfire and found36-year-old Byron Ruiz unresponsive with several gunshotwounds to the body, police and the medical examiner’s office said.Ruiz was pronounced dead on the scene, authorities said. An autopsy found he died from multiple gunshot wounds.About 30 minutes earlier, agroup of five was wounded, one fatally, in a drive-by in Gresham.They were on the sidewalk about 2:58 a.m. in the 7900 block of South Loomis Boulevard when a gray sedan drove up, police said. Someone in the vehicle unleashed gunfire, striking the group, before driving off north on Loomis.Daquan Cathary, 24, was shot in the chest and taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn  where he later died, authorities said. Another man, 31, was hit in the back and chest and taken to the same hospital in critical condition, police said.Two people had their conditions stabilized at the University of Chicago Medical Center: a 27-year-old man struck in the leg and a 29-year-old woman hit in the hip, police said.A 37-year-old man who was grazed in the wrist refused medical treatment, police said.Earlier, a man was shot to deathoutside the New Parie Hotelin Garfield Park on the West Side.A witness told officials they heard gunshots and saw George Bingham, 57, on the ground next to a 2008 Chrysler minivan about 2:20 a.m. in the 2800 block of West Washington Boulevard, police and the medical examiner’s office said.Bingham was pronounced dead on the scene, authorities said. Police didn’t have a description of who shot him.A Sun-Times photographer on the scene said he appeared to be shot outside the New Parie Hotel.On Friday, a man was fatally shot in Chatham on the South Side.First responders foundRaymont A. Hicks,31, unresponsive in an alley with gunshot wounds to his head and chest, authorities said.He was pronounced dead on scene, authorities said. He lived about a block away from where he was shot.The shooting happened about 5:55 p.m. in the first block of East 87th Street, police said. A witness told investigators a gunman fired shots at Hicks and then fled in a black car.Non-fatal gun violence wounded at least 26 others from 5 p.m. Friday to 5 a.m. Monday.Fourth of July weekend shootingskilled five people and wounded 63 others.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.PHILADELPHIA (CBS) – Police are searching for two men who allegedly opened fire at a playground and injured seven people in the Overbrook section of the city. The incident happened just before 9 p.m. Saturday at Baker Playground located at 5433 Lansdowne Ave. in Overbrook.Police say two armed men fired into a crowd while a basketball game and party were going on.Officials say six men and one woman between the ages of 16 and 32 were rushed to area hospitals in stable condition, mainly suffering injuries to the arms and legs. A 16-year-old suffered a gunshot wound to the head.“Apparently there were so many people and it was so noisy that when police responded the people on the basketball court were still playing basketball,” Philadelphia Police Commissioner Richard Ross said. “They didn’t even know gunshots had been erupted.”Benjamin Wright was a referee at a basketball game at a city park several years ago when shots rang out.7 People Shot During Neighborhood Basketball Game In West Philadelphia, Police Say“Mander Playground was an outlet for guys to grow themselves, show themselves,” Wright said. “I was shot during that job.”Now Wright wants playgrounds, a place he considers a safe zone for children, to be safer with more cameras installed.According to the city, about 60% of parks and recreational facilities have cameras.The Parks and Recreation Department says it is working to install strategically-placed CCTV at all of our parks and recreation sites.“Are we at a point where we have to police playgrounds at night,” Commissioner Ross questioned.The first suspect is described as an African American male with short hair, between 5-foot-10 and 6-foot-2, wearing a black hoodie and between the ages of 19 and 25.The second man was wearing a black t-shirt, and 5-foot-6.If you have any information on these suspects, contact police immediately.CBS3’s Crystal Cranmore contributed to this report.Home•311 Help & Info•Contact Us•FAQs•Privacy Policy•CitizensNetDigital Content ProducerST. LOUIS (KMOV.com) – Five people were shot early Sunday morning in downtown St. Louis.Police said a man and four women were shot in the area of Tucker and Convention around 1:30 a.m.Four of the victims were listed as stable and a 23-year-old woman was in critical, unstable condition following the shooting.Four other people who were in the area when the shooting occurred were not injured, police said.According to police, the victims are not cooperating and a motive is unknown.The investigation is ongoing.Copyright 2019 KMOV (Meredith Corporation). All rights reservedDigital Content ProducerLog InKeep it Clean.Please avoid obscene, vulgar, lewd,
racist or sexually-oriented language.PLEASE TURN OFF YOUR CAPS LOCK.Don't Threaten.Threats of harming another
person will not be tolerated.Be Truthful.Don't knowingly lie about anyone
or anything.Be Nice.No racism, sexism or any sort of -ism
that is degrading to another person.Be Proactive.Use the 'Report' link on
each comment to let us know of abusive posts.Share with Us.We'd love to hear eyewitness
accounts, the history behind an article.Filed under:It’s the second shooting in less than three hours where four people were wounded by gunfire in a single incident in the South Side neighborhood.Four people were wounded in a shooting Sunday in Englewood on the South Side.They were on the sidewalk about 3:43 a.m. in the 5600 block of South Paulina Street when someone fired shots from a black SUV, Chicago police said.A 31-year-old man struck in the leg was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in critical condition, police said. A woman, 22, was shot in the back and taken to the same hospital. Her condition was stabilized.A 21-year-old woman who was shot in the foot had her condition stabilized at St. Bernard Hospital, police said. Another woman, 32, was hit in the leg and her was condition stabilized at Stroger Hospital.Area South detectives are investigating.Less than three hours earlier,four other people were hurtin a separate gun violence incident a few blocks away.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Filed under:They were in the 600 block of West 61st Place when someone fired shots.Four people were wounded in a shooting Sunday in Englewood on the South Side.They were outside about 1:10 a.m. in the 600 block of West 61st Place when someone unleashed gunfire and struck them, Chicago police said.A 37-year-old man who was hit in the legs tried to drive to a hospital in a silver Chrysler 300 but crashed at Union Avenue and 61st Place, police said. He was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in fair condition.Another man, 27, was shot in the buttocks and armpit, police said. He was taken to the same hospital in critical condition.A man and woman, both 25, were taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The man had gunshot wounds to the back and buttocks, and his condition was stabilized. The woman was grazed in the buttocks and is in good condition.Police don’t have a description of the shooter.Area South detectives are investigating.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.There may be an issue with the delivery of your newspaper. 
				This alert will expire atNaN.Click here for more info.Recover passwordRegisterSuccess! —Manage subscriptionsShare.......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... .......... ..........ALBUQUERQUE, N.M. — Four people were shot outside a Downtown nightclub early Sunday morning, and Albuquerque police are asking anyone who witnessed the incident to come forward to help them sort out the events that led to it.Officer Simon Drobik, a spokesman for the Albuquerque Police Department, said Valley officers responded to a shots-fired call at 2:34 a.m. at a nightclub near Gold and Second.“Upon arrival they discovered four gunshot victims in the adjacent parking lot,” he said. “The victims were transported and are currently being treated at local hospitals.”Drobik said a vehicle with visible firearms was sealed.“Numerous interviews were conducted, but there were conflicting statements and insufficient evidence to make an arrest without additional investigation,” he said.Drobik said three individuals were taken into custody for questioning. He noted that it is an active case being investigated by Valley impact detectives.ADVERTISEMENTSkipAlthough police identified the venue as the Lotus Nightclub, the venue reopened in 2018 as Tantra, according to the club’s Facebook page.Lotus Nightclub was no stranger to violence. In 2014, a 23-year-old was shot and killed shortly after leaving the club. In 2015, a fight that started inside Lotus ended in a shooting blocks away and in 2017 police responded to the club after a man was shot in the leg in an alley nearby, according to court documents.Copyright © 2021 Albuquerque Journal | Albuquerque, N.M. | www.abqjournal.com$14/moSubscribeOther OffersAlready a subscriber? Sign InFour males suffered non-life-threatening injuries when they were shot at a San Jose home late Saturday night, according to police.Police are still looking for a suspect in the shooting, which occurred around 11:45 p.m. in the area of Manda Drive and Hillsdale Avenue. Neighbors say there was a party going on at the home that was occupied by Airbnb renters at the time of the shooting.The four victims were found to be suffering from at least one gunshot wound each, according to police. They were transported to a local hospital.A motive for the shooting remains unknown at this time. An investigation is ongoing.Further information was not immediately available.FOX 2by:Kelley HoskinsNORTH ST. LOUIS COUNTY, MO – St. Louis County Police investigators are trying to get to the bottom of the discovery of five people found dead in a North County apartment Saturday afternoon.The community remains on edge. The deadly shooting happened in the 1900 hundred block Chambers, and detectives were back at the scene Sunday.“We heard a single shot then boom and boom and boom.”I heard numerous gunshots. We could tell they were not fireworks because it was so loud” said one resident.Some residents asked our news crew to not show their faces fearing a suspect remains at largePolice confirmed that the case is a homicide investigation, “One homicide is too many, it’s a tragedy for a community anytime we have a scene what appears to be five individuals’ victims of homicide rock the community,” said Chief Jon Belmar.Police would not go into details how the victims died but those who knew the victims claim the 5 adults died of a violent crime, “From what I hear, they all were shot in their head, all five people. That seems like the Devil’s work.” They were not trying to be extraordinary men,  they were not trying to be wealthy men, they just wanted to live a normal life and they were content with what they were doing,” said another resident.Police say those responsible for the murders remain at large, leaving some residents to frighten and very concerned, “It makes you be afraid to really be out here.  You got to wonder if what if they are still out here,” said a resident.“The biggest thing that I can say, we need help from the community to assist us in solving this crime. This is the most important thing we can do,” said Chief Jon Belmar.St. Louis County Police say the gunman is still out there and they encourage anyone with information to contact CrimeStoppers.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Six people who were attending a party were shot late Friday night on a Roxbury street, according to Boston police.Police said the victims, three men and three women ages 25 to 35, were shot while inside a vehicle. It is not clear whether they were inside the same vehicle or in different vehicles."It's really sad," said neighborhood resident Marie Rudolph. "This community, once, was taken over by drugs and they cleaned it up, and now it seems to be coming back. Most times, it's probably people that don't even live over here."Officers responded at 11:13 p.m. for a report of a shooting on Maple Street. Upon arrival, they found six victims suffering from gunshot wounds in an outdoor crime scene.The victims were transported to area hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries, police said."This is a nice neighborhood," said Boston Police Commissioner William Gross. "As I always say, this isn't indicative of the entire neighborhood."He said problems are caused by 1-2% of people in the area, "and we need to send a message that this is unacceptable."This shooting came a night after two people,including an 8-year-old girl, were shot at Mary Hannon Park on Dudley Street.Police set up a second crime scene on Blue Hill Avenue around a red Toyota Prius. This is related to the shooting but it was not made clear how.Officials are asking neighborhood residents for help with identifying the shooting suspects.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Mari Solis put on a straight face and walked into her room at the Travelodge motel in downtown Reno.She was in the midst of separating from her husband and was temporarily staying at the motel with her four young children, ages 7, 8, 14 and 15.“How do I tell them their brother is dead?” Solis asked herself.She couldn’t. Instead, she pretended like nothing happened. The next morning, she got ready for work—cleaning rooms for the motel where she was staying. She cried all day, she said.“I didn’t tell them nothing until two weeks later,” Solis said. “I would walk in from work and lock myself in the restroom for hours.”Our year of COVID-19:Feeling loss and hope as Nevada reaches first pandemic anniversaryOn the night of July 5, 2019, Solis’ son,Jordan Reynoso, was shot and killedat an apartment in the 600 block of Spokane Street, east of downtown. He was just 18 years old.According to the police report, three local gang members—later identified as Antonio Sotelo, Juan Chavez and Kelly Gillig—were paying Reynoso’s neighbor a shakedown visit.Court records show Reynoso went to check on his upstairs neighbor after hearing what sounded like fireworks, and he was later shot. Reynoso’s neighbor, who was acquainted with two of the men, was also shot that night, but she survived.Investigators have since arrested Sotelo and Chavez, both of whom were sentenced after pleading guilty to charges in the fatal shooting.In February, detectivesarrested Gillig for his alleged involvement,but a court date has not yet been set.Gone but not forgotten:Reno mom shares son’s story as a message to parentsAccording to the FBI’s Uniform Crime Reporting database, a total of 1,419 violent crimes were reported in Reno in 2019. Reynoso's death was among a dozen murders reported that year.Solis said she was grateful to the investigators who worked on her son’s case.“When you see something like that, people start thinking he was living that bad life,” Solis said of her son. “But he wasn’t, he was somebody’s hero.”Reynoso was at home with his roommate’s 12-year-old son the night of the shooting. He had just arrived from his shift at McDonald’s on Kietzke Lane when he heard what sounded like fireworks.Reynoso told the boy to stay inside as he rushed out to check on their neighbor.According to court documents, Sotelo, Chavez and Gillig were drunk and armed when they showed up at the neighbor’s apartment. At one point, Sotelo fired his gun twice at the ceiling.Reynoso was also armed with a handgun, which he bought for protection after being jumped several times before.The neighbor reassured Reynoso she was OK and asked him to leave, according to court documents. But Sotelo, Chavez and Gillig invited him in for a drink, and they all gathered in the bedroom.Reynoso reportedly told the men he was glad all was well. He pulled up his shirt to show them the handgun tucked in his waistband. He then shook hands with the men and tried to leave.“You guys stay smooth,” Reynoso told the men, one of whom took it as an insult, the report said.A witness said that Sotelo then pointed a gun at Reynoso's heart and shot him, according to court documents. Reynoso was shot several more times in the chest and abdomen.His neighbor was then shot in her shoulder, and the three men fled. By the time police showed up, they found Reynoso slumped against a wall in the bedroom. Meanwhile, his neighbor had collapsed by the front door.More stories like this:Chia murders 30 years later: 'I always pray that somebody will help me'Reynoso died at the scene. His neighbor was rushed to Renown Regional Medical Center and survived the shooting.Soon after, investigators learned Sotelo and Gillig arrived at the hospital with gunshot wounds. Sotelo had a gunshot wound that went through his abdomen and out his buttocks area. Gillig also had a gunshot wound to his right upper thigh. The police report did not specify how the two were shot. Solis said investigators told her the men accidentally shot themselves while they were attempting to get rid of the gun.Video surveillance showed someone had dropped them off at the hospital in Sotelo’s white Jeep Cherokee. The car was later found abandoned and on fire in Golden Valley.In July 2020, Sotelo was sentenced to 40 years in prison for shooting and killing Reynoso. He pleaded guilty to murder in the second degree with the use of a deadly weapon and is required to serve a minimum of 15 years before he can become eligible for parole.Chavez also pleaded guilty to one count of coercion with physical force or immediate threat of physical force with the use of a deadly weapon. He was sentenced to a maximum term of six years in prison with a minimum parole eligibility of 28 months.Irma Bell, Reynoso’s aunt, said she was glad Gillig was arrested last month for his suspected involvement.“Jordan lost his whole life ... and that’s not fair,” Bell said.“So, it was answered prayers for sure when they finally got him,” she said of Gillig. “Little by little, piece by piece, (the detectives) never gave up, and I thank God they never did.”Fourth of July has taken on a different meaning for Reynoso’s family. They light fireworks and gather to celebrate, but in his memory, Bell said.She described her nephew as a kid with “a really big heart for people.”“He had plans to get married,” Bell said. “He had plans to have kids. He had a lot of plans.“He was always like that, thinking about the future,” she said. “He’s a good kid who just got caught up in a bad situation.”Jacqueline Provencio-Sanchez, Reynoso’s grandmother, said her grandson would often visit her in Cold Springs. He always offered to help his grandfather with the yard work.For his birthday, Provencio-Sanchez baked him his favorite dessert, banana-nut bread, and gave him $50.He would have turned 20 on March 15.“He was one of a kind, and we’ll never get to see him again,” she said in between sobs.Solis, who has since moved back in with her husband in Sparks, described her son as a homebody. He loved music and was learning to dance to impress his girlfriend.He was flashy and liked expensive things, but he worked hard to buy them. He would take his younger siblings out to eat and hand them each five dollars. He showered his girlfriend with gifts, too.In total he had five other siblings, four younger ones and an older adult brother.The day after he died, he received an acceptance letter from a college he applied to. Still, Solis said she couldn't recall which college sent the acceptance letter. She was too distraught to notice at the time.“He didn’t want to be a gangster,” Solis said, adding his biological father and her oldest son, Reynoso's older brother, have been in and out of jail. “He wanted better for himself.”At the small Reno apartment building where Reynoso was shot, a red wooden cross under a stairwell displays Reynoso's name and the dates he was born and died in white ink. A couple of candles sit at its base.Solis buried her son at Smith Mountain Cemetery in Dinuba, California, where her brother is buried. Her mother and sister live in the area and often leave flowers at Reynoso's grave.She would like to get her son a headstone, which would cost her about $1,700, and is trying to save up the money to do so.Marcella Corona is a reporter covering local underrepresented communities in Northern Nevada.Support her work by subscribing to RGJ.com.Filed under:Police responded to shots fired in the 1600 block of East 67th Street and discovered multiple people shot.Five people were wounded by gunfire Friday in Woodlawn on the South Side.Officers responded to calls of shots fired about 2:08 a.m. in the 1600 block of East 67th Street and found five people with gunshot wounds, Chicago police said.An 18-year-old woman who was struck in the chest and arm was taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center, police said. Another 18-year-old was taken to the same hospital with gunshot wounds to his leg and chest. Both of their conditions were stabilized.A 33-year-old man who was shot twice in the back was also taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center in good condition, police said.A 20-year-old woman was struck in the ankle and took herself to Stroger Hospital, and a 26-year-old man was taken to the same hospital with a gunshot wound to the leg, police said. Both were in good conditions.No one is in custody as Area Central detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.RelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.WATCHVIDEOS4 shot in Brooklyn after 4th of July fireworksAt least four men are shot after an argument late Thursday night in Rockford.Around 10 p.m. Rockford Police responded to the 1100 block of Preston Street for a shooting. Officers learned an argument among a group of people outside a residence led to shots fired. Four men, ages 32, 33, 38 and 47, were struck by gunfire and taken to local hospitals. Their conditions are unknown at this time.The incident is not believed to be random as all the men involved knew each other. No further details are available at this time.Anyone with information should contact Rockford Police at 815-966-2900 or leave an anonymous tip with Rockford Area Crime Stoppers at 815-963-7867.LOS ANGELES (FOX 11)-Four people were taken to the hospital Thursday night after being shot in the Central-Alameda area of Los Angeles.The shooting happened at about 8:44 p.m. in the 1900 block of Adair Street. Details are limited as the investigation continues.One teenage girl, a woman and two men were taken to a local hospital, according to the Los Angeles Fire Department.Police have not released any information on the gunman. Authorities don't believe this shooting was gang-related.No further details were immediately known. Anyone with information on this crime is asked to contact the LAPD.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsFiled under:Keshawn Keaton was initially charged with torching a vehicle used by his fellow gunmen about a week after the 2019 shooting that claimed the life of 32-year-old Pierre Teamer. But murder and attempted murder charges were filed against Keaton this week after an additional witness recently identified him as one of the individuals who pulled the trigger, Cook County prosecutors said.A Hermosa man was ordered held on $5 million bail Tuesday for his alleged involvement in a  Fourth of July shooting that left one dead and three others injured in Humboldt Park.Keshawn Keaton was initially charged with torching a vehicle used by his fellow gunmen about a week after the 2019 shooting that claimed the life of 32-year-old Pierre Teamer.But murder and attempted murder charges were filed against Keaton this week after an additional witness recently identified him as one of the individuals who pulled the trigger, Cook County prosecutors said.Keaton had been identified as a “participant” in the arson and the shooting, according to his 2019 arrest report. One witness identified him as a shooter at that time and another person identified him as a shooter in November.But prosecutors did not explain in court Tuesday as to why there was a delay in charging Keaton with more serious crimes earlier.Witnesses saw Keaton and two others get out of two cars and open fire at a group of people hanging out and playing dice near Iowa Street and Homan Avenue around 11:30 a.m. that morning, prosecutors said.The deadly shooting, which also wounded three men — ages 17, 23 and 31 — was part of a violent July Fourth weekend that year, which sawfive people killed and 63 others wounded, the Chicago Sun-Times had reported.After the shooting, officers tried to chase the white sedan involved in the crime but lost sight of the car. They found it abandoned that afternoon, Chicago police said at the time.Keaton, a reputed member of the TNG faction of the Conservative Vicelords, was captured on a surveillance camera wiping down and pouring lighter fluid on the sedan before setting it on fire, prosecutors said.When he was arrested in 2019, Keaton admitted to setting the sedan on fire during a recorded phone call, prosecutors said. “They got me on the arson, ain’t no denying that’s me on the video and it’s my face, they showed me pictures,” Keaton allegedly said.Court records show Keaton was initially held without bail for arson, but was later released on electronic monitoring. Judge Mary Marubio Tuesday revoked Keaton’s bond for the pending arson.When Keaton was arrested at this home Monday, officers recovered a loaded semiautomatic handgun, more than $32,000 in cash and 265 grams of marijuana, prosecutors said.As a result, Keaton is facing an additional felony drug charge and a misdemeanor weapons charge.Keaton’s attorney argued that the search was illegal because a warrant was not obtained and Keaton was arrested at the front door.Keaton was working at a suburban Portillo’s before his arrest for the arson, the defense attorney said.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.WKRN News 2by:The Associated PressMan in stolen car leads Brentwood Police on a pursuit, abandons car in south NashvilleFORT BEND, Texas (AP) — A Texas sheriff says a brother fatally shot his sister and wounded three others before killing himself at a housewarming party.News outlets report that the Fort Bend County Sheriff’s Office said deputies were called to a home at around 11:30 p.m. Wednesday. The woman was dead, while the suspect later died at a hospital. Two other women and a man who were wounded are expected to survive.Sheriff Troy Nehls told KHOU early Thursday that the family had just moved into the neighborhood, and they’re trying to figure out what prompted the attack. He said all of those hurt are “family and friends.”Two other women managed to escape the shooting, and deputies found a teenager locked inside a bathroom, not physically hurt.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.GATLINBURG, Tenn. (WATE) -- A lost parrot and his owner have been reunited thanks to employees and visitors at Anakeesta in Gatlinburg.You may have hear stories about missing dogs or cats, but what about a missing parrot?DETROIT (AP) — Honda is recalling more than 628,000 vehicles in the U.S. to replace fuel pumps that can fail, causing the engines to stall.The recall covers much of the Honda and Acura model lineup from the 2018 to 2020 model years including the CR-V small SUV, the company's top-selling U.S. vehicle.NASHVILLE, Tenn. (WKRN) - So far this afternoon, the instability of the atmosphere has been low in our eastern and northeastern counties that have been in the Marginal Risk category (1 of 5) for severe weather.Odds are at this point, we have escaped strong storms there.FOX 2by:Jason Maxwell,Katherine HesselWELLSTON, Mo. –   Police are searching for a suspect who injured four people in a drive-by shooting Tuesday night.According to the North County Police Cooperative, the shooting happened just before midnight at Clay’s Wellston Food Market Restaurant, the same place where Officer Michael Longsdorf was shot and killed last week.Police say that a suspect shot rounds from a crew cab pick up truck. Security video caught a car leaving the scene at a high rate of speed. The car is described as possibly being a white Dodge Dakota.Police released a photo of the suspected shooter to get from the community in identifying the person involved in the shooting.Anyone with information regarding the shooting is asked to contact the NCPC Bureau of Criminal Investigations 314-428-7374.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.Trending:OAKLAND — A 12-year-old boy and three adults were injured in an East Oakland shooting Sunday morning, authorities said.In addition to the boy, 45- and 30-year-old men were shot and a 45-year-old woman sustained injury from shrapnel, authorities said. All of them are expected to recover.Police said the four are part of the same family, but their exact relationships were not confirmed.The shooting was reported about 12:08 a.m. Sunday outside an apartment complex in the 3000 block of Brookdale Avenue, a residential area in the Lower Dimond area of the city.Police said the family was having a barbecue when at least one gunman got out of a vehicle and began shooting at the victims from the street. The victims were outside.Multiple rounds were fired, injuring the four victims and damaging the front of the apartment building.The shooter fled in the vehicle before police arrived.The adults, some of whom were hit more than once by the gunfire, were taken to a hospital and the boy, who was wounded in the leg, was treated at the scene, authorities said.Police don’t have a motive yet for the shooting.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $20,000 in reward money for information leading to the arrest of the shooter.  Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3426 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Check back for updates.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersTrending:Josh Mitchell was listening to rap music with his friend Sunday night, June 30, when he thought he heard fireworks.When he turned the music down, he heard them again. This time, he said, he knew the sound wasn’t fireworks, but gunshots.“You just don’t expect these things to happen this close to home,” he said.Five people were wounded, none seriously, in a Yucaipa shooting that began as an afternoon argument at a mobile home park barbecue and ended with gunfire breaking out, authorities said, endangering dozens of people at the scene.Three of the victims had arm and leg wounds described as non life-threatening, and two had graze wounds, San Bernardino County sheriff’s deputies said. The victims were identified as four men and one woman.One person was been detained, but was not described Monday as a suspect.A Chevrolet Trailblazer left the Mountain View mobile home park in the 12700 block of California Street late Sunday afternoon, according to deputies, and later returned. The SUV has since been found, they said.The people inside the Trailblazer started arguing with family members at the barbecue, according to deputies, then left after threatening to kill them. They returned and a fight broke out with shots fired from a handgun, wounding the five people.Deputies were called shortly before 10 p.m.Witnesses had given to investigators photos they had taken of the Trailblazer.At the time of the shooting there were “dozens of witnesses and involved parties at and around the fight,” deputies said, asking Monday that those who left before law enforcement arrived contact them.Some may have videos of the shooting and argument, and deputies are asking to see those.Mobile home residents on California Street, including Frances Johnson and Maria Rodriguez, also figured the noise Sunday night was from fireworks. After all, Rodriguez explained, the upcoming Fourth of July holiday made it a possibility.“I thought somebody was popping M-80s,” she said.By midday Monday, police had left the area and no signs of the shooting remained.Anyone with information or evidence of the shooting is asked to contact the Yucaipa Sheriff’s Station at  909-918-2305. Anonymous tips can be made at 800-782-7463 or atwww.wetip.com.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.DALLAS — Two teens were killed and another two teens were injured in a drive-by shooting Sunday night near an apartment complex in old east Dallas.Officers were called at 11:18 p.m. to 3535 Munger Avenue., near U.S. 75 and Hall Street. The teens were playing dice in front of the Roseland Community Center near the apartments when a vehicle drove by and began shooting at them, police said.Gregory Horton III and Zacchaeus Banks, both 17, were pronounced dead at the hospital, police said.The other two teens underwent surgery as of early Monday morning, and their conditions are unknown.On Monday, the pavement outside the community center is still stained with the blood of the four victims who were shot. Hearts were heavy and emotions were high in the complex as people returned to the crime scene Monday.”You feel like you get defeated," Roseland Community Center behavioral specialist Tierre Berger said. "When a tragedy like that happens, everybody feels it. It’s like a ripple effect."”It’s very frustrating. It’s frustrating because two innocent young men were in the wrong place at the wrong time. And they lost their lives. You can’t ever get a life back," assistant community director Cierra Cotton said.It’s a ripple effect that stings for neighbors in the community. They are concerned police are still working to identify suspects responsible for the killings. Residents call it yet another senseless crime that is leaving people fearful and insecure.”I don’t even want to come outside at night,” a teen said.Staff at the community center spent Monday trying to mask some of the damage to the building. They were covering bullet holes on the windows with plywood and motivational signs reading "Don’t Give Up."“It’s saying, hey, even though the worst happened, there’s a brighter side to it," Berger said. "We just have to find out what it is, and then exploit it.”Officers are carefully looking over the area of the playground for evidence, police said. They do not have a suspect description at this time.Crime Stoppers is offering up to $5,000 for information that leads to an arrest and indictment in the case. Call 214-373-8477 or call Detective Sayers with the Homicide Unit at 214-671-3647 if you have any information.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.We’ve detected that JavaScript is disabled in this browser. Please enable JavaScript or switch to a supported browser to continue using twitter.com. You can see a list of supported browsers in our Help Center.Help CenterTerms of ServicePrivacy PolicyCookie PolicyImprintAds info© 2021 Twitter, Inc.A investigation is underway after four people were shot in Hartford on Saturday afternoon.Police said the shooting happened near Judson Street and Martin Street around 3:30 p.m.Four people were shot and all are conscious and alert, authorities added. Two people were at the scene and two were transported to area hospitals.Officials did not release details about the conditions of the victims.Motorists are urged to avoid the area during the investigation.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.The Terrebonne Parish Sheriff's Office said they are investigating a shooting that injured four people in Grey.According to Sheriff Jerry Larpenter, around 3:30 a.m. Saturday, deputies responded to the 2700 block of West Park Avenue for a call of multiple people shot inside of a car that crashed into a utility pole.Officials said five people under the age of 21 were in the car at the time of the crash. Four of the people were shot and taken to a hospital.Their conditions are not known.Larpenter said the shooting appears to have stemmed from an earlier argument outside of a business on Martin Luther King Boulevard.There has been no word of a suspect at this time.Anyone with information can contact the Terrebonne Parish Sheriff's Office at 985-876-2500 or Bayou Region Crime Stoppers at 1-800-743-7433.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Filed under:They were in the 2400 block of West Jackson Boulevard when someone opened fire.Multiple people were shot Saturday while gathering outside in the Near West Side.About 2:32 a.m., five people were on the street in the 2400 block of West Jackson Boulevard when someone unleashed gunfire, Chicago police said. All five took themselves to area hospitals.A 22-year-old woman went to the University of Illinois Medical Center with a gunshot wound to her leg, police said. Her condition was stabilized.Four others went to Stroger Hospital, police said. Two 28-year-old men shot in the leg and back and a 54-year-old man hit in the back had their conditions stabilized. A 49-year-old woman who was shot in the chin is in serious condition.Witnesses and the five shot didn’t see who shot them or know where the rounds came from, police said. Area North detectives are investigating.Red cups and liquor bottles littered the street. A blue flat-brimmed Cleveland Cavaliers hat lay crushed on the sidewalk beside a fresh blood splatter.A bullet struck the side of an apartment building on the street, but the man who was sleeping in one of units said he didn’t hear any gunfire.“I was woken up by the police lights,” Giovanni said. He only gave his first name for fear of getting recognized by the large group of people he said gather on the corner nearly every weekend.“It’s a large crowd,” he said, “I usually try not to interact with them.”The former Pilsen resident has been living in the apartment for a little over a year and said he’s previously complained about the gatherings to police.“They usually just drive by but don’t do anything about them,” he said. “Last weekend was really noisy, too. Nothing happened but it was just a matter of time.”RelatedRead more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.BATON ROUGE, La. (WAFB) - Police announced an arrest in a shooting investigation in which seven people were injured at a Florida Boulevard nightclub.Cadonovan Sanchezz Robinson, 24, of Zachary, was arrested Tuesday, July 23 in connection with the shooting. He was booked into the East Baton Rouge Parish Prison and charged with attempted first degree murder. Baton Rouge Police Chief Murphy Paul says detectives received many videos posted on social media of the shooting incident.The videos helped detectives identify a suspect. Paul didn’t say whether there will be any other arrests, but says the investigation is active.Paul thanked the community for sending tips to investigators and asks residents to continue helping.“The Baton Rouge community came together during this horrific incident and helped us identify this shooter. The video footage that was given to us and posted on social media ultimately led us in the right direction. Special thanks to my officers for their hard work and to the Zachary Police Department and State Police Fugitive Task Force," Paul said.On June 29 at about 1 a.m., at least two people had life-threatening injuries after seven people were hurt during the shooting at a nightclub on Florida Boulevard.The Baton Rouge Police Department responded to a call about the shooting reported at the Stadium Ultralounge on Florida Boulevard. The club is located across the street from the Bon Marche Mall.Investigators believe a physical altercation escalated into a shooting. Gunshots were fired both inside and outside of the club.First responders picked up four patients at the shooting location and three other victims were picked up at a nearby address.RELATED:String of 5 shootings sends over 12 to hospital in violent Baton Rouge weekendThe patients were transported to a local hospital. One of the patients is believed to not have been shot, but was injured during the shooting incident.Multiplevideosshowing moments before the shooting have surfaced. Gunshots can be heard in a video that was taken inside the nightclub. Another video taken in the parking lot of the club shows people walking around before gunshots can be heard.The Florida Boulevard shooting happened the same night as two other late night shootings in Baton Rouge. Two people were injured in ashooting reported on Jasper Avenue, and at least one person was injured ina shooting near Fred’s Bar in Tigerland, according to EMS spokesperson Nick McDonner.McDonner added the shootings are unrelated.The investigation is ongoing.The police anyone with information to contact the Baton Rouge Police Department’s Violent Crime Unit at 225-389-4869 or Crime Stoppers at 225-344-7867.GUNFIRE CAUGHT IN GRAPHIC VIDEO!! An Instagram user captured the wild scene as a shooting erupted Friday night at the Stadium Ultralounge on Florida Blvd. WAFB STORY➡️: https://bit.ly/2YlphI3Copyright 2019 WAFB. All rights reserved.844 Government StreetBaton Rouge, LA 70802(225) 383-9999A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.New Haven Police believe there is a connection between a shooting at a party in Hamden that injured five people and a boy who was shot while inside of a home in New Haven on Friday night.Five people were shot while Hamden Police were clearing a 500-person house party around 8:45 p.m.Officers were called to dispurse the massive party that spilled onto Choate Avenue."We were getting reports that there were drunk people on individuals' lawns, things of that sort, so we were here to disperse that and that's when the chaos began," Hamden Police Captain Ronald Smith said.Officials said homeowners and guests began cooperatively dispersing. “While we had 3 or 4 officers on scene, someone began to shoot into the crowd. As far as we know right now, we have at least 5 victims,” Capt. Smith added.Police said four victims were taken to the hospital by ambulance. Another was driven to a hospital by a friend.According to police, the victims are all between the ages of 18 and 23.Three victims have been released and the two others are staying in the hospital for observation. All of the injuries are considered non life-threatening.A few hours later, an 8-year-old boy was shot while he was inside of a home in the Newhallville neighborhood of New Haven.Police said officers who were on patrol in the neighborhood reported hearing gunfire shortly before 11:30 p.m.A ShotSpotter activation and a 911 call helped police find a home on Thompson Street between Newhall Street and Shelton Avenue, where investigators believe several gunshots were fired, authorities said.According to police, an 8-year-old boy who was lying in a bedroom on the first floor was hit by gunfire. He suffered a non life-threatening gunshot wound to his leg and was transported to Yale-New Haven Hospital.The boy's mother said her family is shaken and no longer feels safe in their home.“Nobody want to sleep there for now, because it’s scary," Liliane Toupou told NBC Connecticut. “Every time I go downstairs the whole thing comes across my mind.”"We will not tolerate violence that results in the shooting of an 8-year-old child in our city. We won't tolerate violent crime, especially that violent crime that happens with gunfire," said interim New Haven Police Chief Tony Reyes.In a surveillance video released by New Haven Police, a car can be seen driving down the road before it reverses back down the same road. A few seconds later, someone can be seen getting out of the vehicle as it drives away. The video shows the person firing what looks like one shot into a home before running off.Police believe the home was targeted, but Toupou, who says she shares all three floors of the multi-family home with extended family, said they largely keep to themselves and don't have any friends or enemies.New Haven Police did not release details about exactly how they believe the two shootings are connected, but they said they are communicating with detectives on an hourly basis.The investigation into both shootings is ongoing. Anyone with information is urged to contact police.ATLANTA —Two separate shooting scenesintwo separate parts of Atlanta. Two days apart. Each with seven shooting victims. According to Atlanta Police, both shootings are believed to be gang-related.Investigators said the two shootings are not connected. However, state officials said gang violence is at a crisis level in Georgia.In the first shooting, which took place early Thursday morning in Atlanta's Old Fourth Ward area, investigators said several dozen shots were fired from two cars at a group of people standing in the 600 block of Parkway Drive, N.E.According to police investigators, five men and one woman initially appeared to be targeted in the shooting. They later discovered that a seventh victim transported themselves to the hospital."Several of them are known, documented gang members," said Atlanta Police Major Michael O'Connor. "They were out there in the very early morning hours."RELATED |Shooting that injured 7 in Old Fourth Ward believed gang-related, police say"The neighborhood itself, you know, it's somewhat challenged - this particular series of apartment complexes that stretches for a while," O'Connor said. "That's been the case since I've joined the police department. The entire time I've been here it's been something of a drug market over there."He said it is not a new problem in that neighborhood, which is only a few blocks from the revitalized Ponce City Market area and the BeltLine."As we pick one person off, somebody else fills that spot," O'Connor said. "So we continue to work on it diligently. It's an ongoing effort; it has been for decades now."RELATED |Police precinct slated for Old Fourth Ward where 7 people were shotPolice said they have several significant leads in the case. They are looking for multiple suspects and are searching for one silver car and one other dark-colored car.The second shooting took place in the Mechanicsville neighborhood of Southwest Atlanta late Friday night in the 700 block of Ira Street, S.W. at about 11:15 p.m.White said thatseven people were hit by gunfirewhen, according to witnesses, a black SUV and a black sedan drove into the location and began firing into a group of people. He said that four vehicles were also damaged by gunfire.The shooting victims took themselves to hospitals for treatment, according to White.Police said that shooting is also believed to be gang-related. However, is not believed to be connected to the Parkway Drive incident.RELATED |Seven people wounded in southwest Atlanta shootingIn April,Georgia Gov. Brian Kemp launched a gang task force, with the goal of reducing what state officials are calling a crisis."Nearly every county in Georgiahas reported gang activity," Kemp said. "I've made my position clear when it comes to street gangs and drug cartels. It is a serious issue in our state. One we cannot afford to ignore."Kemp said there are about 71,000 gang members in the state of Georgia."Most crimes are gang-related, specifically violent crimes - the aggravated assaults, the drive-by shootings, the murders," according to Jaret Usher, the former Cobb County prosecutor who is leading the task force."When you look further into why these are happening and the motivation behind them and the evidence that comes out, the statistics do back up that they are gang-motivated and gang-related."RELATED |Kemp: Nearly every Georgia county has gang activityUsher is working with the Georgia Bureau of Investigation to investigate and prosecute gang activity.GBI Director Vic Reynolds said he has worked with Usher in the past, while in his prior role as Cobb County District Attorney.In the past, Reynolds said he has seen law enforcement agencies "step over" gang cases."What would happen previously - and we even did this in Cobb for a number of years before we made a conscious decision not to do it - is that a homicide investigation would be pursued and ultimately a murder charge may be filed against an individual," Reynolds said. "However, if it was gang-motivated, sometimes the gang portion would not be pursued, just simply because the homicide charge being as serious as it is."Reynolds and Usher said they have already had a couple of areas around the state reach out to them requesting help with gang activity.RELATED HEADLINES |Gangs are infiltrating Atlanta and targeting its children - and they're doing it in plain sightGang members sentenced in 'the most horrific death' in recent county historyGangster Disciples: Murders, molestation, moneyA body, a burning truck and the Ghostface Gangsters: 4 convicted in Mableton murderNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.JERSEY CITY– Four people were shot late Friday night in the area of Armstrong Avenue and Martin Luther King Drive, Jersey City spokeswoman Kimberly Wallace-Scalcione said.Police were looking for two males supected in the shootings, police said in radio transmissions early Saturday morning.One female had a graze wound while one male was shot in the leg, police said in radio transmissions.All four victims were taken to a local hospital, Wallace-Scalcione said. Officials did not describe any of the injuries and or provide any ages of the victims.The shooting comes just a few days aftera 22-year-old and 28-year-old were shot on Ocean Avenue, between Bidwell and Bayview avenues, a short distance away.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesST. PAUL — Five people were shot and injured, one critically, on Friday night, June 28, in St. Paul.The shootings in the Payne-Phalen area happened about two hours aftera man was killed in a shooting, also on the city’s East Side, but Sgt. Mike Ernster said police don’t believe the cases are related.Officers responded to a two-story house at 909 Desoto Street about 10:30 p.m. on a report of shots fired and found four people injured.A woman and three men were taken by ambulance to Regions Hospital, the St. Paul Pioneer Press reported. One of the men has life-threatening injuries, Ernster said.Someone brought another man who was shot in the incident to St. John’s Hospital in Maplewood. He and three other people are in stable condition, Ernster said.Police investigation was complicated by the number of people at the house and the conflicting reports of how the incident occurred. Area officers were stretched thin, several leaving the site of the homicide on Earl Street to help at the drive-by shooting scene.No one was under arrest as of early Saturday morning and the circumstances of the shootings are under investigation.Two children are hospitalized after an accidental shooting inside a Fort Worth home Thursday, police say.A 7-year-old girl is recovering and her 5-year-old brother is undergoing a second surgery.They were accidentally shot by their cousin who is just 10 years old, according to family.The latest news from around North Texas.The shooting happened at a home near Interstate 30 and Beach Street in East Fort Worth.The children's grandmother, who was home at the time of the shooting, rushed them to the hospital.She told NBC 5 the shooting happened with a pistol that shot pellets like a shotgun, and that when she first saw it even she initially thought it was a toy.Her son, Jordan Lewis, told NBC 5 his 10-year-old daughter accidentally shot her cousins after they found a gun while digging in a bucket full of clothes.The children had been searching for cell phones to play with, according to the grandmother.Lewis said his daughter tried to take the loaded gun out of her 5-year-old cousin's hands when it accidentally went off once.Pellets struck the boy in his chest and hit the hand of his 7-year-old sister who was nearby. Their grandmother immediately drove the children to Cook Children's Hospital.Fort Worth police said that one child is listed in stable condition and one child is listed in serious condition.Police also said they are investigating the shooting as an accident and do not expect any charges will be filed in the case. Child Protective Services is also investigating.According to the Texas Department of Public Safety, making a firearm available to a child is a Class C misdemeanor and can be enhanced to Class A if the child discharges the gun and causes death or serious bodily injury to himself or another person.The father told NBC 5/Telemundo 39 it's not clear who owns the gun.MenuAKRON, Ohio — Authorities are offering a reward for information that leads to the arrest of a 33-year-old man wanted for aggravated murder in Akron, according to the Northern Ohio Violent Fugitive Task Force.Martino Livingston, 33, of Akron, is wanted for attempted murder and aggravated murder by the Summit County Sheriff's Office and the Akron Police Department.On June 26,  Livingston allegedly was involved in a shooting that happened in the 900 block of Rowe Street in Akron. Four people were shot inside a home, including Brandon Varner, 34, who died from his injuries.Livingston is described as standing at 5 feet, 11 inches and weighing 190 pounds. His last known address is near the 1000 block of Hardesty Boulevard. He's considered armed and dangerous.Anyone with information on his whereabouts is asked to call the Northern Ohio Fugitive Task Force at 1-866-4WANTED. Tipsters can remain anonymous and reward money is available.RELATED:Police: 3 injured, 1 dead in Akron home invasion shootingFour people injured in shootingMILWAUKEE -- Four men were hurt in a shooting near 34th and Hadley on Wednesday, June 27. The victims were all taken to the hospital for their injuries. Neighbors say this is the second shooting in the same location in two days.Glen WrightIn total, five people have been injured by gunfire in that same location in less than 24 hours. The circumstances surrounding the shootings are still under investigation, but one thing is clear: community members and city leaders agree there are too many guns on the streets.Bullet castings litter the street at 34th and Hadley two days in a row. According to the people living in the neighborhood, it's become a normal occurence."I just heard a lot of shots," said Glen Wright. "I hit the floor."Shooting near 34th and HadleyNellie MillerAdvertisementMilwaukee Police say a 33-year-old man was shot an wounded on Tuesday night. Less than 24 hours later, four men between 23 and 41 were also struck and taken to the hospital."It's out of hand, and it needs to stop," said Nellie Miller. "You can hardly walk out your door. You can't sit on bus stops. It's just too ridiculous."Residents' pleas for peace are one the community hears time and time again."I say just find something better for us to do as a whole," said Wright. "We'll be more occupied and won't have time for the foolishness."Shooting near 34th and HadleyCity leaders are listening.Shooting near 34th and Hadley"The frustrating part is we've had so much progress this year, where we've seen double digit reductions in homicides and non-fatal shootings," said Mayor Tom Barrett.Mayor Barrett says he and the police chief are working with a number of different agencies to ensure this violent streak doesn't become a trend all summer long."We know that this is the time of year when there are more people outside. And we want to just get that message across, there will obviously be a strong police, but you can`t have a police officer on every single block. So there has to be worked on with our partners, including the office of violence prevention and our church groups and community groups," said Mayor Barrett.Police haven't said if any suspects have been arrested -- but the mayor says officers know who they're looking for, and that the shooters and victims know each other.Shooting near 34th and HadleyThis material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsNearly three months after a young woman died after being gunned down near a house party in La Jolla, San Diego police have arrested a second suspect in the case.Malik Campbell, 20, was taken into custody on Sept. 11 and charged with first-degree murder in the shooting of Nina Silver, 20. The San Diego Police Department confirmed Campbell's arrest Friday; he's the second suspect in this case.Silver died after acar opened fire on her and three othersas they stood in an alley off Cuvier Street near Pearl Street on June 23. The gunfire was reported at 12:40 a.m. as a car passed the group.SDPD Lt. Matt Dobbs said Campbell is being charged in the death of Silver, as well as the assault of the three others in the drive-by shooting.He has pleaded not guilty to all charges and is currently being held at San Diego Central Jail. Campbell's court date is set for Oct. 8.Campbell's arrest comes after policearrested and charged the first suspectin this case, Odyssey Sellers Carrillo, 18, in July.Carillo was charged with six felonies, including murder, three counts of assault with a semi-automatic firearm, unlawful possession of a firearm, and evading an officer with reckless driving. According to court documents, Carrillo was convicted of robbery as a 15-year-old.The case is being handled by the San Diego County District Attorney's Office. No other details have been released.KRON4by:KRON4 Staff,The Associated PressSANTA CLARA COUNTY (KRON) — The four people who police say were killed by a relative who then turned the gun on himself in San Jose earlier this week have been identified.According to the Santa Clara County Coroner, the victims are identified as:It happened late at a home on Habbitts Court in the Cramer Umbarger neighborhood.Police were on the scene after neighbors heard gunshots Sunday night.Two of the victim were able toget out of the home, but later died at the hospital.A tense standoff with police lasted several hours.When police finally got inside, they found the bodies of two other people and the suspected shooter.A relative of the gunman says the man hadbeen upset his wife was able to get visas for her relativeto travel from Vietnam to the United States.To Van Khuat said that 66-year-old Chi Dinh Ta had recently called him and told him he planned to kill his in-laws, who had recently arrived from Asia.Khuat says Ta was his wife’s cousin.He says the Ta had been seething with jealousy because he was not able to bring his own family from Vietnam.Police have not confirmed the identity of the gunman.Residents in the San Jose neighborhood are shocked at what happened, one neighbor saying she heard gunshots and screams on the night of the shooting.“I heard screaming, like a lady screaming and then gunshots, then more screaming and another gunshot and then silence,” said neighbor Fatima Jimenez.Another resident, Lorenz Dumuk, says there was no indication that his neighbor, Ta, who lived with his family in the house on Habbitts Court, was angry about anything.“It’s one of those neighborhoods where you know he would say hi to his neighbors and they would have talks now and then,” Dumuk said.Dumuk says the situation and the alleged jealousy over a visa brings up concerns of how people deal with anger.“You don’t see the anger, you don’t see anything until the anger finally manifests itself into action like this, we don’t get to talk about until the anger becomes destructive,” Dumuk said.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.SEDRO-WOOLLEY, Wash. (AP) — With dish soap, brushes and plastic water jugs in hand, Carole Rae Woodmansee’s four children cleaned the gravestone their mother shares with their father, Jim. Each scrub shined engraved letters spelling out their mother’s name and the days of her birth and death: March 27, 1939, and March 27, 2020.Carole passed away on her 81st birthday.CHICAGO (NewsNationNow) – One mom's battle with picky eaters won her millions of views and followers on social media.Meet Jessica Woo, a normal mom who went viral on TikTok for creating bento box lunches for her children. She told NewsNation's Nichole Berlie that she wanted to foster good memories for her kids by creating the boxed lunches.HALF MOON BAY, Calif. (BCN) - Two people were rescued from a fire early Saturday morning at the historic San Benito House in Half Moon Bay, Cal Fire officials said.The fire was first reported at about 2:30 a.m. at the 1905 inn at 356 Main St.One man died and 10 others were injured in a June shooting at Kelly’s Pub in South Bend, and police just identified a person of interest in the investigation.Tyler Crawford, 28, has links to South Bend and Michigan City, according to the St. Joseph County Metro Homicide Unit. He was identified as being present at the time of the murder and is being sought for questioning.Just after 2 a.m. on June 23, South Bend police received a report of shots fired outside Kelly's Pub at 1150 Mishawaka Ave.Brandon D. Williams, a 27-year-old from Niles, died from a gunshot wound.Ten additional gunshot wound victims were identified, treated at area hospitals and released.Crawford has an outstanding warrant for an unrelated matter.Three people were killed and another was injured in an apartment shooting in Abbeville early Sunday morning, according to Abbeville County Coroner Ronnie Ashley.The shooting was reported just after 3 a.m. at the Hickory Heights Apartments on Cambridge Street, Ashley said. He did not know who made the 911 call.Residents of the apartment, Shirley Jones, 61, and Steven Tinch, 26, were pronounced dead at the scene of the shooting, Ashley said. John Moss, 25, who also lived at the apartment, died later at a local hospital. A fourth victim, William Brook, 24, survived the shooting and was being treated at a local hospital.Autopsies are scheduled for Wednesday.Ashley said he did not know of any relation between the victims and suspect.A motive for the shooting is still being investigated, said Thom Berry, a spokesman for the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. SLED was asked to help Abbeville police and the Coroner's Office in the investigation. Agents were still interviewing Brook Sunday afternoon, as well as people in the area of the shooting.“We’re continuing to talk to people and piece together events that led up to the shooting this morning," Berry said.As of about 1:30 a.m. Monday, an arrest had been made in the case.Elijah Ty Rez Head, 19, of Greenwood, was charged with three counts of murder, one count of attempted murder and one count of possession of a weapon during the commission of a violent crime.You can connect with reporter Gabe Cavallaro on Twitter@gabe_cavallaroorfacebook.com/cavallarogabeor email him at gcavallaro@greenvillenews.com.HAMPTON, Va. — The Hampton Police Division arrested a 15-year-old on Friday in connection to the Buckroe Beach shooting in June.Around 8 p.m. on June 22, Hampton police officers were on patrol at Buckroe Beach when several shots were fired in the area.Immediately officers responded and found several victims on the beach. A 12-year-old boy was suffering from life-threatening injuries.RELATED:12-year-old Buckroe Beach shooting victim speaks outA 7-year-old girl, a 31-year-old woman, and a 52-year-old man, also found by officers, were suffering from gunshot wounds, but they only had non-life threatening injuries.The 15-year-old boy who was arrested has been charged with three counts of Use of a Firearm in Commission of a Felony, two counts of Maiming, Aggravated Malicious Wounding, Reckless Handling of a Firearm, one count of Shooting in Public with Injury, and Possession of a Firearm by a Juvenile.Officers are still seeking information on at least one additional suspect in connection to this incident. Anyone that may have taken photos or videos, before or after the incident at Buckroe Beach on June 22, 2019, is asked to forward those to the Hampton Police Division at hamptonpdpio@hampton.gov.No further information has been released at this time.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.A gunman opened fire on a crowd in East Baltimore early Saturday morning, killing a 19-year-old man and injuring four others in one of several shootings Saturday, according to police.In total, 11 people were shot, three fatally, in various incidents throughout the city Saturday.A total of eight people were shot — of whom two were killed — in incidents across the city in a two-hour span. A third man was killed in a shooting late Saturday morning.Two people were shot in the 5600 block of The Alameda on Saturday evening. The first victim arrived to an area hospital around 7:30 p.m., and the second arrived an hour later.Just before 11:30 a.m., police received several ShotSpotter alerts in the 800 block of Bradford Ave. in East Baltimore. On July 1, Baltimore police identified the victim as 33-year-old Antonio Jackson Jr. and later, on July 5, announced he was killed.Police said the quintuple shooting occurred just before 1:15 a.m. Saturday when police were called to the 800 block of N. Port St. in the Milton-Montford neighborhood. Detectives said an unidentified male suspect approached the crowd and began shooting.Responding officers found a 19-year-old man and a 20-year-old man who had both been shot in the stomach. They were taken to an area hospital, where the 19-year-old was pronounced dead, police said.While still on the scene, investigators were notified of three walk-in shooting victims at an area hospital.Police said a 20-year-old woman was shot in the shoulder, a 19-year-old man was shot in the chin, and a 20-year-old male was shot in the arm and leg.Just before 1 a.m., Northern District officers were called to area hospital for a report of a walk-in shooting victim who had been shot in both legs.Police said he is in stable condition, but they did not identify where the shooting occurred.Just before 2 a.m., police said, another man was shot in the head in the 800 block of W. Lombard St., near Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. He was taken to an area hospital, where he was listed in critical condition; homicide detectives were notified.Police said later that the man had died.At 2:38 a.m., a patrol officer at Pennsylvania Avenue and West North Avenue in West Baltimore was approached by a man who had been shot in the thigh. He was also taken to an area hospital for treatment.Police determined he had been shot by an unidentified suspect in the 1100 block of W. North Ave.Anyone with information on the homicide is asked to call detectives at 410-396-2100 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7lockup.RecommendedPolice tapeMLive.com FileSAGINAW, MI – A shooting on Saginaw’s West Side has left one man dead and another three hospitalized.About 8:50 p.m. on Friday, June 21, police responded to a reported shooting at 1506 N. Charles St. They arrived to find four Saginaw men had suffered bullet wounds.One man, 34-year-old Damon Q. Adkins, was pronounced deceased at the scene, according to Michigan State Police Lt. Duane Zook. The other three men were taken to an area hospital, where they remain in serious condition as of Saturday morning, Zook said.The circumstances of the shooting are still being investigated. No suspect is in police custody, Zook said.The case is being handled by the Major Crimes Unit, which comprises investigators from the Michigan State Police and Saginaw Police Department.Anyone with information related to the shooting is urged to MSP Detective Sgt. William Arndt at 989-615-6257.Adkin’s death marks the city’s sixth homicide of 2019.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesFiled under:Someone fired shots into an apartment in the 6300 block of South King Drive and struck two women.Four people were wounded, including a pregnant woman, in a shooting Friday in Parkway Gardens on the South Side.About 3:08 a.m. someone came up the back alley stairs of a building in the 6300 block of South King Drive and fired shots into an apartment, according to preliminary information from Chicago police. Two women inside were struck by gunfire.A 22-year-old who is seven months pregnant was hit in the leg, arm, upper body and is in critical condition, police said. The second woman, 29, was struck in the leg, and her condition was stabilized.Officers found a 20-year-old man with a gunshot wound to the foot outside the building, and his condition was stabilized, police said.All three were taken to the University of Chicago Medical Center, police said.Authorities found another man, 26, with a gunshot wound to the arm in the hallway of the building, police said. His condition was stabilized at Saint Bernard Hospital.No arrests have been reported as Area South detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicidesRelatedKnow about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Santa Maria Fire Department/FacebookA dispute between Claude Adams and his neighbors resulted in the deaths of five people at the Casa Grande  Senior Mobile Estates Park in Santa Maria, California. After shooting Richard Hanen and Kurt Bracke, Adams murdered his wife, Sherry and son Seth, then killed himself. Adams also set the family home on fire.A long-standing feud between three neighbors turned deadly at a California mobile home park. Claude “Bodie” Adams, 64, murdered Kurt Bracke, 70, and Richard Hanen, 78, on June 21, at the Casa Grande Senior Mobile Estates Parkin Santa Maria. Adams then killed his wife,Sherry, 65, son Seth, 33, and himself.The mobile home park is a 55+ age-restricted community, located approximately 150 miles northwest of Los Angeles, inSanta BarbaraCounty. “Beautiful grounds, well maintained, lots of free activities, NICE clubhouse, pool, club kitchen and barbeque areas, nice golf course. Love, love, love!” one resident wrote on Facebook.“My husband and I have been living here for about 5 years. We love it. Everyone we met is friendly. We’re blessed with terrific neighbors,” is how another neighbor described the community.Neighbors who knew the shooter told KSBY he was not friendly and kept to himself. “He was always angry. He had issues and he really didn’t know how to handle them,” Kalani Young said.Here’s what you need to know about Claude Adams and the deaths at the Casa Grande Mobile Estates Park.The deadly series of events unfolded just before noon. Adams, Bracke, and Hanen had what Santa Maria police are describing as “a dispute.” The exact cause of the disagreement has not been made public but it’s believed the fight was related to Adams’ impending eviction from the community.Bracke and Hanen were close friends and organizers of the community’s Friday Golf Group. Adams confronted the two men at the mobile home park’s pitch and putt golf course, then went back to his house, got a gun, and returned to kill the two men. As police reached the clubhouse, Adams was spotted fleeing to his home at 519 W. Taylor Street, lot 407.Police responded to a “shots fired” call at 11:37 a.m. and were at the Casa Grande clubhouse within two minutes. When officers arrived at the scene they discovered the bodies of Bracke and Hanen. Police heard from witnesses that a potential suspect was in the neighborhood and headed toward lot 407. They initially thought there was an active shooter and asked residents to remain inside their homes.“Within moments, as we were starting to move in that direction, there were reports of an explosion and fire at 407,” Santa Maria Police Chief Phil Hansen revealed. He added that the fire engulfed the home on lot 407 almost immediately. Casa Grande resident Jeanne Pate told KSBY that after the explosion, she suddenly saw big black billows of smoke, along with police cars “coming from every direction possible,” and police running across her front lawn.Santa Maria Police have identified the suspect and other decedents in Friday's shooting and house fire that left five people dead at a mobile home park in the northwest part of the city. Detectives believe Claude Adams, 64, of Santa Maria, shot and …https://t.co/2s2ZnrpCEq— Santa Maria Times (@SantaMariaTimes)June 24, 2019As police headed toward the Adams residence, live ammunition inside the home began discharging from the heat of the blaze. “All throughout the firefighting challenge ammunition was cooking off,” Hansen explained. “That created a safety hazard for residents, for responding officers, forfirefighters, and whatnot. You had rounds just cooking off on a pretty regular basis from that location.”“I can’t believe something like this can happen here in this peaceful neighborhood,” Peter Salinas shared with KSBY. I noticed this big fire out here and a bunch of bullets that were popping off inside the house,”he said.Santa Maria Sergeant Russ Mengel said theammunitioncontinued to shoot off for a couple of hours, making ittoo dangerousfor firefighters respond. The delay resulted in three homes destroyed by the fire and several others severely damaged. “It was sending shrapnel and debris all of the street where we’re standing,” he told KSBY, showing the camera bullets and metal fragments blasted from the house.The bodies of Claude, Sherry and Seth Adams were so badly burned they have not been positively identified. Responders initially located two bodies in the Adams home but later found a third in the rubble. The police have not revealed if the Adams’ died in the fire or if they were killed prior to the explosion.DNA testing by the coroner is still pending. The Santa Maria Police Department has asked members of the Adams’ family to contact their office to help identify the bodies.According to Casa Grande residentK.C. Chavers, the community’s homeowner’s association has taken up a collection of cash and gift cards for neighbors whose homes were lost or damaged by the fire. “One of the houses that were completely destroyed lost everything. They likely got out with the clothes on their back,” Chavers said.Linda Culphad just purchased the house adjacent to the Adams’ residence. The Herald-News reported she was getting ready to move from Klamath Falls, Oregon to Santa Maria.“It’s a good thing I wasn’t down there. I could have been killed. I guess it was a blessing in disguise,” she said.“I’m just appalled at what happened,” Chavers shared, adding that Casa Grande is a quiet community were “most people are polite to one another.”Stay ConnectedFive people are hurt following a drive-by shooting late Friday in Richmond.The shooting was reported at 6:30 p.m. on the 700 block of 14th Street, police said.All five victims suffered non-life threatening injuries. Police do not have a suspect(s) description at this time.An investigation is ongoing and no other information was immediately available.WATCHVIDEOSShootings at 2 locations in Newark leave 1 dead, 6 woundedFour people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four people were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.Four men were shot in a drive-by attack late Monday in downtown San Antonio, police said.The four victims and one woman, all aged between 20 and 23, were traveling eastbound on Market Street near Tower of Americas Way at about 11:20 p.m. when they got into a verbal altercation with someone in a white pickup truck. The truck has a lift kit, tinted windows and a black grill guard.FIND OUT FIRST:Get San Antonio breaking news directly to your inboxOfc. Doug Greene, a spokesman for the police department, said someone inside the white truck then opened fire on the victims' blue Toyota Camry. Police later found the Camry wrecked on the access road. Investigators discovered a firearm inside the Camry."We don't know exactly what it was that sparked this altercation between the individuals," he said.The victims were identified as the Juan Longoria, 22, Noel Dillon, 21, Domingo Longoria, 21 and Noah Brandon, 22.The woman in the car was the only person who was not shot. The four men were hospitalized. Two went to University Hospital and two went to San Antonio Military Medical Center. The driver was the only victim to suffer life-threatening injuries. He is now in critical condition.Police said the shooter or shooters fled onto the Interstate 37 access road and have not been apprehended.Greene said there were multiple witnesses to the shooting."This is our downtown area so there's always people out and about so were thankful that not more people were injured in this incident," he said.Anyone with information on this case is asked to call the homicide unit at 210-207-7635.Text "NEWS" to 77453 for breaking news alerts for mySA.com.Caleb Downs covers crime in San Antonio and Bexar County. Read himon our breaking news site,mySA.com, andon our subscriber site,ExpressNews.com|cdowns@mysa.com|@calebjdownsCaleb Downs is a breaking news reporter for the San Antonio Express-News. His job is to hunt down crime and chaos in San Antonio and Bexar County. He is a graduate of the University of North Texas and has previously worked for The Dallas Morning News as a breaking news reporter.MEMPHIS, Tenn. (WMC) - Five people are injured following a shooting at a Raleigh apartment complex.According to Memphis Police Department, the shooting happened around 11:45 p.m. at the Huntington Hills Apartments on Coach Drive.Shelby County deputies noticed a car broken down near the intersection of Yale Road and Austin Peay Highway. When deputies stopped to help, they noticed a person inside the car had a a gunshot wound. The victim in the car was taken to the hospital.Around midnight, four people showed up to a Memphis hospital suffering from gunshot wounds. After investigating, police believe all five victims were shot in the parking lot of the Huntington Hills Apartment complex. The victims, all men, are all expected to survive.At this point, police do not have a description of any possible suspects.Copyright 2019 WMC. All rights reserved.1960 Union AvenueMemphis, TN 38104(901) 726-0555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WATCHVIDEOS1 killed, 5 injured in Philly graduation party shootingNeighbor says cookout was a graduation/Father’s Day party organized by a bunch of families in this SW Philly neighborhood. Police identified the deceased as 24 year old Isiaka Meite. 5 more people injured in shooting.pic.twitter.com/PppHaDqDcFLOUISVILLE, Ky. (WAVE) - In a violent weekend across Louisville, 13 people were shot, two of them fatally.The first of many shootings happened around 10:15 p.m. Friday. Police responded to the 5400 block of Robbs Lane. When they arrived, they found a woman in her late teens or early 20s with a gunshot wound. Police later said the shooting actually happened in the 9400 block of New Maple Road. The woman was taken to University of Louisville Hospital. She’s expected to survive.The second shooting came in around 6:30 Saturday morning, whenpolice found a man shot to death in the 800 block of Cecil Ave. Police have not made any arrests or released any suspect information in this case.Then, around 8 p.m. Saturday, police said a mandriving down Interstate 264 was shot two times by his passenger. The shooter/passenger then then took off with the victims vehicle. Police said they do have a person of interest and are currently trying to locate that person.The fourth shooting was reported in the 1000 block of S. 38th Street at 11:28 p.m. Saturday. That’s in Louisville’s Chickasaw neighborhood. Once on scene officers located a male juvenile victim who had sustained both a gunshot and a graze wound. Police said it did not appear the shooting occurred at the location where the victim was found and investigators were attempting to establish a scene. The victim was listed in stable condition.The fifth shooting was called in at 1:27 a.m. Sunday from Louisville’s Park Hill neighborhood. According to MetroSafe, seven victims, five men and two women in their 20s and 30s, were shot at near the intersection of Dixie Highway and West Ormsby Avenue, near a liquor store. They were rushed to University of Louisville Hospital where one of the men, Durelle G. Moxley, 33, of Louisville, died. The six other victims, five men and two women, are listed in stable condition.The sixth shooting came just one minute later, at 1:28 a.m. Sunday. This one happened in the Jacobs neighborhood, near an apartment complex in the 3600 block of Georgetown Place. Police located a man in his 20s who had been shot twice. He was transported to University Hospital where he remains in stable condition.A seventh and final shooting came 20 minutes later, at 1:47 a.m., in the 1500 block of Bellamy Place, in the Algonquin neighborhood. Police said a man in his late teens showed up at a Audubon Hospital with a gunshot wound and said he was shot at this location. The teen was transferred to University Hospital where he remains in stable condition. According to Google Maps, this is the location of Bellamy Louisville: Louisville Student Housing, a University of Louisville affiliated property.Lt. Emily McKinley with LMPD says none of the shooting appear to be connected, and appear to be isolated events contained within themselves.Police are still investigating all the shootings, saying they have identified a couple suspects in a couple of the shootings, but didn’t elaborate on which suspects are connected to the shootings.Police are asking for help from the community to put those responsible for the shootings behind bars.“A lot of these cases get solved with information from the community, especially the homicides because our victims can no longer speak for themselves a lot of our living victims can and they do provide information to us,” Lt. McKinley said. “It is our responsibility as human beings to speak up for each other and to do the right thing and I know a lot of times that is difficult to do it takes a lot of vulnerability and it takes a lot of courage to do that.”Officials with the Louisville Metro Police Department Homicide Unit will discuss several weekend shootings, including two homicides >> http://bit.ly/2RofkXt Get the earliest breaking news alerts on your phone with the WAVE 3 News app >> http://bit.ly/2vCuYnrChristopher 2X, a community activist at the Peace Centered Alliance, said even if marginal decreases in violent crime statistics are happening, the problem of violence in Louisville is still a big one.“It’s not just concentrated in one area anymore,” 2X said. “People are willing to unfortunately use deadly force on others in places that you wouldn’t have imagined five-plus years ago.”He said over the past five years, there have been 438 similar homicides and in that same timeframe, 1,645 individual people have been shot in Metro Louisville.So far, in 2019, there have been 43 homicides. At this time last year, there were only 37.Anyone with information regarding any of the shootings should contact the Louisville Metro Police Department’s anonymous tip line at (502) 574-LMPD.Copyright 2019 WAVE 3 News. All rights reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SHREVEPORT, La. (KSLA) - A number of people are recovering after a violent Saturday morning in Shreveport.The first shooting happened just before 2 a.m. in the 2500 block of Hollywood Avenue, outside of a nightclub.When officers arrived on scene they found a juvenile male with gunshot wounds to both of his legs.Police were told that it was four to six men in a older model Chevrolet pickup truck that opened fired outside of the club.He was sent to a Shreveport hospital, and his wounds were considered to be non-life threatening, according to the major incident report filed by police.Three other injured people showed up later to the same hospital for the treatment of injuries they received outside of the same club.The second shooting happened just an hour later at a home in the 6100 block of Willard Street.According to police, that’s in Shreveport’s Cedar Grove neighborhood.Several people were sleeping inside a home when shots rang outside, and bullets pierced the walls of the home.The victim, a woman, was struck in the leg by the gunfire.She was sent to a Shreveport hospital and is expected to be okay, according to police.Because of the nature of this shooting, police do not have any suspect or vehicle information. However, they do know that a handgun was used in this shooting.Anyone with information about either one of these shootings is urged to call Shreveport police at (318) 673-7300 or Shreveport-Caddo CrimeStoppers at (318) 673-7373, visit the group’s website, or the P3Tips app to submit information anonymously.Copyright 2019 KSLA. All rights reserved.1812 Fairfield Ave.Shreveport, LA 71101(318) 222-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.CHARLOTTE, N.C. (WBTV) - Two teens were charged with murder in connection to the deadly shooting at a graduation party in uptown Charlotte that left one man dead and several others injured.According to the Charlotte-Mecklenburg Police Department, detectives have charged 19-year-old Marcus Joubert and 16-year-old Michael Sio-Somah for the murder of Calvin Haines.Detectives have made arrests in this case.📣Know something, say something.📱@CLTCrimeStopperat 704-334-1600pic.twitter.com/Bc1tfVhwdNHaines, 24, was identified as the man fatally shot during the graduation party in uptown Charlotte on June 12.[Vigil held for man killed in uptown shooting]Police say four people, Haines, a 16-year-old, a 19-year-old, and a 22-year-old, were shot outside following an altercation.Three of the victims, including Haines, were found shot in the stairwell of an apartment building where a graduation party was being held around 12:52 a.m. The building is located on Graham Street at 6th Street.The 16-year-old was seriously injured and the other two victims suffered minor injuries.As a result of continued investigation into this case, Joubert and Sio-Somah were identified as suspects, and warrants were issued for their arrest.On Wednesday, law enforcement officials located and arrested Joubert and Sio-Somah. Joubert was charged with murder and shooting into occupied property and Sio-Somah was charged with murder.“It’s getting more than frustrating, it’s getting downright tragic,” CMPD’s Rob Tufano said about the situation.HOMICIDE INVESTIGATION UPDATE: Police are providing new information in a shooting that left one person dead and three others injured during a graduation party in uptown Charlotte » https://bit.ly/31wZ4Z9The place the party was held was being rented, police say, for a “post-graduation celebration.”"There were young teenagers there. I mean one of the victims at the hospital was 16,” police said of the victims, whose names have not been released.Update: A total of 4 people were shot, 1 person is dead, 2 people were transported from the scene to the hospital and 1 person self-transported themself to the hospital.https://t.co/luWe6ZyFJCThis is an active and ongoing investigation.Anyone with information about this incident is asked to call 704-432-TIPS and speak directly to a homicide unit detective. The public can also call Crime Stoppers at 704-334-1600 or visitthe Crime Stoppers website.Copyright 2019 WBTV. All rights reserved.1 Julian Price Pl.Charlotte, NC 28208(704) 374-3500A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.AURORA, Colo. — Aurora Police are investigating a shooting that left four people injured early Tuesday morning.The shooting happened at about 1 a.m. in the 12500 block of East Kansas Place, according to the Aurora Police Department.Police said shots were fired during some kind of gathering. The four victims took themselves to the hospital. One is in critical condition.Of the four victims, one is 17-years-old and three are adults, police say.Police did not release information on a suspect. They say there's no danger to the public.Anyone with information on the shooting is asked to call Aurora Police at 303-739-6067, or Denver Crime Stoppers at 720-913-7867.9NEWS has a crew on scene and will update this story as more information is available.SUGGESTED VIDEOS|Local stories from 9NEWSTwo men were found dead and two others shot when police responded to Damascus Street earlier this month. Now this man is charged with murder.Two men were found dead and two others shot when police responded to Damascus Street earlier this month. Now this man is charged with murder.The latest breaking updates, delivered straight to your email inbox.Two men were found dead and two others shot when police responded to Damascus Street earlier this month. Now this man is charged with murder.Police say they've made an arrest in the June 11 killing of two men in Savannah.(Above: Initial reports into that night's shooting)Derek Gallop Jr., 29, was arrested Thursday and charged with murder. Police say they found Devonte Henneghan, 27, and James Fields Jr., 30, dead at the scene when they arrived to the 6900 block of Damascus Street on June 11. Two other men - Michael McDaniel, 28, and Deonte Jones, 27 - were treated for their injuries.The investigation remains ongoing.Anyone with information on this incident is asked to contact the Violent Crimes Tip Line at (912) 525-3124. Tipsters can also contact CrimeStoppers at (912) 234-2020.  Tipsters remain anonymous and may qualify for a cash reward.(Below: Savannah Police investigate multiple shootings)Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.A man was killed and three others were hurt Sunday in a shooting at a park on Cleveland's East Side.File photoCLEVELAND, Ohio – A Cleveland man died and three other men were hurt in a shooting while a large crowd was gathered at a park in the city’s Lee-Seville neighborhood, police said.Investigators have not identified any suspects in the shooting that happened just before 8:30 p.m. at Kerruish Park, on Tarkington Avenue near Lee Road, police said. The preliminary investigation revealed the crowd was gathered at the park for dice games and other activities.Frankie Jackson, 21, was shot in the abdomen and back during the incident. He died after an ambulance took him to MetroHealth, the Cuyahoga County Medical Examiner’s Office said.Three other men drove to South Pointe Hospital after the shooting. A 44-year-old man was shot in the right arm and a 23-year-old man was shot in the left foot, but both were treated and released, police said.A 37-year-old man was shot in the right knee. He was transferred to Hillcrest Hospital, where he remained Monday morning.Investigators have not released a motive for the shooting. Cleveland police officers learned the large crowd ran from the park when the shooting began.Officers recovered several bullet casings and two weapons at the park. They also towed two vehicles as part of the investigation, police said.To comment on this story, visit Monday’scrime and courts comments page.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesBUFFALO, N.Y. — Buffalo Police confirmed four people shot Sunday night in the Black Rock neighborhood.Police were called to the Poize Restaurant & Lounge at 2081 Niagara Street, near Hertel Avenue, at 9:17 p.m.Two females, a 24-year-old and a 26-year-old, have been treated and released from ECMC.Two males, 33-year-old and 28-year-old, are in stable condition at ECMC.MORE ON WGRZ.COMBuffalo K-9 unit trains for water scent detectionBuffalo Police: Three men hurt in two different shootingsNiagara Falls Police identify teens involved in crime spreeNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.WREG.comby:WREG StaffLAUDERDALE COUNTY, Tenn. — One person is dead and several others are injured following a shooting in the 200 block of North Main Street in  Henning, Tennessee early Sunday morning, according to District Attorney Mark Davidson.Police were called to a sports bar around 2 a.m.Davidson says the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation has been asked to assist. No suspect information was given.Submit(WJW/AP) -- After news of Prince Philip's death Friday, many photos and stories from throughout the years quickly resurfaced as the world mourned him.Prince Philip, the husband of Queen Elizabeth, died peacefully at Windsor Castle at the age of 99.MISSION, Texas (Border Report) -- On Friday, two more Republican-led congressional delegations descended upon the Rio Grande Valley in South Texas where there is an influx in unaccompanied migrant youth and families. Once again, both groups characterized it as a "crisis" of disproportionate means and laid the blame on the Biden administration's immigration policies.They also — as several other previous Republican-led delegations have done who have also come to tour the Rio Grande Valley — challenged President Joe Biden and especially his Border Czar, Vice President Kamala Harris, to come to the border to witness the situation first-hand.NORFOLK, Va. (WAVY) -- A group of friends put on their helmets and headed out on a more than 800-mile bike ride for a special cause.The dozen or so men are traveling from Norfolk, Virginia, to Savannah, Georgia, to celebrate two cancer-free friends.Cloudy and windy. High 51F. Winds NW at 20 to 30 mph.  Higher wind gusts possible..Mostly clear. Low near 25F. NW winds at 10 to 20 mph, decreasing to 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 12:11 pmFILE — This photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, shows the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.FILE — The sun beats down Monday at the scene where five people were fatally shot Sturday, June 8, 2019, in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.A view of the crime scene from Medicine Valley Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 3400 block of Evans Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 9400 block of Evans Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.Lindell “Dino” LaFollette speaks about events regarding the multiple shootings incident that left five dead in the White Swan area on Thursday, June 14, 2019, at a local hospital.Lindell LaFollette’s wounds heal Thursday at a local hospital after he was shot in a June 8 outburst of violence that left five dead in the White Swan area. Watch LaFollette tell his story by visiting this story atYakimaHerald.com.FILE — This photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, shows the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.FILE — The sun beats down Monday at the scene where five people were fatally shot Sturday, June 8, 2019, in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.In this photo taken Monday, June 10, 2019, the crime scene where five people were fatally shot off of the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near White Swan, Wash.A view of the crime scene from Medicine Valley Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 3400 block of Evans Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 9400 block of Evans Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.The 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road on Thursday, June 13, 2019, near White Swan, Wash. Four victims were killed in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road and a fifth victim found dead in the 3400 block of Evans Road near White Swan on June 8.Lindell “Dino” LaFollette speaks about events regarding the multiple shootings incident that left five dead in the White Swan area on Thursday, June 14, 2019, at a local hospital.Vivid memories of last week’sbrutal slayingof five people in the White Swan area continue to haunt Lindell LaFollette.He was sitting next to his cousin, Dennis Overacker, when a gunman shot Overacker in the face.LaFollette was shot, too, but he managed to escape.“I keep seeing it over and over,” LaFollette, 60, said recently from a hospital bed.His left ear was bandaged and his head and shoulder speckled with scabbed-over buckshot.“I’ve got a massive headache,” he said. “It comes and it goes.”LaFollette has cancer. He returned to a local hospital for cancer-related complications he was experiencing.There, he agreed to tell a Yakima Herald-Republic reporter what happened the day hiscousin and friendswere slaughtered deep within the Yakama reservation.John Cagle, 59, Michelle Starnes, 51, Catherine Eneas, 49, and Thomas Hernandez, 36, were all shot to death along with 61-year-old Overacker in the 5100 block of Medicine Valley Road near the foothills of the Cascade Mountains.Four suspects have been arrested in the carnage:James Dean Cloud, 35, Donovan Quinn Carter Cloud, 23, Morris Bruce Jackson and Natasha Mae Jackson.LaFollette — emotional at times — recounted the terror he and his friends unknowingly stepped into when they arrived at Cagle’s trailer at the end of a long, dusty driveway.Here’s what he recalls:Overacker stopped by LaFollette’s home in Harrah, saying he was headed to Cagle’s to look at a motorcycle. A friend, Esmerelda Zaragoza, and her baby were also in Overacker’s pickup.Zaragoza wanted to show her baby to Cagle and Starnes — they were a couple.But when they arrived, people at the gate of Cagle’s property said he didn’t want to see anyone. Overacker found it odd — he had just talked to Cagle about seeing the motorcycle.They drove to Hernandez’s home a few miles away. Hernandez hopped in the pickup and they returned to Cagle’s.Lindell LaFollette’s wounds heal Thursday at a local hospital after he was shot in a June 8 outburst of violence that left five dead in the White Swan area. Watch LaFollette tell his story by visiting this story atYakimaHerald.com.This time no one was at the gate. Hernandez hopped out of the truck and went inside Cagle’s trailer. Hernandez returned, followed by a gunman.Then, another gunman came outside and pointed a firearm at Overacker’s face. “Don’t. Don’t do it,” Overacker said.The gunman lowered his weapon, but quickly raised it again and shot Overacker in the face.“With no hesitation, like he’d done it before,” LaFollette said.Overacker’s body slumped. LaFollette quickly leaned over, threw the pickup in gear and pressed on the gas.Another shot was fired and struck LaFollette.“I saw stars,” he said. “I hit the floor.”Head down, LaFollette pressed the gas pedal with his hand. The truck rumbled across the property. LaFollette called to Hernandez, but the second gunman shot him.As the truck left the property, a third shot was fired, grazing Zaragoza in the shoulder — her baby was unharmed.By this time, LaFollette was practically sitting on Overacker’s body. Zaragoza called 911 as she applied pressure to Overacker’s blood-drenched face.They were met by Yakima County sheriff’s deputies and medics about six miles away on Evans Road, where Overacker was pronounced dead.LaFollette’s hands jittered and tears welled in his eyes as he told the story. He paused, looked out the hospital window, and wondered why.“Five lives — like that,” he said.“I’ve got so much going on in my life right now that I don’t have much time left,” LaFollette said. “It should have been me — not Dennis.”This is theworst homicide casein recent Yakima County history, authorities say. Because it occurred on tribal land, the FBI has taken the lead on the investigation with the sheriff’s office and Yakama tribal police assisting.Authorities believe drugs were a factor in the slayings but say most of the victims weren’t involved.Sheriff Bob Udell described most of the victims as “in the wrong place at the wrong time.”LaFollette said Cagle did dabble in drug sales, but that wasn’t why he and Overacker were there.LaFollette doesn’t deny once using drugs but said he hadn’t in years.It’s about 30 miles between Yakima — where Cheri Root works as a paralegal for a local law firm — and White Swan, the unincorporated community…White Swan is an unincorporated community of nearly 800 people, remotely situated on the most westerly portion of the Lower Valley floor.“We weren’t there for dope or nothing like that,” he said. “We were there to look at the bike he had for sale. But we never did get to see the bike.”LaFollette said Cagle told him weeks ago that a group in the area was pressuring him into paying them for protection. A group that knew he sold drugs.“They wanted their cut,” LaFollette said.Reach Phil Ferolito atpferolito@yakimaherald.comor on Twitter: @philipferolitoA year after a murder spree in the Lower Yakima Valley, the accused killers of five people are still awaiting trial.An in-person status conference is set next week for the two men accused in the killings of five people in the Lower Yakima Valley in early June 2019.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Filed under:The group were “in an altercation” with someone who fired shots after the argument turned physical in the 3500 block of West North Avenue.Four people were hurt in a shooting Saturday in Humboldt Park on the West Side.They were involved “in an altercation” with an unknown person about 4:20 a.m. at a restaurant in the 3500 block of West North Avenue, Chicago police said.After the altercation turned physical, the four left the restaurant, got in a Jeep Cherokee and the person they were arguing with pulled out a handgun and fired shots at the car, police said. The Jeep caught fire, collided with a parked car and came to a stop.A 30-year-old man was hit in the arm, leg and chest, police said. He was taken to Mount Sinai Hospital in serious condition.A 45-year-old man suffered a gunshot wound to the shoulder and was taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition, police said. A third man, 43, was hit in the back and was taken to the same hospital. His condition was stabilized.The fourth person, a 24-year-old man, was grazed in the hand and refused medical attention, police said.No one is in custody as Area North detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.A shooting last week that left five men wounded at a Southwest Austin mobile home park had its origins in a previous dispute and an accusation that one of the victims was secretly dating the girlfriend of the suspect's brother, police allege in court documents.The suspect in the shooting, 35-year-old Jose Dennis Caballero, has been charged with aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, a second-degree felony.According to an arrest affidavit, one of the victims told police that on the night of May 13, Caballero’s brother and three other men came to his trailer at Country Aire Mobile Home Park, off of Texas 71 and U.S. 290. The victim told police the brother called him a "son of a bitch" before accusing him of dating the brother's girlfriend.The victim also told officers that Caballero’s brother then hit him on the left side of his face with a beer bottle, and the three men assaulted his cousin.A few days later, one of Caballero’s relatives sent the victim a video in which he was holding a shotgun while in a car with Caballero, and told the victim to “stay away from his family or he would kill him,” according to the affidavit.The victim told police he texted back and offered Caballero and his relative a chance to come over and talk about it, but more threatening messages were sent, and the victim said he did not respond.The night of June 7, the victim and four of his cousins were sitting in front of his trailer at the mobile home park, when Caballero and his brother pulled up in a pickup truck and got out, the affidavit said.Two of the cousins exited the trailer and asked why Caballero and his brother were there, the document said. Caballero then got angry and threatened to kill the victim, witnesses told police. According to the affidavit, Caballero retrieved his shotgun, walked in front of the truck and fired at the victim and his cousins.Police said Caballero fired a shotgun with “light bird” rounds from about 15 feet away at five people twice, resulting in several small injuries to the upper torsos of two men and to the extremities of three others. Three had wounds that penetrated just beneath the skin and the two others had round welts, the affidavit said. Austin-Travis County EMS medics who responded to the shooting said the injuries were not life-threatening.Caballero, whose bail was set at $75,000, was not in the Travis County Jail on Tuesday, online jail records showed.A shooting last week that left five men wounded at a Southwest Austin mobile home park had its origins in a previous dispute and an accusation that one of the victims was secretly dating the girlfriend of the suspect's brother, police allege in court documents.The suspect in the shooting, 35-year-old Jose Dennis Caballero, has been charged with aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, a second-degree felony.According to an arrest affidavit, one of the victims told police that on the night of May 13, Caballero’s brother and three other men came to his trailer at Country Aire Mobile Home Park, off of Texas 71 and U.S. 290. The victim told police the brother called him a "son of a bitch" before accusing him of dating the brother's girlfriend.The victim also told officers that Caballero’s brother then hit him on the left side of his face with a beer bottle, and the three men assaulted his cousin.A few days later, one of Caballero’s relatives sent the victim a video in which he was holding a shotgun while in a car with Caballero, and told the victim to “stay away from his family or he would kill him,” according to the affidavit.The victim told police he texted back and offered Caballero and his relative a chance to come over and talk about it, but more threatening messages were sent, and the victim said he did not respond.The night of June 7, the victim and four of his cousins were sitting in front of his trailer at the mobile home park, when Caballero and his brother pulled up in a pickup truck and got out, the affidavit said.Two of the cousins exited the trailer and asked why Caballero and his brother were there, the document said. Caballero then got angry and threatened to kill the victim, witnesses told police. According to the affidavit, Caballero retrieved his shotgun, walked in front of the truck and fired at the victim and his cousins.Police said Caballero fired a shotgun with “light bird” rounds from about 15 feet away at five people twice, resulting in several small injuries to the upper torsos of two men and to the extremities of three others. Three had wounds that penetrated just beneath the skin and the two others had round welts, the affidavit said. Austin-Travis County EMS medics who responded to the shooting said the injuries were not life-threatening.Caballero, whose bail was set at $75,000, was not in the Travis County Jail on Tuesday, online jail records showed.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Austin American-Statesman  ~ 305 S Congress Ave, Austin, TX 78704~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKWATCHVIDEOSVictim ID'ed in Lake Shore Drive shooting near Lincoln Park, 1 killed, 3 critically woundedA shooting on Lake Shore Drive near Lincoln Park left one man dead and three others critically wounded late Thursday night, Chicago police said.Second Ward Alderman Brian Hopkins said he is well aware of escalating crime, and some of his residents are frustrated.Authorities arrested three suspects in Mendocino County Thursday night following a gang-related shooting Wednesday evening in Santa Rosa’s Jacobs Park that wounded four people, including an 11-year-old boy.The arrested suspects include Michael Beltran, 23, and Lukas Philip Cortina, 19, both of Santa Rosa, and the alleged shooter, a 17-year-old male from Rohnert Park whose name was withheld by authorities because of his age.Police believe the three suspects to be affiliated with gangs because of the nature of the incident, as well as their past contacts and arrests, said Santa Rosa Police Lt. Ryan Corcoran.They were arrested in a different vehicle than the one involved in the shooting. Corcoran could not say Friday whether either of the two men were in the initial getaway car, a dark- colored SUV.“We got the shooter, that’s the big thing,” Corcoran said. “We’re still trying to locate the vehicle and work the case.”On Wednesday, the gunman was seen exiting the SUV at West Ninth Street. He used a handgun to fire at a 21-year-old Santa Rosa man as he ran back toward the crowded park, where police said several hundred people were gathered. Moments earlier, someone in the SUV had confronted the man as they drove past the park, demanding to know if he “gang banged,” police said. He told them no, police said.But the confrontation on the edge of the park escalated. The gunman exited from the front passenger seat and shot the 21-year-old man in the torso as he ran away.Three others in the vicinity of the sidewalk, including the 11-year-old soccer player, a 46-year-old youth coach and 20-year-old man who had arrived to play soccer, were hit in the spray of bullets, which police said included at least 10 rounds.After the shooting, the gunman got back into the SUV, which sped away from the area, heading south on Link Lane, police said.Police have not recovered a weapon, Corcoran said. A semi-automatic handgun appears to have been used in the shooting, he said.Twenty detectives from the Santa Rosa Police Department were assigned to the case. Their interviews with witnesses led to identification of the suspected gunman, who was believed to be traveling to Mendocino County in a different vehicle than the SUV thought to be involved in the shooting, Corcoran said.Santa Rosa police alerted Mendocino County authorities, who spotted the car heading west on Highway 128 near Boonville, Corcoran said.Mendocino County deputies stopped the vehicle, a 2012 Lexus RX350, about 7:30 p.m. on Highway 128. As the stop was underway, Beltran refused deputies’ orders and smashed a cellphone in what police described as an attempt to destroy evidence.The detained trio were taken into custody and transported back to Santa Rosa. The two men were booked into Sonoma County Jail and are each being held on $600,000 bond. Both face multiple felony counts of alleged gang participation and helping the shooting suspect evade police.The suspected shooter was booked into Sonoma County Juvenile Hall. As a minor - and unless he is later charged as an adult - he is not eligible for bail, Corcoran said.“We settled on them through the investigation and witness statements,” said Corcoran. “With a gang crime, I would not want to put anyone on the spot for who did or did not put the suspect in jail.”Beltran completed two years of probation in October from a misdemeanor conviction of an assault on a peace officer in 2015, according to Sonoma County Court records. The charge was pleaded down to probation and a ?$150 fine. He later served 10 days in jail for a violation.Cortina has no criminal record as an adult in Sonoma County. It was not yet known if the 17-?year-old suspect has past charges on his record, Corcoran said.All of the shooting victims are expected to survive, police said.Two of them, the 21-year-old man and 11-year-old boy, who was hit in the pelvic area, remain hospitalized. The two others have been treated and released. The 46-year-old coach was hit in the lower leg as he retrieved equipment from his car. The 20-year-old soccer player was grazed by a bullet along his back as he put on his cleats while seated nearby.You can reach Staff Writer Kevin Fixler at 707-521-5336 or kevin.fixler@pressdemocrat.com. On Twitter @kfixler.ALLENDALE, S.C. — Five men are wounded after a shooting at a car wash in a small South Carolina town.Law enforcement says the shooting took place just at 9:30 p.m. Saturday at the Allendale Car Wash on Main Street. Allendale police said several people had been hit by gunfire, and some were taken to the hospital in a personal vehicle.While securing the scene, Allendale police say they learned that five men were reportedly being treated for bullet wounds at an area hospital.The South Carolina Law Enforcement Division said their crime scene agents responded to the scene. An agency spokesman did not have any information on the severity of the injuries, although as of Sunday morning, there were no fatalities.The Allendale Police Department has asked the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division (SLED) to conduct an investigation concerning the shooting incident.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Filed under:All four people were taken to area hospitals where their conditions were stabilized.Four people were wounded by gunfire Saturday in a shooting near Northwestern University’s Gold Coast campus on the Near North Side.Two men were standing outside a red van about 2 a.m. in the 300 block of East Chicago Avenue, Chicago police said. They heard gunfire, saw several vehicles drive away and realized they were hit.The 28-year-old was shot in both legs, and the 26-year-old was struck in the buttocks, police said. Both went to Northwestern Memorial Hospital where their conditions were stabilized.Two other men who were in the area were also shot, police said. A 28-year-old was grazed in the head, and a 25-year-old was struck in the head. They drove in a silver-colored Toyota sedan to Cermak Road and State Street where they flagged down an ambulance.The man with the graze wound was taken to Northwestern Memorial Hospital, and the other man was taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. Both of their conditions were stabilized.No one is in custody as Area Central detectives investigate.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.WAVY.comby:WAVY Web StaffPORTSMOUTH, Va. (WAVY) — A grand jury will hear the case against one of the men chargedin a deadly Portsmouth shootingthat also left three people injured.Twenty-one-year-old Tyquan Anderson faces first-degree murder and weapons charges. Those charges were certified to a grand jury on Thursday.The charges stem from a shooting in early june on Mount Vernon Avenue that left 28-year-old Robert Artis Junior dead.Police also charged 23-year-old Eric Hoskins in the case, but prosecutors nolle prossed those charges — or set them aside.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.PORTSMOUTH, Va. (WAVY) -- Elizabeth River Crossings sent out a reminder on Thursday for the Good Citizen Scholarship application deadline.The Good Citizen Scholarship is awarded to ten Norfolk/Portsmouth graduating seniors who show excellent character, demonstrate leadership, and make positive contributions to both their school and community.RICHMOND, Va. (WFXR) — Gov. Ralph Northam announced Friday an allocation of more than $6.3 million in Growth and Opportunity for Virginia (GO Virginia) grants to help the Commonwealth address the economic impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic by funding a total of 15 projects, including eight regional GO Virginia projects and seven projects through GO Virginia’s Economic Resilience and Recovery Program.“This funding will go a long way towards supporting a broad-based economic recovery across our Commonwealth,” said Northam. “As we celebrate these projects, we must also recognize the leadership and many contributions of the late GO Virginia Board Chairman Tom Farrell, whose business acumen helped advance the GO Virginia mission of fostering lasting regional collaboration, and was instrumental in mounting a robust effort to spur Virginia’s economic recovery amid the pandemic. His legacy will live on through innovative, impactful programs like this one.”PORTSMOUTH, Va. (WAVY) -- A judge has ordered that the lawsuit from former Portsmouth CIty Attorney Solomon Ashby against former Mayor John Rowe will be dismissed if the suit is not amended by April 16.In his March 26 opinion, Norfolk Judge Everett Martin said that he views the lawsuit claiming Rowe's statement to WVEC-TV defamed Ashby -- "culminating in an opinion that you can’t fire the city manager, that the city manager is bulletproof, and that just does not hold up," the judge said -- as a "mischaracterization of legal advice."Filed under:They were standing in a parking lot when someone opened fire from across the street, police said.Four people were wounded by gunfire Saturday in Austin.They were in a parking lot about 9:47 p.m. in the 5600 block of West Madison Street when someone unleashed gunfire from across the street, Chicago police said.A 17-year-old girl was hit in the back and was taken to Stroger Hospital where her condition was stabilized, police said. An 18-year-old man was struck in the neck and was taken to the same hospital in critical condition.A boy, 17, and a 22-year-old man were taken to Mount Sinai Hospital where their conditions were stabilized, police said. The teen was hit in the back, and the man suffered a gunshot wound to the arm.It’s unclear if they were standing in a group when shots rang out and who the intended target was, police said. Area North detectives are investigating.Bullets shattered the window at a nearby bus stop and a witness on the scene told the Sun-Times the shooters “must have had automatics” because he heard a lot of shots.This marks the second incident within 24 hours in which at least four people were hurt in a shooting within city limits. The other took place about 2 a.m. nearNorthwestern University’s Chicago campus.Read more oncrime, and track the city’shomicides.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.ATLANTA — Police said two more victims with gunshot wounds came to Grady Memorial Hospital Saturday evening as a result of a downtown Atlanta incident that had already left three others hurt.Atlanta Police Investigator James White said those two people were stable, alert, conscious and breathing. They bring the total number of injuries related to the incident to five.White said officers were initially called to an address on Broad Street around 6 p.m. to reports of a person shot. They soon learned that there were actually three - and that one person involved in the crime had escaped.Based on preliminary information, White said that the shooting appeared to stem from a dispute outside 12 Broad Street - one that escalated and led to both suspects drawing their guns and opening fire.Police said that the suspect that was taken to the hospital, as well as the two bystanders who were caught in the crossfire, were all conscious and alert when they were taken to Grady Memorial Hospital. Their exact condition wasn't released, however, White said they were stable at the time they were removed from the scene.In a written statement, White had strong words regarding the violence and what police intend to do moving forward."A shooting of this nature, at this time of day in our downtown business district is unacceptable," he wrote. "We will immediately begin aggressively stepping up patrols. We will also be meeting with area businesses to review their safety measures and improve safety in the area."As for the one alleged gunman who got away, he was described as a black male with dreadlocks who was wearing a gray t-shirt and black sweatpants. The search for this man remains active and anyone with information about him - or the shooting - should call Atlanta Police.***Abortion law in Georgia | DAs say they won't prosecute womenChild sex sting: 82 arrested in Operation Southern Impact IIIGang members sentenced in 'the most horrific death' in recent county historyVideo shows healthcare staff punching, beating disabled man with beltMorehouse College commencement speaker to pay off student loan debt for class of 2019Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.WAVY.comby:Brett HallVIRGINIA BEACH, Va. (WAVY) — Virginia Beach’s police chief said while the criminal investigation into the Municipal Center mass shooting is nearly complete, the full findings may not be made public initially.“Once we are complete, we will be able to release some of the findings but we are working closely with the independent investigators and do not want to be perceived as influencing anything they are doing,” said Chief James Cervera, of the Virginia Beach Police Department.Cervera made the comments Tuesday afternoon after appearing before the Virginia Beach City Council for the first time since a 40-year-old Public Utilities employeeshot and killed 12 and injured 4in Building 2 on May 31st.While the presentation focused on crime statistics for the first half of 2019, Cervera in responding to a question from Mayor Bobby Dyer about the status of the mass shooting criminal investigation, revealed there was, in fact, two separate investigations.One has been completed according to Cervera. The four officers that engaged in a gun battle with the gunman that ultimately lead to his death, have been cleared by the Commonwealth Attorney’s office.“We did a complete investigation on that as we should have,” Cervera said.The other investigation has to do with the gunman’s involvement.“At last check, we have interviewed over 280 people,” Cevera said. “The investigative division sent out a Survey Monkey to all employees who worked in Building 2.”Cervera said his department is nearly complete with its work, but the FBI is not. The FBI was in charge of the initial investigation inside Building 2 in the aftermath of the shooting,reconstructing the sceneand collecting evidence.“It is going to take them a while to finish their investigative end, which is their evidence collection, it will take the time to finish that,” Cervera said.In the meantime, Cervera said the department will continue to meet with Hillard Heintze, the firmhired to conduct an independent investigationinto the tragedy.City Auditor Lyndon Remias, however, pointed out that the firm has never requested the police hold off on releasing anything to his knowledge.“The independent investigators are working independently and they are forming their own opinions and certainly we don’t want them to be influenced in regards to whether [the chief] is going to release his report or not,” Remias said.Cervera, who under current city code will have to retire next spring, became emotionaltalking about how his officers have performedin the wake of the shooting.“The virtues of being a cop is your police department. These officers have compassion for their citizens, they have understanding for their citizens and they do one hell of a good job,” Cervera said.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.VIRGINIA BEACH, Va. (WAVY) -- Nearly two years after a city employee committed mass murder in city building, investigators have closed their investigation without answering the question: why did it all happen?In a nearly 50-page report released Wednesday, the Virginia Beach Police Department concluded that "despite exhaustive investigative work and in spite of unsubstantiated rumors and accusations, it appears we may never why [the shooter] committed this heinous act."VIRGINIA BEACH, Va. (WAVY) -- The final investigation summary report on the mass shooting at the city Municipal Center in May 2019 will be released this week.The summary report will be released after noon on Wednesday, according to a Monday morning email from City Manager Patrick Duhaney to various city departments.Trending:Prosecutors have accused a 17-year-old boy in a fatal shooting ata West Covina house partywhere a La Mirada man was killed and three others were injured.The teenager faces one count of murder, two counts of attempted murder and one count of assault with a semi-automatic firearm, said Greg Risling, spokesman for the Los Angeles District Attorney’s office, who confirmed the charges filed June 7.Dennis Anthony Bracamonte, 18, of La Mirada was killed in the shooting on May 31. Bullets also struck two teenagers in the legs, and a third person suffered non-life-threatening injuries; they were rushed to a hospital.On the night of the party, dozens of people crammed into a home’s backyard in the 300 block of North Hollow Avenue. Fliers posted about the event said the party would begin at 9 p.m., the entrance fee was $5, drinks were available for sale, strict security would be on hand and balloons containing nitrous oxide would be available.By about 10:30 p.m., the party took a violent turn when a fight broke out among at least five partygoers, including Bracamonte. That is when detectives believe the shots were fired, injuring three and killing Bracamonte, who was pronounced dead at the scene. Detectives were not sure how the fight started.Authorities responding to a call about gunshots heard in the area arrived to a chaotic scene of partygoers running and driving away from the house.Several days after the shooting, authorities released photos of two suspects in the case. One suspect wore a dark-colored jacket, a red hat and two necklaces while the second suspect wore a dark-colored baseball cap with a logo, a white shirt and a cross on a necklace.It was not immediately clear whether the photos depict the defendant in the case. The Sheriff’s Department Homicide Bureau did not immediately respond to inquiries about the charges.A hearing was set for Aug. 6 in Pomona Juvenile Court, Risling said, declining to comment on whether prosecutors are planning to try the teenage boy in juvenile or adult court.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.WATCHVIDEOS5 shot in RobbinsWATCHVIDEOSTwo victims have died, deputy injured following Liberty Co. shootingDeputies say Liberty Co. suspect shot himself to death after shooting 4 peopleNEW SUSPECT PHOTOS: this is Pavol Vido, 65. I’d you see him, DO NOT approach. Investigators say he shot 4 people, killed one woman.#abc13https://t.co/LDqPeu045zpic.twitter.com/UJfw5T3uxCLiberty County shooting suspect's vehicle foundATF, DPS, police, deputies, with guns and dogs searching the plumbing property. Three people were shot inside B Dependable Plumbing. The woman is dead. Unknown how two men are doing.#abc13https://t.co/LDqPeu045zpic.twitter.com/7u4NwlqL4nAccording to officials, the shooter, identified as Pavol Vido, was living in a metal container behind the business.Liberty County Sheriff's Office gives update on shootingRESERVE, La. — Two men have been arrested in connection to a drive-by shooting that left three men wounded and another dead.According to the St. John the Baptist Parish Sheriff’s Office, Carlshane Jarmar Dennis and Darrius Tramaine Williams were both arrested and charged with second-degree murder and three counts of attempted second-degree murder.The shooting happened back on May 29, 2019.Police reported that a car pulled up to a home in the 300 block of Homewood Place and the people inside opened fire on a crowd standing outside.RELATED:1 dead, 3 wounded after drive-by shooting in ReserveRELATED:Man with autism targeted in drive-by shooting, St. John Sheriff saysTwo 21-year-old men and a 19-year-old man were treated at the hospital for their injuries and released. A fourth victim, identified as 20-year-old Kyree Jones, died from his injuries.Police developed Dennis, 31, and Williams, 26, as suspects over the course of the investigation.► Get breaking news from your neighborhood delivered directly to you by downloading the new FREE WWL-TV News app now in theIOS App StoreorGoogle Play.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.St. Louis police released names of 11 homicide victims Thursday, including some who were killed months ago.The department’s public information staff typically releases to reporters the names of homicide victims once the victim’s family is notified.The department explained the delay Thursday by saying it was “recently made aware” that the information hadn’t been posted to crime summaries it shares with reporters.“It was our office that was following up on instances where we realized the information had not been provided,” said officer Michelle Woodling, a spokewoman for the police department.The victims are:• Jose Duran, 52, and Lorenza Medina, 43, who werefound dead inside a homein the 3900 block of Dunnica Avenue on Jan. 28. They both lived at the home on Dunnica, Woodling said.• Shaquayla Garvin wasfatally shot March 4 in a vehicle. Two women in the car flagged down a police officer in the Baden neighborhood; police said she had been shot in the 2000 block of Wilbert Drive in St. Louis County. Garvin, 22, was from Fort Wayne, Indiana.• Bryant Spraggins was found dead March 19 in the front yard of a building in the 700 block of Aubert Avenue.He had been shot. Spraggins, 45, lived in the 7400 block of Calvin Avenue, in Country Club Hills.• Deon Woods was one of two men killed in aquadruple shooting May 27in the 5900 block of Goodfellow Boulevard. Woods, 27, lived in the same block of Goodfellow.• Kelvin Hoskins wasgunned down May 30in the 4500 block of Evans Avenue. Hoskins, 37, lived in the 5000 block of Cote Brilliante Avenue.• Jessica Meanus was shot multiple times andkilled May 31 inside a home in the 4900 block of Farlin Avenue. Damon Love, 20, of the 4900 block of Farlin, died of a self-inflicted gunshot wound, police said. Meanus, 19, also lived in the 4900 block of Farlin.• Johnny Aikinswas shot May 31 in the 4200 block of Clay Avenue. Aikens, 42, lived in that block of Clay.• Maurice East was fatally shot Aug. 7 in the 4900 block of Plover Avenue. Police saidhis death was part of a quadruple shooting and fiery crashthat left two other men dead and one critically injured. East, 29, lived in the 1400 block of Gano Avenue.• Kendall Matthews was found dead Aug. 16in an alley in the 5100 block of St. Louis Avenuein the Kingsway West neighborhood. He had been shot, police said. Matthews, 25, lived in Bonne Terre, Missouri.• Joe Anna Soptic wasshot to death Aug. 31in the 2700 block of Belt Avenue. Police said Soptic was from Camdenton, Missouri, and from 25 to 30 years old. Police said her body was found about 50 to 75 feet from a box van that was engulfed in flames.Kim Bell and Taylor Tiamoyo Harris of the Post-Dispatch staff contributed to this report.Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.One person was killed and five others wounded as gunfire erupted in Trenton on Monday nightjust two days after a drive-by shooting outside a city bar wounded 10 people, authorities said Tuesday.The shootings were reported about 11:25 p.m. in the 100 block of Walnut Avenue about one mile from the shooting early Saturday night shooting at a Trenton bar that left 10 people hurt, according to Trenton police Capt. Stephen Varn.“We had six individuals struck by gunfire,” Varn said Tuesday.Officers found a man who had suffered gunshots to the head shoulder and forearm, according to Casey A. DeBlasio of the Mercer County Prosecutor’s Office.The victim was taken to Capital Health Regional Medical Center "where he was pronounced dead a short time later,” DeBlasio said in a statement.The man was identified as Unique Anderson, 18, of Trenton.Five other gunshot victims were taken to area hospitals with gunshot wounds. They include a 22-year-old man from Trenton, a 20-year-old man from Edgewater Park, a 20-year-old woman from Trenton, a 19-year-old man from Trenton, and an 18-year-old man from Hamilton.The Monday night shooting comes after 10 people were wounded early Saturday in a drive-by shooting as gunmen fired at least 30 shots on a crowd, authorities said.The gunmen opened fire around 12:25 a.m. outside Ramoneros Liquor & Bar, formerly J&J Liquor & Bar and the Stokes bar. None of the injuries were fatal, officials said.DeBlasio said police are investigating a motive for Monday night’s shootings but do not believe they are connected to the shootings on Saturday.The city’s new police director, Sheilah Coley, said authorities were investigating if Saturday’s shooting was gang related.“There are gangs in Trenton,” Coley said at a press conference on Saturday afternoon. “They happen to be associated with neighborhoods and sometimes there are neighborhood conflicts. This might very well be a part of that friction.”Anthony G. Attrinomay be reached attattrino@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@TonyAttrino. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Get the latest updates right in your inbox.Subscribe to NJ.com’s newsletters.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesSTOCKTON — The identities of the city’s sixth and seventh homicide victims of the month were publicly released Tuesday by the San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office.Both fatal shootings occurred within a two-hour span Sunday evening in different areas of the city and are being investigated by Stockton police homicide detectives.Everett Lynn “Love” Johnson, 45, of Stockton was found by responding officers suffering from multiple gunshot wounds about 7:15 p.m. in the vicinity of the sprawling Polo Run Apartments in the 8100 block of Palisades Drive, just north of East Hammer Lane. Medics pronounced him dead at the scene.Abdul Brown, 16, of Stockton was one of four people found shot inside an apartment by officers responding about 9:15 p.m. to a shooting at the Central Oak Apartments, 625 E. Oak St., near downtown Stockton. Brown was declared dead at the scene by medics.A 17-year-old boy and 35-year-old man were listed in critical condition after being transported to an area hospital suffering from unspecified gunshot wounds. An 18-year-old man was reported to have sustained a non-life-threatening gunshot wound, police reported.Following Sunday’s violent night — homicides have now reached 20 this year, compared with 13 by the same date one year ago — the Police Department announced the implementation of a new plan known as Operation RVN that stands for Reducing Violence in Neighborhoods.Department spokesman Officer Joe Silva described it as “an all-hands-on-deck approach” in partnership with the San Joaquin County Sheriff’s Office and the California Highway Patrol to increase the law-enforcement presence in neighborhoods identified as crime hot spots.“This is a proactive and assertive approach to reduce violent crime in Stockton,” Silva said.Anyone with information about Sunday’s homicides is encouraged to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Or they can use the Stockton Police Department mobile phone app and also remain anonymous. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s website at stocktonpd.org or Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Contact reporter Joe Goldeen at (209) 546-8278 or jgoldeen@recordnet.com. Follow him on Twitter @JoeGoldeen.STOCKTON — The identities of the city’s sixth and seventh homicide victims of the month were publicly released Tuesday by the San Joaquin County Coroner’s Office.Both fatal shootings occurred within a two-hour span Sunday evening in different areas of the city and are being investigated by Stockton police homicide detectives.Everett Lynn “Love” Johnson, 45, of Stockton was found by responding officers suffering from multiple gunshot wounds about 7:15 p.m. in the vicinity of the sprawling Polo Run Apartments in the 8100 block of Palisades Drive, just north of East Hammer Lane. Medics pronounced him dead at the scene.Abdul Brown, 16, of Stockton was one of four people found shot inside an apartment by officers responding about 9:15 p.m. to a shooting at the Central Oak Apartments, 625 E. Oak St., near downtown Stockton. Brown was declared dead at the scene by medics.A 17-year-old boy and 35-year-old man were listed in critical condition after being transported to an area hospital suffering from unspecified gunshot wounds. An 18-year-old man was reported to have sustained a non-life-threatening gunshot wound, police reported.Following Sunday’s violent night — homicides have now reached 20 this year, compared with 13 by the same date one year ago — the Police Department announced the implementation of a new plan known as Operation RVN that stands for Reducing Violence in Neighborhoods.Department spokesman Officer Joe Silva described it as “an all-hands-on-deck approach” in partnership with the San Joaquin County Sheriff’s Office and the California Highway Patrol to increase the law-enforcement presence in neighborhoods identified as crime hot spots.“This is a proactive and assertive approach to reduce violent crime in Stockton,” Silva said.Anyone with information about Sunday’s homicides is encouraged to call the Stockton Police Department at (209) 937-8377, the Investigations Unit at (209) 937-8323 or Crime Stoppers at (209) 946-0600. Crime Stoppers pays cash rewards up to $10,000. Callers can remain anonymous.Cellphone users can text information to 274637 (CRIMES) by entering the keyword “TIPSPD” followed by their tip. Or they can use the Stockton Police Department mobile phone app and also remain anonymous. Internet users can visit the Police Department’s website at stocktonpd.org or Facebook page and click “Submit a Tip.”Contact reporter Joe Goldeen at (209) 546-8278 or jgoldeen@recordnet.com. Follow him on Twitter @JoeGoldeen.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.recordnet.com  ~ 530 East Market Street, Stockton, CA 95202~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Authorities are searching for two gunmen who fired at least 30 shots in a drive-by shooting that injured 10 people outside a North Trenton bar early Saturday morning, city officials said.The gunmen opened fire around 12:25 a.m. at a crowd enjoying the start of Memorial Day weekend outside Ramoneros Liquor & Bar, formerly J&J Liquor & Bar and the Stokes bar. None of the injuries were fatal, officials said.Speaking at a press conference at police headquarters in Trenton, Mercer County Prosecutor Angelo J. Onofri said a dark-colored sport utility vehicle traveled down Middle Rose Street to Brunswick Avenue from Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard. The vehicle stopped at the corner of Middle Rose Street and Brunswick Avenue, at the side of Ramoneros Bar, and at least two suspects fired weapons from the vehicle into a crowd of people gathered in the area, Onofri said.“This was an expansive crime scene,” he said.The city’s new police director, Sheilah Coley, said authorities don’t have a motive yet but are exploring the theory that it was a gang related.“There are gangs in Trenton,” she said. “They happen to be associated with neighborhoods and sometimes there are neighborhood conflicts. This might very well be a part of that friction.”The victims, five men and five women, were taken to Capital Health Regional Medical Center in Trenton by first responders. One person was taken to the hospital in a private vehicle. None of the victims were identified but Onofri gave reporters information regarding their ages, injuries and condition.Two of the women have since been released from the hospital, Onofri said. Eight of the victims were Trenton residents.The investigation into the shooting is on going. Police said they may have a suspected vehicle, and are continuing to review multiple videos from the crime scene.Trenton Mayor Reed Gusciora said the shooting is "indicative of gun violence that is throughout America.“Ultimately, it’s going to have to be the federal government to step up to the plate,” he said.Gusciora said local authorities are “stepping up to the plate,” and commended Coley’s efforts in her short tenure.“Trenton cannot become a tale of two cities: one that is moving toward progress in economic development and improvements in education, while at the same time an unsafe environment for young people due to gun violence,” Gusciora said during the press conference. “As long as there are people with evil intentions, police are prepared to protect our citizens and pursue justice.”There have been five homicides in Trenton in 2019. Gusciora said three of them have been solved and police are close to solving another. Violent crime is down over the past two years in the Capital City, he added.“We will make sure the city is secure that the residents are safe that the neighborhoods are safe,” Gusciora said.Ramoneros Liquor & Bar in Trenton where 9 people were shot early this morning. May 25,  2019 (Patti Sapone | NJ Advance Media for NJ.com)Patti Sapone | NJ Advance MediaColey said Ramoneros Liquor & Bar, located in the North Trenton neighborhood of the city, has had violations in the past for not following Alcoholic Beverage Control Division laws, but that it wasn’t a place known to be frequented by violent people.This is the second shooting in the city in nearly a year that’s wounded 9 or more people. In June 2018, gunfire at theArt All Night festival wounded or injured nearly 30 peopleand one man, a suspected gunman, was fatally shot by responding police officers.“There are many neighborhoods people feel safe and secure in Trenton,” Gusciora said. “Yes, we need to address socio-economic problems where many young people have given up hope. We have to address the underlying causes of why someone would pick up a gun and join a gang.”Reporter Cassidy Grom contributed to this story. Reach her atcgrom@njadvancemedia.comFollow her at@cassidygrom.Olivia Rizzo may be reached atorizzo@njadvancemedia.com. Follow her on Twitter@LivRizz. FindNJ.com on Facebook.Have a tip?Tell us.nj.com/tips.Get the latest updates right in your inbox.Subscribe to NJ.com’s newsletters.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMenuCHESAPEAKE, Va. - A Chesapeake man planned on enjoying a kid-friendly Memorial Day party in theHolly Cove neighborhoodSaturday. But next thing he knew, he was caught in the crossfire of gunshots, trying to save his sisters.Antonio Roseboro"You had music, guys out there performing, you had ice cream trucks, trampolines, a slip and slide for the kids -- it was perfect," said 32-year-old Antonio Roseboro, who took his sisters and four children to the party.Then the gunfire began."It went on forever. Like, it sounded like Iraq," Roseboro told News 3. "The gunshots went on for like three minutes."Roseboro moved to protect his loved ones, throwing himself on top of them."Hundreds of people were running past us, everyone was screaming, people were trampling over top of me, and I knew I needed to get up," he said.When he tried to get up and flee, he started feeling weak. That's when he realized he had been shot in the neck."I kept telling myself, 'I can't die, I have four kids,'" Roseboro said.Roseboro wasone of 10 people shotwhen two groups of people got into a fight at the party. Brandon Smith, 27, died from his injuries after the shooting.As for Roseboro, he's now home from the hospital with a bullet still lodged in his neck.Chesapeake detectives say they've received information that many videos were taken during the party that night and are asking community members to send police any videos they may have of the incident to help them identify persons of interest. Videos can be downloaded tothis link. You can also call 1-800-CALL-FBI (1-800-224-5324) for additional instructions.Report a typoFour people, including a teenager, were found shot in McElderry Park late Saturday night.The victims — two men, a male teenager and a woman — were found about 11 p.m. by Southeast District police officers responding to reports of a shooting. When they arrived in the 500 block of N. Belnord Ave., officers found a 36-year-old man with gunshot wounds to his leg. While investigating, three more victims were discovered: a 31-year-old man with a gunshot wound to his stomach, a 29-year-old woman with a gunshot wound to her back and a 17-year-old boy with a graze wound to the side of his body.Police believe all four victims were in the 500 block of N. Belnord Ave. when they were shot. All were treated at area hospitals and are expected to survive.Anyone with information on these shootings is asked to call police at 410-396-2221 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup (1-866-756-2587).Crime videosRecommendedKFOR.com Oklahoma Cityby:Kaylee DouglasShooting near NE 26th and Kelley, Oklahoma CityOKLAHOMA CITY – First responders are on the scene of a shooting with multiple people shot in northeast Oklahoma City.Officers were called to the scene near NE 26th and Kelley just before 9:30 p.m.OKCPD has confirmed that there are 4 victims in the shooting.Authorities say the victims were standing in front of the store when a green SUV pulled up and began shooting.5 people were shot, and 4 were transported to a local hospital.Officers say multiple suspects are possible.There is no word on the extent of their injuries at this time.This is a developing story. We will keep you updated.SubmitDEATH VALLEY NATIONAL PARK, Calif. (AP) — An Arizona tourist has died and his wife has been rescued after their vehicle got two flat tires and they went missing in Death Valley National Park in California.The Inyo County Sheriff's Office says searchers on Friday reached 32-year-old Alexander Lofgren and 27-year-old Emily Henkel on a steep ledge in the California desert park.WASHINGTON (AP) — From a secure room in the Capitol on Jan. 6, as rioters pummeled police and vandalized the building, Vice President Mike Pence tried to assert control. In an urgent phone call to the acting defense secretary, he issued a startling demand.“Clear the Capitol,” Pence said.(KTVX) -- Millions of vaccine shots have been given across the U.S., and as that number grows, there is the potential for researchers to learn more about how the vaccine affects people's health.The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is currently tracking any side effects of receiving the vaccine through a tool called v-safe.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Prosecutors in Tulsa say a 20-year-old man has been charged with two counts of first-degree murder for a shooting that killed two and injured two others.TheTulsa World reportsKaleb Young has also been charged with two counts of shooting with intent to kill.According to a probable cause affidavit, Young allegedly confessed he shot the four people at an apartment complex on Monday because they were standing near his ex-girlfriend.Investigators say Young told them he thought the people standing next to this ex-girlfriend had shot up his home a month earlier.Young remains in the Tulsa County jail on a bond of more than $1 million. Jail records didn't list an attorney for Young.Killed in the shooting were 23-year-old Marco Celestine and 26-year-old Joshua Smith.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.K'ci Jaleell Rue, wanted in connection to Alexandria's first homicide of 2019, surrendered voluntarily Wednesday morning, according to attorney Mike Small.Small, in a letter to Alexandria Police Department Chief Jerrod King, stated that he was authorized to speak as Rue's attorney "at this point."More:Suspect named in Alexandria shooting that killed 1, wounded 4Detectives had issued warrants for Rue's arrest last week after a shooting on Bacon Street that killed one man and wounded four others.Rue, 19, of the 1700 block of Hickory Street in Alexandria, was wanted on warrants for first-degree murder, four counts of armed robbery with a firearm and four counts of attempted first-degree murder.He was booked into the Rapides Parish Detention Center at 2:18 p.m. Wednesday. Bond has not been set.His arrest in this case comes as a pretrial conference nears in another criminal case pending against him.Police had responded around 1:30 a.m. on May 20 to the 1900 block of Bacon Street, where they found a man lying in the road. The unidentified man died at the scene, which is off Masonic Drive across from the Alexandria Zoo.Calls about others who had been shot were received by police within minutes, said officials. Two were found near Bacon Street, while another two went to a local hospital.On Wednesday afternoon, Small sent an email to The Town Talk with a letter to King attached. In that letter, he writes that Rue and his family asked him to represent Rue.Small said he helped to voluntarily surrender Rue around 11:30 a.m. at police headquarters to Detective Patrick Harrison."Whether or not I formally enroll as counsel for Mr. Rue at a later date, I am authorized to speak for him as his attorney at this point," Small wrote in the letter to King. "Because I have not yet had the opportunity to familiarize myself with the facts surrounding the incident in question I am not willing at this point to have my client voluntarily submit to questioning."Small asked King to tell all detectives and other law enforcement officers involved in the case that Rue would not be questioned without Small's "express written authorization."Rue has a June 12 pretrial conference in a case in which he faces charges of armed robbery with a firearm and aggravated assault with a firearm. He allegedly robbed and assaulted an individual on July 13, 2018, according to the bill of information.Rue originally was arrested on a charge of attempted second-degree murder in the case. His bond was set at $175,000, but he sought to have that reduced.His bond eventually was reduced to $100,000, and Rue was released from jail in September 2018. He failed to report for a pretrial conference on May 8, according to the Rapides Parish Clerk of Court website.A bench warrant wasn't immediately issued, however. His defense attorney in that case, Christopher LaCour, said Rue was taking a final in school.But Rue didn't show up in court that afternoon, so 9th Judicial District Court Judge Chris Hazel issued the warrant. It was recalled on May 13, a week before the shooting.Police are investigating an incident in the Hilltop area of Columbus that left four people injured Monday night.According to Columbus police, officers responded to the area of South Wayne Avenue and Sullivant Avenue around 7:20 p.m.Battalion Chief Steve Martin with the Columbus Division of Fire said two people had serious injuries and he described the injuries to the other two people as minor.Police added that two of the victims had gunshot wounds and a third was pistol-whipped. The injuries for the fourth person were not released.Police have S. Wayne Avenue closed from Wicklow Road to Sullivant Avenue while they are on the scene.No one is in custody and police have not released any suspect information at this time.Police said ShotSpotter picked this up, giving officers the location to within a foot of where the shots were fied.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Shooting at AudioCinema warehouse in SE PortlandIan Ondrejcak noticed two men arguing, then suddenly heard gunshots ring out after he stepped from his business office early Sunday to smoke a cigarette on Southeast Madison Street.About 350 young adults had crowded into the AudioCinema warehouse for an all-ages DJ party Saturday night that was supposed to run from 7 p.m. to midnight, according to Ondrejcak.Around 12:40 a.m. Sunday, a man standing outside the warehouse at the corner of Madison and Third Avenue fired at least two shots into the open garage bay of the party and someone fired back at least five shots from inside, said Ondrejcak, who ducked behind cars.Ondrejcak’s business partner, who was inside the warehouse at the time, said he heard between five to seven gunshots and then barricaded himself inside the upstairs office of their drone operation.Partygoers raced out of the Madison Street door from the packed venue because other entrances were cordoned off, Ondrejcak said. He said most of those attending the party looked like they were between the ages of 18 and 20.At least five people were wounded -- one 17-year-old girl and four adult men, Portland police said. Three of the victims were taken by private vehicle to a local hospital. Two were taken by ambulance. At least three have been released from the hospital, police said.Police haven’t announced any arrests yet and said they want to talk to witnesses who left the scene before they arrived.“It’s absolutely ridiculous,’’ Ondrejcak told The Oregonian/OregonLive on Monday. He’s rented space in the warehouse for the last 18 months.He said he saw some men wearing “security’’ shirts, but wondered what type of security they were providing and why the warehouse was allowed to be so full, with only one entry and exit.He’s got employees and others who are scared to return to his office because of what occurred, Ondrejcak said.Iadreace Robinson, owner of the recording studio Straight Up Entertainment in the warehouse, sponsored the party and said about 200 young people attended what he described as a “social dance party” with no alcohol served.He was trying to provide a venue so teens aren’t out on the streets at night, he said. If he holds further events like Saturday night’s, he said he’ll make sure "it’s done in a better way,'' with more security. He also called for stricter gun control laws."I was trying to do something for youth. It didn’t go according to plan,'' he said.The warehouse is billed as an independent art and music factory. Tenants rent space in the building, which includes a dance studio, several recording studios and practice facilities, a hair salon, tattoo shop and the drone company.“Officers responding to the original call encountered a chaotic scene, with people leaving on foot and in vehicles,’’ according to a police release.Robinson obtained a special-use permit for Saturday night’s event, which he called "First Official Teen Summer Party.'' The permit describes the event as "Youth Function. No Nightclub Type Atmosphere.'' That would allow up to 300 people to attend, according to Lt. Rich Chatman, a Portland Fire Bureau spokesman.A "nightclub environment'' would mean only 100 people could attend, Chatman said.Officials from the Portland Fire Marshal’s Office visited the warehouse Monday and an assistant fire marshal has been assigned to investigate whether the sponsor abided by the permit granted. No public assembly inspector had gone out to the site before the event, Chatman said.The Fire Marshal’s Office already found that someone was living in the warehouse though wasn’t allowed to do so.Police asked anyone with information on the shooting to call the their Gun Violence Reduction Team at (503) 823-4106, or e-mailGunTaskForce@portlandoregon.gov.-- Maxine BernsteinEmail atmbernstein@oregonian.comFollow on Twitter@maxoregonianVisitsubscription.oregonlive.com/newslettersto get Oregonian/OregonLive journalism delivered to your email inbox.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesMUNCIE, Ind. (WTHR) — A 17-year-old  shot at a home in Muncie early Saturday has died of his injuries.Delaware County Coroner Rick Howell confirmed to Eyewitness News Daymarr Kennedy died Monday morning. He was one of seven people shot at the party on West Euclid Avenue, just blocks from the Ball State campus.Three of the victims were critically injured. Kennedy was one of them. The other victims were treated and released at local hospitals.Police arrested19-year-old Va Shaun Harnett, who was preliminarily charged with two counts of attempted murder. Muncie Police Chief Joe Winkle said investigators will meet with the Delaware County prosecutor Tuesday. One of the attempted murder charges against Harnett will likely become a murder charge after Kennedy's death.Investigators are waiting to see what happens to the two other victims who were critically wounded in the shooting. Both remain hospitalized."It's a shame, 17 years old," said Winkle of the shooting victim.His whole life ahead of him, Kennedy passed away Monday morning after fighting for his life for two days."My youngest son, who's a firefighter, was at the scene that night, holding his hand and talking about how scared he was and he was too young to die and now to know he's passed, is really sad," said Winkle.Investigators say it was all part of an ongoing confrontation between some guests, including the shooting suspect."They happened to run into each other that night. We're still trying to piece together exactly what led to the actual shooting," said Winkle."That's crazy.  That's just so unfortunate," said neighbor Cassie Amman.Amman lives across the street from where the shooting happened. She heard the shots and saw people running."They were like shouting and running through our yard to get away," Amman explained.The suspect's mom said she believes her son wasn't the only person there with a gun that night."How can he be the only shooter when there were seven people shot?" asked Leank Harnett."If there was more than one shooter, we just haven’t gotten any witnesses and/or evidence to verify that," said Winkle, who added that could always change with the continuing investigation.Investigators were able to talk with one of the other critically injured victims Sunday. The other victim has not been able to give police any information because of his condition.Investigators are hoping they get a chance to talk to him, too.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.A woman was killed and five other people were injured early Saturday in a shooting outside a Long Beach bar, according to police.The shooting happened around 12:40 a.m. on Pacific Coast Highway near Canal Avenue, media relations officer Alvino Herrera said.The woman, a 57-year-old Ontario resident, died at the scene, according to police. Three men and two other women were also wounded in the shooting. Four of them had injuries that were not life-threatening; the fifth is in critical but stable condition, according to police.One woman who arrived at the scene after the shooting had told KTLA-TV Channel 5she believed that the person who died was her mother-in-law, a grandmother who had been there to mark someone else’s death.“She was important to us,” Sabrina Neely told the station. “She was all we had … She was just at the wrong place at the wrong time.”The Los Angeles County coroner’s office later identified the woman who died as Jacqueline Glasby.Long Beach homicide detectives believe that the shooting happened while people were meeting for a vigil for someone who had recently died, gathering at a parking lot for a business on the edge of an industrial area, according to a statement released by the department.It is unclear how many shooters were involved and police had no description of any suspect or suspects as of Saturday morning. Police are asking anyone with information about the shooting to contact Long Beach homicide detectives at 562-570-7244 or send anonymous tips to 1-800-222-8477.City News Service contributed to this report.emily.alpert@latimes.comTwitter:@AlpertReyesThe perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsEmily Alpert Reyes covers City Hall for the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.CaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoveragePoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeThe LAPD said three children were found stabbed to death in Reseda homeCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.A man who shot and killed two people and injured two others in a Cedar Rapids parking lot has been sentenced to 75 years in prison.KCRG-TV reports that 27-year-old Andre Richardson was sentenced Wednesday. He pleaded guilty in June to two counts of second-degree murder, attempted murder and other charges.The shooting happened in May 2019 outside a smoke shop near Kirkwood Community College. Matrell Johnson and Royal Abram, both 18, died in the shootings.Two others also were hit by bullets but survived.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Omaha Police said that four people were injured in shootings just before 1:30 a.m. Saturday.The shots were fired in the area of 27th and Y streets and 31st and Jefferson streets, near the Kroc Center.Medics found two victims at the locations and took them to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.OPD was informed that two more victims took themselves to the hospital with non-life threatening injuries.Victims ranged from 15 to 28 years old.The investigation is ongoing. Anyone with information should call Crime Stoppers at 402-444-STOP.A bullet hole in the window of a vehicle parked on Cody Drive after a shooting over the weekend left two people dead and others injured in Winston-SalemWinston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks Friday at a discussion of the recent string of violent crimes in the city. Community leaders and law-enforcement officials called for community care, fellowship and accountability, and for people to cooperate and help authorities.Lt. Gregory Dorn (left) and Capt. Steve Tollie of Winston-Salem Police Department speak to community leaders and reporters Friday at a session called to discuss how to work toward less violent crime in the city.Bishop Todd Fulton, social justice chair of the Minister’s Conference of Winston-Salemand Vicinity, speaks Friday about the violence. While the street code may be to keep silent, people need to look beyond that, share information and not betray the slain young men, he said.A bullet hole in the door of a vehicle parked on Cody Drive after a shooting over the weekend left two people dead and others injured.Three shootings in the city within six weeks are the works of the same people, with more than 140 shots fired and 16 guns used, officials said Friday.“We call on the members of our community to assist us in solving a string of very violent gun crimes and to assist us in preventing similar crimes,” Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson said at a media briefing on Friday.Police said ballistics and information obtained through their investigation has led them to link a shooting outside Nova Lounge on April 7 in which seven people were shot at 515 N. Cherry St. about 1:35 a.m.; at a children’s birthday party at a park in the 2400 block of Ivy Avenue on April 13 about 7:50 p.m.; and the shooting at a cookout party in the 4200 block of Cody Drive on May 18 about 10:50 p.m., in which two men died and six other people were injured.Police said three guns were used to fire 12 shots at theNova Loungeshooting. Two guns have been recovered. At the shooting at the birthday party, no injuries were reported, despite more than 50 shots fired by at least five guns, police said. Two of the guns used in that shooting have been seized. In the Cody Drive shooting, police found 80 shell casings used by at least eight guns. Five of those have been found by police — four on Cody Drive after the shooting.The weapons used in these shootings included semi-automatic pistols and semi-automatic revolvers, Thompson said, with some of the same people at the shootings. In a news release, Winston-Salem police said two people have been charged with possession of a firearm by a convicted felon in the Nova Lounge shooting and the Cody Drive shooting. No one has been charged in direct connection to the shootings. The police department did not release the names of the two people charged with gun possession.At the shooting at a party on Cody Drive, Jalen Chavon Cockerham, 23, of Obgurn Drive, was shot dead in the street. Fred Douglas Hawkins III, 26, of Regents Park Lane, died from his injuries 72 hours later.Thompson said law enforcement has expended hundreds of hours investigating all three shootings, including involving the gang unit, SWAT unit, the U.S. Marshals Office and the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. The resident agent in charge for the district ATF was at the media briefing Friday, lending his support to the investigation.Jackie Clayton hosted the cookout on Cody Drive on May 18, but said she thinks criminals took advantage of the situation.She was starting to clean up after the cookout when she heard gunshots.“I heard, ‘pop, pop, pop,’” said Clayton, who lives in the 4200 block of Cody Avenue.She looked up from her front yard, where she’d been relaxing with her 18-year-old daughter and a few friends and saw a vehicle driving down the street shooting. It continued to the end of the cul-de-sac, turned around, slowly went back up the street and fired again in the area where it initially fired before leaving Cody Avenue, Clayton said.“They were in a vehicle and came down the street and started shooting. I don’t know what the cause of it was,” Clayton said. “I ran into the house.”Police confirmed there was a vehicle that was involved in a drive-by shooting on the street on May 18, but said there was other shooting on the street, as well.Cockerham died in the street while Hawkins was critically injured and would later die. Two other men and three women were also shot, police said. An eighth person was pistol-whipped.The cookout was a birthday party for her 29-year-old son. She disputes police information there were around 200 people on Cody Drive at the time of the shooting, saying many people had left at the time of the shooting. Clayton estimates about 100 people attended the party.She thinks the shooting was unrelated to the cookout, but instead had something to do with a person who happened to be on the street at that time.“There was nobody arguing here,” she said. “(The disagreement) could have been recent, it could have been something from the past few months. There was no arguing out here. Whoever was doing the shooting seized the opportunity to do what they needed to do.”Clayton said no shots were fired at her house, although she admitted Cockerham and Hawkins were guests at the cookout.She has held cookouts regularly, both for her son’s birthday and in honor of another son who was killed. After the shooting on May 18, Clayton vowed never to hold a public gathering again.“I want justice for them boys. I want whoever’s responsible to be caught,” she said of Cockerham’s and Hawkins’ deaths, adding, “I feel violated.”The shooting on Cody Drive caps an escalating number of shootings in the city, alarming police.“This is one of the most violent strings in the city that I’ve seen in my career,” said Capt. Steve Tollie. “The amount of shots and violence is of concern.”The city’s gang unit is trying to determine if the shootings are the works of an established gang, a new gang or other illegal activity, Tollie said.Police have previously said Hawkins was a gang subject of interest and there were several gang members in the area of Cody Drive at the time of the shooting.Tollie said itsIntegrated Ballistic Identification System(IBIS), which allows the agency to run ballistics tests in-house, has helped speed the investigation. Results on the shell casings found at the scenes have come back in hours or days, rather than weeks or months.However, although the technology plays a crucial role, Tollie said nothing is more important in a case than cooperating victims and witnesses.Thompson said social media posts about events and rumors don’t help an investigation. Law enforcement needs people to come forward with information.“Witnesses, victims and others have to be willing to come forward with a detective face-to-face to provide eyewitness account to what occurred,” she said.If people would prefer to report information anonymously, the Crime Stoppers tip line allows people to do so. Its number is 336-727-2800. For information leading to an arrest in the Cody Drive shooting, a reward of up to $5,000 is available.“We will work around the clock to ensure no stone is unturned,” Thompson said. “Every effort is underway to solve these crimes, but community effort is needed.”Depending on a person’s background in the case, they could potentially face federal charges.Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O’Neill said there’s only one question the community needs to ask itself: Do you want a safe community to live in? If so, then don’t participate in vigilante justice and tell law enforcement what happened.Bishop Todd Fulton, the social justice chair with the Minister’s Conference of Winston-Salem and Vicinity, said although there is a street code not to betray their friends, people should consider the larger picture and not betray Cockerham and Hawkins with silence.Fulton said if a white officer shot several black people in this neighborhood, the Minister’s Conference would have received dozens of phone calls. It’s received zero about the deaths of these two men.“Don’t subscribe to silence,” he said.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes on Friday, May 24, 2019 in Winston-Salem, N.C.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr. speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Jason Walsh with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson listens as Jason Walsh, foreground, with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Elder Tembila Covington, President of the Minister's Conference of Winston-Salem and Vicinity, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Bishop Todd Fulton, Social Justice Chair of the Minister's Conference of Winston-Salem and Vicinity, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr., from left, Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill and Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson listen during a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Reverend Alvin Carlisle, President of Winston Salem/Forsyth County Chapter of the NAACP, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.James Perry, President of the Winston-Salem Urban League, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Cedric Russel, of Russell's Funeral Home, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn, from left, and Captain Steve Tollie speak to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Captain Steve Tollie speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr. speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn, from left, and Captain Steve Tollie speak to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes on Friday, May 24, 2019 in Winston-Salem, N.C.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr. speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Jason Walsh with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson listens as Jason Walsh, foreground, with the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Elder Tembila Covington, President of the Minister's Conference of Winston-Salem and Vicinity, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Bishop Todd Fulton, Social Justice Chair of the Minister's Conference of Winston-Salem and Vicinity, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr., from left, Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill and Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson listen during a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Reverend Alvin Carlisle, President of Winston Salem/Forsyth County Chapter of the NAACP, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.James Perry, President of the Winston-Salem Urban League, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Cedric Russel, of Russell's Funeral Home, speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn, from left, and Captain Steve Tollie speak to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Captain Steve Tollie speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County District Attorney Jim O'Neill speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Forsyth County Sheriff Bobby Kimbrough Jr. speaks to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.Winston-Salem Police Department Lieutenant Gregory Dorn, from left, and Captain Steve Tollie speak to community leaders and members of the media at a press conference to address a recent spate of violent crimes.O’Neillsnewell@wsjournal.com336-727-4068@s_k_newell on TwitterGet local news delivered to your inbox!Winston-Salem police are trying to unravel the details behind the shooting of seven people at a birthday party on Cody Drive late Saturday.A bullet hole in the window of a vehicle parked on Cody Drive after a shooting over the weekend left two people dead and others injured in Winston-SalemWinston-Salem Police Chief Catrina Thompson speaks Friday at a discussion of the recent string of violent crimes in the city. Community leaders and law-enforcement officials called for community care, fellowship and accountability, and for people to cooperate and help authorities.Lt. Gregory Dorn (left) and Capt. Steve Tollie of Winston-Salem Police Department speak to community leaders and reporters Friday at a session called to discuss how to work toward less violent crime in the city.Bishop Todd Fulton, social justice chair of the Minister’s Conference of Winston-Salemand Vicinity, speaks Friday about the violence. While the street code may be to keep silent, people need to look beyond that, share information and not betray the slain young men, he said.A bullet hole in the door of a vehicle parked on Cody Drive after a shooting over the weekend left two people dead and others injured.O’NeillGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.SACRAMENTO (CBS13)— A grieving family is looking for answers after a young mother was killed in a South Sacramento shooting.Erica Frazier, 27, is dead after four people, including a little boy, were shot Friday at a South Sacramento apartment complex.CBS13 has learned the shooting was targeted, and that Frazier and the 4-year-old boy were both bystanders. The family said Frazier was at the apartment complex off of Stockton Boulevard by chance.She was planning on stopping by for a birthday party at a friends house. In an instant, her life was cut short and we’re told she was not the intended target.“Our family needs peace because we need to find out who did this to my sister,” says Frazier’s sister Zasha Hodge.Hodge sat alongside an extended family inside the house in Oak Park Frazier had just bought for herself and her two daughters.They looked at photos of the 27-year-old, they say her life was just beginning.“She wasn’t involved in violence, I could call and talk to her whenever,” said her sister Cynthia.READ ALSO:Megan ‘Monster’ Hawkins, Featured On Netflix Show ‘Jailbirds’ Back In Jail After Arrest In Elk GroveOn Friday, Frazier had stopped by an old friend’s birthday party after work when suddenly gunshots were heard throughout the complex.“I need somebody to tell me what happened to my sister,” Hodge said.Witnesses told investigators that five men in dark clothing were seen leaving the scene after the shooting occurred.Unidentified Suspect (credit: Sacramento Sheriff’s Department)Monday, the Sheriff’s Office released a sketch of a man with dreadlocks believed to be in his twenties.The Sheriffs Office calls this a “targeted shooting.” The family says four days later, they have no answers, including how and why this happened.“This is what we end up with, no answers, no nothing,” Frazier’s Uncle, Eddie Sims said.READ:Search On For Suspects After Shooting Leaves 1 Dead, 1 Injured In South NatomasThe community came out Sunday for a vigil In Frazier’s honor, to celebrate her life.“I’m hurt I lost my everything; And if you know how it feels to lose somebody like this, it’s my heart, my sister, my everything,” her sister Cynthia said.“I love my niece, she was a beautiful woman, she touched all of us here, and she’s very missed. We need some peace, we need some closure,” said Richard Sims, Frazier’s uncle.The Sheriff’s Office is asking anyone with information to call deputies at916-874-5115or Sacramento Valley Crime Stoppers at916-443-HELP.Fox 8 Cleveland WJWby:Darcie LorenoCLEVELAND, Ohio — Four people, including two teens, were shot and hospitalized in an incident in Cleveland Thursday night.Cleveland police said it happened at just after 10:30 p.m. in the 9500 Cardwell Avenue.An 18-year-old female was shot in the chest. A 20-year-old male was shot in the back, and a 30-year-old male was shot in the ankle. The fourth victim was a 17-year-old male who was shot in the leg.The incident remains under investigation.SubmitCLEVELAND (WJW) -- Cleveland police are investigating a fatal shooting that occurred in the city's east side Friday.According to police, officers responded to the 19600 block of Arrowhead Avenue around 10:30 a.m. after a 56-year-old woman was found dead in her kitchen by family members.  She had been shot multiple times.COLUMBUS, Ohio (WJW) — The Ohio Department of Health released the state’s latest coronavirus numbers Wednesday afternoon.There have been 1,037,600 total confirmed and probable cases of COVID-19 in the state since the pandemic began, which includes an addition of 2,048 cases reported today, along with a total of 18,827 deaths (including zero additional fatalities reported today).LONDON (AP) — Britain’s Prince Charles said the royal family is “deeply grateful’’ for outpouring of support they’ve received following the death of his father, Prince Philip.In a deeply personal message, the heir to the throne said he was touched by the number of people around the world who have shared the family’s loss and sorrow.ST. ROSE, La. (WVUE) - The St. Charles Parish Sheriff’s Office said a boy and girl were shot during a violent altercation between two men in a St. Rose strip mall parking lot.Deputies were called to the 100 block of St. Rose Ave. on Wednesday around 6 p.m.Officers discovered a 19-year-old man, a boy and a girl who were all shot.Investigators believe the shooting started because of a prior conflict between the 19-year-old and someone identified as Je’Marius Beason.Officers said Beason allegedly pulled out a gun and fired six shots, hitting the three victims.The 19-year-old victim was shot two times. He was taken to a hospital in New Orleans, where his most recent update listed him in good condition.The boy was shot in both legs, he was also taken to a hospital in New Orleans where he is in critical condition and scheduled for surgery.The girl was shot in the right index finger, according to officers. She was taken to Ochsner in Kenner, where she was treated and released. Deputies believe the girl was shot while putting herself between Beason and the 19-year-old victim, in an attempt to defuse the altercation.After the initial shooting in the strip mall parking lot, Beason left the scene.The father of one of the victims, identified as Cyrus London, found out his son was shot and went after Beason.He followed him to the 400 block of Turtle Creek Ln. where the two men were involved in a shootout.London was shot twice and taken to the hospital. He was treated and released.Detectives found Beason at his home in the 500 blk. of Turtle Creek Ln. where he was taken into custody without incident.Beason was charged with two counts of Attempted Second Degree Murder and one countof Negligent Injuring. He is currently being held at the Nelson Coleman Correctional Centeron a $400,000 bond.London was charged with one count of attempted Second Degree Murder. He is currentlybeing held at the Nelson Coleman Correctional Center on a $500,000 bond.Copyright 2019 WVUE. All rights reserved.1025 S. Norman C. Francis Pkwy.New Orleans, LA 70125(504) 486-6161A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.NEW ORLEANS — Police have arrested an 18-year-old accused of shooting four people in New Orleans' Central City area and burglarizing dozens of vehicles.According to court records, Theron Glover faces four counts of aggravated battery in a quadruple shooting and 81 counts of simple burglary - usually associated with car break-ins.Glover and three juveniles were arrested after the New Orleans Police Department received reports on May 30 of people traveling in a stolen car breaking into vehicles.Police later tried to stop the stolen car on Chef Menteur Highway when several people jumped out of the vehicle and Glover drove away. Police arrested three people who ran away, who were known juvenile offenders of previous burglaries and car thefts. Glover was arrested the next day without incident.All four individuals were charged with 12 counts of auto burglary for the May 30 reported incidents. During the investigation, the NOPD said detectives determine Glover and one of the juveniles were responsible for another 15 car break-ins and two car thefts, totaling 27 property crimes in 5 days.Authorities say they are also investigating Glover's involvement in another 19 incidents including car thefts and burglaries.The shooting that Glover was booked on happened on May 13 near the corner of Fourth Street and Loyola Avenue in Central City. According to police, a man in a dark-colored sedan pulled up and opened fire on a group of people, wounding four. The victims ranged in age from 33- to 15-years-old. None of them were killed.RELATED:Four wounded in Central City shooting, NOPD investigatingNotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Crime scene technicians on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comCrime scene technicians on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA homicide detective standing in the the doorway and a crime scene technician on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home along the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA crime scene technician on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home along the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comSt. Louis police said Wednesday that a fourth victim has now died after gunfire broke out in a home Monday night.Five men were shot in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue about 8:50 p.m. Monday. All five victims were in their 20s and 30s, Police Chief John Hayden said at the scene.Officers arrived and spoke to the homeowner, who was sitting on the porch with a gunshot wound to his leg, officials said. The homeowner told police that several people came inside his home and argued, a brawl broke out and then a gunbattle took place, Major Mary Warnecke said in a public statement issued Wednesday.When police went inside, they found four more victims, three of them dead at the scene, Hayden said. One of those men was critically injured and died later at a hospital, police said Wednesday.Authorities have not yet released the identities of the victims, but Teisha Jackson said one of them was her brother Ray Howard, and that all of the deceased men were related. Two of them, Brendan and Kenneth Williams, were brothers, she said.Howard's grandmother, Phyllis Williams, died of natural causes shortly after hearing about the deaths, Jackson said."She had been sick for a while, but this was just too much for her," Jackson said. "I'm just doing everything I can right now to keep from breaking down."Jackson, who lives in Arkansas, said she did not know why her brother and other family members were at the home on Shreve on the night of the shooting.Warnecke said in her statement issued Thursday that police believe there were other people present in the home at the time of the shooting "that could shed light on what exactly occurred." Police asked anyone with information about the shooting to call CrimeStoppers at 866-371-8477. Tipsters can remain anonymous and may be eligible for a reward.Several guns were seized from the home along with suspected illegal drugs, Warnecke said.Board of Alderman President Lewis Reed said he knew the aunt and the mother of one of the victims because they frequently volunteer for events together."If ever we're handing out backpacks to the kids somewhere or anything like that, here they come," he said. "They never asked for assistance. They were out saying, 'We read about this and we came to help you out.'"Now having four family members being gunned down in one day and having to plan four separate funerals, it's very difficult. This highlights the need to get guns off our streets and to make a heavier investment in our youth to ensure that everybody has an opportunity to achieve the best."Reed said he believes the city should be pursuing programs likeCure Violence. That program takes a public health approach to violence through identifying and "treating" high risk individuals by connecting them with social services or other resources, according to its website.The shooting took place inside “Hayden’s Rectangle,”a portion of St. Louis where the chief pledged to focus crime-fighting resources starting in 2018.The St. Louis Police Department said Tuesday the "rectangle" was seeing a drop in homicides and aggravated assaults using a firearm. Robberies were on the increase.Even with Monday night's victims on Shreve, there have been fewer homicides inside Hayden's Rectangle so far in 2019, compared with the same period of time in 2018.The rectangle encompasses at least a half-dozen neighborhoods. The home on Shreve is in the Penrose neighborhood.Violent crime in the Penrose neighborhood is down slightlyin the last six months compared with the same time period last year, though crime overall has increased in that neighborhood.These crime statistics for the area known as “Hayden’s rectangle” in St. Louis cover year-to-date 2018 and 2019, as of May 13, 2019. The numbers for 2019 do not include the shooting from the evening of May 13, 2019, that left three men dead and two injured in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue. The trapezoidal area, which is named after the St. Louis police chief, has become a focus of law enforcement due to high crime rates there. It is bordered by Goodfellow Boulevard to the west, Vandeventer Avenue to the east, Dr. Martin Luther King Drive to the south and West Florissant Avenue to the north. Source: St. Louis Metropolitan Police.Kim Bell and Rachel Rice of the Post-Dispatch contributed to this report.•Crime Tracker: St. Louis city•Get crime reports for the St. Louis region•Map: St. Louis-area homicides in 2019Shake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Christine Byers is a reporter for the St. Louis Post-Dispatch.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Crime scene technicians on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comCrime scene technicians on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home in the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA homicide detective standing in the the doorway and a crime scene technician on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home along the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comA crime scene technician on the scene of a shooting where five men were shot, leaving three dead at a home along the 4000 block of Shreve Avenue on Monday, May 13, 2019. Photo by Laurie Skrivan,lskrivan@post-dispatch.comGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Clouds and limited sunshine..Mostly cloudy and mild; periods of rain late.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 3:10 pmFour people were injured after a shooting in Monroe County Saturday night.A man is facing attempted homicide charges in the shooting reported just after 8 p.m. Saturday night in the 800 block of Toll Road in Chestnuthill Township.Thomas Modzel pointed a 12-gauge shotgun at the four victims and fired multiple rounds at them, according to state police.Modzel fired from his porch at the four people, one of which was his stepson, standing on the road, according to court paperwork.The four victims were taken to Lehigh Valley Hospital - Pocono for treatment of gunshot wounds.The victims were in stable condition, police said.Crews at the scene also reported that the victims were believed to have been hit with birdshot.Modzel was charged with criminal attempt homicide, aggravated assault, recklessly endangering another person and simple assault.Stay up-to-date on breaking news, weather and entertainment with "Desktop Alert Notifications" WFMZ.com.*No installation requiredGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.WATCHVIDEOSFive men shot in North Philadelphia ambushFOX 2by:Kevin S. HeldST. LOUIS – An investigation into a north St. Louis shooting has increased in scope Friday after police learned of additional victims.Police responded to a shooting just after 3 p.m. in the 3900 block of Ashland Avenue, that’s in the Greater Ville neighborhood. Two men had been shot and taken to a nearby hospital.Later that afternoon, police said four additional victims showed up at the hospital.The victims were only identified as men and were conscious and breathing.Anyone with information on the shooting is asked to call CrimeStoppers at 866-371-TIPS.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.3 hours ago4 hours ago10 hours ago3 hours ago5 hours ago18 hours ago9 hours ago9 hours ago22 hours ago23 hours ago18 hours ago24 hours ago17 hours ago21 hours ago21 hours agoWISH-TV InstagramWISH-TV TwitterWISH-TV YouTubeWISH-TV FacebookIndy Style FacebookAll Indiana FacebookLocalStaff Reports2021-04-10T11:59:03-04:003 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T10:18:18-04:005 hours ago|Aleah Hordges2021-04-10T09:36:22-04:007 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T08:14:08-04:008 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-10T06:23:57-04:009 hours ago|NationalJay Croft, CNN2021-04-10T15:11:58-04:0011 mins ago|LISA MASCARO, BEN FOX and LOLITA C. BALDOR, Associated Press2021-04-10T14:04:33-04:004 hours ago|Clare Foran, CNN2021-04-10T08:23:17-04:007 hours ago|JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T08:03:23-04:007 hours ago|JONATHAN LEMIRE and JESSICA GRESKO Associated Press2021-04-10T06:46:02-04:009 hours ago|TRENDING PODCASTSSPORTSChris Boyette, Hollie Silverman and Jennifer Henderson, CNN2021-04-10T06:20:11-04:009 hours ago|Gregg Montgomery2021-04-09T22:07:21-04:0017 hours ago|Dan Klein2021-04-09T23:02:09-04:0018 hours ago|Staff Reports2021-04-09T14:04:08-04:001 day ago|Charlie Clifford2021-04-09T10:19:21-04:001 day ago|INDY STYLEAmber Hankins2021-04-09T15:50:08-04:0024 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:52:12-04:0024 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:52-04:0024 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T16:39:40-04:0024 hours ago|Amber Hankins2021-04-09T15:49:38-04:0024 hours ago|FEATURED POLLTake Our PollCOMMUNITY CALENDARMenuHIGHLANDS RANCH, Colo. — The security guard who fired his gun and mistakenly shot two student bystanders during the May 2019 attack at STEM School Highlands Ranch will complete community service as part of a diversion program and not face jail time, 4th Judicial District Attorney Dan Mayannouncedon Friday.Shamson Sundara detained and disarmed one of the alleged shooters during the incident, but he was also prohibited from carrying a weapon on campus, per his employment contract with the school.Emailsobtained by The Colorado Sun show the suburban Denver charter schoolhad requested an unarmed guard from BOSS High Level Protection about a year ago. In a statement, STEM School Highlands Ranch said it didn’t know the guard was armed until the shooting occurred May 7 on the campus that includes students from kindergarten through high school.After Sundara detained one suspect in the shooting, he saw a person in street clothes round a corner of a hallway and spotted the muzzle of a gun. Sundara fired two shots toward the person, who turned out to be a plainclothes deputy. The shots missed the deputy and went through the wall of a classroom, where they struck two students, May said in a news release.The students suffered non-life threatening injuries. When other law enforcement officers identified themselves, Sundara complied with their commands, May said.Part of Sundara's diversion program will "incorporate restorative justice forum with the victims," May said, and the victims and the Douglas County School District were consulted as officials worked to reach the agreement with Sundara.While Sundara's possession of a weapon at the school violated his contract, Colorado state law allows deadly force if a person "has reasonable ground to believe, and does believe, that he or another person is in imminent danger" of being killed or wounded."Although it was illegal for him to have a gun on the premises, our investigation has determined that his actions were in compliance with applicable law," May said.Sundara has been promoted since the shooting and is now involved in hiring and recruitment with Boss High Level Protection, the president of the company, Grant Whitus, said in an interview Friday. Whitus said he and Sundara were "happy no charges were filed" and that they did not expect them to be filed in the first place. Whitus declined to comment on specifics because of the ongoing cases involving the school shooting suspects. But he said that employees at the company "hail Shamson as a hero.""The facts are going to come out in the trial. We believe everybody is going to be amazed about what he did, how many lives he saved that day and understand exactly what happened that day," Whitus said.Whitus said that Sundara, a Marine combat veteran, is a witness for prosecutors in the two suspects' trials, and that the whole story about his actions would come out then."Believe me — he wants to tell his story, and when it's all over, he will," Whitus said. "And people will really understand what happened that day."Kendrick Castillo, 18, was killed and eight other students were injured in the attack. The suspects — two teen students at the school — face dozens of charges, including murder.READ MORE:Denver7's coverage of the STEM school shootingClouds and limited sunshine..Mostly cloudy and mild; periods of rain late.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 3:10 pmWhy was a man shot and then dumped on the side of the road? South Whitehall Township police are trying to figure that out.Monday morning, officers found a man shot multiple times on the side of Hamilton Boulevard near Dorney Park.Police say the man was shot somewhere else, then taken to that location and left."Did you hear a shot?" 69 News Reporter Bo Koltnow asked neighbor Ed Lewis."No," he said. "There was no gun shot, there was some activity out there on the street."Lewis said he could see police near the intersection of Haines Mill Road and Hamilton Boulevard around 6:30 a.m."Obviously it's concerning when you find something like that," Lewis said.South Whitehall Township police say they found a 27-year-old man shot several times in the lower body.Investigators say the man was shot hours prior at a different location, then taken and dropped off at Hamilton and Haines Mill by a dark-colored SUV.The victim was taken to Lehigh Valley Hospital for non-life threatening injuries.Police say with pain medication, the victim has been in and out of consciousness and hasn't been able to tell any details about the shooting.Stay up-to-date on breaking news, weather and entertainment with "Desktop Alert Notifications" WFMZ.com.*No installation requiredGet up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.ST. LOUIS•  Police released new details Monday in two killings Saturday that came inan especially violent weekend in St. Louis.In the first fatal shooting, just after 3 a.m. Saturday, someone pulled alongside a minivan driving in St. Louis and opened fire, killing one man and injuring four people riding with him. Three of the injured passengers were critically hurt.Bobby Carter, 28, was killed in the 3:13 a.m. shooting Saturday in the 2600 block of Union Boulevard. Police say Carter lived in the 2000 block of Madison Street in St. Louis.The critically injured passengers were two women, 26 and 28, and a man, 25. Meanwhile, a man, 28, was stable after being shot, police say. They all were in the northbound minivan near Wabada Avenue when they were shot. Police had no description of the shooter or shooters. After the shooting, the minivan went off the road and stopped in the 2600 block of Union.Police didn't know which victim was driving. Detectives were trying to determine who sat where inside the vehicle.The shooting on Union was on the border of the the city'sKingsway Westneighborhood and theWells-Goodfellowneighborhood.In the second killing of the day Saturday, a mile to the south of the one on Union, Jessica Vinson was found shot to death in the 5300 block of Vernon Avenue, police say. Paramedics pronounced her dead at the scene, in the city's Visitation Park neighborhood.Police say they don't know who killed her. Vinson lived in the 4300 block of Maffitt Avenue.Both homicides came in a violent weekend in St. Louis.They were among at least 18 people shotin 10 separate incidents in the city. Most of the injured suffered non-life-threatening injuries.In most cases, police had little to go on, with victims saying they were not sure who shot them or why. Authorities believe two shootings may be drug related, and five appear connected to arguments or "personal vendettas.," a police spokesman said. None appeared to be random.In at least one case, the shooting didn't happen where the victims said it did, and the victims stopped cooperating with investigators.Meanwhile, three people shot themselves accidentally over the weekend in the city, police said.All three were young men from 18 to 24 who showed up at hospitals Saturday after shooting themselves. Two said they shot themselves in the leg as they got in or sat in cars. The third said he was inspecting a gun and pointing it at the ground when he accidentally shot himself in the foot. They were alive and stable, police say.The violence was not limited to the city.A highly recruited eighth-grade football phenom was shot to deathat a party in Venice, and at least five people were injured in four shootings between Friday and Sunday in areas patrolled by St. Louis County police. Those include a man shot and critically injured in a stolen vehicle in Jennings on Friday, a man shot during a possible drug deal in North County Saturday, two people who showed up at a North County hospital with injuries Sunday, and a man who accidentally shot himself while trying to defend himself from a robbery attempt Sunday in the Mehlville area.Authorities asked anyone with information about any of the crimes to contactCrimeStoppers onlineor at 1-866-371-8477. Tipsters can remain anonymous and may be eligible for a reward.•Crime Tracker: St. Louis County•Crime Tracker: St. Louis city•Get crime reports for the St. Louis region•Map: St. Louis-area homicides in 2019Kim Bell• 314-340-8115 @kbellpd on Twitterkbell@post-dispatch.comShake off your afternoon slump with the oft-shared and offbeat news of the day, hand-brewed by our online news editors.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Karen L. Guccione, 49, of Wildwood was pronounced dead at the scene.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Over 28 hours, four people were killed in St. Louis, and two more were killed in St. Louis County. In all, 12 people were shot.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Jaymes Mays, 22, was charged Saturday with three counts of unlawful use of a weapon. He was being held in lieu of $75,000 bail.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.Charges say police reviewed surveillance video that showed a jail guard open an inmate's cell, allowing two inmates to attack another.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.A mayoral spokesman said there were no reports of serious injuries. Both candidates for St. Louis mayor criticized the correctional system.No one was injured in the incident.No one was injured in the incident.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.The court ruled expert testimony on ‘coded language’ in church files deserved to be heard by a jury.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Hamza Alammouri, 27, was arrested Tuesday on charges that include aggravated criminal sexual assault.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.Norvin L. Lopez-Cante pleaded guilty Monday to statutory rape and incest in a plea deal with prosecutors.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.All charges against Austin Anderson were dismissed Monday.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Fox 59by:Russ McQuaidCourtesy: Kevin Powell, IndyFirstAlertINDIANAPOLIS, Ind. — A week after more than 81,000 NRA members left town, many of them carrying their firearms legally, and there were no reported incidents of gun violence, that streak of seven days of peace downtown was shattered Saturday night as four people were wounded in the vicinity of West Maryland Street between Capitol and Illinois Avenue.The wounded range in age from 14 to 20 years old, with the youngest victim a girl.All suffered non-life threatening gunshot wounds during the incident first reported at 11:38 p.m.A relative of a 16-year-old male caught running from the scene said that detectives doubted the boy was the shooter, and another person is still being sought.A handgun was recovered at the scene.The relative told FOX59 the shooting may have started in a dispute over a girl, while the teen in custody was wanted for removing his GPS home detention tracking unit related to a stolen car arrest from early March.The teen has a juvenile history that includes forgery and burglary while armed with a firearm.The relative said the youth has been in receipt of intensive home counseling from a gun violence prevention counselor and a substance abuse counselor.The boy has a Monday afternoon hearing before a juvenile magistrate in which the relative hopes he will remain in the juvenile system to receive intensive programming and therapy.Nine of Indianapolis’ gunshot homicide victims so far this year were under the age of 20.That’s approximately one out of every five homicide victims.The statistic underscores the toll gun violence is taking on the city’s youth.Timothy Taylor is an ex-offender, paroled from the Department of Correction, who said he has watched many of his childhood friends die or end up in prison.“95% of them for sure,” he said. “95% are either passed away or either they’re still doing the same thing. There’s very select few who are moving in a positive direction, and literally I can probably count them on one hand so most of them are still doing the same thing or are no longer with us.”Mayor Hogsett recently launched a summer jobs program to find partial employment for 3000 teens once the current school year ends.The mayor’s office is still accepting applications for grants through May 17th for community-based violence prevention programsSubmitLAWRENCE, Ind. -- The Lawrence Police Department (LPD) is investigating a shooting that left one person in critical condition.LPD said at 11:30 a.m. Friday, officers responded to a gas station on the 11000 block of Pendleton Pike on a report of a person shot.BRYAN, Texas (NewsNation Now) — A man opened fire Thursday at a Texas cabinet-making company where he worked, killing one person and wounding five others before shooting and seriously wounding a state trooper prior to his arrest, authorities said.Larry Winston Bollin, 27, of Iola, Texas, was booked into the Brazos County Detention Center in Bryan late Thursday, according to a Bryan Police Department statement. Jail records showed Bollin was charged with murder and being held on a $1 million bond. No attorney was listed for Bollin in the jail record.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department is investigating after a man was critically wounded in a shooting Thursday afternoon.The IMPD said the shooting happened in the 2400 block of North Sherman Drive just before 5 p.m. Thursday. When officers arrived, they found a man with injuries consistent with a gunshot wound. The man was transported to a local hospital in critical condition. His condition has since stabilized.Incident is connected to earlier shooting, police sayIncident is connected to earlier shooting, police saySign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Incident is connected to earlier shooting, police sayOne man was killed and four other people were hospitalized after a shooting in Stockton on Saturday night, police said.Benny Lott, 34, died at a hospital, police said Monday. Police identified the four other victims Sunday as a 31-year-old woman, a 39-year-old man, a 29-year-old woman and a 49-year-old man. Their conditions were not released Sunday morning.The shooting happened around 7:45 p.m. Saturday on Holiday Drive and March Lane, Stockton Police Department spokesperson Joe Silva said.The five people shot were attending a vigil for aman who was killed Wednesday in a shooting. The two shootings are connected and both are gang-related, Stockton police said.🚨Shooting at a vigil: Police say 5 people were shot at a vigil in Stockton along March Lane. A man was shot & killed at this same spot last Wednesday.pic.twitter.com/V2oI2KB9NsNo suspect has been caught or identified yet, Silva said.No other details were released.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Four people were shot in Wilmington on Saturday evening.Wilmington police are investigating the shooting at West 27th and Tatnall streets.A crowd of more than two dozen converged at the intersection after gunfire broke out. Some were residents who reported hearing five or six shots. Others followed the sound of police sirens to the scene.Police left six chalk circles on the street to indicate where they found shell casings.Also hit: a car parked on Tatnall Street and an ice box outside the corner store there.No one has been arrested.The four victims survived the shooting. A 15-year-old boy, a 21-year-old woman and a 21-year-old man were taken to a hospital for minor injuries. An 18-year-old man was hospitalized in serious but stable condition, according to Wilmington police.DELAWARE CRIME:Man with concealed carry permit opens fire at car of fleeing shoplifters at Concord Mall: PoliceMan posing as ride-sharing driver sexually assaulted 21-year-old woman near UD, police sayCity police taped off Tatnall Street between West 27th and West 29th streets. Police had the shot car towed away and searched for a bullet in a bag of ice from the cooler.The crowds looked on at the police work once the victims had been taken away in ambulances. Some laughed and joked, while others shook their heads dismayed by it all.Asked to describe what they heard and saw, they declined and eventually left the corner.On May 3, 2019, at approximately9:04 p.m.,the Dallas Police Department responded to a shooting at5475 Maple Springs Blvd.They discovered four Latin males had been shot inside Cherrywood Park when an unknown vehicle drove by and began shooting.  All four victims were struck by gunfire and transported to an area hospital.  Victim Alan Valdez, a Latin male 20-years-old, died from his injuries.  The other three victims have non-life-threatening injuries.  There are no suspects in custody.Anyone with information regarding this case is encouraged to contact Detective Tonya McDaniel at214-671-4236ortonya.mcdaniel@dallascityhall.com.Crime Stoppers Reward InformationCrime Stoppers will pay up to $5,000.00 for information called into Crime Stoppers that leads to the arrest and indictment for this felony offense and other felony offenses.  Call Crime Stoppers at: (214) 373 – TIPS, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.mgmgThe family of a 2-year-old boy shot outside a Southwest Baltimore corner shop embraced and praised the police officers who performed CPR on the child and rushed him to the hospital without waiting for an ambulance.But the boy’s grandfather on Tuesday also called Baltimore’s violence a “virus” — and said he planned to move his family out of the city.Markiyah Walker, 18, and her toddler son, Chase Meade, were on their way to get crabs when they were shot along with a1-year-old and two men outside the Busy Bee corner marketin Carrollton Ridge Friday night.“Those kids survived and I’m grateful, but I’m angry this happened to them,” said Walker’s father, Marvin Walker. “This was a wake-up call for me.”Walker, 39, said his daughter and grandson are in stable condition but remained in the hospital Tuesday. He said Chase faces an uphill battle to regain full use of his legs.Walker and his mother, Darlene McFadden, met with the officers who sped Chase to the hospital — Carlos Arias, Daisha Simms and Nicholas Yinger — and said they’re grateful for the officers’ effort.McFadden struggled to describe the toll the shooting has had on the family.“I’m overwhelmed. I’m done,” she said. “I’m drained. I really am drained.”Describing the shooting, police said unidentified assailants got out of a silver, mid-2000s model Honda Accord and opened fire at the intersection.Officer Simms said she was the first on the scene and performed CPR on Chase before Arias and Yinger assisted.Simms, who’s been with the department for three and a half years, said the scene was “chaotic.” She heard Markiyah Walker’s screams, fearful her son wouldn’t survive.It reminded her of a fire she’d responded to where two infants were taken from a building; despite efforts to resuscitate them, they ultimately died.When Simms began performing CPR on the 2-year-old Friday, she knew what was at stake.“I could not have lost another baby,” she said, adding that she would’ve “definitely” needed therapy had Chase died.Family, friends of victims try to pick up pieces after violent weekend in Baltimore; 2 more people shot MondayWith the child still alive and Arias and Yinger assisting, she said, the three took him to the hospital without waiting for a medic. “All of that goes out the window” when a child’s life is in danger, she said.Marvin Walker said he received a call from his mother Friday night telling him about the shooting, and he raced to the hospital. It pained him to see his grandson in the hospital bed, connected to tubes and machines.“The boy looks like he is in so much pain,” Walker said.Chase is normally a happy child, Walker said, but the struggles show in his face.“You can see it in his eyes. I can see that baby is not comfortable,” he said. “He doesn’t deserve this.”Walker said Chase had extensive internal bleeding and had to have a kidney removed. The boy may struggle to walk because of his injuries, Walker said.Markiyah Walker was shot in the back of the neck, which fractured her collar bone, he said. She is still in significant pain, but alert, he said.McFadden said the injured mom has not left her child’s side since stabilizing.The other victims, including a 1-year-old child, were taken to area hospitals and also were listed in stable condition, according to police.The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives Baltimore Field Division and Metro Crime Stoppers of Maryland have announced a reward of up to $15,000 for information about the shooting leading to an arrest and conviction. Police have announced no arrests.Carrollton Ridge residents said the violence is symptomatic of larger issues of poverty and neglect.Cynthia Tensley, president of the Carrollton Ridge Community Association, said the neighborhood has had two homicides this year, and the violence stems from regular drug-dealing there.“In certain areas of our community … they are very open and blatant about it, as if they are protecting their business with impunity,” she said.In a couple of instances, drug dealers have told double-parked drivers to move because they are hurting business, she said. Neighbors complain of drugs stashed in mailboxes and vacant houses. Others hesitate to call police because they fear retribution, even if they remain anonymous.“It’s like a war zone. You have people who think they can shoot without care,” she said.Tensley said the neighborhood has changed since she moved into her home in 1985. Some neighbors are making efforts to bring improvements, though, and she feels some optimism that new police Commissioner Michael Harrison can bring change.“We can only hope and pray,” she said.'They told us this before': Baltimore community disillusioned, fearful after violent weekendWalker has met with Mayor Bernard C. “Jack” Young and Harrison since the shooting, and theypromised to hold those involved responsible and to make the neighborhood safer, he said.But Walker said he cannot rely on the city’s leadership to keep his family safe.“I thank the police officers and appreciate the mayor for what he’s doing,” he said, but “it’s going to be a hard job to do.”He said he raised his daughter in Pigtown, but the family moved to Carrollton Ridge, which they thought was safer.Walker said he plans to work extra hours or find another job to afford to move out of the city.“The virus is just spreading. We have to get out of the city,” he said.“This has become Satan’s playground.”RecommendedFour people were injured in a shooting in East Baltimore early Friday morning, police said, leaving a crime scene that stretched several blocks.Officers responded to the 2500 block of E. Biddle St. around 2:30 a.m. for a Shot Spotter gunfire alert. They found two men and two women suffering from gunshot wounds at the scene, police said.A 36-year-old man was shot in both his legs; a 27-year-old woman was shot in her foot; a 22-year-old man was shot in his leg; and an 18-year-old woman was shot in her groin, according to police.The victims were transported to an area hospital for treatment.A preliminary investigation found that the suspects fled in a vehicle after the shooting, driving south onto the 800 block of N. Caroline St. The getaway car collided with another vehicle, causing the suspect’s car to flip, police said.Three suspects were taken into custody and are being interviewed by detectives, police said.As the sun came up Friday, police were still investigating a crime scene that stretched to the 800 block of Montford Ave., nearly a half-mile from where officers initially responded. Madison Street was closed for several hours before reopening just after 7 a.m.Citywide shooting detectives are investigating.Baltimore Sun photo editor Jerry Jackson contributed to this article.RecommendedInvestigation Update:At about 6:26 PM on Wednesday, May 1, 2019, officers assigned to District C-11 (Dorchester) responded to a radio call for shots fired in the area of 32 Windermere Road in Dorchester. On arrival, officers observed four adult male victims suffering from apparent gunshot wounds. Three of the males were transported to local hospitals with non-life-threatening injuries. One male victim was pronounced deceased on scene. The victim has since been identified asKevin Brewington, 33-years-old, of Allston.The Boston Police Department is actively reviewing the facts and circumstances surrounding this incident. Anyone with information is strongly urged to contact Boston Police Homicide Detectives at (617) 343-4470.Community members wishing to assist this investigation anonymously can do so by calling the CrimeStoppers Tip Line at 1 (800) 494-TIPS or by texting the word ‘TIP’ to CRIME (27463). The Boston Police Department will stringently guard and protect the identities of all those who wish to help this investigation in an anonymous manner.Powered bySquarespaceBIRMINGHAM, AL (WBRC) - Four people were shot outside an Ensley club early Sunday morning.Around 12:44 a.m., the West Precinct was called to the Ensley Volcano Night Club. Police had received reports of a drive-by shooting at the club.The officers located four gunshot victims. None of the injuries were life threatening. Authorities believe that the suspect was targeting a particular victim.Police do not currently have any suspects in custody. The suspect was seen driving a dark-colored vehicle.Chris Broadnax has office space in the area and says there are bars and some biker clubs in the area that should be blamed for the violence, not Volcano.“We want to make sure that people, your patrons, individuals that have interest in the area that are invested have the right information and when that’s conveyed wrong you have a concern about that," he said.Copyright 2019WBRC. All rights reserved.1720 Valley View DriveBirmingham, AL 35209(205) 322-6666A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Eight people were shot, leaving one dead, in West Baltimore Sunday evening as police say a man opened fire on a cookout.Baltimore Police Commissioner Michael Harrison said the gunman approached two cookouts at the corner of Edmondson and Whitmore avenues and began firing indiscriminately into the crowd, striking several men and women. Officers were called to the scene at 5:03 p.m., the department wrote in a news release.More: West Baltimore neighbors lament shooting at cookout that killed one, injured seven »Harrison said that one man ran toward the Perkins Square Baptist Church and later died. On May 1, police officials identified the victim who died as 28-year-old Derrell Briscoe. Six of the injured victims — a 58-year-old man, a 51-year-old man, a 30-year-old man, a 29-year-old man, a 27-year-old man and a 30-year-old woman — were taken to area hospitals with non-life threatening injuries.A police spokeswoman later said an eighth victim, an adult man, walked into a hospital with a gunshot wound to the leg.Harrison added there was evidence to suggest someone shot back, but officers were still piecing together the events."At this time suspect information and motive is unknown to investigators," police said in a release Sunday night.Police identified the shooter only as a black man. Officials made no reference to a suspected shooter being a white man in a white t-shirt and blue jeans, effectively contradicting the swirl of rumors that spread across social media following the shooting.While the shooting was near two churches — Perkins Square and Doswell Cathedral on Doswell Avenue — Harrison said the shooting did not have any connection to planned events at the two locations.Acting Mayor Bernard C. "Jack" Young again called on the city's residents to step up with any information they may have as to the suspect or motive behind the shooting."People know who's doing these shootings and who is targeting these people," Young said.Officers established a crime scene around the 2500 block of Edmondson Ave. in the city's Western District shortly after 5 p.m., a police spokeswoman said.At the crime scene, bullet casing were scattered on the ground near grills and a table with items that still appeared to be left over from the afternoon cookout.16-year-old girl, boy wounded in Northeast Baltimore shooting, police sayPeople peering out of their houses to look at the investigation were juxtaposed against the images of older residents in their Sunday best going to the nearby Doswell Cathedral.Harrison called the shooting "very cowardly" and said the shooting "appears to be extremely targeted."He added the department had "a very robust deployment strategy" this weekend and will continue to look for witnesses to speak because "many people were out here" during the shooting.RecommendedHAMILTON, Ohio – A  man accused of killing four members of his extended family collapsed in court MondayAt the Monday arraignment Gurpreet Singh, of West Chester, pled not guilty to the charges. Judge Gregory Howard denied bond and noted that Singh could face the death penalty.Singh’s attorney Charlie H  Rittgers asked for a reasonable bond, noting that Singh is a US citizen and has no prior criminal record.Singh collapsed after making his plea, as prosecutors and lawyers were discussing upcoming schedules with the judge. He fell to the floor and had to be helped by deputies, who helped him to a chair.The scheduling issue involves another celebrated trial Rittgers has coming up: the case of a teen charged with killing her newborn baby. The trial for Brooke Skylar Richardson is scheduled to begin Sept. 3 in neighboring Warren County.Rittgers said Singh collapsed again in the elevator but he declined the offer to be taken to the hospital.Rittgers said that he did not know why his client collapsed. He added that the turmoil of the charges and the death penalty may have been factors because Singh is healthy.He said his client had been informed in a visit on Friday that he had been indicted and that prosecutors were seeking the death penalty.Rittgers said after the arraignment that his client was “absolutely not guilty.”Gurpreet Singh, 37, was indicted on four counts of aggravated murder of his wife Shailenderjit Kaur, his father in law Haikikat Singh, 59, his mother in law Parmjit Kaur, 62, and her sister Amarjit Kaur, 58, which occurred in West Chester on April 28.Singh had made the initial 911 call and had told police that he found his family members “bleeding.” He was questioned as a witness, he was swabbed for DNA and photographed for bruises and scratches, the entire night and then released.A month later, he moved to Indiana to a house he had purchased a year ago.Singh was arrested in Branford, Connecticut on July 2, where he went to attend a wedding.  He was held in New Haven and Cheshire jails, until he was picked up by Ohio authorities on Thursday, August 1.Singh was booked into the Butler County Jail in the early morning hours of Friday. The grand jury indictments were made public eight hours later.Gurinder Hans, whose mother Amarjit was slain and who lives in Melbourne Australia, sent a message after watching video of Singh's collapse: “I wish my family could wake up like he get up. Bloody actor. Did you see the video, omg.  Hope jury will make his decision soon and give him death penalty.”Satinder Bharaj, the past president of the local Sikh temple in West Chester, said simply:  “Everyone is looking for justice to be served for the family.”The next pre-trial hearing is scheduled for Oct. 10 at 10 am in Judge Gregory Howard’s courtroom.Jackson police can't confirm that a man's shooting death on Saturday is related to the shooting of three other men nearby.The incident occurred in the 700 block of Monterey Street at around 8:30 p.m., according to Sgt. Roderick Holmes, a spokesman for the Jackson Police Department. Officers responded to the area regarding shots being fired. When they arrived, officers found a man lying in the driveway near a vehicle, suffering from multiple gunshot wounds. Charles Watson, 33, was later pronounced dead at the scene.Officers also located three additional shooting victims nearby. The men were transported to an area hospital with non life-threatening injuries. Investigators are working to gather information about what lead to the shootings, Holmes said. Charles Watson did not live at the residence where he was found dead.More:Jackson homicide map: 30 people killed in the first four months of 2019For the family of a girl hurt Saturday in thePoway synagogue shooting, the violence was not their first brush with anti-Semitism since moving to the United States from Israel in search of a safer life.The girl, identified as Noya Dahan, 8, of Mira Mesa, was hit with shrapnel in the face and leg when a gunman opened fire on worshipers at the synagogue, Chabad of Poway. Noya and two other people were hurt in the shooting, and a woman —Lori Gilbert-Kaye, 60, of Poway — was killed. Noya’s uncle was among those injured in the attack.The suspected shooter, a 19-year-old man authorities identified asJohn T. Earnestof Rancho Peñasquitos, was arrested Saturday after allegedly fleeing the synagogue in a hail of bullets fired by a U.S. Border Patrol agent working there as a security guard.Saturday’s shooting was not the first anti-Semitic crime against the Dahan family since moving to the U.S. from Israel in 2014. Their home in Mira Mesa was vandalized during the Passover holiday in April 2015, according to news reports at the time.Giant red swastikas were painted on the family’s garage door and the hood of their pickup around 11 p.m. April 5, 2015, according to the news reports.Noya’s father, Israel Dahan, told Fox 5 San Diego at the time that his family had moved from Israel to find a safer life, and that the vandalism had left them fearful.Recalling the vandalism and the shooting Sunday in an interview with an Israeli radio station, Israel Dahan said the crimes had not caused the family to regret its decision to move to the U.S., according to the New York Times.“We love America. ... It can happen anywhere — in any mall, and in any hospital and in any family gathering and in any place,” Dahan told the station, according to the article. “We are strong. We were born to be strong.”Noya’s injuries were not life-threatening, authorities said Sunday.Children light candles during the vigil to remember the death of Poway resident Lori Gilbert-Kaye.Rabbi Yisroel Goldstein, center, meets with members of the congregation of Chabad of Poway the day after a deadly shooting at the synagogue. Goldstein was shot and lost a finger on his right hand.A woman leaves flowers at small memorial near Chabad of Poway.Mourners attend a vigil at Rancho Bernardo Community Presbyterian Church in Poway.People mourn at a vigil at Rancho Bernardo Community Presbyterian Church in Poway.People attend a vigil at Rancho Bernardo Community Presbyterian Church in Poway.Police evacuate a cul de sac in San Diego’s community of Rancho Peñasquitos and surround a house related to the investigation of the synagogue shooting in Poway.Chabad of Poway members gather outside their synagogue after a man shot multiple people on Saturday, killing one.Police surround a house related to the investigation of the synagogue shooting in Poway.San Diego County Sheriff Bill Gore, center, discusses Saturday’s synagogue shooting.Members of the media and the surrounding community gather near the Altman Family Chabad Community Center in Poway after Saturday’s shooting at Chabad of Poway synagogue.President Trump speaks to the media about Saturday’s deadly shooting in the San Diego area.A sheriff’s deputy walks in front of the Altman Family Chabad Community Center in Poway.An FBI agent gives information to the media outside Chabad of Poway on Saturday.Jessica Parks, right, hugs Tina White outside Chabad of Poway synagogue.Morgan Cook writes for the San Diego Union Tribune.The perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Subscribers Are ReadingTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.CaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoveragePoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeThree children were found stabbed to death in a Reseda home, the LAPD says.CaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsA shooting in the Cypress Park neighborhood in northeast Los Angeles on Saturday evening left six people wounded, including one critically, authorities said.About 7:20 p.m., a person flagged down LAPD officers at the intersection of San Fernando Road and Merced Street to report a shooting. Police found three gunshot victims outside an automotive repair shop, said LAPD Sgt. David Armas of the Northeast Division.Initial reports said the shooting was on the 7000 block of San Fernando Road in the San Fernando Valley.A crowd formed and officers had to call for backup, Armas said. Police found two additional gunshot victims nearby. All five were taken to a hospital, Armas said. One of the victims was shot in the head and is in critical condition, two are in serious condition and two have sustained non-life-threatening injuries, LAFD spokeswoman Margaret Stewart said.Then a sixth victim, who had been shot in the stomach, was found, Armas said.Authorities believe the shooting is gang-related.Photos surfaced on social media of several people behind yellow police tape with their hands cuffed. Armas said that nobody has been arrested in connection with the shooting but that persons of interest are being questioned.'At least' five shot in Cypress Park attack. Witnesses said many people fled the scene and authorities think there could be more victims. At least two are in serious condition, one is critical and two have non-life threatening injuries.https://t.co/yrn0zl7Tbrpic.twitter.com/sDYutCNQKFFor more California breaking news, follow@AngelJennings. She can also be reached atangel.jennings@latimes.com.The perils of parenting through a pandemicWhat’s going on with school? What do kids need? Get 8 to 3, a newsletter dedicated to the questions that keep California families up at night.You may occasionally receive promotional content from the Los Angeles Times.Follow UsAs assistant managing editor for culture and talent, Angel Jennings oversees the Los Angeles Times’ Metpro and internship programs as well as works closely with HR and department heads to help manage a broad range of responsibilities, including tracking, recruiting, interviewing and selecting diverse candidates for job opportunities and advancing the company’s efforts to promote diversity, equity, inclusion and access. She also works across the newsroom on retention, training and career development efforts. Jennings previously worked as a reporter in Metro. She got her start in the Metpro program in 2011 and has since worked on assignments with many departments in the newsroom, including Metro, National, Calendar, Business and podcasts. She is a graduate of the University of Nebraska.Subscribers Are ReadingTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightTelevisionHe was half of ‘the most famous argument’ in reality-TV history. Time proved him rightIn 1992, original ‘Real World’ cast member Kevin Powell sparked vital conversations about race. It took 30 years, and a reunion, for many to listen.CaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandCaliforniaCal State L.A. now giving vaccines by appointment only after surge in demandAfter briefly allowing all adults to line up for COVID-19 shots, Cal State L.A. returns to requiring appointments.More CoveragePoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisPoliticsPoliticians dread the sting of #KHive, the fervent online fans of Kamala HarrisMembers of the #KHive respond with venom when they think someone has dismissed or insulted the vice president.MoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeMoviesKyoko Takenaka recorded racist things men said in bars. For many, it hit homeKyoko Takenaka’s short film ‘Home’ has gone viral on Instagram. It contains audio recordings of racist comments men made to Takenaka in bars.Coronavirus, Vaccines and PandemicCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCaliforniaMobile clinic to bring COVID-19 vaccine to Central American Indigenous L.A. residentsCIELO will host a mobile clinic to vaccinate Central American Indigenous L.A. residents against the coronavirus.CaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesCaliforniaFemale trio in Inland Empire charged with fraud over $1.2 million in COVID benefits to inmatesProsecutors charged three Inland Empire women in separate schemes in which they allegedly raked in a combined $1.2 million in COVID-related unemployment benefits using the names of California inmates.CaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaCaliforniaSchool reopenings in CaliforniaScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredScienceCOVID-19 vaccine questions answeredCOVID-19 vaccines are now being administered to healthcare workers in the U.S. What are your questions about the timeline, the safety or the science?Latest on vaccines and pandemicLatest on vaccines and pandemicCoronavirus and COVID-19 pandemic and health news.Latest CaliforniaCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeCaliforniaThree children found stabbed to death in Reseda homeThree children were found stabbed to death in a Reseda home, the LAPD says.CaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewCaliforniaLAPD rejecting most complaints against officers from summer protests; others still under reviewOf the 73 allegations of less serious force, 33 have been resolved by the department with zero resulting in a finding that officers were in the wrong.More CoverageCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasCaliforniaAsylum-seeking families are being expelled to Tijuana after flights from TexasMigrant families apprehended in Texas are being flown to San Diego and then bused to Tijuana, a city they do not know, without applying for asylum.California‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysCalifornia‘It’s alarming’: 4 gray whales found dead on Bay Area beaches in 9 daysThe whales spend the winter off Mexico’s waters, then they head back north and stay off the coast of California in spring and summer.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.CaliforniaEarthquake: Magnitude 3.4 quake reported near Santa Rosa, Calif.A magnitude 3.4 earthquake was reported Saturday at 7:13 a.m. Pacific time three miles from Santa Rosa, Calif., according to the USGS.Subscribe for unlimited accessFollow UsPHILADELPHIA (CBS) – A manhunt is underway following a quadruple shooting in Philadelphia’s Grays Ferry section. The shooting happened at around 10 p.m. Sunday on the 1500 block of South 31st Street.Police say a 23-year-old man and two teenage girls were all struck in the legs, and a 36-year-old woman was shot in the arm.Police found 11 spent shell casings at the scene.All of the victims are in stable condition.So far, no arrests have been made.After seven people were injured in a shooting in South Memphis Saturday evening, 26-year-old Olivia Johnson has been charged with four counts of aggravated assault, according to a Shelby County court record.Johnson admitted to firing eight shots after being identified in a police lineup by one of the victims, the affidavit says, noting a handgun was later found in Johnson's home. According to the court record, gunfire came from multiple parties.The condition of six of the victims was described as non-critical in information released by Memphis police on Twitter. They include a 16-year-old who was grazed by gunfire, according to police.The other victim remains in critical condition, Lt. Karen Rudolph told The Commercial Appeal Sunday morning."This reportedly stemmed from a fight involving multiple people," police said in a preliminary statement shared at approximately 6:45 pm Saturday, after officers first arrived to the scene on the 700 block of Chesnut Ave. Through Twitter, police later added, "It appears that the victims and suspect are known to each other."Sarah Macaraeg is an award-winning investigative reporter with The Commercial Appeal, where she writes features and covers the occasional Saturday shift. Macaraeg can be reached at sarah.macaraeg@commercialappeal.com or 901-426-4357. She is on Twitter@seramak.Four people were shot inside their vehicle Thursday evening on Interstate 264 when at least one person in another car opened fire, police say.The four people, three men and one woman in their late teens, were taken to the University of Louisville Hospital, said Louisville Metro Police spokeswoman Alicia Smiley. They're expected to survive their injuries.Officers responded to a report of a shooting about 8:20 p.m. on I-264 westbound near Bells Lane in the Park DuValle area.Top headlines:Abortion protester says she was assaulted at Louisville clinicSee also:Louisville doctor indicted on Medicaid fraud chargesAn unknown number of people driving westbound in a vehicle opened fire on the second vehicle, striking four people.The shooting, reported at mile marker 4, shut down all lanes of the interstate. I-264 was shut down for several hours at Cane Run Road, with traffic being diverted to Cane Run Road at exit 5, and reopened about 11 p.m. Thursday night.Smiley said as of 9:30 p.m. there had been no arrests and there were no suspects.Police ask anyone with information to call the anonymous police tipline at 502-574-LMPD.Reporter Matthew Glowicki can be reached at 502-582-4989 or mglowicki@courier-journal.com. Support strong local journalism by subscribing today:courier-journal.com/mattg.NORTHWEST MIAMI-DADE, FLA. (WSVN) - A man who allegedly killed two sisters and injured two other victims in a Northwest Miami-Dade shooting has been arrested.Twenty-year-old Drakar Smith appeared in bond court on Thursday morning after he allegedly opened fire at an apartment complex in the area of Northwest 60th Street and 19th Avenue on April 14.One man and three women were injured in thedrive-by shooting, but two of those women did not survive.Twenty-four-year-old Joanna Telusme and 27-year-old Stephaine Telusme were killed as they were getting ready to leave the apartment and go out with some friends.A community can now feel at ease after the suspected killer has been put behind bars.Smith was ordered to be held on no bond. He faces several charges including two counts of second-degree murder with a deadly weapon.Copyright 2021 Sunbeam Television Corp. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed.GET BREAKING NEWS IN YOUR BROWSER. CLICK HERE TO TURN ON NOTIFICATIONS.XTrending:A shooting early Sunday left one man dead and three others injured, Vallejo Police Department officials said.It is the fourth homicide in Vallejo this year, while there were five homicides in all of 2018.Sunday’s shooting occurred at about half past midnight, when four people where shot in the 100 block of Princeton Avenue.When officers arrived, they found a man with gunshot wounds who was pronounced dead at the scene, Sgt. Jeff Tai said.Three additional victims with gunshot wounds — a Pittsburg man and two Bay Area 17-year-old juveniles — “self-transported” to local hospitals for treatment and are expected to survive, Tai said.Those three people were not at the scene, when police arrived, he said.The scene was the site of a party at a residence, which all the victims attended, Tai said.“At this time we do not have much more information we are releasing,” Tai said. “We are working with the Solano County Coroner’s Office to positively identify the victim in this case, to make notification to the next of kin before releasing any victim information.”No arrests have yet been made, and police are asking anyone who may have been at the party or who may have any information in regards to this incident to call Detective C. Long (707) 648-4514 or Detective T. Schillinger (707) 648-4278.There were five homicides in all of 2018, including one in January and two in February, so by April of of last year, there were just two.This year, 20-year-old Arneal Jamari Austin, was found dead in his car in the 400 block of Corcoran Avenue on March 31, the victim of an apparent homicide.The fatal shooting of Jeveon Washington, 19, of Vallejo occurred on Feb. 16 in the 800 block of Curtola Parkway.These followed the officer-involved shooting on Feb. 9, of an unconscious local rapper Willy McCoy in the drive-thru lane of the Taco Bell restaurant on Admiral Callaghan Lane. The eatery has since been shuttered.Sign up for email newslettersSign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Police in Stockton are searching for the man responsible for shooting four men at a bar early Sunday morning.Just after 1:30 a.m., a man opened fire inside the El Tahur Bar on East Main Street, striking four people, according to Joe Silva, spokesman for the Stockton Police Department.The four victims were hospitalized for treatment. One victim is in critical condition, Silva said. The other three victims are expected to survive.It's unclear what led up to the shooting. Police were at the scene Sunday morning investigating.This is a developing story. Stay with KCRA 3 for the latest.Hearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Trending:Four people were shot at a business in Moreno Valley on Saturday, April 13, but all were expected to survive, the Riverside County Sheriff’s Department said.The shooting happened about 3:40 a.m. in the 23500 block of Alessandro Boulevard. The Sheriff’s Department did not identify the business. All victims, adults, were hospitalized, the Sheriff’s Department said. No one had been arrested as of Wednesday.“No further information is being released at this time to maintain the integrity of the investigation,” a spokesman said.The Sheriff’s Department did not put out a news release on the shooting but provided details to Southern California News Group in response to an inquiry on Wednesday.Detectives ask anyone with information on the shooting to call 951-247-8700.Get the latest news delivered daily!We invite you to use our commenting platform to engage in insightful conversations about issues in our community. Although we do not pre-screen comments, we reserve the right at all times to remove any information or materials that are unlawful, threatening, abusive, libelous, defamatory, obscene, vulgar, pornographic, profane, indecent or otherwise objectionable to us, and to disclose any information necessary to satisfy the law, regulation, or government request. We might permanently block any user who abuses these conditions.If you see comments that you find offensive, please use the “Flag as Inappropriate” feature by hovering over the right side of the post, and pulling down on the arrow that appears. Or, contact our editors by emailing moderator@scng.com.JACKSON COUNTY (WSIL) -- The man convicted of attempted murder in connection to a 2019 shooting outside of Tres Hombres, in Carbondale, has been sentenced to prison.Jody Pullen, Jr., 28, of Carbondale, was sentenced to a total of 84 years for attempt first-degree murder, multiple counts of aggravated battery with a firearm, and aggravated discharge of a firearm.He was found guilty back in November of 2019for for the April 12, 2019 shooting near the restaurant and ABC Liquors.Pullen was sitting in the store's drive-thru when an argument ensued. He then pulled a gun and started firing multiple shots.Four people were injured, including two innocent bystanders that were sitting in the beer garden at Tres Hombres.Jackson County State's Attorney Joseph Cervantez plans a press conference on Friday, Jan. 22 to address Pullen's sentencing.Jackson County State’s Attorney Joseph Cervantez explained that “every citizen should be able to live, work, and enjoy life in this community without the fear or threat from gun violence.” He went on to add that “the sentence for Pullen is not necessarily a win for anyone unless we use it as a reason to implement programs to deter similar behavior. Although our streets are safer with Pullen sentenced, we still have work to do.”State’s Attorney Cervantez explains that this is not just a neighborhood problem, this affects the entire community because absolutely no one is exempt from gun violence.He plans to work with law enforcement and community organizations in the upcoming weeks to discuss viable options for substantive programs that can be implemented in Jackson County. “Together, we will curb gun violence in Jackson County,” Cervantez said.Carbondale Police Department Interim Chief Stan Reno stated, “We must remember the victims in this senseless act of violence who suffered both physically and mentally.  I want to acknowledge the officers and detectives that responded to this dangerous in-progress event and their tireless work to bring the offenders to justice.  I am thankful for the support the community provided in this investigation, and I look forward to developing more partnerships to prevent any future violence in our community.  I am committed to providing the resources and support to make Carbondale a safe place to live and visit.”While heavy rain and storms have ended, hit & miss showers will remain possible through the morning and possibly even into the early…WSIL News 31416 Country Aire Dr.Carterville, IL 62918News Tips: (618) 985-2333ornews@wsiltv.comAccessibility ToolsMissing PersonPlease help Baltimore Police locate 28, year-old Janicua Wicks.Ms. Wicks was reported missing from the 2000 block of East Lanvale Street on March 24, 2021. She was last seen wearing a black coat, blue shirt with Maryland on the back, gray sweatpants and  black boots. She is 5’2” and weighs approximately 100lbs.If you know the whereabouts of Janicua Wicks, please contact Missing Person detectives at 443-984-7385, Eastern District detectives 410-396-2433 or 911.Northern District Shooting InvestigationOn April 9, 2021 at approximately 11:13 a.m., officers responded to an area hospital where a shooting victim had recently walked in and was seeking treatment.Upon arrival, officers located a 27 year-old male who was suffering from a non-life threatening gunshot wound to his left foot.The victim told officers he was walking on Cuthbert Avenue when he was approached by two suspects who opened fire on him.  The victim then caught a ride to the hospital.Northern District shooting detectives are asking anyone with information about this incident to call (410) 396-2355 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7lockup.--Northern District Shooting InvestigationOn April 9, 2021 at approximately 4:49 p.m., officers responded to the 2700 block of Reese Street for a shot spotter alert.Upon arrival, officers located a 29 year-old male who had been shot in the torso. He was transported to an area hospital suffering from non-life threatening gunshot wounds.The victim describes the suspect as a black male who was wearing a black jacket and  black ski-mask who fled towards Greenmount Avenue in a black SUV after the shooting.Anyone with information about this shooting is asked to call detectives at (410) 396-2455 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7lockup.REWARD - BPD is investigating a shooting that occurred Thursday April 8th in the 1700 Block of E. North Ave, where a 14 y/o female was shot. There is a reward of up to $4k for any tips that lead to an arrest and charges in this case.The Baltimore Police Academy is joiningInternational Assn of Directors of Law Enforcement Standards & Trainingas a research partner for the Academy Innovations Project. IADLEST offers additional services built to enhance and improve the framework of the training programs essential to the success of our nation’s law enforcement community. The Academy Innovations research project is designed to develop evidence-based training methods for law enforcement. This project will evaluate if the methods and timing of how training content is delivered improve knowledge and skill retention at the basic academy level.14 Year-Old Shot in the 1700 block of E. North AvenueBPD Recognizes SWD OfficersLast night, Police Commissioner Michael Harrison addressed the Southwest District Midnight Shift at roll call.At that time, he presented each of the members of the District’s Action Team with a Unit Citation.  The Southwest District Action Team is tasked with reducing violent crime in the Tri District area, and has done so in exemplary fashion by affecting 276 felony arrests, 65 handgun violations, seizing 72 firearms, affecting a total of 616 ar...rests, and executing 50 search and seizure warrants.Their enforcement efforts have led to a reduction of violent crime the Tri-District area and have resulted in federal prosecutions with the help of the ATF of several repeat violent offenders.Additionally, Commissioner Harrison presented Sgt. Sedgwick, Police Officers Tahir, Plummer, Paul, Rosier, and Russell with the Bronze Stars.  Police Officers Connors and Augustin were presented with the Commendation Awards.In April of 2019, these officers responded to two rapes that occurred in the 300 block of Lyndhurst Street and in the 500 block of N. Hilton Street. These officers were able to track and trap the common rape suspect in the woods in the 500 block of N. Hilton Street.  They arrested the 32 year-old suspect, who was interviewed and ultimately gave a confession as to his involvement in the above mentioned sex offenses.It was due to the coordination and quick response of these Southwest District Patrol Officers, that this suspect was apprehended.  This is a great example of how teamwork, bravery, and the proper utilization of resources can have a maximum effect on the ongoing pursuit of justice for the citizens of Baltimore.Western District Homicide InvestigationOn April 8, 2021 at approximately 8:52 p.m., officers were in the 800 block of W. Lexington Street when they heard discharging.While canvassing the area, the officers were dispatched to a courtyard in the 800 block of W. Lexington Street where they found a 25 year-old male who had been shot in the head.GET VAXXED.Everyone 16 & over can now pre-register.COVAX.BaltimoreCity.govVisitCoronavirus.BaltimoreCity.govfor updated info.#BaltimoreHealthDepartment#BaltHealthDept#HealthyBaltimore#BmoreHealthy#BALTIMOREvsCOVID#BaltimoreversusCOVID#CoronavirusBalt#CoronavirusBaltimoreApril is National Child Abuse Prevention Month. Recognize the signs of child abuse.  If you see something, say something. Keeping children safe is everyone’s responsibility and it starts by investing in support systems for families.Baltimore City Child Care Resource Center#ChildAbusePreventionMonth#ThrivingFamiliesCentral District Shooting InvestigationOn April 7, 2021, at approximately 2:09 a.m., Central District patrol officers responded to an area hospital in reference to a walk-in shooting victim.Once at the location, officers located an adult male suffering from  apparent gunshot wounds.Preliminary investigation revealed that the victim was possibly shot while in the 400 block of East Baltimore Street.Central District detectives are asking anyone with information to contact them at 410-396-2411 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.Guns and Drugs Seized, Suspects ArrestedOver the past 24 hours, our officers and detectives have seized the below pictured guns and drugs and have arrested 5 suspects for these infractions.Baltimore Police are still working hard to bring criminals to justice.If you see or know of individuals who are participating in illegal activities, especially those who are armed with illegal fire arms, call the police.Non-Fatal Shooting ArrestIn reference to the shooting that occurred on March 26, 2021, in the 800 block of Carroll Street, investigators have arrested 36 year-old Deandre Whitehead of Owings Mills, Maryland.On that date, Whitehead shot a 34 year-old man in the leg after an argument escalated to gunfire.Deandre Whitehead was transported to Central Booking Intake Facility where he has been charged with Attempted 1st Degree Murder.Currently, Whitehead is waiting to see a court commissionerSouthern District Shooting InvestigationOn March 26, 2021, at approximately 11:23 p.m., a Southern District officer heard gunfire in the area she was patrolling.  After a brief canvass of the area, a 34 year-old male suffering from a gunshot wound to the leg was discovered in the rear alley of the 800 block of Carroll Street.The victim was transported to an area hospital for treatment. Southern District detectives responded and assumed control over the investigation.Anyone with information is urged to contact Southern District detectives, at 410-396-2499.Those who wish to remain anonymous can utilize the Metro Crime Stoppers tip line, at 1-866-7LOCKUP.  You can also submit an anonymous online text-tip to Metro Crime Stoppers by visiting the MCS website.Northeast District Homicide ArrestIn reference to the shooting death of 49 year-old Frankye Duckett that occurred on January 29, 2021, in the 4400 block of Moravia Road, Warrant Apprehension detectives along with The U.S. Marshals and Florence County Sheriff’s Office, have arrested  33 year-old Marquis Poteat of Baltimore.Poteat was arrested while in Florence, South Carolina, with the help of the Carolinas Regional Fugitive Task Force. He is currently being held in a Floren...ce County jail while he awaits extradition back to Baltimore later this month.Upon his return to Baltimore, Marquis Poteat will be charged with 1st and 2nd Degree Murder, 1st and 2nd Degree Assault, and various firearms violations.“I want to thank the members of our Warrant Apprehension Task Force, and our law enforcement partners at the U.S. Marshal’s Office and the Florence Count Sheriff’s Office in working diligently and aggressively to apprehend Poteat,’’ said Commissioner Michael Harrison. “Poteat senselessly took the life of MTA Mobility Bus Driver Frankye Duckett and I am committed to working alongside the State’s Attorney Office to ensure justice is served in this case.”“I am thankful for the diligent work of Baltimore Police Department in apprehending a suspect in the callous murder of MTA Mobility Bus Driver Frankye Duckett,” said Mayor Brandon M. Scott. “This widespread effort between the U.S. Marshal’s Office and the Florence County Sheriff’s Office reflects the all-hands-on-deck approach that is required to tackle violent crime and bring justice to grieving families.”_________________Northeast District Homicide InvestigationOn January 29, 2021, at approximately 5:35 p.m., Northeast District patrol officers responded to the 4400 block of Moravia Road in reference to a shooting.Once at the location, officers located a 49 year-old male suffering from gunshot wounds to the body.The victim was transported to an area hospital where he later died.Preliminary investigation reveals that the victim, an MTA Mobility van driver, was seated inside of his vehicle when he was approached by an unidentified black male that produced a handgun and shot the victim.The suspect(s) then fled the location in a tan or beige colored Ford Crown Victoria or a Lincoln Grand Marquee.Homicide detectives are asking anyone with information to contact them at 410-396-2100 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.Suspect Identity SoughtIn reference to four commercial robberies and attempted commercial robberies that occurred between February 27-March 3, 2021, in the 3500 block of Boston Street , detectives need your help in identifying the suspect seen in these pictures.The suspect is described as a light skinned black male who stands 5’9”- 5’11” tall and looks to be in his late 20’s to mid 30’s.In each case, the suspect is wearing a black mask with a yellow logo. The suspect has been known to request a pen and paper to write a note, announcing the robbery.If you have any information on the identify of this suspect, please contact Citywide Robbery detectives at 410-366-6341 or 911.Investigation UpdateThe shooting that occurred on April 6, 2021, at approximately 11:00 p.m, in the 1900 block of Wilhelm Street has been upgraded to a homicide.Tragically, the 27 year-old male victim succumbed to his injuries on April 8, 2021, at an area hospital. The victim’s identification is pending next of kin notification.////////////Southern District Shooting InvestigationOn April 6, 2021, at approximately 11:00 p.m., Southern District patrol officers responded to the 1900 block of Wilhelm Street for a report of a shooting.Once at the location, officers located an adult male suffering from an apparent gunshot wound.The victim was transported to an area hospital where his condition is unknown.Due to the victim’s injuries, Homicide detectives have been notified.Anyone with information is asked to contact detectives at 410-396-2499 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.--Central District Shooting InvestigationOn April 6, 2021, at approximately 2:20 a.m., patrol officers responded to an area hospital for a report of a walk-in shooting victim.Once at the location, officers located an adult male suffering from apparent gunshot wounds.Preliminary investigation revealed that the victim was in the unit block of West North Avenue when he was shot by an unidentified suspect.Central District shooting detectives are asking anyone with information to contact them at 410-396-2411 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.16 year-old Arrested for MurderOn April 2, 2021, at approximately 5:00 a.m., a Southeast District officer observed an assault in the 100 block of North Conkling Street.  As the officer approached the block, three suspects involved in the incident entered a blue sedan and sped away.While speeding away, the driver struck the assault victim with the sedan. The victim was dragged several blocks causing severe injuries.The driver of the sedan subsequently crashed into another vehicle and then bailed out, attempting to elude police on foot.  After a brief foot chase, the suspect was apprehended.Tragically, the victim later identified as 41 year-old Fabian Mendez was transported to Johns Hopkins Hospital and pronounced dead by medical personnel shortly after arrival.  Investigators learned that Mr. Fabian was the registered owner of the blue sedan driven by the suspect.The 16 year-old suspect told investigators that he carjacked Mr. Fabian and then struck him  with the sedan.  After confessing his crimes, the suspect was criminally charged, remains in custody, and is awaiting trial.Southwest District Shooting InvestigationOn April 5, 2021 at approximately 10:54 p.m., officers responded to the 4600 block of Emondson Avenue for a shooting.Upon arrival, officers located an unidentified male who was suffering from a gunshot wound to the head.The victim is in critical condition at an area hospital.  Due to the seriousness of the victim’s condition, homicide detectives were summoned and are investigating this incident.Anyone with information about this shooting is asked to call detectives at (410) 396-2100 or call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-lockup.--Northern District Homicide InvestigationOn April 5, 2021, at approximately 2:01 p.m., Northern District patrol officers responded to the 2800 block of Edgecombe Circle for a report of a shooting.Upon arrival, officers located an unresponsive adult male suffering from apparent gunshot wounds.  This victim was located inside the apartment in the block.The victim was transported to an area hospital where he was pronounced deceased at 2:31 p.m.Homicide detectives are asking anyone with information to contact them at (410) 396-2100 or Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7Lockup.--Eastern District Homicide InvestigationOn April 5, 2021 at approximately 2:41 p.m., officers responded to the 1000 block of N. Broadway for a shooting.Upon arrival, officers located an adult male who was suffering from gunshot wounds.Baltimore City medics responded an pronounced the victim deceased at the scene.Homicide detectives have assumed control of the investigation and are asking anyone with information to call (410) 396-2100.Anyone wishing to remain anonymous can call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7lockup.--Central District Shooting InvestigationOn April 5, 2021, at approximately 1:11 a.m., Central District officers were dispatched to the 300 block of North Eutaw Street to investigate a reported shooting.Officers arrived at the location and observed a 47-year-old black male victim, a 39-year-old black male victim, a 38-year-old black male victim, a 61-year-old black male victim, and a 37-year-old black male victim suffering from multiple gunshot wounds.Medics transported all victims to an area hospital. One victim is currently in critical but stable condition, the other four victims have non-life-threatening injuries.Central District Shooting detectives responded to the scene and assumed control over the investigation. Anyone with information is urged to contact Central District Shooting detectives, at 410-396-2411.Those who wish to remain anonymous can utilize the Metro Crime Stoppers tip-line at 1-866-7LOCK-UP. You can also anonymously text a tip by visiting the MCS of Maryland website.Officer Figueroa working in the community in our Carrollton Ridge neighborhood!#communityBPD wishes you and your family a safe and blessed EasterCoroner's officials Sunday released the name of a 55-year-old Los Angeles resident who was killed in a shooting in the Broadway-Manchester area, near the route where thousands had earlier lined streets for the funeral procession of slain rapper Nipsey Hussle.The victim was identified as Glenn Mitchell, according to the Los Angeles County coroner's office.The shooting occurred about 6:25 p.m. Thursday in the area of 103rd and Main streets, according to Los Angeles Police Department Officer Jeff Lee.Top news of the dayMitchell and three other shooting victims were taken to a hospital, Lee said. The extent of the wounded victims' injuries were not immediately available.LAPD Chief Michel Moore had tweeted that the victims were three men and one woman between 30 and 50 years old and that one of them had died."In the midst of this procession we have a multi-4 Shooting at 103 St and Main St.," he tweeted, adding, "Suspects in a gray Hyundai opened fire on the victims.""We must stop this senseless violence," Moore tweeted.Although the procession had passed near the shooting scene, it was not in the area when the shooting occurred, police said.Last week, 29-year-old Eric Ronald Holder Jr., an aspiring rapper and acquaintance of Hussle, pleaded not guilty to one count each of murder and possession of a firearm by a felon, along with two counts of attempted murder.A Phoenix man convicted of killing his wife, two daughters and a man in 2019 was sentenced on Tuesday to life in prison.Austin Smith, 30, took a plea deal for four counts of first-degree murder, attempted murder and aggravated assault, according to Maricopa County Superior Court spokesperson Clara Colmenero.The killing spree began on the night of April 11 at a home in the 7100 block of West Minnezona Avenue, when Smith confronted his wife after she arrived home from a bar.Smith suspected his wife, Dasia Patterson, 29, was having an affair. She denied it, but Smith "shot her because he believed God told him to do so," records show.According to court records, Smith believed his Nasha Smith, 5, had "exhibited bad behavior" against God's law, so he laid her on top of his wife's body and then shot the girl in the back of the head.Smith then beat his daughter Mayan Smith, 7, to death for crying, records show.He drove to his brother's apartment near Indian School Road and 39th Avenue, and made contact with a family friend, confronting the man with the belief that his brother was involved in an affair with his wife, records revealed.Smith then shot and killed the friend, identified as Ron Freeman, 46. Police say Smith shot and wounded two other people, a man and a woman, who tried to help Freeman.Police arrested Smith a short time later as he was driving near 67th Avenue and Osborn Road.Just five months before the killings, Smith had been referred by Phoenix police for psychiatric care, had his guns taken away and later got them back. Police had been called to his residence in reference to a report that he was yelling that people were trying to kill him.FOX 2by:Tribune MediaKANSAS CITY, Mo. – Lamar Sharp was visiting a family friend whengunshots rang out.Relatives said Lamar stopped by his childhood babysitter’s home in Kansas City April 9. He checked on the woman once a week.That day, a huge crowd gathered next door at the woman’s son’s home for a picnic.Then, bullets started flying. Police said several men walked down the street, fired shots at the crowd and then ran. The motive is still unknown.“And everybody just ran into the home,” says Charlotte Barner, Lamar Sharp’s mother.But not Lamar.“He just ran towards the baby, and that’s when he was shot,” Barner said.He was shot three times, including twice in his head, while running to save his friend’s 2-year-old great-grandson who was all alone on the front lawn.“Just trying to save a baby, and that was his instincts. When it comes to kids, he’s always been a protector,” Barner said.Sharp, father of a 13-year-old girl,  died five days before his 32nd birthday.“It’s just sad and unbelievable. It’s been very devastating. I haven’t been able to go back to work. I mean I can’t work a full day. I live in Grand Rapids, Michigan, and to get that phone call — it’s just so hard on me,” Barner said.Sharp’s ability to look out for others wasn’t stifled by his death; he was able to give the gift of life.“I’ve learned a 50-year-old man got his liver. A middle-aged female got one of his kidneys. I am so proud of him. I didn’t even know he was an organ donor. He’s a hero. He’s always been my hero at heart,” Barner said.Sharp’s funeral will be held Saturday.SubmitFRANKLIN COUNTY, Mo. – The Missouri State Highway Patrol reports a fatal accident involving a pick up truck and a motorcycle on westbound Missouri 30 near Route K in Franklin County.Troopers say the driver of a pickup truck was traveling eastbound when he made a left turn and traveled into the path of the motorcycle traveling westbound.ST. LOUIS - St. Louis police officers report two homicides late Friday into early Saturday morning.The first shooting happened at around 9:15 p.m. Friday at 4900 Claxton. Police say a male victim of a shooting arrived at an area hospital where he was pronounced dead.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.In addition, he said, there were 7 people transported with injuries to local hospitals and multiple people were treated at the scene.FOX 2 and KPLR 11 in St. Louis cover the news in Missouri and Illinois. There are over 68 hours of live news and local programming on-air each week.Our website and live video streams operate 24/7.Download our apps for alertsand follow us on social media for updates in your feed.President Harry Truman said: “It is amazing what you can accomplish if you do not care who gets the credit.” That spirit is alive and well at Fox 2. Our teamwork is on display each and every day.Our news slogan is: “Coverage You Can Count On.” We quite frankly are too busy to worry about who gets the credit. Our main concern is serving the viewer.We go where the stories take us. Whether it be Washington, D.C when aBelleville manopened fire during a congressional baseball game practiceor to Puerto Rico where local Ameren crews restored power after more than 5 months in the dark.Coverage You Can Count On means “Waking up your Day” with our top-rated morning show. From 4:00 am-10:00 am we are leading the way with breaking news.But our early morning crew also knows how to have some fun! Our strong commitment to the communities we serve is highlighted with our Friday neighborhood shows.Our investigative unit consists of three reporters.Elliott Davisfocuses on government waste,Chris Hayesis our investigative reporter, andMike Colombo is our consumer reporter. They work in unison with the news department by sharing resources and ideas.We continue to cover breaking news aggressively and relied on our seasoned journalists to make a difference with the stories we covered. The shooting of Arnold PoliceOfficer Ryan O’Connoris just one example of that.Jasmine Hudawas the only reporter who hadexclusive access to the O’Connor family during his amazing rehabilitation in Colorado.Last, but certainly not least,FOX 2 and KPLR 11 are committed to covering local politics. We host debates among candidates and have the most extensive presidential election coverage. Our commitment to politics isn’t just during an election year.We produce two political shows that air every weekend.Winston-Salem police arrested a man Tuesday in relation to a shooting which left six people injured, back in April 2019.Police recently arrested Bernard Boyd.While searching his home, investigators found a combination of almost 44 grams of both powder and crack cocaine, a small amount of suspected fentanyl and a gun.Detectives said Boyd was remanded to federal custody as a result of the federal indictment.Investigators said additional state charges for trafficking cocaine, possession of firearm by a felon and possession of marijuana will be forthcoming.Police found three people with gunshot wounds in front of Club Nova, back in April 2019, according to investigators.Investigators said the three people were taken to the hospital.Officers later found out three more people went to the hospital with gunshot wounds.WFMY previously reported, all six were shot while on the 500 block of North Cherry Street, and had non-life-threatening injuries, according to police.RELATED:Six Hurt in Shooting Outside Winston-Salem Bar: PoliceDetectives said a seventh person told officers her car was shot at while she was trying to leave the scene.Police said the woman wasn't hurt and the 500 block of North Cherry Street was closed for about four hours as officers investigated.WFMY reported police believe a fight led to the shooting, back in 2019.Police said Boyd was charged with possession of firearm by felon, discharging a firearm within the city limits and possession of heroin in the State of North Carolina as a result of the shooting, late April 2019.Investigators said Boyd initially received no bond allowed on the charges; however, was later released on a $18,000 secured bond for all three charges late April as well.If you have any information about the incident, contact Crime Stoppers at (336) 773-7700.OTHER STORIESStay connected to local, national, and breaking news: Download the WFMY News 2 app.►Text the word APP to 336-379-5775►DOWNLOAD FOR IPHONE HERE►DOWNLOAD FOR ANDROID HERENotifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.Fox 59by:Jesse WellsUPDATE (December 30, 2019):The Marion County Coroner has ruled the cause and manner of the death at 1000 N. Tuxedo as “undetermined” and has been removed from the 2019 homicide count.Original Story (April  8, 2019):INDIANAPOLIS, Ind. — A half dozen Indianapolis families grieving following a deadly weekend. Starting at 9:30 p.m. Saturday night, six people were shot and killed over just 24 hours.Police first found aman with gunshot woundslying in the middle of Bellefontaine Street. That victim was identified as 31-year-old Theron Rowley.Ninety minutes later, 19-year-old Ezekiel Summers died after being shot near anapartment complex on Twin Oaks Drivewhile visiting friends.Early Sunday morning, five people were hit by gunfire at a“motorcycle club hangout” on Roosevelt Ave.John Boxley, 76, and Yolanda Bailey, 42, died.“We’re going through disbelief and shock,” said Bailey’s cousin Caprice Love. “It’s really hard.”Caprice says her cousin leaves behind five kids, the youngest just started Pre-k.“There’s five boys without their mom. They will never able to see their mom,” said Love. “It’s unbelievable that people have hearts that cold to do the things that have been going on in our city here lately.”The violence didn’t stop there. On Sunday afternoon, someone shot and killed 17-year-old Leandre Lane walking on a sidewalk near34thStreet and Franklin Road.Tony Mason became the last of the six victims when just after sunset the 21-year-old was shot to death on Indy’s near east sidein the 1000 block of North Tuxedo.“It’s out of control. It’s been out of control and they need to do something,” said Love.“We feel like we got hit in the mouth this weekend,” said IMPD chief Bryan Roach.According to IMPD’s numbers, the six killings brought the total number of homicides this year to 42. Last year on the same date there were 39 homicides before the city went on to break it’s murder record.“This is as big a blow to the police department as it is to the community,” said Roach.Still, despite the violent start to the year, the police chief had a message of hope for everyone in the circle city.“This is a safe city there are good people working non-stop,” said Roach. “I don’t want the city and all the people doing good things to be discouraged.”Police say they need the public’s help to make arrests in these cases. As always anyone is asked to contact Crime Stoppers at 317-262-TIPS (8477).SubmitINDIANAPOLIS -- The Marion County Public Health Department is hosting a pop-up vaccine clinic at an Indianapolis Church Saturday and Sunday.The clinic is taking place at Light of the World Church, located at 4646 N. Michigan Road. Fresh fruits and vegetables including apples, bananas, green peppers, cabbage, onions, white potatoes, carrots, and tomatoes will be provided for free to individuals who receive a vaccine at the clinic.INDIANAPOLIS — The Indiana State Department of Health (ISDH) reported 27,036 additional Hoosiers are now fully vaccinated as of Saturday.To date, 1,984,879 first doses of the two-dose vaccine have been administered and 1,379,399 individuals are fully vaccinated.HENDRICKS COUNTY, Ind. -- Indiana Conservation Officers are investigating after a man died in an Off-Road Vehicle crash Friday night.The Indiana Department of Natural Resources said the crash happened around 10 p.m. Friday in the 7300 block of West U.S. 36 near  Danville. When responders arrived, they found 20-year-old Chase Lynch unresponsive. He was transported to an Indianapolis hospital where he died.Mayor Mike Purzycki called for an end to "reckless behavior" in Wilmington the day after six young men were shot – the most injured at one shooting in the city in recent memory."This is the type of incident that you hope will be solved through trust and cooperation between the police and community," Purzycki said. "We need to stop this type of reckless behavior and together, I know we can."The mayor's statement said it was a complex case and "lots of people are working on it."The statement came after an initial period of silence from the city's top officials, including police Chief Robert Tracy and Wilmington City Council president Hanifa Shabazz.Around 5:30 Monday, the Mayor's Office released a second statement in which Purzycki and Tracy announced that the corner store at North Pine and E. 10th streets, near where the shooting occurred, had been ordered closed as a public safety precaution.The owner of Bill’s Deli Market at 940 North Pine Street was notified a short while ago to close the store immediately, the statement read.Purzycki said the city code allows the police chief to order the closure of a property when there is concern about a matter of public safety.“As this investigation continues," Tracy said in the statement, "I have determined that it’s in the best interest of citizens in the immediate area to close this business to protect customers and area residents. I will meet with the property owner to discuss developing a plan for improved public safety."According to the City’s Licenses and Inspections Department, the store has been cited at least eight times in the past few years for improper licensing, state health code violations, improperly placed trash and storing junk and debris, as well as the need to repair exterior masonry and windows, the staement said.None of the violations resulted in the accumulation of enough points to take action against the deli as a nuisance property under city law.Gunfire rang out about 7:10 p.m. Sunday near the corner of 10th and Pine streets in the city's East Side neighborhood.Tiffany Brown was sitting on a West 10th Street stoop when she heard at least seven gunshots around the corner on North Pine Street.“Everybody heard the shots. It was like pop, pop, pop,” she said.She saw young men scatter, running away down the streets.“They were all just boys,” Brown said.She saw some of the victims go into the market at the intersection.Brown called 911, and police arrived quickly.Warning:The following Instagram video contains explicit language and content. It shows a tourniquet being applied to an apparent gunshot victim after the shooting in Wilmington Sunday night.Six victims, four in their teens, were taken to local hospitals and were listed in stable condition as of 9:45 p.m. Sunday.Susie Grimes, who heard the gunshots from her home blocks away on 10th Street, was not surprised by the lack of official statements on Monday."Nobody is going to acknowledge the problems there," she said. "Because if you know it exists, why aren't you doing anything about it?"Grimes said she hasn't noticed a drop in crime in the area, as the city officials have pointed to."I don't know what world they live in," she said.Other residents, such as Alycia Peay, echoed her thoughts."Why is Market Street a priority?" She asked. "There are bigger problems in the city."Peay's 1-year-old son was playing in front of a rowhome at the time of the shooting. She is a new mother and doesn't want her child exposed to gun violence."I don't feel comfortable here," she said.Another mom, Latonya Roane, is ready to pack her bags after Sunday's shootout.She had just come home with her children and their friends from the park when the shooting began in front of her home. Roane hit the ground and laid on top of the children. She has lived on West Tenth Street for two and a half years and witnessed three shootings."I'm terrified," Roane said. "I don't get no sleep. I'm so done. I'm so over it."Jaron Johnson, an East Side community activist, said he is disappointed because even with all the work residents are putting into the neighborhood, shootings still happen."It's all these people, I don't know where they come from, but they congregate on that corner," Johnson said. "It's the drug artery of the East Side."A lifelong East Sider, Johnson said most of the victims were not familiar, and strangers to the residents.Wilmington has not experienced a shooting with this many victims since 2012. Five people were shot and three killed on July 8, 2012, at a soccer tournament in Eden Park.During that incident, two men with guns approached the crowd and one fired several shots at Herman Curry, the tourney's founder, police said. Curry's family told The News Journal that he was a potential witness for the state in its murder case against one of the suspects, Otis Phillips.Spectators then opened fire on the gunmen, inciting a spray of bullets that left nearly 50 shell casings strewn around the field and parking lot.Curry, 47, died, along with 16-year-old Alexander Kamara, who was waiting to play his soccer match, and suspect 43-year-old Sheldon Ogle, who drove the getaway car.Suspect Jeffery Phillips was struck in the leg, and a 33-year-old Baltimore man was hit in the shoulder.SHOOTOUT:Death penalty, life in prison in Eden Park shootoutWilmington police on Monday released the ages of the six people shot near 10th and Pine streets.The injured were a 17-year-old boy and five men, according to Wilmington Police Department spokesman David Karas. Three of the men are 19, one is 26 and one is 30.All but the 17-year-old and the 30-year-old have been released from the hospital, Karas said. Those two are in stable condition.No other information about the incident was released Monday, including whether there is any threat to the public."We are grateful that there were not more serious injuries," the mayor said in a statement. "Chief Tracy and his team are investigating this incident and will release more information when additional facts become known."Anyone with information can contact Detective Kane at (302) 576-3961.This marks the 21st shooting Wilmington police have responded to this year, according to The News Journal's database. Eight people have been killed in 2019.WHAT IS KNOWN:6 shot in WilmingtonWilmington violence:Residents react to 6 shot: City needs to do more for its kidsA 17-year-old Shreveport male will be prosecuted as an adult in connection to an April shooting that injured four, including children ages 11 and 13, the Caddo District Attorney's Office announced Wednesday afternoon.Timothy D. Owens Jr., will be tried before Caddo Parish District Judge John D. Mosley Jr., in relation to the attempted slayings, according to a news release."Due to there being multiple victims of the attack, the teen could be tried for attempted first-degree murder, facing up to 50 years in prison if and when convicted," according to a news release.The shooting occurred onApril 7 at a mobile home park, located in the 400 block of Flournoy Lucas Road,where three juveniles and one adult were injured.The victims included three females — ages 11, 13, and 19 — and one 17-year-old male.Owens will be prosecuted under a provision of the state children's code that allows the district attorney to seek jurisdiction of juvenile offenders aged 15 or older, and are charged with a number of offenses; including attempted first-degree murder, attempted second-degree murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, aggravated burglary, forcible or second-degree rape and simple or third-degree rape, per Wednesday's news release.Jonathan Rogers, 19, also faces one count of attempted second-degree murder in relation to the crime.He is set to appear in court on July 23 for arguments and hearings.Rogers was previouslycharged in late Februaryin connection to the second-degree murder of24-year-old Tevin Washington.Washington was shot while driving a vehicle in the 900 block of Babylon Street in mid-December 2018.MORE IN CRIME BEAT:Emily Enfinger is the breaking news reporter for The Shreveport Times, covering crime and court. Follow her on Twitter at@EmilyEnfinger. To email,click here.April 6, 2019TALLAHASSEE, Fla. (WCTV) – The Tallahassee Police Department is currently investigating a shooting near the intersection of Kissimmee Street and Wahnish Way.Around 2:30 a.m. Saturday, officers were notified of the shooting and responded to the area. Arriving officers and emergency personnel discovered four people suffering from gunshot wounds.All of the victims were transported to a local hospital with non-life threatening injuries to their lower bodies. Three of them have since been released from the hospital.Florida A&M University confirms three of the victims are students, and the fourth victim is dual enrolled at FAMU and Florida State University.The police department says a disagreement at a house party led up to the shooting.TPD is working with FAMU’s Campus Safety and Security to obtain additional information that may lead to an arrest.Investigators are asking anyone with information about the case to please call them at (850) 891-4200. If you wish to remain anonymous, please call Crime Stoppers at (850) 574-TIPS.Filed under:At least six people were wounded, including an 8-year-old boy and a 10-year-old girl, in a shooting Saturday evening on the South Side that happened while a family was celebrating the upcoming birth of a child.Gunfire erupted at 6:21 p.m. at a gathering in the 6300 block of South Seeley in the Englewood neighborhood, according to Chicago police. Two men in dark clothing approached the family gathering and opened fire before fleeing on foot, police said.Both children were taken to Comer Children’s Hospital where their conditions are critical but stable, authorities said. The boy was struck in his back and chest, and the girl was shot in her shin, police said.A 29-year-old woman was shot in her shoulder and chest, while a 42-year-old man was shot twice in his hip, police said. They were taken to Christ Medical Center in Oak Lawn, where the woman was in critical condition, and the man’s condition was stabilized.The gunfire also hit a 23-year-old man in his foot and a 28-year-old man in the shoulder, police said. They were both taken to Holy Cross Hospital, where their conditions were stabilized. The older man was later transferred to Mount Sinai Hospital.Witnesses were not cooperating with investigators, but based on the victim’s profiles police believe the shooting may have been in retaliation from an earlier incident in the neighborhood, police spokesman Anthony Guglielmi said. Detectives were reviewing footage from nearby surveillance cameras but had little physical evidence to work with at the scene.The family was celebrating the upcoming birth of a child, authorities said.The mother and grandmother of the wounded 8-year-old boy were seen waiting outside Comer, both of them visibly distressed. The mother, whose shirt was stained with blood, was crying out for her child.“He’s just a baby, he’s just a baby,” the mother said, as tears flowed down her face.The grandmother told reporters the boy was in surgery.Meanwhile, in another shooting, a 13-year-old boy was seriously wounded about 8:20 p.m. in the 1200 block of West 73rd. Two males ran out of a vacant lot and fired shots into a car where the boy was sitting, striking him in the hip, police said. The car drove to 69th and Racine where paramedics were called. The boy’s condition was stabilized at Comer.Speaking to reporters outside Comer, community activist Andrew Holmes called for prayers for the young victims and urged any witnesses to talk to police.“We’re starting the spring and summer off wrong,” Holmes said.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.PANAMA CITY — Michael Hunt, the man initially sought as a "person of interest" in the April 4 quadruple shooting on Allen Avenue that left one woman dead and three people critically injured was charged Friday afternoon with first-degree murder and three counts of attempted felony murder, according to Panama City police.Panama City police announced the arrest of Hunt on a charge of first-degree murder in the death of Alexandra “Lexie” Elise Peck, 19. She was one of four people shot late April 4, with three surviving with critical injuries. Hunt is charged with attempted felony murder in each of those shootings. In addition, police have now also charged Hunt with armed burglary of a dwelling and two counts of failure to register as a sex offender.Hunt has been in custody on other charges since April 5, one day after four people were shot in the 100 block of Allen Avenue. He was caught the day after the shooting but until Friday was charged with Human Trafficking and Sexual Assault from another case, as well as being held without bond for failure to appear on a charge of "unlawful sex acts with certain minors" and aggravated assault with a firearm. Hunt appeared for that hearing April 1, then disappeared after the prosecutor announced there was a new warrant out for him for sexual battery but a hard copy of it was not on hand.Three days later the shootings occurred.The Panama City Police Department has since been working with a bevy of agencies on the case — they maintained the crime scene for a week to gather evidence — which left many in the Cove area frightened and wondering what had actually happened, particularly after Hunt was picked up the day after the shootings but not charged in connection with them until today.Police have still released few details about the shootings and did not take any questions today after issuing the press release. They have said the case is of such a nature that public records laws do not apply to much of the information sought and prevents them from releasing certain details. They have also said the public has provided "invaluable" information to investigators.Hunt, 53 is a registered sex offender who was set for a hearing April 1 on a new sex charge from last fall. Hunt was at the hearing, but when confusion over a new sex charge brought the hearing to a temporary halt, Hunt was gone when court reconvened and the warrant for sexual battery had been found.Courtroom video obtained by The News Herald shows Hunt and his appointed attorney at the time standing at one podium and the prosecutor at another.As the hearing begins at 2:42 p.m., the prosecutor quickly tells the judge, “I believe Mr. Hunt has an active warrant. I was (unintelligible) this morning.”“A what?” Hunt says, looking back toward the audience in the courtroom.The judge can be heard a short time later saying, “Yeah, I’m not showing it in (unintelligible) but that doesn’t mean it’s not active.”The prosecutor then is seen pulling up the information on her smartphone, saying, “A warrant for Michael Harrison Hunt, uh, for sexual battery on a victim under 18.”Hunt at this point raises his left hand in what looks like a gesture of disbelief.Hunt’s attorney tells the judge it’s likely just a continuation of the charge Hunt is in court for that day — for which his previously posted $65,000 bond was reduced to a release on his own recognizance bond in November by another judge. Hunt had made his court appearances since then.“What’s your date of birth, Mr. Hunt?” the judge asks.“6-1-65, your honor,” Hunt replies.Using that as a comparison point, the prosecutor a short time later, again using her smartphone, says, “I have it right here” and says that the date of birth matches Hunt’s.“Alright, well, I’m not going to take any action yet until I see an actual capias has been issued so I’ll wait and see what that is and maybe that will give a chance for Ms. Miron to get with (the prosecutor) to discuss that issue,” the judge says says.Hunt remains standing by his attorney as the prosecutor asks if they can “just recall the case (when we’ve) sorted it out?”“You can,” the judge replies. “Mr. Hunt, if you will take a seat and we’ll see if we can get to the bottom of this for you.”“Yes sir,” Hunt replies, and he is seen walking out of camera range toward the audience, and the door, less than 2 minutes after the hearing started.Forty-five minutes later the video picks back up with the court clerk calling, “The State recalls Michael Hunt.”The judge asks Miron to get her client but less than a minute later her voice can be heard from beyond camera range, “It appears Mr. Hunt has vacated the courthouse.”The judge immediately ruled that Hunt had failed to appear by leaving early and ordered him held without bond, making Hunt a wanted man. The search that ensued turned into an all-out manhunt three days later when four people were gunned down Thursday night in an Allen Avenue home.Panama City police quickly declared Hunt a “person of interest” in the case and he was located the following evening and taken into custody for failure to appear, but he had not been charged in connection with the shootings.Police have not said if they think the shootings are related to any of the previous or pending charges against Hunt or why he is a “person of interest” in the case. In addition to the earlier charges, Hunt, now being held without bond, is facing new charges of human trafficking, living off the earnings of a prostitute and sexual battery no physical force by offender 18 or older, victim greater than 12 years of age/less than 18 years of age.Hunt previously served prison time from April 3, 2013, until June 1, 2015, for three drug charges — including trafficking — as well as grand theft and living off the earnings of a prostitute, according to Florida Department of Corrections records. Those records also indicate Hunt “qualified” for sexual offender status for a 1990 conviction for “US MILITARY (RAPE) GCMO 16 Us Army, NJ.”The Florida Department of Law Enforcement’s Sexual Offenders and Predators Search website shows that on Jan. 3, Hunt registered his address as being 2119 E. Fifth St., which is the address for Polecats, a business that advertises on social media as a “Dance Studio & VIP Event Venue.” On social media it appears to have a warehouse-type interior that includes a small stage and dance pole.According to the Florida Department of State, Division of Corporations, Hunt is listed as the registered agent and manager of POLECATS LLC.And according to the Bay County Property Appraiser’s Office, that property is owned by 6316 E INDEPENDENCE BLVD, LLC., which, in turn, according to the Division of Corporations, lists its title manager as George Kingston, who owns a number of other properties downtown and in Panama City.People with information can contact the Panama City Police Department at (850) 872-3100 or remain anonymous by contacting Crime Stoppers at (850) 785-TIPS.PANAMA CITY — Michael Hunt, the man initially sought as a "person of interest" in the April 4 quadruple shooting on Allen Avenue that left one woman dead and three people critically injured was charged Friday afternoon with first-degree murder and three counts of attempted felony murder, according to Panama City police.Panama City police announced the arrest of Hunt on a charge of first-degree murder in the death of Alexandra “Lexie” Elise Peck, 19. She was one of four people shot late April 4, with three surviving with critical injuries. Hunt is charged with attempted felony murder in each of those shootings. In addition, police have now also charged Hunt with armed burglary of a dwelling and two counts of failure to register as a sex offender.Hunt has been in custody on other charges since April 5, one day after four people were shot in the 100 block of Allen Avenue. He was caught the day after the shooting but until Friday was charged with Human Trafficking and Sexual Assault from another case, as well as being held without bond for failure to appear on a charge of "unlawful sex acts with certain minors" and aggravated assault with a firearm. Hunt appeared for that hearing April 1, then disappeared after the prosecutor announced there was a new warrant out for him for sexual battery but a hard copy of it was not on hand.Three days later the shootings occurred.The Panama City Police Department has since been working with a bevy of agencies on the case — they maintained the crime scene for a week to gather evidence — which left many in the Cove area frightened and wondering what had actually happened, particularly after Hunt was picked up the day after the shootings but not charged in connection with them until today.Police have still released few details about the shootings and did not take any questions today after issuing the press release. They have said the case is of such a nature that public records laws do not apply to much of the information sought and prevents them from releasing certain details. They have also said the public has provided "invaluable" information to investigators.Hunt, 53 is a registered sex offender who was set for a hearing April 1 on a new sex charge from last fall. Hunt was at the hearing, but when confusion over a new sex charge brought the hearing to a temporary halt, Hunt was gone when court reconvened and the warrant for sexual battery had been found.Courtroom video obtained by The News Herald shows Hunt and his appointed attorney at the time standing at one podium and the prosecutor at another.As the hearing begins at 2:42 p.m., the prosecutor quickly tells the judge, “I believe Mr. Hunt has an active warrant. I was (unintelligible) this morning.”“A what?” Hunt says, looking back toward the audience in the courtroom.The judge can be heard a short time later saying, “Yeah, I’m not showing it in (unintelligible) but that doesn’t mean it’s not active.”The prosecutor then is seen pulling up the information on her smartphone, saying, “A warrant for Michael Harrison Hunt, uh, for sexual battery on a victim under 18.”Hunt at this point raises his left hand in what looks like a gesture of disbelief.Hunt’s attorney tells the judge it’s likely just a continuation of the charge Hunt is in court for that day — for which his previously posted $65,000 bond was reduced to a release on his own recognizance bond in November by another judge. Hunt had made his court appearances since then.“What’s your date of birth, Mr. Hunt?” the judge asks.“6-1-65, your honor,” Hunt replies.Using that as a comparison point, the prosecutor a short time later, again using her smartphone, says, “I have it right here” and says that the date of birth matches Hunt’s.“Alright, well, I’m not going to take any action yet until I see an actual capias has been issued so I’ll wait and see what that is and maybe that will give a chance for Ms. Miron to get with (the prosecutor) to discuss that issue,” the judge says says.Hunt remains standing by his attorney as the prosecutor asks if they can “just recall the case (when we’ve) sorted it out?”“You can,” the judge replies. “Mr. Hunt, if you will take a seat and we’ll see if we can get to the bottom of this for you.”“Yes sir,” Hunt replies, and he is seen walking out of camera range toward the audience, and the door, less than 2 minutes after the hearing started.Forty-five minutes later the video picks back up with the court clerk calling, “The State recalls Michael Hunt.”The judge asks Miron to get her client but less than a minute later her voice can be heard from beyond camera range, “It appears Mr. Hunt has vacated the courthouse.”The judge immediately ruled that Hunt had failed to appear by leaving early and ordered him held without bond, making Hunt a wanted man. The search that ensued turned into an all-out manhunt three days later when four people were gunned down Thursday night in an Allen Avenue home.Panama City police quickly declared Hunt a “person of interest” in the case and he was located the following evening and taken into custody for failure to appear, but he had not been charged in connection with the shootings.Police have not said if they think the shootings are related to any of the previous or pending charges against Hunt or why he is a “person of interest” in the case. In addition to the earlier charges, Hunt, now being held without bond, is facing new charges of human trafficking, living off the earnings of a prostitute and sexual battery no physical force by offender 18 or older, victim greater than 12 years of age/less than 18 years of age.Hunt previously served prison time from April 3, 2013, until June 1, 2015, for three drug charges — including trafficking — as well as grand theft and living off the earnings of a prostitute, according to Florida Department of Corrections records. Those records also indicate Hunt “qualified” for sexual offender status for a 1990 conviction for “US MILITARY (RAPE) GCMO 16 Us Army, NJ.”The Florida Department of Law Enforcement’s Sexual Offenders and Predators Search website shows that on Jan. 3, Hunt registered his address as being 2119 E. Fifth St., which is the address for Polecats, a business that advertises on social media as a “Dance Studio & VIP Event Venue.” On social media it appears to have a warehouse-type interior that includes a small stage and dance pole.According to the Florida Department of State, Division of Corporations, Hunt is listed as the registered agent and manager of POLECATS LLC.And according to the Bay County Property Appraiser’s Office, that property is owned by 6316 E INDEPENDENCE BLVD, LLC., which, in turn, according to the Division of Corporations, lists its title manager as George Kingston, who owns a number of other properties downtown and in Panama City.People with information can contact the Panama City Police Department at (850) 872-3100 or remain anonymous by contacting Crime Stoppers at (850) 785-TIPS.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Panama City News Herald  ~ 501 W. 11th St, Panama City, FL 32401~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Two Henry County police officers were shot and a suspected gunman remained barricaded inside a home with two hostages in a Stockbridge neighborhood Thursday night, according to police.The two male officers, whose names were not released, were taken to Grady Memorial Hospital in serious condition, according to Henry County police Capt. Joey Smith. Their conditions were not believed to be life-threatening.The Henry County officers were the second and third metro Atlanta cops shot  in the line of duty in four days.UPDATE: Some kids in nearby homes escorted out of neighborhood to waiting parents. 2#HenryCountyofficers shot; suspected gunman barricaded in house -https://t.co/z9QW5Nnt7fpic.twitter.com/M0SWGrG4Y5Officers responded to the home along Eagle Court, not far from I-75 in the Eagle Ridge neighborhood, about 10:45 a.m. in response to a report of “unknown trouble,” Smith said Thursday afternoon. Investigators believe a relative of someone inside the house called 911 to report some type of violence.The officers arrived at the scene and forced their way into the home when they were shot, Smith said. The officers did not return fire.AJC ON THE SCENE:Photos from Henry County shootingOne officer was struck in the hand and the second was hit in the torso and hip area, according to Smith. The officer struck in the hand was able to assist his fellow officer getting out of the home.The two officers, both in their 30s, have been with the police department for several years. Their families have been notified, Smith said.SWAT negotiators were still trying to get the barricaded gunman out of the home late Thursday, police said. The suspected gunman is believed to have a 16-year-old boy inside along with a woman, who is another family member, Smith said. The teenager is not believed to be harmed, but Smith did not know the condition of the woman in the home.The suspect refused to assure police the two inside the home were uninjured, so officers resorted to firing tear gas into the home around 9 p.m. However, an attempt to enter the home was halted when the suspect fired multiple shots at SWAT officers, Smith confirmed at 11 p.m. No one was hurt, and officers have not returned fire or engaged with the suspect since then.A man on the phone talked to us as gunfire rang out.#standoff#HenryCountypic.twitter.com/xspgQkgbTlAt 11:30 p.m., the suspect remained barricaded as the standoff neared its 13th hour.Neighbors were told to stay away from the crime scene, including Lena Holt, who saw the police presence on her street through her video doorbell. Holt, who lives across the street from the house where the shooting occurred, said she was alerted to the massive police presence about 11 a.m.She was in Marietta visiting her son at the time, but rushed back to find out what was going on.“My Ring went off and I opened it up and I said, ‘What is all this going on,’” she told AJC.com. “And it’s right here on my street. It’s very weird.”Some neighbors have been trapped in their homes, and many told Channel 2 Action News they heard loud bangs and gunfire around 9 p.m.“It was like a bomb went off at first, but now it’s just shooting — a lot of shooting,” Dwight Taylor told Channel 2 Action News on the phone.One of the injured officers was flown to Grady and the second by ambulance, Smith said. Police temporarily blocked I-75 in the area of Hudson Bridge Road as the wounded officers were taken to the hospital.Credit: JOHN SPINK/JSPINK@AJC.COMCredit: JOHN SPINK/JSPINK@AJC.COMAll lanes later reopened, but heavy traffic delays remained in the area in both directions.Russell Blanding, a resident of Eagle Ridge subdivision, was stuck in his home all day as the standoff played out. He was getting ready to go to work when law enforcement arrived and cordoned off the neighborhood.“It’s sad that this happened, but, ‘Man, we’re on lockdown,’” he told AJC.com.Blanding said he did not know the residents in the home and that they  have lived there only for the past six months. He described the community as friendly, but changing, as Henry County — the second-fastest-growing county in metro Atlanta — explodes with new residents.“The demographics are just changing,” he said. “I used to be able to go from here to Gwinnett (County) in no time, but not anymore.”OFFICERS SHOT IN HENRY COUNTY - WHAT WE KNOW:-- 2 officers are being treated at Grady Memorial Hospital-- 1 person is dead inside a home where a gunman is barricaded-- Dozens of police vehicles on the sceneTHE LATEST:https://t.co/WfpbZaTOrepic.twitter.com/ubAXxIbaHhSeveral nearby police agencies, including Jonesboro and Clayton County, also responded to the scene.The GBI said Thursday it was not called in to assist with the investigation. So far this year, the agency has investigated 27 shootings involving police officers.Thursday’s shooting comes just days after a Union City police officer was shot multiple times Monday evening after responding to a home on Stonewall Drive. Officer Jerome Turner Jr. is stable and recovering at Grady after undergoing surgery, police said. A fellow Union City officer was seen carrying “Get Well” balloons into the hospital Thursday afternoon.RELATED:GBI identifies Union City police officer wounded in shootoutIt was the second time in four months a Henry County officer was shot in the line of duty. On Dec. 6, Officer Michael Smith was shot while trying to subdue a man outside a dental office. Smith, 33, died from his injuries Dec. 28.Six Georgia officers died in the line of duty in 2018, including four in metro Atlanta. Smith was the second Henry officer to die in 2018. In February, Locust Grove police Officer Chase Maddox was shot and killed while assisting deputies serving a warrant.MORE:Henry officer is Georgia's 6th killed in line of duty this yearALSO:Henry County officer remembered by hundreds: 'He saved lives that day.'So far this year, one Georgia officer has been killed in the line of duty. On Jan. 29, Glascock County Deputy Joshua Ryer Jr. was killed in a two-vehicle crash while on the way to pick up an inmate. The 19-year-old had been with the department for five months.Henry County students and teachers are on spring break this week and no schools are affected by the police presence. Some children in neighboring homes remained inside until their parents arrived to pick them up.— Please return to AJC.com for updates.Credit: Alyssa PointerCredit: Alyssa PointerWJTVby:DeAngelo VaxterUPDATE: The man Claiborne County deputies say shot four people outside a convenience store last night, has turned himself in.Claiborne County Sheriff Frank Davis says Lydell Page walked in to the Claiborne County Sheriff’s Department and surrendered with his lawyer.Page will face four aggravated assault charges.Update: Three of the four people shot by a drive-by shooter in Claiborne County are Hinds Community College Students.According to Claiborne County Sheriff Frank Davis, the following have been identified as injured in the during the shooting.Three out of the four were treated and released. Brown is still hospitalized.Lydell Page is out on a $15K bond for aggravated domestic assault.The shooting happened just outside Michael Dean’s convenience store in Hermanville.Claiborne County Sheriff Frank Davis says “If anyone is caught harboring this fugitive, we will prosecute them as well.”Deputies were called to Claiborne County Hospital after learning four people were shot.Two of them were transported to a Jackson hospital.The incident occurred Tuesday night on Highway 18 at Michael Dean’s Convenience Store in Hermanville.Sheriff Frank Davis says it was a drive-by shooting.Authorities believe the four people wounded were not the intended targets.Deputies are now looking a for Lydell Page.According to the sheriff, Page just got out on bond for aggravated domestic violence.He was accused of shooting at the mother of his child.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.JACKSON, Miss. (WJTV) – The Mississippi State Department of Health (MSDH) is reporting 238 new cases of the coronavirus in Mississippi, along with nine additional deaths.That brings the state’s total number of cases to 307,332 with 7,095 deaths.HINDS COUNTY, Miss. (WJTV) - Parts of the Jackson-metro area experienced flash flooding overnight due to the severe storms.You can stay up to date on the forecast by downloading the 12 News app.SATURDAY: Storms will wrap up just after sunrise across extreme southeast Mississippi. Winds will still be breezy out of the west up to 15 mph as clouds linger through mid morning. Then skies should turn mostly sunny by early afternoon, shaping up for nice weather. Highs today will be a bit cooler, but still near normal in the middle 70s. Lows tonight will be near 50 with clear skies.SUNDAY: Tomorrow will be gorgeous, with morning sunshine and a chilly start in the 50s. Temperatures will warm nicely into the 60s at lunchtime and 70s for the afternoon. Skies will remain clear with plenty of sun.[ditty_news_ticker id="349423"]COVINGTON, Ky. (WTVQ) – Two men pleaded guilty Monday to a variety of charges stemming from a drive-by shooting.Dawayne Dixon and Bryce Newborn had been scheduled to stand trial Tuesday but pleaded guilty to five counts of attempted murder and three counts of first-degree wanton endangerment.Dixon also pleadedd guilty to Receiving Stolen Property, Tampering with Physical Evidence, and Fleeing Police Second Degree, according to Assistant Commonwealth’s Attorney Aaron Levinson, who is recommending each man serve 20 years in prison.Final sentencing is scheduled for December 15, 2020 at 2:30 PM before Kenton Circuit Judge Patricia Summe.On April 2, 2019, Yawshura Jones, Samuel Hayden, Zakori Griffin, Kevin Jones, and Simeon Jones were playing cornhole in front of 337 E. 13thStreet in Covington when a black sedan drove by. Gunshots rang out as two men in the vehicle opened fire on the group.All five of the victims were struck by bullets but miraculously no-one was seriously injured. A stray bullet also went into the residence at 337 E. 13thStreet, nearly striking three people inside.The victims described the shooters as white males but were unable or unwilling to identify them further.On April 3, 2019, Covington Police Bike Patrol Officers Galvin Adkisson and Jacob Gier spotted Dawayne Dixon and Bryce Newborn smoking marijuana only a few blocks from where this shooting took placeNewborn was arrested and officers discovered a Ruger .45 caliber semi-automatic pistol in his waistband. Dixon ran from police but was caught by Adkisson in the backyard of a house on Kendall Street, Levinson said in outlining the evidence.Shortly after, the homeowner at found a Glock 9mm caliber semi-automatic handgun in the trash can right next where Dixon was arrested and notified police.A ballistics comparison determined Dixon’s Glock produced two of the empty shell casings recovered from East 13th Street.Dixon was also discovered to be driving a black Acura matching the description of the car used for the drive-by shooting.Sgt. Jim West and Det. Corey Warner interviewed Dixon’s girlfriend who owned the black Acura. Sshe admitted Dixon told her he and Newborn used her car in the shooting.Det. Justin Bradbury later interviewed Bryce Newborn admitted to his role in the shooting. Newborn said the two were paid to shoot at the men but did not identify the person who allegedly paid them.Commonwealth’s Attorney Rob Sanders said still sentences for such dangerous acts help keep the city safe saying, “Police and prosecutors know we must respond to this kind of senseless violence swiftly and with severe consequences so everyone knows it won’t be tolerated!” Sanders credits the Covington Police Department’s “all hands on deck” approach to shooting investigations for providing prosecutors enough evidence to make charges stick and convict those who put lives at risk.“Covington gets safer every year and their police deserve credit for cracking down on violence,” said Sanders. “These two defendants were no strangers to crime but now they’ll be out of our community for a good long time!”Talk to ABC 36 News anchors, reporters and meteorologists. When you see news happening, share it! We’d love to hear from you.We live, work and play right here in Central Kentucky. We are your neighbors. We celebrate community and we tell your stories. We are the most trusted source for local news.Download the ABC 36 News App on your smart phone or tablet device to receive breaking news and weather push notifications the minute it happens.© 2020 WTVQ-DT.Website Design & Hosting by ChartLocalATLANTA — A shooting in Southwest Atlanta left one person dead and four others injured early Monday morning.Atlanta Police told 11Alive that it all started at a house party Sunday night on Landrum Drive  around 11:00 p.m.According to APD, a man opened fire hitting five people, including 27-year-old Tyriq Livatt, who died from his injuries.  The other four victims were taken to Grady Hospital and are being treated for non-life-threatening injuries.Police said the victims' ages range from 17 to 20 years old and they are all males.Police said they are still trying to figure out what led to the shooting.11Alive is working to get more information on the incident and will update this story as details develop.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.CHARLESTON, S.C. (WCSC) - A judge denied bond Sunday for a 19-year-old facing charges in connection with a shooting at a North Charleston party back in March.Christian Tyler Garcia faces two charges of attempted murder and one charge of possession of a weapon during the commission of a violent crime, according to jail records.He was booked into the county jail on Saturday.Police responded shortly after 1 a.m. on March 31to the 1900 block of Jacksonville Road where a shooting had been reported, North Charleston Police spokesman Spencer Pryor said.Investigators say Garcia went to the location to attend a party that had been advertised on Facebook. Garcia was not initially allowed to enter because there were too many people inside, but security personnel told Garcia and others they would be allowed to enter as soon as some people inside left, affidavits state.Investigators say Garcia and friends then entered the building through a side entrance and were seen on the stage.The light came on inside and everyone was told the party was over and instructed to exit the building, the affidavit states.When Garcia got outside and to the vehicle he arrived in, shots were fired, police say.A woman was struck by a bullet when she ran for safety and police learned six other people were taken to MUSC and Trident Hospital in personal vehicles after being struck by gunfire, but none of the victims suffered life-threatening injuries, Pryor said.Documents state Garcia was identified through a photo lineup.He was being held at the Al Cannon Detention Center.Copyright 2019 WCSC. All rights reserved.2126 Charlie Hall BoulevardCharleston SC 29414(843) 402-5555A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.WGN-TVby:Courtney GousmanCHICAGO — One person was killed and four others wounded after a gunman opened fire on people standing on the sidewalk in East Garfield Park around 3 a.m. Sunday.“I just know they were at some party, the party was over with and they were outside leaving, somebody opened up fire,” said Tiffany Granville, who says her sister was among the wounded.According to police, the victims were out on the 500 block of North Hamlin Avenue around 3 a.m. Sunday when a man walked up and fired shots.Granville said a 22-year-old man, identified as Timothy Lomax by his family, was shot multiple times while attempting to help her sister flee the gunfire. He was later pronounced dead at Stroger Hospital.“Just to know my sister is here, and to hear her say her son tried to assist my sister; he’s not here but she is, it’s very sad,” Granville said.Her 27-year-old sister was shot in the chest and pelvis, and taken to Stroger Hospital in serious condition. Granville said doctors gave her a blood transfusion as they rushed to save her life.“She was shot, they say, in the chest and it come out through her back. Hey, we’re just glad it didn’t hit her spine. We’re just grateful she’s still here with us,” Granville said.A male of unknown age was shot in his abdomen and taken to Mt. Sinai in serious condition. Two additional victims, a 25-year-old man shot in the thigh and a 25-year-old man who received a graze wound on the cheek, were taken to hospitals in good condition.Stroger Hospital called for police support as the emergency room began to overflow with friends and family trying to check on the three brought there overnight.No one is in custody, and detectives are investigating.“It’s just sad. we need to come together and love on each other more and just stop the nonsense. stop the violence,” Granville said.SubmitRAVENEL, S.C. (NEXSTAR) — A South Carolina meat processing and taxidermy business found a collection of bizarre items in the belly of a 445-pound alligator a customer brought in recently.Among the photos of turkey, deer and other game that people brought in recently to be processed, the 12-foot gator stands out among the Facebook photos Cordray's shared.CHICAGO — The Illinois Department of Public Health reported 3,630 new cases of COVID-19 and 13 deaths.The deaths were reported in the following counties:LONDON — Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Philip, also known as the Duke of Edinburgh, took part in planning his funeral and its focus on family was in accordance with his wishes. The 99-year-old duke, who died Friday, also took part in designing the modified Land Rover that will carry his coffin.Sign up for daily emails with local updates and other important news.Baltimore police say they are investigating a quadruple shooting in southeast Baltimore on Thursday.According to officials, officers responded to the 6200 block of Boston Street for a shooting just before 4 p.m.Two victims were taken to a hospital before police arrived officers found the other two men at the scene."One of the two male victims that was on the scene, we believe to be in critical condition," said Baltimore Police Commissioner Michael Harrison.More than 40 evidence markers are scattered across a crime scene near a playground in southeast Baltimore."This is happening in broad daylight, close to when school got out, it is just heartbreaking and unacceptable," said Councilman Zeke Cohen.Police aren't sure if the victims were targeted."It's too early to tell, but this is a very calculated and very deliberate shooting, with a number of rounds on the ground and this kind of crime scene, we know that this was very deliberate, very violent," said Harrison. "These individuals need to be removed from the streets of Baltimore forever.""From everything I've heard from the community here, the people that came and did this shooting don't live here. They came in here to cause harm, so I am not only saddened by this but I am incredibly angry," said Cohen.Investigators are asking people to come forward with information about possible suspects."We don't have any descriptions right now, that's why it's so important that any information that's out there that we need it as fast as we can possibly get it," said Harrison.Anyone with information is asked to call Metro Crime Stoppers at 1-866-7LOCKUP.There’s at least 43 evidence markers. This shooting scene is in front of a playground#WBALpic.twitter.com/IN8ulW4EvpThis content is imported from Twitter.
	You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site..@BaltimorePoliceCommissioner Michael Harrison talks with residents as officers investigate a quadruple shooting.The shooting happened near Boston St and Gusryan St.Harrison says four adult males were shot. He believes one of the men is critically wounded.#WBALpic.twitter.com/9cxXXBs6tH— IG: @Vanessa__Herring (@VanessaHerring)March 28, 2019Get WBAL-TV 11 News On The Go.@BaltimorePoliceCommissioner Michael Harrison talks with residents as officers investigate a quadruple shooting.The shooting happened near Boston St and Gusryan St.Harrison says four adult males were shot. He believes one of the men is critically wounded.#WBALpic.twitter.com/9cxXXBs6tHHearst Television participates in various affiliate marketing programs, which means we may get paid commissions on purchases made through our links to retailer sites.Read the latest print edition here.View this issueBrowse other issuesDON'T MISS A BEAT: Simply submit your e-mail address below, click on the opt-in email link and watch your inbox for news from the Daily Independent at YourValley.net. Thank you for reading!Read moreRead moreRead moreRead moreAt 16 years-old Cerue is ready for forever.

The social butterfly makes friends easily, but she’s ready to find a family to love and call her own.

Cerue likes to stay busy  …Eleven-year-old Constintine, or CJ as he’s called, is like most fifth grade boys. He’s friendly and talkative, loves the outdoors, and wants nothing more than a family to call his  …Salina thrives in the classroom and she wants to stay there when she is grown up.

“I want to be a teacher because I want to teach kindergartners their ABCs and stuff,” Salina  ……Music helps people express their deep emotions and listening to it helps Aiden to know he isn’t the only one who has felt that way.

A long list of favorite artists includes  …If you’re looking for a little conversation, sit down next to 14-year-old Keegan.

“He is a story teller,” says John Hicks, a child specific adoption recruiter with Aid to …Just as the sky above seems to know no limits, neither does 15-year-old Sky.

“I really like to tell people that I want to be president,” she says, “but I know I have to be  …While everyone has been stuck at home to slow the spread of COVID-19 virus, not many have been as stuck at 16-year-old Aaron.

When someone in Aaron’s group foster home tested  …Like a lot of teens doing remote learning during the COVID-19 pandemic, Julio misses the classroom. Well, at least the other students in the classroom.

“He does not like virtual  …Active and engaging, 10-year-old Damascus dreams of a forever family with a built-in playmate.

“I’d like there to be another boy – maybe age 9 to 11 – that I could play …It’s hard keep a straight face when you’re talking to a puppet, so 16-year-old Nelly is all giggles while building a hand puppet at Puppet Pie, a wondrous workshop operated by  …Teens typically come with drama. Not 15-year-old Dylan.

“He is literally, the most chill, laid back kid,” says Kayla, a child specific adoption recruiter with Aid to Adoption of  …Read moreRead more(NewsUSA) - The ongoing coronavirus pandemic continues to keep many children out of preschool nationwide, due to school closures or to parents' concerns about sending their children to the in-person  …Kyrgyzstan votes on constitution boosting president's powersFrench ResultsFellow SNL writer remembers Anne Beatts as courageous, wittyToddler out of medical coma after Chicago road rage shootingBlackmore becomes 1st female jockey to win Grand NationalTexas Rep. Crenshaw temporarily blinded after eye surgeryScottish ResultsRead moreRead moreWASHINGTON (AP) — Despite the strongest public support and the most sympathetic president in years, the American labor movement just suffered a stinging defeat -- again.

Amazon warehouse workers  …BEIJING (AP) — Alibaba Group, the world’s biggest e-commerce company, was fined 18.3 billion yuan ($2.8 billion) by Chinese regulators on Saturday for anti-competitive tactics, as the ruling  …The Anti-Defamation League has called for Fox News to fire prime-time opinion host Tucker Carlson because he defended a white-supremacist theory that says whites are being “replaced” by people of  …The top three home sales in Peoria for the week of April 2-8 were in the 85383 ZIP code, the city’s luxury home hot spot, according to Realtor. com.Read moreScottsdale and Tempe Rotary clubs are among those in Arizona inviting friends, neighbors and fellow citizens to join them as they conduct service projects to benefit the local community during the  …Charles “Wes” Foster, Mesa Community College nursing faculty, is president-elect of the Medical-Surgical Nursing Certification Board's board of directors.

Mr. Foster has been on the  …Your Name: ​Carlos Grandela

Age: 32

Business Name: ViewFinder Low Vision Resource Center

Town/Neighborhood: Mesa

Hours of operation: 9 a.m.-5:30 p.m. Monday-Thursday and 9 a.m.-5 p.m.  …What does adoption mean? For siblings Jaeden, Miracle, and William, it means, “Someone will take care of you.”Read moreMesa Arts Center is hosting a live virtual speaker series with stunning imagery and stories from National Geographic’s world-renowned photographers, scientists, authors, filmmakers,  …In honor of National Poetry Month, the city of Goodyear will showcase the words of eight local poets in Poetry Illuminated, a temporary installation curated by inaugural city of Phoenix poet laureate Rosemarie Dombrowski."The Sound of Music," the world’s most beloved musical, graces the Zao Theatre stage March 26-April 17, featuring the music of Richard Rodgers, lyrics by Oscar Hammerstein II, book by Howard  …With Earth Day coming up April 22, the Southwest Valley cities of Avondale, Goodyear and Litchfield Park are celebrating the planet in a variety of ways. Here’s what’s in the  …Read moreRead moreYourValley.net623-972-610117220 N Boswell BlvdSuite 101Sun City AZ 85373Email:azdelivery@newszap.comPhoenix police on Wednesday identified the man suspected of shooting six people, killing two and wounding four, a day earlier at a house on North 27th Avenue near West Butler Drive.Jeffery Rhone, 29, of Phoenix, is suspected offatally shooting 30-year-old Jorge Rodriguez and 17-year-old Shelby Verderosaand wounding four others, say police.The four people injured, men ages 19, 22, 29 and 56, are expected to recover from their serious injuries as they are treated at a hospital.When police found Verderosa in the home, a 6-month-old child was laying on the floor between her legs, according to court documents. The child was unharmed and removed from the home.According to witnesses at the house, Rhone was angry his wallet had been allegedly stolen from someone in the house, the documents said.Rhone then left after arguing with others in the house. However, he returned shortly after and began arguing with those in the house again, and a physical fight broke out, the documents stated.Witnesses told police Rhone was the one who started the fight at the beginning, but he ended up losing the fight and was physically removed from the house, according to the documents.Rhone then went to his own residence and reportedly stole his roommate's gun from his nightstand as the roommate was sleeping. The roommate told police Rhone did not have permission to use the gun, the court documents said.Rhone returned to the house where the earlier altercation took place, knocked at the door at about 3:30 a.m. and was allowed inside. A witness told police it sounded as though Rhone was moving from room to room, firing the gun at the victims, according to the documents.Several 40-caliber gun casings were found around the house and blood trails in each room.The last person Rhone was suspected of shooting was a 19-year-old man who was hit in the shoulder while in the laundry room, documents said. The man ran out of the house and was pursued by Rhone.The victim escaped to a nearby hotel where police later found him. After Rhone chased the 19-year-old, witnesses told police they saw him drive away in his car, police said.Items from Rhone's wallet were later found outside, south of the residence, by police, according to the documents.Officers found Rhone in his car driving slowly down Northern Avenue with his flashers on around 10:20 a.m. Tuesday, police said.A plain-clothes detective noticed he matched the description of the man police were looking for in connection with the shooting, police said. The detective called for additional units and, upon their arrival, Rhone got out of his car and surrendered to police without incident, police said.Rhone was booked into a Maricopa County jail Tuesday on suspicion of first-degree murder, aggravated assault resulting in serious injury, first-degree burglary and disorderly conduct with a weapon, according to court documents.Rhone is set to appear in court March 27 for a status conference and again March 29 for a preliminary hearing. His bond is set at $1 million.Saturday, March 17, 2019(News 12 at 11)AUGUSTA, Ga. (WRDW/WAGT)-- Hundreds headed to downtown to celebrate Saint Patrick's Day on Saturday, but by midnight it hadturned into a crime scene.What was supposed to end with painting the town green, left broad street at Dr. Unk's Dive Bar, wrapped in yellow instead. Saint Patrick's Day plans changed for a lot of people when gunfire halted their night.Shots erupted leaving four injured and one man behind bars, but many say it appears that it was all self-defense.We asked Richmond County investigators what happened before the fight-turned-shooting, but they could not confirm. So we asked club-goers and many others who hung around the 900 block of Broad to see what was unfolding at midnight.We're told, there was one big group, who appeared to be in a brawl/argument about a girl. Moments later, Montreze Roundtree started shooting. According to witnesses, they saw at least two men hit by the gunfire--one man shot in the leg, another man shot in the stomach area. Shortly after, deputies came on scene to apply pressure on the wounds of the bleeding victims as they awaited EMS. Deputies also wrapped off the block and redirected traffic to end the downtown commotion.According to a statement from the sheriff's office, Roundtree told them four men followed him out of Dr. Unk's and started fighting him.In response, Roundtree says, he started shooting at them.The four men are still recovering in the hospital from what is expected to be non-life threatening gunshot wounds while 24-year-oldRoundtree is in jail for aggravated assault.With hundreds of people downtown last night, it could have been worse but RCSO says no one else was injured during the shooting.News 12 viewers have asked how is it fair that only the shooter was charged when it appears to be self-defense? So News 12 asked the sheriff's office are there any charges for the four men involved in the fight that led up to the shooting. The sheriff's office says CID is still investigating.Sunday, March 17, 2019AUGUSTA, Ga. (WRDW/WAGT) -- Officials say just after midnight on Sunday, Richmond County deputies responded to the 900 block of Broad Street in reference to shots fired.After investigators started looking into the situation, they say they learned the suspect, Montreze Roundtree, 24, shot at a group of individuals that reportedly followed him from Dr. Unks Dive Bar on the 800 block of Broad Street and allegedly began to fight him.Officials say Roundtree turned himself into deputies when they arrived on scene.The four male victims, between the ages of 22 and 33, all sustained gunshot wounds and they were transported to local hospitals to be treated for their injuries. The status of their condition is unknown at this time. News 12 has reached out to learn their conditions.Roundtree was arrested and charged with Aggravated Assualt.Officials say Montreze Roundtree and Sheriff Roundtree are not related.ABBEVILLE, GA (WALB) - On Thursday, Robert Chasteen, chief judge of the Cordele Judicial Circuit, denied bond for two brothers who are in jail for shooting three men, which resulted in one death.Marquavous Coley, 20, and his brother, Cortez Coley, 17, both of Rochelle, are charged in the March 2019shooting death of Jaquarious Benjamin,and the shooting of two other men.The suspects will remain in the Wilcox County Jail on charges of murder and three counts of aggravated assault, according to Brad Rigby, district attorney for the Cordele Judicial Circuit.The autopsy found Benjamin, 20, died of a single gunshot wound, which happened on Dennis Street around 2:30 a.m. on the west of Rochelle, according to J.T. Ricketson with the Georgia Bureau of Investigation Perry office.Ricketson said it seemed the shooting resulted from a disagreement between two groups of people.Copyright 2019 WALB. All rights reserved.P.O. Box 3130Albany, GA 31706(229) 446-1010A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.A judge set bail at $100,000 each on Monday for three men facing conspiracy and attempted murder charges in connection with a weekend shooting at El Cortez.A judge set bail at $100,000 apiece on Monday for three men facing conspiracy and attempted murder charges in connection with aweekend shooting at El Cortez.Travis Callahan, 35, Matthew Norris, 34, and Roberto Romero, 30, were arrested about 1 p.m. Sunday on the 1500 block of East Bonanza Road. Each faces four counts of conspiracy to commit murder and four counts of attempted murder with a deadly weapon.Defense attorney David Chesnoff, representing all three men, indicated to Las Vegas Justice of the Peace Ann Zimmerman that they acted in self-defense.“I have read the report,” Chesnoff said. “And having been involved in a lot of cases over the years of a similar nature, there is a significant self-defense defense here.”Callahan lives in Las Vegas, working on the Resorts World project, while Norris and Romero live in Tucson, Arizona, Chesnoff told the judge.The lawyer said Callahan, who was charged with driving under the influence of alcohol in December, has two children. Romero, a mechanic, has two children and no arrest history, while Norris has three children and works as a lead technician for a construction company, Chesnoff said.The shooting, which the Metropolitan Police Department said resulted from a dispute between two rival motorcycle gangs, was reported about 1:45 a.m. Sunday at El Cortez.Four people were wounded during the shooting, which police said was confined to the fifth floor of the downtown Las Vegas hotel-casino. One of those people was critically injured.The conditions of the four injured people were not known Monday.Anyone with information may contact Metro at 702-828-3251 or, to remain anonymous, Crime Stoppers at 702-385-5555.Contact David Ferrara atdferrara@reviewjournal.comor 702-380-1039. Follow@randompokeron Twitter. Review-Journal staff writers Lukas Eggen and Rio Lacanlale contributed to this report.Nevada’s attorney general and lieutenant governor want to end the death penalty, but Clark County’s district attorney is pushing for the state’s first execution since 2006.O.J. Simpson and a Las Vegas hotel-casino have settled a lawsuit alleging that unnamed employees defamed Simpson by telling a celebrity news site he had been banned from the property.A California attorney wants an appeals court to reconsider her request to throw out a Steve Wynn defamation lawsuit.An appellate court has sided with Steve Wynn in his defamation lawsuit against attorney Lisa Bloom and her law firm in a legal battle over a press release about allegations against the former casino mogul.Oral arguments are expected Wednesday in front of the Supreme Court, where lawyers representing Stavros Anthony and Ross Miller will appear before the justices.The latest Nevada lawsuit fits a pattern of sexual harassment allegations that have surfaced in recent years against the well-known sports entertainment company.A federal grand jury in Las Vegas has charged a health care staffing company and a former manager with engaging in a conspiracy to fix school nurses’ wages.Clark County prosecutors plan to seek a warrant of execution for death row inmate Zane Floyd as Nevada legislators weigh the future of capital punishment in the state.Chandra Bridges, 26, has been indicted on a charge of lying to a firearms dealer in what authorities said was a “straw purchase” of a handgun.Timeline of major developments in the Food and Drug Administration’s investigation of Las Vegas-based Real Water.Copyright ©2019Las Vegas Review-Journal, Inc.|Privacy Policy|Terms of ServicePowered byWordPress.com VIPsublogWKRG News 5by:Katarina Luketich,Jessica Taloney,WKRG STAFFMOBILE, Ala. (WKRG)–UPDATE (10:00am)The Mobile County District Attorney’s office confirms a second arrest has been made in a double murder on Dauphin Island Parkway.According to authorities, a group of people were playing dice at a home on the Dauphin Island Parkway when an argument broke out over money and people began shooting at one another.One person shot was an innocent person walking down the streetJerome Williams, 33, was booked into Mobile Metro Jail early Wednesday morning on two murder charges, according to jail records.Williams is also charged with two counts of assault and shooting into an occupied vehicle or building.Assistant District Attorney Keith Blackwood confirms Jerome Williams is the brother of a man who was arrested Saturday on the same charges. Cedric Williams, 29, is scheduled to enter a plea during an arraignment hearing on Wednesday morning.Jerome and Cedric Williams are accused of shooting and killing two men, who were 27-years-old and 38-years-old, according to Mobile police.Three other people, a 39-year-old male, 38-year-old male and 17-year-old male, were injured in the shooting. Cedric Williams was one of those injured in the shooting.This would not be the first time a shooting in Mobilebegan over a dice gamethat led to retaliatory shootings, culminating with the death of 15-year-old Anesa Baker at the Grand Hall in April of 2018.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.MOBILE, Ala. (WKRG) -- Mobile Police responded to a call of a shooting just after midnight, early Saturday morning.  According to Mobile County's "My Neighborhood" map, a shooting was reported at 12:17 this morning at 6801 Airport Boulevard.That's the same address as Providence Hospital.  Many times, when a shooting is reported at a local hospital, it usually means a gunshot victim either drives themselves or is taken by someone else by private vehicle to a hospital and the shooting happened somewhere else.  We don't know the circumstances of this case.  We've reached out to Mobile Police and are waiting to hear back.MOBILE COUNTY, Ala. (WKRG) -- Alabama Law Enforcement Agency troopers are investigating an accident involving a motorcycle that occurred on Lott Road Thursday evening.Troopers responded to the two-vehicle crash at approximately 8:02 p.m. on Alabama 217/Lott Road near Cayton Road, in Mobile County.MOBILE, Ala. (WKRG) -- Mobile Police are investigating a shooting on Houston Street Friday morning.Officers were called to No Limit Hair Styles at 514 Houston Street at 10:47 a.m.Windy with rain showers. A few flurries or snow showers possible. High 43F. Winds W at 20 to 30 mph. Chance of rain 60%..A few clouds. A few flurries or snow showers possible. Low 24F. W winds at 15 to 25 mph, decreasing to 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 1:09 pmWade Palmer (MHP photo)File photo: Wade Palmer receives Medal of Valor after rescuing woman in Dec. 2014Wade Palmer (MHP photo)MISSOULA - The Montana Highway Patrol released the name of a trooper shot and injured in an early morning manhunt.MHP says Trooper Wade Palmer was shot early Friday morning near the Evaro Bar and Casino.Palmer was originally treated at St. Patrick Hospital in Missoula. Friday afternoon, the Montana Attorney General's Office said Palmer was being transferred to Salt Lake City for treatment. Attorney General Tim Fox is reportedly en route as well.The suspect, Johnathan Bertsch, 28, reportedly shot at three people on Expressway in Missoula before taking off for Evaro.Bertsch was booked in the Missoula County Jail Friday afternoon. He's being held on one count of felony deliberate homicide and three counts of felony attempted deliberate homicide, according to Chief Deputy County Attorney Jason Marks.MHP said Trooper Palmer found Bertsch near the Evaro Bar and Casino.The next responding officer found Palmer, still seat-belted in his vehicle, and suffering from a gunshot wound.Bertsch is expected to appear in court on Monday.A GoFundMe page for Trooper Palmer has been set up. Click here for more information.File photo: Wade Palmer receives Medal of Valor after rescuing woman in Dec. 2014From the press release:NEWS RELEASE: Early in the morning of March 15, near the Evaro Bar and Casino, Montana Highway Patrol Trooper Wade Palmer located a suspected vehicle matching the description of one involved in a Missoula shooting before midnight.Trooper Alex Hiday was the next officer to arrive on scene. Hiday found Palmer still seat-belted in his patrol car and that he had been shot. The suspect had fled the scene. Hiday and a Missoula Police Department officer transported Palmer to an ambulance at the intersection of Highway 93 and Interstate 90. Palmer is in critical condition at St. Patrick Hospital.After an extensive manhunt, at approximately 6:15am the Missoula County Sheriff’s Office took the suspect, Jonathan Bertsch, into custody without incident.The Department of Justice’s Division of Criminal Investigation and Missoula County Sheriff’s Office are investigating the shooting incident.Palmer has been with the Patrol since 2012. He is stationed in Detachment 112 in Missoula. In 2015, he was awarded the Patrol’s highest honor, the Medal of Valor, for his heroic lifesaving efforts at the scene of a multiple-vehicle crash involving a mother and her young children in December 2014. Trooper Palmer has a wife and two young children.MISSOULA - One victim has died after an overnight shooting in Missoula. Three other people, including a Montana Highway Patrol Trooper, are be…EVARO - Two lanes of Highway 93 from the Wye to Arlee are now open, after an early morning shooting that led to an hours-long full road closure.EVARO - Two lanes of Highway 93 from the Wye to Arlee are now open, after an early morning shooting that led to an hours-long full road closure.GET A FREE HEADLINES EMAIL EVERY EVENING.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Currently in MissoulaSuccess!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Local news headlines from ABC Fox in Great Falls and Helena - delivered to your email inbox every weekday.Local news headlines from ABC Fox Bozeman and Butte - delivered to your email inbox every weekday.Local news headlines from ABC Fox Butte - delivered to your email inbox every weekday.Local news headlines from ABC FOX in Missoula and Kalispell - delivered to your email inbox every weekday.Get the latest headlines on local sports! News from UM, MSU, High School sports and more.Sorry, there are no recent results for popular commented articles.Get up-to-the-minute news sent straight to your device.Four people were shot Monday evening inside a New Jersey liquor store and the gunman behind the quadruple shooting is still on the run, officials say.Shots were fired one after one at around 8 p.m. inside Estrella Bar & Liquor on the corner of East 22nd Street and 12th Avenue in Paterson, according to officials. Neighbors in the area said they heard the bullets flying and immediately ducked for cover.The four men shot, a 23-year-old, a 20-year-old, a 27-year-old and an 18-year-old, suffered injuries that are not considered to be life-threatening, police said. They are being treated at a nearby hospital.The motive behind the shooting is unclear. No arrests have been made and authorities did not release a description of the suspect.Neighbors in the area heard the bullets whizzing."All I heard was pow-pow-pow," one resident said. "Paterson is dangerous. It's just dangerous streets."The investigation is ongoing.SHREVEPORT, LA (KSLA) - Shreveport police have released new information onSunday’s drive-by shooting on Sunday.There were four victims in total. Demond Taylor, 18, and a 13-year-old-juvenile, 14-year-old juvenile, and a 15-year old juvenile were injured in the incident, according to Shreveport police Spokeswoman Ofc. Christina Curtis.Injuries are described as non-life threatening.The shooting happened around 2 p.m. at the intersection of San Jacinto Avenue and Catherine Street. That’s in Shreveport’s Queensborough neighborhood.Police do not have any suspect information at this time, according to Ofc. Curtis.Authorities urge anyone with any information to contact Shreveport-Caddo Crime Stoppers by calling (318) 673-7373, visiting the organization’s website,lockemup.org, or using the P3Tips app.Copyright 2019 KSLA. All rights reserved.1812 Fairfield Ave.Shreveport, LA 71101(318) 222-1212A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.MenuDENVER — Police in Denver announced Wednesday the arrests of two suspects wanted in two separate homicide cases.The two fatal shootings, which are not connected, occurred in or around downtown Denver this past year and resulted in the deaths of a 57-year-old man in June and a 25-year-old man in March.Gaghe Fox, 24, was arrested in Oklahoma Thursday. He was wanted on suspicion of first degree murder in the shooting death of Vayron Garcia in Denver’s Lower Downtown neighborhood in the early morning hours of March 10.The shooting occurred in the area of 15th and Market Street. Police said a conflict between Fox and Garcia escalated, leading to the shooting.Another downtown homicide case is getting closer to a resolution after the arrest of Malando Sanders on Tuesday.Authorities were seeking Sanders in connection with the shooting death of Marcus Nash on June 3.The victim was shot and killed near the intersection of 21st and Champa streets. Details surrounding the events that led to the shooting are not known.Trending:OAKLAND — A man suspected of shooting four people at a downtown Oakland sports bar March 3 has been arrested and charged with six felony counts, according to authorities and court documents.Vernon Castle Jr.  36, of Oakland, is charged with four counts of assault with a semi-automatic firearm, carrying a loaded firearm on one’s person in a city, and carrying a concealed firearm.Castle surrendered to police Monday and is being  held in lieu of $1.8 million bail at Santa Rita Jail.  He is scheduled to enter a plea March 19. He has refused to talk to investigators.Castle is charged in the shooting of four people about 12:33 a.m. March 3 at the Halftime Sports Bar, 316 14th St.Two 26-year-old women, one from San Leandro and the other from Hayward, and two San Leandro men, one 25 and the other 29, were wounded.They were at the bar for a birthday celebration when said the 29-year-old man reportedly got into an argument with Castle — who then allegedly pulled out a gun and began shooting. What the dispute was about has not been determined.Authorities said Castle apparently did not know any of the victims.  All the victims have since been released from hospitals.As investigators were working to confirm Castle as the suspect,  he initiated contact with police through an attorney saying he wanted to turn himself in, which he did on Monday, according to the records..Get Morning Report and other email newslettersFiled under:Police are investigating a private club’s possible ties to organized crime after six people were shot there early Sunday. They are all expected to survive.Gunfire erupted at 3:43 a.m. inside the private lounge, located in the 2900 block of East 79th Street in the South Shore neighborhood, according to spokespeople for the Chicago Police Department.“This appears to be some type of fight that escalated,” CPD spokesman Anthony Guglielmi told the Sun-Times.Witnesses told investigators they were dancing at the club when shots rang out and people fell to the floor, police said. A 24-year-old woman told detectives she heard gunshots before feeling a bullet rip through her leg.She and a 26-year-old man, who was shot in the buttocks and grazed in the chest, were taken to University of Chicago Medical Center, police said. Later that morning, four other people showed up to hospitals with gunshot wounds from the shooting.Three men — two 25-year-olds and a 31-year-old — arrived at Jackson Park Hospital, police said.  A woman, 29, took herself to Provident Hospital after being shot in the knee.All six people suffered wounds that were not life-threatening, police said.On Sunday morning, Guglielmi announced that Chicago Police Supt. Eddie Johnson ordered a wide-ranging investigation into the club, its owners and the people who were there when the shooting happened.Guglielmi said that witnesses of the shooting were being uncooperative with investigators.As Area South Detectives investigate this shooting, Chicago Police Superintendent Eddie Johnson ordered an investigation into this private club. Organized crime units & the CPD troubled buildings section will support the effort that will be led by the Commander of CPDs vice unit.https://t.co/IKxgxSCZMxOne team of investigators is looking into whether the club’s license holders or attendees have any ties to gangs or organized crime, while another is investigating whether the building is up to code and the club’s licenses are in tact, Guglielmi said. Area South detectives are investigating the shooting.“Organized crime units & the CPD troubled buildings section will support the effort that will be led by the Commander of CPDs vice unit,” Guglielmi tweeted.On Sunday afternoon, no one answered the bar’s front door, which is labeled “PRIVATE CLUB” and guarded by a padlocked iron gate.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.La Russa, early in his second stint with the Sox, goes back a long way with Matheny and looks at him like family.Trending:OAKLAND — A man killed Feb. 28 in a drive-by shooting at an East Oakland gas station that left three other people wounded was identified by police Tuesday as Maurice Cooper, 27.The two women and a man who were wounded are still recovering.Police have not determined a motive yet for the shooting and have not made any arrests.The shooting happened shortly after 5 p.m. Feb. 28 at a gas station in the 9700 block of Edes Avenue in the city’s Brookfield Village neighborhood.Police said Cooper, of Oakland, and the other man wounded were standing outside a vehicle containing the two women when someone began shooting at them from a passing vehicle. Cooper died at the scene and the others were taken to hospitals. Police said the four knew each other.Police and Crime Stoppers of Oakland are offering up to $25,000 in reward money for information leading to the arrest of the shooter. Anyone with information may call police at 510-238-3821 or 510-238-7950 or Crime Stoppers at 510-777-8572.Get Morning Report and other email newslettersBaltimore attorney Ivan Bates once represented Jason Hodge and Andre Haydel.On Friday, he learned both men were killed in Baltimore’s latestwave of violence.“It’s heartbreaking. It just hurts,” Bates said. “I’m just trying to not lose hope and believe we can do something positive.”Hodge, 38, of Pikesville, was working as an electrician and was excited to see his 18-year-old son graduate this year, Bates said. But he died in a shooting shortly after midnight Friday in the 5400 block of Crismer Avenue in Northwest Baltimore.Haydel, 26, of West Baltimore, had been so proud of his job at a local Au Bon Pain cafe downtown, Bates recalled. More recently, Haydel’s girlfriend said he aspired to be a real estate agent. But around 6 p.m. Thursday, he died in a shooting in the 500 block of Bloom St. in West Baltimore that also injured four others.The two were among 14 people shot in a 24-hour span, which included three other homicides for a total of five. New acting police Commissioner Michael Harrison said it was his most violent day on the job and called it “totally unacceptable.”Police have not announced any arrests in the incidents.14 shot in 24 hours in Baltimore, five in single West Baltimore incident, police say; five dead overallThe spate of violence caught the attention of the General Assembly in Annapolis Friday morning, where Senate President Thomas V. Mike Miller called it an embarrassment to the entire state, and pledged support for the city before the end of the session.“It’s embarrassing to see headlines like this and it shouldn’t happen,” Miller, a Democrat who represents Prince George’s and Calvert counties, told legislators.Miller said lawmakers would not make the deep cuts to Gov. Larry Hogan’s proposed crime-fighting plan that were suggested by legislative analysts. Hogan has proposed a $13 million crime package, but the recent analysis recommendedcutting about $11 millionbecause the plan lacked details, and wouldn't necessarily drive down crime.Miller said the funding would help drive down crime in Baltimore.“Every jurisdiction should have the same effort to make sure that the public is protected. This is the first responsibility,” he said. “If one part of our state hurts, we all hurt.”Baltimore has struggled to reduce its violence, particularly homicides. The city has recorded more than 300 homicides in each of the past four years, a mark previously not reached since the 1990s.Harrison is expected to reinvigorate the city’s fight against street violence, while overseeing the implementation of court-mandated policing reforms under a federal consent decree. Many proponents of the consent decree, including the federal judge enforcing it, believe the reforms will improve the department and its relationship with residents, which will help fight crime.Thursday's violence in Baltimore was extreme — but the number of shootings isn't unprecedentedAt recent community meetings with Harrison, many residents have expressed more immediate concerns about the violence in their neighborhoods.Harrison told residents gathered Thursday night in the cafeteria at Baltimore Polytechnic Institute that he wanted to go after the city’s most violent offenders, and use federal partnerships to tackle violence. While progress could take time, Harrison said he’s dedicated to making Baltimore safer.“I hope to be here a long time,” said Harrison, who led the New Orleans Police Department, also under a consent decree, prior to coming to Baltimore.Bates criticized the city’s leadership on Friday for not doing enough to curb the violence. Bates, who ran unsuccessfully for city state’s attorney last year, pointed to the recent announcement by State’s Attorney Marilyn Mosby’s office to not prosecute simple marijuana possession as misplaced priorities.“We’re sitting here talking about weed. No one is talking about the violence,” he said.Melba Saunders, a spokeswoman for Mosby’s office, said city prosecutors are looking forward to working with Harrison, who will hopefully provide stability moving forward.“We’re hopeful that the new police commissioner brings stability within the police department, and our office remains committed to working with him in the implementation of a crime plan that focuses on violent crime,” she said.The recent shootings occurred across the city, including the quintuple shooting that killed Haydel and wounded four others, ages 19 to 46, in the 500 block of Bloom Street, just south of North Avenue in West Baltimore.Haydel’s girlfriend, Da'Jah Bushrod, 23, described him as very loving and extremely hardworking. She said the two met outside a neighborhood chicken carryout, had been dating for six years and wanted to start a family soon.She said Haydel got a new job about three weeks ago with a moving company. He had been taking a roughly hour-long bus ride to get to the job and was saving money to buy a car.“He was excited. The last message he sent me, he just got off work, and they wanted him to work the next two days,” Bushrod said.Bushrod said Haydel aspired to go into real estate.“All he wanted to do was work, and have fun,” she said, recalling trips to Sandy Point State Park, where the couple went swimming last summer. He also loved to dance.“It’s hard,” she said of his death. “I wish it was all a dream.”Also killed in the recent spate of violence was 27-year-old Justin Forney, who was shot outside his home in the 5100 block of Charlgrove Road, just south of Pimlico Race Course. No one answered at his Park Heights home Friday morning.Darius Davenport, a 20-year-old man from Baltimore County, was found fatally shot Thursday morning inside a vehicle in the 1700 block of North Longwood Street in West Baltimore. His family could not be reached for comment.A 39-year-old man was killed around 7:30 p.m. Thursday in the 6300 block of Tramore Road in Northeast Baltimore. And, on Friday afternoon, another man was killed in a shooting just before 3 p.m. in the area of Park Heights Avenue and Sumter Avenue. Police have not yet identified either man.Bates said that in previous years, he would know one or two victims of violence through his work as an attorney. But now, it’s between five and 10 each year, he said.He said Hodge, his other client who was killed Friday, “was working very hard to change his life.”Hodge worked as an electrician, and was taking additional classes to advance in the field, Bates said.Bates recalled how he saw Hodge recently at a memorial service for 30-year-old Marquis Richardson, who was killed in a shooting on Christmas Day around the corner from where Hodge was killed early Friday morning.Bates said many of his clients have legal troubles because they lack opportunities, and are forced to find other ways to support themselves and their families. A majority of the city’s crime victims have criminal histories.Police said 259 of the 309homicide victims last year had criminal records.“There’s guys who slip and fall,” he said. “We have to provide opportunity.”Baltimore Sun reporter Pamela Wood contributed to this article.RecommendedELIZABETHTOWN, KY (WAVE) – A not guilty plea was entered Monday on behalf of a man charged with the shooting deaths of a man and woman in Elizabethtown.Shadrach Peeler is accused of the murders of Cherie Turner, 34, and Subash Ghale, 40, and the shootings of Prayash Baniya, 31, and Nadia Browne, 34, on Feb. 21.According to an arrest slip, Peeler was seen on surveillance video shooting Ghale, Baniva and Browne at the T Mart, located at 600 North Miles Street.Turner’s body was found near Peeler’s home on West Wafield Street.Elizabethtown Police Department spokesman John Thomas said on Monday Baniya remained hospitalized and was listed in stable condition.Browne was released from the hospital the day of the shooting.Peeler has been lodged in the Hardin County Detention Center.Monday, a judge said Peeler was believed to be a danger to the community. His bond remains at $2 million.Peeler is scheduled to appear back in court on March 8.Copyright 2019 WAVE 3 News. All rights reserved.725 S. Floyd StreetLouisville, KY 40203(502) 585-2201A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Please log in, or sign up for a new account and purchase a subscription to continue reading.Please purchase a subscription to continue reading.Your current subscription does not provide access to this content.To subscribe,click here. Already a subscriber?Click here.Abundant sunshine. High 72F. Winds NW at 10 to 20 mph..Mainly clear. Low 46F. Winds WNW at 5 to 10 mph.Updated: April 10, 2021 @ 2:11 pmRandy Buford WinnGrand jurors in Henderson have indicted a Rusk County man on a capital murder charge stemming from the Feb. 17 shooting deaths of a brother and sister in a downtown area apartment.Randy Buford Winn, 62, of FM 840, which runs south of Henderson, was arrested in Louisiana hours after a fatal home invasion at the Oak Manor Apartments on South Van Buren Street a few blocks south of City Hall. Police summoned to the scene at 6 p.m. that day found four people shot.They included resident Justin Cord Smith, 31, and his Holly Patrice Jones, 37, who both were pronounced dead that night. Police say Jones had been trying to break off a romance with Winn for several weeks and had been living temporarily with her brother to evade Winn.Jones’ and Smith’s mother, Billie Pyers, 65, also lived in the apartment, as did Smith’s girlfriend, Cassandra Shaffer, 26. Pyers and Shaffer were wounded in the shootings.According to an arrest affidavit for Winn, the family was celebrating Smith’s birthday that Sunday evening when Winn tried to get in the front door, armed with a shotgun, but was rebuffed. He then smashed a sliding glass door to gain entry.Winn was tracked to Bienville Parish, Louisiana, and was arrested by local law enforcement the night of the shootings. He was extradited to Henderson a few days later and has remained in the Rusk County Jail on $2.5 million in bonds, charged with murder and capital murder.A trial date is pending. District Attorney Michael Jimerson has not indicated whether he will seek the death penalty for Winn.Randy Buford WinnSign up to get our newsletters emailed to you.Success!An email has been sent towith a link to confirm list signup.Error!There was an error processing your request.Our daily morning email of top news articles from News-Journal.comThis email is scheduled for delivery every morning at around 5 am. It will include the most recent list of Death Notices and Obituaries on News-Journal.com.Get links to all of our local sports coverage in your email inbox.This is the list to receive occasional emails containing special offers, deals and promotions (like contests).Sign up to get our Breaking News stories in your inbox.EVANSVILLE, Ind. — Bond was set at half a million dollars for an Evansville man accused in a mass shooting outside a center city bar this weekend.John Perteet, 32, was arrested on preliminary charges including aggravated battery with a firearm, criminal recklessness with a firearm and possession of a firearm by a felon.His initial hearing is scheduled for Thursday morning in Vanderburgh Superior Court, according to court records.Perteet's bond was set at $500,000 cash-only during a probable cause hearing Monday morning. He is being held in the Vanderburgh County Jail.More:Five shot outside Evansville barFive people were injured by gunfire outside Sidetrack Tavern at 664 E. Illinois Street early Sunday morning. Evansville Police say all five were conscious and able to talk to investigators. No motive has been publicly discussed by police.Perteet is accused of opening fire into the crowd outside the bar about 3 a.m. Sunday. Police say surveillance video from the building shows Perteet firing a gun and then leaving in an SUV with two other men. Those two men denied seeing Perteet use a weapon.Three men total were arrested in connection with the shooting, but according to police, only Perteet was accused of firing a gun.One of the men in the car, Terry Ealum, was taken into police custody on a preliminary charge of resisting law enforcement. Police believe Ealum was driving the SUV that an officer saw leaving the scene when he arrived. The officer ordered the driver to stop, but the SUV reportedly drove away anyway.Ealum's bond was set at $500 cash-only. His initial hearing is scheduled for Thursday afternoon in Vanderburgh Circuit Court.The third man arrested Sunday was also a victim in the shooting, according to Evansville Police.Howard Phipps was shot in the leg and taken to a local hospital for treatment, police say. He allegedly returned to the scene of the shooting later to retrieve his car keys and was accused of going past crime scene tape to try to get them.Officers reported they told Phipps he could not retrieve the keys until the crime scene was completely processed. When he went past the crime scene tape, he was arrested on preliminary charges of obstruction of justice and public intoxication.Phipps' bond, like Ealum's, was set at $500 cash-only. His initial hearing is set for Thursday afternoon in Vanderburgh Circuit Court.More local news:Evansville man found guilty of killing 1, shooting another in neck sentenced to 135 yearsLocal history:This Evansville lawyer was shot to death. Decades later, mystery still lingers | WebbWeather:Watch drone video of Evansville floodingNEW ORLEANS — The man killed in a shootout with New Orleans and State Police that wounded five innocent bystanders was a member of a Houston-area gang known as 59 Piru Street gang, according to police in Texas and sources.Reginald Romero Bursey, 32, was wanted for two counts of aggravated robbery in Columbus, Texas.The Columbus Police Department said two victims there were bound and robbed at gunpoint by Bursey on Sept. 8.Sunday night. New Orleans detectives recognized Bursey as a person of interest in two recent armed robberies there.RELATED:New Orleans shootout: 5 wounded, suspect dead; Here's what we knowWhen officers confronted him,he started shooting so the officers returned fire,according to NOPD. They chased him to Tulane Street where he was shot and killed.All five bystanders injured during the gunbattle survived. It's not clear yet whether they were hit by Bursey, by officers or a combination.One victim remains in critical condition, two others are still hospitalized and two have been released.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.CHICAGO (CBS) —Timothy Williams was shot three times when a disgruntled co-worker opened fire at Henry Pratt Company in Aurora last week, and he survived to talk about the horror. His sisters are sharing his story.“It’s devastating. It’s devastating to not only our family members, but the other family members also,” said his sister, Harriett Rodgers.Williams’ family didn’t want to show his photo, but said he’s a union steward who was inside the manufacturing plant during a meeting when Gary Martin was being fired. Authorities have said Martin pulled out a gun at that meeting and opened fire, shooting 11 people before police killed him.Five people died, and five police officers were wounded. Timothy Williams, 48, was the other survivor of the mass shooting.The company said, at the time of the shooting, nine people were inside that part of the building. Five workers would not leave alive.“We’re just so sad that this had to happen to Aurora,” Rodgers said.Somewhere between shock and relief, three sisters shared the realization their brother was one of only a handful inside the manufacturing plant to survive Friday’s mass shooting.“We just want to thank God that our brother is still here with us,” said his sister, Latoya Williams.Timothy Williams’ sisters said his injuries are not life-threatening, but they are life-altering.“Where he was wounded, they’re not able to basically remove the bullets,” said sister Lisa Williams-Pool.The Williams sisters said they and their brother are praying for the other families who lost loved ones in the mass shooting.“He’s really grieving for the family members of his co-workers. He’s more worried about them than he is himself,” Williams-Pool said.Williams’ family also credited first responders with limiting the loss of life by getting there as fast as they did to stop Martin’s rampage, and treat the victims.“We are definitely praying for the officers that was wounded also,” Rodgers said.Williams’ family would not go into detail on how long his recovery process would take, but indicated it would be lengthy.MenuPETERSBURG, Va. – Four people were shot outside a Petersburg apartment Saturday night, according to Crime Insider sources.Crime insider sources tell cbs 6 four people were shot outside an apartment complex.The incident happened at the Perry Street Lofts off Wythe Street around 11 p.m.Sources said one of those victims suffered serious injuries, while the other three people were just grazed.Additionally, one of those victims is a woman, according to those sources.This incident comes afteranother shooting on that same streetFriday night.If you have information that could help detectives, call Petersburg/Dinwiddie Crime Solvers at 804-861-1212 or text the keyword pdcash followed by the tip and send to 274637.A Brooklyn man shot dead in a Bedford-Stuyvesant apartment building was remembered by his younger brother Thursday as a good influence.Giovanni Lewis, 20, died in the lobby of the building on Fulton St. at Malcolm X. Blvd. after he was shot in the head and chest about 10:30 p.m. Wednesday.“He was kind. He makes sure everybody good. He was a good son and brother,” said Lewis’ brother, who didn’t give his full name.“He was just somebody that made sure I was going in the right path. Made sure I was doing good in school,” the brother said outside his home in Crown Heights.The brother was struggling to accept Lewis’s death. “It’s just like a dream, but it’s real,” he said.Lewis and three friends — Pam Jordan, 55, Brianna Culler, 22 and Joshua Cross, 20 — were shot in the lobby of the Bedford-Stuyvesant building after they left a party on its second floor.The shots were fired from outside the building, said cops.All four were hit in the fusillade. Lewis collapsed in the building’s lobby. The other three victims ran back upstairs to the second floor, where they hid in a hallway.Jordan and Culler were hospitalized in stable condition Wednesday night. Cross, who was shot multiple times in the chest, was in critical condition.Police were still searching for the shooter Thursday evening.Jonathan Winston Johnson, 25, will face charges of capital murder related to a shooting on Feb. 5, 2019.A man and a woman were found dead after a reported shooting about 8 p.m. in the 500 block of Hot Wells Tuesday, Feb. 5, 2019.A man and a woman were found dead after a reported shooting about 8 p.m. in the 500 block of Hot Wells Tuesday, Feb. 5, 2019.A man and a woman were found dead after a reported shooting about 8 p.m. in the 500 block of Hot Wells Tuesday, Feb. 5, 2019.These are the 2018 homicide cases that remain unsolved in the San Antonio area.Case:Homicide victim Leon David PerkinsDate:June 7, 2018Summary:Leon David Perkins, was gunned down around 11:40 a.m. June 7 at an apartment complex in the 2900 block of Rigsby Avenue. Police believe whoever shot himalso stole his shoes.Case:Homicide victim James Willie EdwardsDate:May 10, 2018Summary:James Willie Edwards, 48, was found shot to death on Thursday May 10, 2018 in the 7300 block of Harlow Drive.His child was found unharmed in one of the apartments.Case:Homicide victim Candida JimenezDate:March 22, 2018Summary:Candida Jimenez, 22, was gunned down  in an apartment complex in the 5900 block of Danny Kaye Drive.The suspect was dressed in all black with a white mask-like covering over his face, police said.Case:Homicide victim Ricardo AguirreDate:March 20, 2018Summary:Police initially found Aguirre dead inside a wrecked car in the 3800 block of San Fernando Street. Upon closer investigation,police determined Aguirre was shot multiple times.Case:Homicide victim Tammy FudgeDate:March 4, 2018Summary:Tammy Fudge, a homeless woman, was found dead around in a parking lot at the corner of North Flores and West Travis streets, near the Robert E. Lee Apartments.Police put out a sketch of a person of interest in the case.Case:Homicide victim Dina Kay MundineDate:Feb. 9, 2018Summary:Dina Kay Mundine, 65, was run over in the 1900 block of Culebra Road.The motorist failed to stop and render aid.Case:Homicide victim Robert Taylor Jr.Date:March 5, 2018Summary:Robert Taylor was fatally struck by a car as he crossed FM 78 near Lakeview Drive. One car that struck him remained and spoke to police, but two other sedans fled the scene.Case:Homicide victim Steve Monroe PickensDate:Sept. 6, 2018Summary:Steve Monroe Pickens, a 36-year-old paraplegic man, was killed in a drive-by shooting in the 100 block of Dafoste. Witnesses saw a black 2-door sedan leaving the scene after the shooting.Case:Homicide victim David D. BenavidesDate:Jan. 24, 2018Summary:David Benavides was killed in the 700 block of Runnels Avenue. Police said he was shot multiple times.Case:Homicide victim Diana MartinezDate:March 25, 2018Summary:Diana Martinez was found dead on a sidewalk near Denver Boulevard and Cherry Street. Police believe she was waiting on someone when she was shot to death.Case:Homicide victim Brandon CorneliusDate:June 23, 2018Summary:Brandon Cornelius, 25, was gunned down while sitting in a car at The Ridge Shopping Center.Police believe at least two suspects were involved in the shooting.Case:Deloris Marie DouressauxDate:March 28, 2018Summary:Deloris Douressaux, 61, was struck and killed by a car in Balcones Heights near Shadyview Drive. Police suspected the vehicle is an older model black Dodge or Chrysler.Case:Homicide victim Grace Abigail SewardDate:July 15, 2018Summary:After a night out at a San Antonio club, Grace Abigal Seward was shot and killed in the 100 block of Gorman Street.Police believe Seward was involved in an argument at the club.Case:Homicide victim Jai TurnerDate:January 21, 2018Summary:Jai Turner, 18, was fatally shot at the Windcrest Apartments in the 5300 block of Gawain.Police believe the killer was someone who knew him.Case:Homicide victim Jalil StewartDate:Sept. 10, 2018Summary:Jalil Stewart was killed during a drive-by in the 6600 block of Highland Grass.The shooters left behind more than 25 bullet casings on the street.Case:Homicide victim Jesus Guerra Jr.Date:March 2, 2018Summary:Jesus Guerra Jr., 49, was found dead on a vacant lot near the Alazan Creek Walkway. Police believe he was bashed in the head with a large rock they found near his body. His death was ruled a homicide.Case:Homicide victim Majdi AmmaryDate:April 16, 2018Summary:Majdi Ammary, 52, was riding a 2007 Yamaha scooter on the westbound access road of the 3900 block of Northwest Loop 410 when he was struck by a Honda Civic traveling at a high rate of speed. The drive fled the location and did not stop and render aid.A man accused of fatally shooting two people and injuring two others during a South Side home invasion was arrested Thursday and later hospitalized after he ingested an unknown substance, San Antonio police said.Jonathan Winston Johnson, 25, faces a charge of capital murder, police said.SAPD Chief William McManus said that Johnson was arrested without incident at about 6 p.m. on the East Side. After he was interviewed by detectives, Johnson was seen reaching deep into his pants pocket and swallowing a handful of an unknown substance.“He retrieved what we believe to be narcotics that he had concealed somewhere in the middle of his body,” McManus said.FIND OUT FIRST:Get San Antonio breaking news directly to your inboxOn Tuesday before 8 p.m., a gunman kicked down the door to a ground-level unit at the Robin's Nest Apartments, 538 Hot Wells, and began shooting.The Bexar County Medical Examiner’s Office said Andres Luis Rangel, 19, and Katrina Marie Casarez, 18, were struck multiple times and died in the apartment.Two women also were shot but survived the attack. One was shot in the chest, and the other was struck in the arm, McManus said. They were taken to area hospitals.One of the women told police that the suspect was wearing a bandana covering the bottom half of his face to conceal his identity.“Apparently he didn’t do a good enough job of that,” McManus said.RELATED:Graphic crime scene photos show aftermath of gun battle outside strip club involving SAPD officerThe chief said she recognized the shooter as Johnson because she had met him before the incident.The woman said that she was immediately hit by a bullet after the door came down, McManus said.“She believes that she only survived because she pretended to be dead,” he said.Johnson also allegedly shot at two of her children, both under 10 years old, but missed, McManus said.The chief said he could not release the motive behind the shooting because it is part of the investigation.Johnson is expected to face additional charges, police said.Jacob Beltran is a reporter covering San Antonio and Bexar County. Read him on ourfree site, mySA.com, and on oursubscriber site, ExpressNews.com. | jbeltran@express-news.net | Twitter: @JBfromSAJacob Beltran is a staff writer on the evening public safety beat at the San Antonio Express-News. He is completing a bachelor's degree in journalism from Texas A&M-San Antonio. Since beginning his journalism career in 2010, he's worked at local college newspaper The Ranger and The Mesquite.He is a San Antonio native who enjoys video games, photography, and exploring during his free time.WASHINGTON (FOX 5 DC)-Sources say a 30-year-old DC man has been arrested after five people - including an elementary-school-aged girl - were shot at a bus stop Monday in Southeast, D.C.RELATED: 4 shot at bus stop in Southeast DC; young girl injuredPolice say Ronnell Offutt, from Southeast DC was arrested, suspected of shooting a 5-year-old girl and four men on Monday near Pennsylvania Avenue and Minnesota Avenue before 6 p.m.Police say the young girl was initially injured by debris, but said on Wednesday in a press briefing that she had indeed been hit by a bullett.Police responded to multiple scenes after the victims ran away from the area.AdvertisementDOWNLOAD: The FOX 5 News app for breaking news in DCAuthorities said the victims' injuries were not life-threatening.This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed. ©2021 FOX Television StationsOne teen is dead and another is injured after a hit-and-run crash in Opelousas on Saturday night.Four people were injured after a shooting early Monday in a neighborhood off Plank Road.Baton Rouge police spokesman Sgt. Don Coppola Jr. said officers were called out around 3:20 a.m. to the 4000 block of Topeka Street. He said it appears all of the victims will survive their injuries.But the victims have not been cooperative with officers and the investigation remains ongoing, Coppola said.The shooting occurred near the intersection of Topeka Street and Weller Avenue in a residential neighborhood between Plank Road and Interstate 110.Can't see the map below?Click here.Purchases made via links on our site may earn us an affiliate commissionNews Tips:newstips@theadvocate.comOther questions:subscriberservices@theadvocate.comNeed help?WGN-TVby:Courtney GousmanCHICAGO — A drive-by shooting outside a South Side lounge left two men dead and five people wounded early Sunday, according to police.Around 2 a.m. Sunday, Chicago police say it began when a fight broke out inside Reynold’s Lounge at 75th and Ingleside Avenue. As people spilled outside, someone driving by in a grey four-door Ford fired shots on a crowd, striking seven people.Family members say 39-year-old Jermey Carothers and his best friend 36-year-old Marvin Powell were killed. Carothers was shot in the back and chest, and Powell was shot in the neck and chest, and they were rushed to University of Chicago Hospital where they were declared dead.Street Pastor Dr. Donovan Price was on the scene following the shooting.“People everywhere trying to scramble to find their loved ones who was hurt. Their friends who was hurt,” Price said.According to family, Carothers just celebrated his 39th birthday in January, and his relatives relatives were among the injured as well.Three of the people shot were women. A 36-year-old woman was shot in the foot and was taken to St. Bernard Hospital. The other two women were grazed in the foot and arm. A 36-year-old man is now in critical condition at Christ Hospital after being shot in the back.“Those type of lounges in a lot of cases, everybody knows each other. They’re frequented by the same people,” Price said.Price said when he arrived on the scene, a woman was in the street with a gunshot wound to her foot.“She was trying to get to her brother. She was just screaming, ‘Don’t worry about me. Don’t take care of me. I just want to get to my brother. I just want to find my brother.’”The only victim not in his 30s, an 18-year-old shot in the shoulder, was taken to University of Chicago Hospital in good condition. Police said it’s unclear if the people who were shot were the intended targets.“Chicago Police are looking at surveillance video footage that may shed some light on how this started, who were the perpetrators, and what happened,” community activist Andrew Holmes said.SubmitRAVENEL, S.C. (NEXSTAR) — A South Carolina meat processing and taxidermy business found a collection of bizarre items in the belly of a 445-pound alligator a customer brought in recently.Among the photos of turkey, deer and other game that people brought in recently to be processed, the 12-foot gator stands out among the Facebook photos Cordray's shared.CHICAGO — The Illinois Department of Public Health reported 3,630 new cases of COVID-19 and 13 deaths.The deaths were reported in the following counties:LONDON — Prince Philip’s royal ceremonial funeral will take place April 17 at Windsor Castle — a slimmed-down service amid the COVID-19 pandemic that will be entirely closed to the public.Philip, also known as the Duke of Edinburgh, took part in planning his funeral and its focus on family was in accordance with his wishes. The 99-year-old duke, who died Friday, also took part in designing the modified Land Rover that will carry his coffin.The suspect in last month's quadruple homicides in Palm Springs will undergo a psychiatric evaluation, a Riverside County judge ordered Thursday morning during a pre-trial appearance at the Larson Justice Center in Indio.Also, the judge set an Aug. 2 trial date for 19-year-old Jose Larin-Garcia, who has pleaded not guilty to multiple offenses including four counts of first-degree murder. He is being detained at the Cois M. Byrd Detention Facility in Murrieta."Bail remains at no bail," Superior Court Judge Charles Stafford said.Larin-Garcia's appearance Thursday happened very quickly as it was an information arraignment, a procedural pre-trial proceeding that usually follows a preliminary hearing, once a judge has decided there is enough evidence in a case to send a suspect on to trial.Prosecutors and Larin-Garcia's defense attorney, John Patrick Dolan, could not comment Thursday because of a gag order.Larin-Garcia is accused of killing three teens and an adult male.Shortly after 11:30 p.m. Feb. 3, Palm Springs police found the bodies of the teens, who had been shot-to-death, inside a crashed Toyota Corolla at Sunny Dunes and El Placer roads.  The fourth victim, who had also been fatally shot, was found a half-mile away outside his residence at Theresa and Canon drives.The teens were identified as Yuliana Garcia, 17, Juan Duarte Raya, 18, and Jacob Montgomery, 19. The adult victim was Carlos Campos, 25. Each victim had been shot in the head.Prosecutors said the killings may have involved an attempted robbery at Campos' apartment building, which is where his body was discovered. But they conceded during last month's preliminary hearing that a motive for the killings hadn't been determined.Police found Larin-Garcia hiding under a pickup truck  just a few blocks from the Toyota, which had collided with a Jeep at Sunny Dunes and El Placer roads. Paramedics took him to Desert Regional Medical Center in Palm Springs, but he left about 3:30 a.m.on Feb. 4 without telling anyone, according to court testimony.Teen victim:Teen killed months after overcoming painful past, family saysTeen victim:Girl killed in quadruple homicide was kind and had a "big heart"Teen victim:Cathedral City teen killed remembered as "grandma's boy"Investigators testified during the preliminary hearing that Larin-Garcia went to a Palm Springs home where he stayed on numerous occasions over the past two years.It's the home of Joseph Beaver, 51,who said he occasionally helps troubled youthget back on their feet and improve their lives.According to officers, Beaver retrieved Larin-Garcia's clothing from his home in Cathedral City and purchased bandages and a bus ticket to Tampa, Fla., for the suspect, who only told Beaver he was in trouble after getting in a traffic collision.Authorities later took Larin-Garcia into custody at the Indio Greyhound Station on Indio Boulevard the evening of Feb. 4. They never said how they tracked him to Indio.During the preliminary hearing, an official testifiedundercover officers interviewed Larin-Garciawhile he was in custody at the Larry D. Smith Correctional Facility in Banning."He told our agents that he was screwed and was concerned that his mother might be charged," Riverside County sheriff’s Investigator Jarred Bishop testified.Bishop added Larin-Garcia said there were potential witnesses who could identify him and he believed law enforcement had found a gun.Palm Springs police said no gun has been recovered.Desert Sun reporter Colin Atagi covers crime, public safety, and road and highway safety. He can be reached at Colin.Atagi@desertsun.com or follow him at @tdscolinatagiMenuSAN DIEGO (KGTV) - New video reveals the flurry of gunshots as a shooter unloaded on guests at a house party in Encanto Friday night, injuring 4 people..The shooting unfolded in the 6800 block of Springfield Street just before midnight in the home next door to Adeline Smith."Not much noise all night. I was in bed reading," said Smith.Smith said she heard the commotion of people streaming into her backyard.Across the street, a neighbor's Ring camera was too far away to capture much video, however it recorded about 20 seconds of shouting followed by a hail of gunfire. In all, some 20 rounds in quick succession are heard on the video. The video then falls silent. Nearly 20 seconds later, another 7 or 8 gunshots can be heard.Four party-goers were shot. One of them was critically injured, but 10news has learned he will survive. One witness says the theft of laptop may have started the fight that led to the shots."My reaction was anger. This shouldn't be happening here. It's a family neighborhood ... a wonderful place to live," said Smith.So far, police have few details about the suspect. This weekend, Smith says the hosts of the birthday party came over in person to apologize to her family. They told Smith they didn't know the people who started the trouble or the shooter.This new audio is now likely a central part of the police probe. One firearms expert says the amount of shots could mean the use of an illegally modified magazine. One neighbor believes there were between 50 and 100 people at the party.Anyone with information on the case in asked to call Crime Stoppers at 888-580-8477.HOUSTON — A former Houston police officer has been charged with murder in connection with the deadly January drug raid of a home that killed a couple who lived there and injured five officers, prosecutors announced Friday.Former officer Gerald Goines, who was shot in the ensuing gunfight during the Jan. 28 raid, is charged with two counts of felony murder after police accused him of lying in a search warrant about having a confidential informant buying heroin at the home. Goines later acknowledged there was no informant and that he bought the drugs himself, authorities said.Another former officer, Steven Bryant, was charged with tampering with a government record for allegedly providing false information in a report after the raid that supported Goines' story about a confidential informant."We recognize that the community has been violated, and I want to assure my fellow Houstonians and other residents of Harris County that we are getting to the truth," Harris County District Attorney Kim Ogg said at a news conference. "Each day we uncover more and with each fact, we work toward doing justice."Both former officers surrendered to authorities Friday afternoon and appeared at a bond hearing.Attorneys for both Goines and Bryant did not immediately return phone calls or emails seeking comment Friday. Goines' attorney, Nicole DeBorde, previously said he has done nothing wrong.If convicted, Goines faces up to life in prison. Bryant faces up to two years in state jail.Killed in the raid were Rhogena Nicholas, 58, and Dennis Tuttle, 59.Family and friends of Tuttle and Nicholas have dismissed allegations the couple sold drugs. Police found small amounts of marijuana and cocaine in the house, but no heroin.Initially, Houston police maintained that after officers entered the home, Nicholas tried to take a shotgun from an officer and was fatally shot by officers who saw what was happening. But an independent review by the family of Nicholas cast doubt on that portrayal.After the shooting, prosecutors began reviewing more than 2,000 cases tied to Goines and Bryant. In June, prosecutors said their investigation has grown into a probe of 14,000 cases handled by the Houston Police Department's narcotics division.Ogg said prosecutors decided to file charges instead of waiting to present the case to a grand jury because they feared the two officers might flee the area and they feared for the safety of witnesses.The case is still set to be presented to a grand jury in the next few weeks and the panel could file additional charges against the two officers or charges against other officers, Ogg said."The purpose of the broader investigation is ... to determine if this was single act by rogue officers or whether it's part of a greater and pre-existing problem in that squad," Ogg said.HOUSTON — A former Houston police officer has been charged with murder in connection with the deadly January drug raid of a home that killed a couple who lived there and injured five officers, prosecutors announced Friday.Former officer Gerald Goines, who was shot in the ensuing gunfight during the Jan. 28 raid, is charged with two counts of felony murder after police accused him of lying in a search warrant about having a confidential informant buying heroin at the home. Goines later acknowledged there was no informant and that he bought the drugs himself, authorities said.Another former officer, Steven Bryant, was charged with tampering with a government record for allegedly providing false information in a report after the raid that supported Goines' story about a confidential informant."We recognize that the community has been violated, and I want to assure my fellow Houstonians and other residents of Harris County that we are getting to the truth," Harris County District Attorney Kim Ogg said at a news conference. "Each day we uncover more and with each fact, we work toward doing justice."Both former officers surrendered to authorities Friday afternoon and appeared at a bond hearing.Attorneys for both Goines and Bryant did not immediately return phone calls or emails seeking comment Friday. Goines' attorney, Nicole DeBorde, previously said he has done nothing wrong.If convicted, Goines faces up to life in prison. Bryant faces up to two years in state jail.Killed in the raid were Rhogena Nicholas, 58, and Dennis Tuttle, 59.Family and friends of Tuttle and Nicholas have dismissed allegations the couple sold drugs. Police found small amounts of marijuana and cocaine in the house, but no heroin.Initially, Houston police maintained that after officers entered the home, Nicholas tried to take a shotgun from an officer and was fatally shot by officers who saw what was happening. But an independent review by the family of Nicholas cast doubt on that portrayal.After the shooting, prosecutors began reviewing more than 2,000 cases tied to Goines and Bryant. In June, prosecutors said their investigation has grown into a probe of 14,000 cases handled by the Houston Police Department's narcotics division.Ogg said prosecutors decided to file charges instead of waiting to present the case to a grand jury because they feared the two officers might flee the area and they feared for the safety of witnesses.The case is still set to be presented to a grand jury in the next few weeks and the panel could file additional charges against the two officers or charges against other officers, Ogg said."The purpose of the broader investigation is ... to determine if this was single act by rogue officers or whether it's part of a greater and pre-existing problem in that squad," Ogg said.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Austin American-Statesman  ~ 305 S Congress Ave, Austin, TX 78704~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKFrom The Trussville Tribune staff reportsBIRMINGHAM — A Sunday night shooting in Birmingham sent five people to area hospitals with gunshot wounds. At least two of the victims have life-threatening injuries, according to Birmingham Police Sgt. Johnny Williams. The suspect is still at large.The shooting occurred at about 8:40 p.m. near Avenue O and Warrior Road in the Bellview area, according toCarol Robinson.The victims include four adults who were rushed to UAB Hospital and a juvenile who was taken to Children’s of Alabama.The suspect began firing at a Dodge Avenger occupied by the victims and continued shooting for several blocks. The vehicle finally came to a stop in the 1400 block of 45th Street in Ensley.“We’ve got to get the community to get involved,” Williams told Robinson. “They were after someone. You don’t just randomly go shooting a group of people.”Anyone with information related to this crime should call Birmingham Police at 205-254-1764 or Crime Stoppers at 205-254-7777.2021 Proudly Managed byAdam Black MediaKLFYby:The Associated PressLIVINGSTON, La. (AP) — An August trial date has been set for a manaccused of a killing five peoplein Louisiana last year.Dakota Theriot, 22, appeared Monday in state district court in Livingston Parish where a judge set trial for Aug. 10. But the trial might be delayed until 2021 as defense attorneys deal with scheduling conflicts, The Advocate reported.Prosecutors said Theriot fatally shot his girlfriend, Summer Ernest, along with her dad and brother in Livingston Parish before driving to neighboring Ascension Parish and shooting his parents in their trailer last January. They said Theriot had been living with Ernest’s family after getting kicked out of his parents’ home.A trial date hasn’t been set in Ascension Parish.Authorities arrested Theriot at his grandmother’s home about 50 miles northeast of Richmond, Virginia, following a brief but nationally publicized manhunt.Theriot faces five counts of first-degree murder for the killings of Summer, Tanner and Billy Ernest and his parents, Keith and Elizabeth Theriot. Each count carries the potential for the death penalty if convicted.A judge has revoked bail, so Theriot has remained at Louisiana State Penitentiary at Angola. He was at Monday’s hearing, wearing an orange jail jumpsuit with his hands and legs shackled, but he did not speak.Theriot pleaded not guilty to the five murder charges, but it’s still unclear if his defense team plans to seek an insanity defense or present evidence arguing he isn’t competent to stand trial.Assistant District Attorney Kurt Wall said his office recently received some material about Theriot’s mental health from his lawyers, but he declined to say what they were about. If Theriot’s attorneys do change his plea to not guilty by reason of insanity, it could lead to further hearings on whether he’s able to assist in his defense — and whether he could tell right from wrong during the alleged killings.“It could halt everything,” Wall said.Theriot’s lawyer, Elliot Brown, said Monday he’s unavailable for a two-week trial because of another capital murder trial, which could further delay proceedings.Judges in the 21st Judicial District preside over criminal and civil cases, and their schedules are often set a year in advance, which doesn’t allow for much flexibility for changing trial dates.Brown declined to comment on the case because it’s still in the early stages. Evidence they’ve filed with the courts is not publicly available.Prosecutors’ decision to seek the death penalty means stricter requirements that will draw out the length of the trial. Capital cases require additional steps, like requiring that defendants are represented by experienced defense lawyers.Wall said waiting a year for this trial is not unusual. He said murder cases can take more than a year to get to trial even when the death penalty isn’t at stake.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.ST. LANDRY PARISH, La. (KLFY) St. Landry Parish President Jessie Bellard has confirmed a fatality related to an early morning possible tornado on Bolton Road in Palmetto.Bellard tells KLFY Jose Antonio Higareda was killed when the tornado struck the home he was living in.   He was 27 years old.METAIRIE, LA — 11-year old Lily Lopinto has a big heart and a real knack for selling lemonade.  The girl donated $2,400 that she raised from her lemonade stand to help cover the medical costs of a dog that was badly burned during a cold spell this past winter.Lily is the daughter of Jefferson Parish Sheriff Joe Lopinto.  She raised the money to help Sadie, a dog that was badly burned when a space heater caught some straw on fire inside her doghouse, says the Humane Society of Louisiana.NEW ORLEANS - NOPD believes carjackings across the city are becoming more dangerous as armed thieves are doing whatever they have to do to steal people's cars.In fact, a woman is in the hospital after getting run over in a carjacking earlier this week.INDIANAPOLIS (WTHR) - One of the victims of a mass shooting over the weekend at an Indianapolis bar is sharing his story of survival with Eyewitness News.The victim told Eyewitness News he never made it past the front door at the bar before the shooting started, with bullets flying right by him and one striking him.Five people were shotat the bar in the 2900 block of N. Sherman Drive early Saturday morning.“The bullet went in my buttock and came out my groin,” said Aaron Herbert. “All you heard was like a 'Bam!' and then 'rat, tat, rat, tat, tat!' and when he ran up he was walking closer, 'rat, tat, rat, tat, tat.'"Aaron arrived at the bar around 2 a.m. Saturday where he went through security. That included a pat down, showing identification and actually signing in on a log sheet by name.Herbert drives a semi for a living and had just got off the road to celebrate another driver's birthday with other truckers. He had already been in communication with his friends by CB radio who were also headed to Indianapolis from out of state. Aaron was carrying a load from Columbus, Ohio to Chicago.He had no clue what had just went down 45 minutes earlier with the suspect. Herbert learned from people already at the bar about the suspect's actions inside the bar before he was kicked out by management.“He was there earlier arguing with a female and security, they don't play that stuff there, you out,” he said.Metro Police arrested 38-year-old Dejuan Brown who reportedly shot three men and two women in all. By Monday morning, two of the victims had been released from the hospital, which included Aaron. The semi driver told Eyewitness News he will never forget Brown’s eyes, despite his attempt to disguise himself during the alleged shooting.“Eye-to-eye contact, yes sir, he had a bandana on like this," Aaron said as he used his hands to cover half of his face from the bridge of his nose downward.Dejuan Brown has been in and out of jail 13 times since 2003. This is his 14th arrest. His past trouble is mostly for public intoxication, but also driving without a license, resisting law enforcement, plus dealing and possession of narcotic drugs.Herbert shared that as Brown reportedly emptied his 9mm handgun, the alleged shooter had his hand on Aaron’s shoulder for leverage. After the handgun emptied of ammunition, Aaron realized Brown pointed the gun at his chest and tried to fire one more time.Herbert also told Eyewitness News that witnesses told him the bar managers had Brown's ID information from when he signed in during his first visit to the bar.Ironically, art on bar outside wall reads, "Stopping the violence starts with you," with a bottle labeled "Non-violence juice."But Aaron argues violence can happen anywhere.“It can happen anywhere. It happens in churches and all that. It's one of those things that the devil is busy," he said.After surviving what happened at the bar, Aaron plans to attend every hearing of the suspect to let the courts know and police the impact the shooting has had on his life.Brown is scheduled to attend an initial hearing January 29, 2019 at 1:30 p.m. at the City-County Building. Right now, he is being held at the Marion County Jail, facing five felony charges related to the shooting.Notifications can be turned off anytime in the browser settings.A teenagershot in the head during a candlelight vigil in Newarkon Saturday night has died of her injuries, Essex County prosecutors confirmed.Jayla Green, 16, was attending a vigil for two teens killed in a car crash on Bergen Street, when someone opened fire, striking four young women, ages 16 to 20.The three other victims were shot in the legs and listed in stable condition, while Green was hospitalized in critical condition at University HospitalNo arrests have been announced in the case.A GoFundMe created for Jayla’s familyindicated she died Monday. The fundraiser had collected about $2,300 toward a $15,000 goal as of Friday.Jayla as a cheerleader at her high school, according to a PIX11 News report, though the high school was not named.The Essex County Sheriff Office is offering a reward of up to $50,000 for information leading to the arrest and conviction of those responsible for the vigil shooting.Tips may be made to the 24-hour Crime Stopper at 1-877-NWK-TIPS (1-877-695-8477) or 1-877-NWK-GUNS (1-877-695-4867). Anonymous tips may also be made using the police websitewww.newarkpd.org.Green and the other victimswere attending a vigil for Quadre Robinson, 17, and Quayim Battle, 19, who died Jan. 25. They were occupants of a car that had been reported stolen in Elizabeth.Matt Gray may be reached atmgray@njadvancemedia.com. Follow him on Twitter@MattGraySJT.FindNJ.com on Facebook.Have a tip?Tell us:nj.com/tips.Get the latest updates right in your inbox.Subscribe to NJ.com's newsletters.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesCredit: Polk County Sheriff's OfficeCredit: Polk County Sheriff's OfficePolk County’s top prosecutor on Monday announced his intent to seek the death penalty against Daylon Delon Gamble, who is accused in two separate double homicides in Rockmart.Gamble is facing four counts of murder in the January deaths of his aunt, Helen Rose Mitchell, 48, a cousin, Jaequnn Davis, 19, and two others, 24-year-old Arkeyla Perry and 26-year-old Dadrian Cummings.Documents obtained by AJC.com show District Attorney Jack Browning filed a notice of intent to pursue the death penalty against Gamble. The documents cite his charges and claimed the homicides were “outrageously or wantonly vile, horrible or inhuman, in that (they) involved depravity of mind.”The bodies of Mitchell and Davis were found in a home on Williamson Street, and Perry and Cummings were found about 300 yards away at a home on Rome Street. A fifth person, 24-year-old Peerless Brown, was shot in the face at the Williamson Street home but survived.RELATED:4 victims ID'd in deadly NW Georgia shootingCredit: Channel 2 Action NewsCredit: Channel 2 Action NewsBrown previously told Channel 2 Action News that Gamble was his cousin, and the family had not seen or heard from him in several years before he turned up on their doorstep that night. Brown had just pulled into the driveway when he spotted him.“When I got out of the car, I asked him what he was doing, and he said nothing,” Gamble said in an interview with the news station. “He shot me — didn’t say nothing.”MORE:Polk County mass shooting victim says his cousin 'didn't say nothing' before firingCredit: WSBTV.comCredit: WSBTV.comAt the time, Gamble was paroled on a 2011 attempted armed robbery and burglary conviction out of Bartow County. He was released from state prison in June 2016, records show.He was on the run for three daysafter the shootings until being arrested in Indianapolis by U.S. marshals, according to the GBI.Gamble was initially scheduled for an arraignment hearing Monday in Polk County Superior Court until Browning told the court he would seek capital punishment, the Polk County Standard Journal reported.As a result, the proceedings stalled until Gamble’s attorney could be present, the newspaper reported. No date has been set.Read more of the story here.In other news:WFLAby:WFLA 8 On Your Side StaffAt least five people are dead after a gunman walked into a central Florida bank and opened fire on Wednesday afternoon, authorities say.Sebring police officials say 21-year-old Zephen Xaver called 911 around 12:30 p.m. Wednesday and reported that he had fired shots inside the SunTrust Bank on US-27 South in Sebring.Xaver is a former correctional officer trainee at the Avon Park Correctional Institution. He worked there for less than two months.The Sebring police chief confirmed the fatalities at a Wednesday evening press conference.“This has been a tragic day for our community. We’ve suffered a significant loss at the hands of a senseless criminal doing a senseless crime,” Sebring Police Chief Karl Hoglund said.Sebring police officers and Highlands County deputies responded to the scene after the call came in and established a perimeter around the bank. Our news helicopter flying over the scene saw a massive law enforcement presence as police tried to negotiate with the man barricaded inside.Police were unsuccessful at first but say the man eventually surrendered after the Highlands County SWAT team went into the bank and continued to negotiate.“At first [SWAT] hooked some cables up to it [bank door], tried to rip the doors off. The door handles came right off. Then they just drove the SWAT machine right through the door,” said witness Stefan Roehrig.Roehrig saw police take Xaver out of the bank in handcuffs and recorded cell phone video.“The suspect, they slammed him pretty good I think and brought him out here,” he said.“He was young, very young.”Gov. Ron DeSantis traveled to Highlands County to provide an update alongside law enforcement Wednesday evening.“Obviously this is an individual that needs to face very swift and exacting justice,” he said of Xaver.None of the shooting victims have been identified yet. Families are still being notified.“We ask that you please keep them in your prayers, keep them in your thoughts,” Chief Hoglund said. “Help Sebring and our community stay strong.”The sheriff’s office asked co-workers and family members of anyone who was inside the bank during the incident should go to the Inn on the Lakes on Gulfview Road.Bill Rogers, SunTrust CEO and Chairman, issued the following statement:We are deeply saddened by the tragic shooting at our Sebring, Florida branch this afternoon. We are working with law enforcement officials and dedicating ourselves to supporting the people and families impacted by this horrible and senseless tragedy. Our entire team mourns this terrible loss.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.HIGHLANDS COUNTY, Fla. (WFLA) - UPDATE 6 P.M.: Officials say Destiny Snyder has been found and is safe. The Florida Missing Child Alert has been canceled.ORIGINAL STORY: A Florida Missing Child Alert has been issued for a 16-year-old girl from Highlands County.TAMPA (WFLA) – The Florida Department of Health added a total of 7,121 new coronavirus cases in Friday's report, bringing the cumulative number of cases in the state to 2,111,807.On Thursday, more than 155,000 people received the COVID-19 vaccine, according to the Florida Department of Health.TAMPA (WFLA) – The Florida Department of Health added a total of 7,939 new coronavirus cases in Thursday's report, bringing the cumulative number of cases in the state to 2,104,686.On Wednesday, more than 156,000 people received the COVID-19 vaccine, according to the Florida Department of Health.Peter Burke, Local10.com Managing EditorSanela Sabovic, ReporterPeter Burke, Local10.com Managing EditorSanela Sabovic, ReporterMIAMI-DADE COUNTY, Fla.– Four people, including two teenage girls, were wounded in a shooting during a block party Sunday night in southwest Miami-Dade County, police said.The shooting occurred shortly after 11 p.m. at 26133 SW 139th Ave. Witnesses told Local 10 News that the party was to celebrate a girl's 15th birthday.Miami-Dade police Detective Alvaro Zabaleta said a group of people were standing in the parking lot when someone opened fire, shooting two adults and two teens."Then all you see is people shooting, doing all that, people running. I see people running, falling down," Exzavier Goodman said.Caridad Rivera lives in the complex right next to where the party took place. She said she heard gunshot after gunshot ring out and a stray bullet even pierced her window."I could have got shot. It went through the window," she said.Zabaleta said two men, a 17-year-old girl and a 15-year-old girl were injured in the shooting.Some people in attendance at the party identified one of the girls who was shot as Takira Callaway. They said the 15-year-old was shot twice, while the older girl, identified only as Kearra, was shot in the leg.All of the victims were taken to area hospitals in stable condition.Callaway later posted photos of her wounds on social media, writing, "Thank you, God, I'm good."Her friends said she has already been released from the hospital.A motive for the shooting was not immediately known, however, police believe the shooter was a man who attended the party.Anyone with further information is asked to call Miami-Dade Crime Stoppers at 305-471-8477.Copyright 2019 by WPLG Local10.com - All rights reserved.Sanela Sabovic joined Local 10 News in September 2012 as an assignment editor and associate producer. In August 2015, she became a full-time reporter and fill-in traffic reporter. Sanela holds a Bachelor of Arts degree in communications with a concentration in radio, television and film from DePaul University.If you need help with the Public File, call (954) 364-2526.Sean SykesA Harrisburg man wanted on nearly 40 criminal charges stemming froma Jan. 19 shootingin Lebanon was arrested Thursday by members of a U.S. Marshals Service task force.Sean Sykes, 28, of Harrisburg was arrested Thursday morning, when members of the U.S. Marshals Service Fugitive Task Force found him at a home on the 100 block of East Cottage Place in York, officials announced in an afternoon news release.Sykes was wanted on charges stemming from a Jan. 19 shooting on the 1000 block of Church Street in Lebanon.There, police said more than 20 shots were fired into a building and four people — a 36-year-old Lebanon man, a 47-year-old Palmyra man, a 48-year-old North Cornwall Township woman and a 64-year-old Lebanon woman — were injured.Police said the building was targeted in the shooting.Sykes is one of three suspects believed to have been involved in the shooting, police said.Theother two suspectsEric McGill, 26, of Lebanon and Dominique Shumate, 28, of no permanent address were arrested shortly after the shooting following a brief police chase, officers announced at that time.Sykes escaped, police said.Local police were unable to locate Sykes and asked members of the U.S. Marshals Service to investigate, according to the Thursday release.The investigation led task force members to the East Cottage Place home, and Sykes was “arrested without incident,” officials said.Online court documents show that Sykes faces39 criminal charges, including felony counts of criminal attempted homicide, conspiracy, aggravated assault and possession of a firearm when prohibited.According to the release, Sykes was turned over to the York County Sheriff’s Office, and he will be extradited to Lebanon County.Note to readers: if you purchase something through one of our affiliate links we may earn a commission.Registration on or use of this site constitutes acceptance of ourUser Agreement,Privacy Policy and Cookie Statement,andYour California Privacy Rights(each updated 1/1/21).Cookie Settings©2021Advance Local Media LLC. All rights reserved (About Us).The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, cached or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Advance Local.Community Rulesapply to all content you upload or otherwise submit to this site.Ad ChoicesA Shelby man is charged with murder and at least two others involved in the case could be in the area, according to officials.Kenyon Corneluies Hopper, 36, is charged with murder and four counts of attempted murder after a shooting at the Sugar Shack Nightclub in Gaffney, S.C., according to Cherokee County Sheriff Steve Mueller.The shooting occurred at 1435 Wilcox Avenue on Jan. 19. Twenty-three-year-old Montreal Jordan McMullins was killed, and a 29-year-old man and three women, ages 31, 32 and 38, were injured.McMullins' mother, Kisha Black, spoke during Hopper's bond hearing Wednesday afternoon."You not only took my son, you took my friend," Black said. "I can't sleep and can't eat… I haven't been right since my baby died. I want to get justice for my son."Gang-related incidentMore than 60 rounds were fired during the altercation, and investigators believe the incident to have been gang-related.Shelby Police officers found Hopper at a home on Northern Street in Shelby, and warrants were issued late Monday afternoon. He was arrested without incident.Hopper was arraigned in North Carolina Tuesday and waived extradition and returned to Cherokee County, S.C.The shooting occurred just before 3:30 a.m. Along with the five people shot, at least four vehicles were struck by gunfire. Mueller said an altercation led up to the shooting.Police reviewed video footage at the club to identify suspects.The Cherokee County Sheriff's Office worked with the Cleveland County Sheriff's Office and Shelby Police Department to help identify the suspect.Gang issuesCleveland County investigators have highlighted issues with gangs in recent years.Shelby Police Chief Jeff Ledford credits residents with helping identifying suspects and encourages them to pay attention to illegal activity. He lauds partnerships with partnering together to make arrests.He said that while some people embrace gang life, there are consequences for all involved and innocent people who never signed on for the aftermath.“While it's a glorified lifestyle to some, it's a dangerous lifestyle… It's impacting the community,” he said.Issues at the clubOver the past 90 days, there have been three shootings at the Gaffney night spot.In 2018, Mueller met with the club's owner to provide guidance on how the business might be able to provide better security and a safer environment for customers. Since then, deputies have responded to a number of fight and shooting calls at the night club.Mueller is working with the Solicitor's Office to have the business declared a nuisance.Convicted felonHopper is no stranger to the court system, or prison. He has prior convictions out of Cleveland County for felony hit and run, drug possession, habitual felon and possession of a firearm by a felon.Investigators asked that anyone with information call the Cherokee County Sheriff's Office at 864-489-4722, Ext. 117, or call CrimeStoppers at 1-888-CrimeSC or 888-274-6372.Reporter Joyce Orlando contributed to this report.© Gannett Co., Inc. 2021. All rights reserved.Original content available for non-commercial use under a Creative Commons license, except where noted.Shelby Star  ~ 315 East Graham Street, Shelby, NC 28150~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Cookie Policy~Do Not Sell My Personal Information~Privacy Policy~Terms Of Service~Your California Privacy Rights / Privacy PolicyGannett | USA TODAY NETWORKChoose the plan that’s right for you. Digital access or digital and print delivery.Filed under:A street brawl resulted in three women and one man getting shot Saturday morning in the West Garfield Park neighborhood on the West Side.At 2:01 a.m., the four of them were “involved in a fight on the street” in the 4400 block of West Madison when gunshots rang out, according to Chicago police. It was unclear who the shooter was.The three women — ages 26, 28 and 35 — were all shot in the leg and taken to Stroger Hospital, police said. The man, 44, was grazed in the right thigh and walked into West Suburban Hospital in Oak Park.Area North detectives are investigating.Know about breaking news as it happens. We follow the stories and update you as they develop.After months of virtual brain training, teams of students from two local universities tested their knowledge and wit this weekend at a national collegiate quiz bowl deemed the "Super Bowl of the mind."Here’s the latest news on how COVID-19 is impacting Chicago and Illinois.Republican lawmakers have sought to limit the power of Democratic governors in states such as Kansas, Kentucky and North Carolina. But they also have sought to rein in fellow Republican governors in such states as Arkansas, Idaho, Indiana and Ohio.Gorden said her and her boyfriend, who are Black, were harassed by a security guard at BBVA Stadium in Houston after he tried to speak with her near the field following the opening match.Illinois is vaccinating more people per day than ever, but the state is also facing its third coronavirus resurgence.Zach LaVine would have traded his first-career 50-point game for a win over the Hawks, but LaVine shouldn’t feel that bad. Of the 10 players to hit 50-plus points in a game this season, their teams are 6-4.Ashley Spicer, Reporter, anchorAshley Spicer, Reporter, anchorJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– Two of the four people shot early Saturday morning in what police described as a double murder-suicide in a Westside home are recovering at UF Health Jacksonville.Police said Jacoby King, 26, shot and killed 33-year-old Ryan Chesser and Chesser's 32-year-old cousin, Eric Bryant, in a home on Brian Lakes Drive, off Normandy Boulevard. Friends told News4Jax that Chesser was King's ex-boyfriend, although King’s mother told News4Jax that the two did not date.Greg Gleason and Jessica Carter, roommates of Chesser, were said to be in critical condition when they were taken to the hospital. Gleason’s parents are to arrive Monday night to be by his side. News4Jax was told he is going to survive and is able to pass notes to Carter, who is doing better, but whose jaw is wired shut and still has a bullet lodged in her head.Carter's mother said it's a miracle she's alive. News4Jax was told Carter has a young daughter.Frankie Prescott said she couldn't believe when she heard Chesser was dead."An angel on Earth," Prescott said of Chesser. "For someone to do that, he’s a monster. To take lives, to tear families apart. The ripple that he’s caused through so many lives in so many families. He’s a monster."Hughes said Chesser was popular because he was so outgoing and sweet to everyone he met."Everybody in the community loved him," Hughes said. "He's definitely going to be missed."A member of Chesser's family released a statement saying, "We just really want him to be remembered as the flamboyant, outgoing, fun-loving, exaggerated, no-filter spark of joy that he was."Prescott and other friends confirmed that King dated Chesser last year."The people in the gay community have seen both of them out," said Christian Hughes, another friend of Chesser. "A lot of people know that they were dating, so I don't know why his mom said that he was not dating Ryan when he was."There will be a remembrance for Chesser at 9 p.m. Saturday at Realities Bar and Lounge on Lane Avenue.Copyright 2019 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.Lifetime Floridian anchors weekends and reports weekdays on issues in Nassau and Baker counties and beyond.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.A homeowner shot four men who forced their way into his home about 12:45 a.m. Saturday on Sherman, Houston police say. One suspect died in front of the home. Another was shot in the leg and was found at the scene. Two other suspects fled in an SUV, but the driver collapsed a few blocks down 71st at Harrisburg, where he crashed into a pole. He died there. The fourth male fled on foot, but collapsed at Capitol and 71st. He later died at a hospital.UPDATE:Randy Torres was a 18-year-old Hispanic man who died January 19 from gunshot wounds at 7041 Sherman Street, Houston.Jonathan Flores was a 24-year-old Hispanic man who died January 19 from a gunshot wound at 7041 Sherman Street, Houston.Joseph Montoya was a 20-year-old Hispanic man who died January 19 from multiple gunshot wounds at 7041 Sherman Street, Houston.ORIGINAL STORY:Three men are dead and a fourth was injured after an East End homeowner opened fire in self defense during an apparent home invasion early Saturday, authorities said.Shortly before 1 a.m., police said, four suspects forced their way into a home on Sherman near 71st, triggering a shootout that left scores of yellow police evidence markers in the street.One of the alleged robbers died at the scene. Two others fled in a vehicle before hitting a pole two blocks away; one man was found dead in the vehicle, and the other collapsed one block away. He was transported to the hospital, where he died.SUSPECT SOUGHT:Police identify teen in deadly shootingPolice said the homeowner was not hurt.Houston Police Department homicide detective Travis Miller said police believe all those involved in the incident are accounted for.Mike Morris has covered City Hall for the Chronicle since early 2013, having covered Harris County government for two years prior to that. Before coming to Houston, he covered local government, agriculture, business and sports at daily and weekly newspapers in southern Indiana and central Ohio. He covers all things policy and politics in the nation's fourth-largest city, explaining the roots of today's complex problems and exposing public corruption and failing programs. In 2012, he won the Texas Associated Press Managing Editors' annual Freedom of Information award and was a Livingston Award finalist for a series of stories documenting rampant mismanagement at the Harris County Housing Authority.OWENSBORO, KY (WFIE) - Police gave updates Friday afternoon on the quadruple shooting in Owensboro.Click here for Thursday’s coverage.The shooting happened Thursday around 11 a.m. in the 900 block of Audubon Avenue.Police say two people were found dead in the home, and a man and a woman went to the hospital. One of those two victims later died at the hospital, while the other remains in critical condition.Police say Arnett B. Baines (30 of Owensboro) and Cylar L. Shemwell (31 of Owensboro) have both been charged with 3 counts of Murder and one count of Assault in the 1st Degree in relation to this case.The Daviess County Coroner’s Office says the victims are Jay Michael Sowders (43), Robert D. Smith Jr (35) and Christopher Carie (18 ).The fourth victim, Carmen R. Vanegas (35) is currently being treated for her injuries.Copyright 2019 WFIE. All rights reserved.Jill has been with 14 News since 2005. She has worked as a video journalist, producer, assignment manager, and digital manager.1115 Mt. Auburn RoadEvansville, IN 47720(812) 426-1414A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.Destiny McKeiverDestiny McKeiverJACKSONVILLE, Fla.– A father of two people shot in a mass shooting last month is speaking out about the state of Jacksonville and what he feels needs to happen to stop the violence.The father, Abdul Robinson, was also wounded in theJan. 16  mass shootingthat happened after a rap event at a gentlemen's club. A total of six people were shot, one of whom died. The man who died was Robinson's 25-year-old son, Willie Addison,who was an aspiring rapper.Addison was in a truck with five other people at the time of the shooting, which was described as being gang-related. His father, who was driving, said he had to act fast."I guess two or three cars pulled up on the side of us and shot inside our car over a hundred times, killed my son in the front seat, shot my son in the back -- in the head --  three times, shot my nephew several times. A couple more passengers in there were shot several times, numerous times," Robinson said. "I drove all the way from there to Memorial Hospital, shot in the back myself twice."It's been a month and no arrests have been made in the shooting.Robinson told News4Jax on Wednesday that he’s been through a lot, including his own trouble on the streets of Jacksonville, but he now wants to clear the air."I went to prison. I did 11 years in prison. I got out in 2009 and I haven’t been in no trouble with the law until a couple months ago -- nothing serious -- and we aren’t getting the same treatment as a victim," Robinson said. "I’m not saying the police aren’t working or doing their job. I don’t want to say that."What Robinson is saying is that with there being 22 murders in the first two months of 2019, he wants people to know he’s not retaliating for the murder of his son, Addison, and the critical shooting of his other son, Abdul Robinson Jr."I want justice for my son. I'm not sending anyone out there. I'm supposed to have 'hits,'" Robinson said.Robinson said people need to put the guns down and let police do their jobs.“I’m no angel, but I want justice for my son,” Robinson said.He said he doesn’t thinkelected officials asking that the National Guard be called in to patrol Jacksonville's streetswill work to reduce the violence in the city. He said it’s going to take people from the streets to reach back and help the younger generation to turn their lives around."I think just as well as them talking about bringing the National Guard in and all that, it’s going to be a challenge to the younger guys or whoever's out here in the streets doing what they do," Robinson said.He is willing to do so, he’s just not sure exactly where he can help.Copyright 2019 by WJXT News4Jax - All rights reserved.If you need help with WJXT’s or WCWJ's FCC public inspection file, call (904) 393-9801.Phoenix police have identified the 18-year-old woman who was killed after ashooting at a Phoenix hotelSunday that also left five others wounded.Fiasia Perry was pronounced dead at a hospital on Sunday after she was shot shortly before 11:30 a.m. at the Pay Less Inn near 25th and Van Buren streets, police said.The shooting happened after a 19-year-old man, who police said is considered a suspect in the shooting, arrived at the hotel with an unidentified man. The two men argued with a group on the second floor, police said and multiple shots were fired from both sides, police said.In all, six people were shot — including Perry and the 19-year-old man, whose name was not released. Police said the other four who were shot included a man and woman, both 41, a 30-year-old woman and a 26-year-old man. All were expected to survive their injuries.Police are still seeking the unknown man who arrived at the hotel with the 19-year-old suspect.Anyone with information may call the Phoenix Police Department at 480-948-6377 or 480-TESTIGO.READ MORE:KRQE News 13 Albuquerque - Santa FeRoswell police have made an arrest in a shooting that left four people injured at an underage party.Blood still covers the sidewalk outside where a shooting happened on West College Boulevard in Roswell early Sunday.Witnesses tell police 22-year-old Isaac Ray Chavez Jr. starting fighting with another man in front of a house where a party was being held. He then pulled out a gun and started shooting.Next-door neighbor Randolph Crow looked out his window after hearing shots ring out.“I think it’s senseless with a vicious intent,” said Crow. “No reasoning behind it.”Four men — ages 18 to 21 — were hit. One victim was shot in the chest and is stable, the other three have non life-threatening injuries.KRQE News 13 spoke to the homeowner off camera, who says the trouble came to the home and his friends were the victims.“They’re really good neighbors. They go to college, and they have a job, too,” said Crow.The reason for the fight is still unclear.Police say a nearby officer saw some cars speed away from the scene.“He followed them and attempted to pull them over…they didn’t stop. Turns out, those vehicles were taking some of the victims to the hospital,” said Todd Wildermuth, Roswell Police Department spokesman.Chavez Jr. Was arrested Sunday afternoon on several charges, including aggravated assault.“We’re happy now that everybody’s doing okay. We have to say our prayers for one person that’s in Lubbock,” said Crow.Police believe Chavez Jr. may not have been the only shooter. They are asking for the public’s help in identifying at least one other possible suspect.If you have any information on the case, contact the Roswell Police Department at 575-624-6770.Copyright 2021 Nexstar Inc. All rights reserved. This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten, or redistributed.NEW MEXICO (KRQE) - New Mexico State Police are seeking assistance in locating an endangered Radium Springs woman. Mary Ellen Emily Quintana, 73, told her family she was going to Española, NM.It is unknown when she left Radium Springs or when she arrived in Española. Her 1994 green Ford Explorer was located by NMSp abandoned on State Road 76 near mile marker 13 near Cordova, NM.The Census Bureau in April 2020 launched a Household Pulse Survey providing weekly updates on how individuals and families have been affected during the pandemic. Data show ongoing difficulties in finding work, affording food, and paying the rent. Meanwhile, the pandemic has created a “seesaw effect” on rent, with rental rates in the most expensive U.S. cities dropping while rental rates have gone up in historically less expensive areas.Story continues belowFARMINGTON, N.M. (KRQE) - Some local businesses said they are anxious for the new liquor laws to go into effect this summer, hoping they will help revitalize downtown areas. Farmington businesses said they hope these new laws will put them on a more level playing field with nearby tourist spots like Durango and bring more activity downtown.Boons Family Thai BBQ has been a Farmington staple for more than a decade. "The downtown area, we have kind of been an anchor restaurant for the last 15 years," owner Morey Havens said.A parolee who allegedly killed three men and wounded four others at a bowling alley in Torrance about 2 1/2 months ago pleaded not guilty Tuesday to triple murder and other charges.Reginald Leander Wallace, 47, of Los Angeles, is charged with the shooting deaths of Michael Radford, 20, and Robert Meekins and Astin Edwards, both 28, at Gable House Bowl at 22501 Hawthorne Blvd. He also faces four counts of attempted murder and one count of possession of a firearm by a felon.The murder charges include the special circumstance allegations of multiple murders and murder to further the activities of a criminal street gang, along with allegations of using a handgun causing great bodily injury and death. Prosecutors will decide later whether to seek the death penalty against Wallace, who was arrested by Torrance police two days after the shooting.Top news of the dayOfficers responded to a shots-fired call just before midnight Jan. 4 at the bowling alley, where a fight involving several people grew into a brawl involving as many as 15, according to police.At some point, Wallace allegedly pulled a handgun from his pocket and fired into the crowd, according to Torrance police Chief Eve Irvine, who said Wallace was believed to have been the only shooter.Relatives of the three victims told reporters they believed the men were killed while trying to break up the fight.Irvine described a scene of "complete chaos" leading up to and following the shooting.Radford, Meekins and Edward were pronounced dead at the scene. Two other people were taken to a hospital for treatment of their injuries and two other men sought medical attention on their own.No employees of the bowling alley, a community fixture for about five decades, were injured."This is a tragic event of major proportions. We've never had an incident like this in the city of Torrance," the police chief said earlier. "It's tragic. Three people lost their lives. Four other people were shot. This is life-changing for so many people."The bowling alley was equipped with surveillance cameras and had security personnel on hand the night of the shooting, Irvine said.Video and other investigative tools led investigators to identify Wallace as the suspected shooter, the police chief said. Wallace had been on parole since 2017 after spending 17 years incarcerated for assault with a deadly weapon involving a firearm, according to Irvine.The criminal complaint alleges that Wallace was convicted of first-degree murder in 1989 when he was a juvenile, and that he was convicted as an adult of bringing or possessing a gun within a school zone in 1997 and assault with a firearm in 1998.Wallace is due back in a Torrance courtroom May 23, when a date is scheduled to be set for a hearing to determine if there is enough evidence to allow the case against him to proceed to trial.Monitoring people's right to effective self-defence..A well regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringedHOW ODD THAT MASSACRES MOSTLY HAPPEN IN "GUN-FREE ZONES"!  When will the brain-dead Left wake up and draw the obvious conclusion?  Gun bans kill kidsAt about 1:30 in the morning of 2 January, 2019, four people attempted a home invasion/burglary in Yuma County, Arizona.I remember the incident as it was reported. Very few details were given. Four people were shot. The location was not revealed.  It was not in the City of Yuma, because the Sheriff department was the responding department. The identity of the defender was not revealed. The firearm or firearms were not identified. Deputies involved were not identified.From foxnews.com, at the time:The Yuma County Sheriff’s Office responded to a 911
 call at approximately 1:38 a.m. Thursday and discovered that four 
individuals were shot after breaking into a home.According
 to a news release, Edith Guerrero, 36, Jaden James, 18, Leonardo 
Gonzalez, 27, and Jessica Aynes, 28, woke the sleeping occupants as they
 entered.The unidentified occupant with the gun fired several rounds, hitting all four suspects and ultimately killing one.I suspected a semi-automatic rifle might have been used. They are especially well suited to repelling multiple home invaders. The investigation was ongoing. More information did not surface until a few days ago.A local radio show had a guest, a conservative woman who was explaining how anti-Second Amendment Presidential Candidate Joe Biden and Senatorial Candidate Mark Kelly were. She casually mentioned they wished to outlaw the sale of semi-automatic rifles. She said the gun used in the incident in January of 2019 would have been outlawed if Biden and Kelly had their preferences.The host of the show is a friend of mine.He helped to refresh my recollection of the incident.By October, 2020 most of the cases stemming from the incident had made their way through the criminal justice system.I contacted the Sheriff's department. A few inquiries lead to the revelation the firearm used to defend the Yuma County home was an clone of the AKM, chambered in 7.62x39.Image AKM from Swedish Museum, CC 4.0 wikimediaThe AKM is a later version of the AK47, made for simplified manufacture.  It is one of the iconic military rifles of the 20th century. Semi-automatic versions have become popular in the United States. It is well suited for home defense in a sparsely populated area.The incident shows many uses of semi-automatic rifles, perhaps most incidents, are never revealed in the media.I heard of the incident when it happened. I actively look for these situations, to document them. I routinely live in Yuma County, Arizona. I suspected a semi-automatic rifle was used.It was only by chance the type of firearm involved in the incident was revealed. If I had not heard the chance comment on the radio show, no one outside of the people directly involved, and a few in the Yuma County government, would ever have known a semi-automatic rifle had been successfully used in home defense.The reporting of firearm types in the media is abysmal. Reporters are seldom knowledgeable about different types of firearms. They are not curious about firearms or calibers. Consequently, we seldom know what firearms are used in self defense incidents.Many have claimed that semi-automatic rifles are not useful for self defense. Incidents such as this one serve as useful counterexamples to show they are mistaken.©2020 by Dean Weingarten: Permission to share is granted when this notice and link are included.Gun WatchIn deference and consideration to opposing opinions, the AK~47 hits it's target like a hammer, which is why I hunt with one. So if it's good enough to hunt wild game with it's more than adequate for home defense, as those four violent criminals found out.tanxPost a CommentJONESBORO, AR (KAIT) -19-year-old Flando Montgomery of Crittenden County and 21-year-old Taurus Bedford of Turrell appeared in court before Judge David Boling on Jan. 7.Montgomery and Bedford both face charges for first degree murder, aggravated robbery, 2 counts of attempted murder, first degree battery and 7 counts of aggravated assault.According to Jonesboro police, Bedford surrendered to police Saturday after the first suspect, Montgomery, also surrendered to Jonesboro police around 12:10 p.m. Saturday.On Jan. 2 around 6 p.m., Jonesboro officers responded to a shooting on the 3500 block of Galaxy Street.Once on scene, officers found four people injured and immediately administered medical attention.The three other people injured were 23-year-old Quenterius Finch, 28-year-old Cedric Finch and 21-year-old Chauncey Thomas, all of Jonesboro.According to court documents, the Bedford and Montgomery were in the residence about an hour and a half earlier buying marijuana.They returned with Bedford entering first and Montgomery following behind.According to the probable cause affidavit, Montgomery shot a 16-year-old victim and then he and Bedford then shot the other victims.Their intent was to rob them.Jonesboro police say Malcom Jemison was fatally wounded, according to a media release from authorities.Montgomery’s bond was set at $10 million and Bedford’s bond was set at $5 million, though the state requested $10 million.Both will appear in court again on Feb. 23.Anyone with information in regards to this case is encouraged to call Crime Stoppers (870) 935-7867, the Jonesboro Police Department Criminal Investigations Division at (870) 935-6710 or the department at (870) 935-5551.Region 8 News will bring you further details as they are made available.Copyright 2019 KAIT. All rights reserved.472 CR 766Jonesboro, AR 72401(870) 931-8888A Gray Media Group, Inc. Station - © 2002-2021 Gray Television, Inc.SectionsWOLOCOLUMBIA, S.C. (WOLO)– A fun night out ringing in the New Year took a scary turn when five people were shot at a local nightclub. All five victims had non-life threatening injuries. One remains in the hospital but the others were released.Witnesses told investigators an argument inside Faces Lounge on Decker Boulevard quickly escalated into a shooting Tuesday morning.“This is not an act of terrorism. This is just a local beef between some individuals and then random individuals end up getting shot. That’s our biggest concern,” Cpt. David Soto said, with RCSD.Some of the victims were rushed to the hospital, while others took themselves. One victim was found at a neighboring Hardee’s parking lot.Cpt. Soto said they are called to Faces Lounge often, or it’s sister bar, Kandy Land. He said the constant battle involves elicit activity in the parking lots, or overcrowding. Cpt. Soto says these are all marks against Faces and their Liquor license under investigation.“It’s a frequent stop area. It’s either that or another nightclub owned by the same individual that we constantly have to deal with,” Cpt. Soto said.The most common complaint against Faces: noise complaints from neighbors and operating after hours. Faces Lounge is supposed to stop selling liquor and close at 2 a.m. but Cpt. Soto said they will often be open until 6.“We’re not saying we don’t want night clubs. We want responsible club owners. We want responsible patrons going to these establishments,” Cpt. Soto said.A person of interest has been identified in the shooting. Anyone with information should call Crimestoppers at 1-888-CRIME-SC.To get alerts for breaking news,download the ABC Columbia News AppforiPhoneorAndroidWeatherMost PopularGovernor Henry McMaster reacts to Darla Moore ending her association with UofSCAtlanta man arrested after being found in Publix bathroom with several firearms, body armor.Police learn more about the motive in deadly Georgia spa shootingsUSC's biggest donor blasts UofSC in letter sent to board, administrationA new restaurant opens in Columbia in hopes of attracting 'Greedy Rascals'On TwitterTweets by @abc_columbiaFacebookABC Columbia© 2021 ABC Columbia.